,Job Title,Salary Range,Job Description,Rating,Company Name,Location,Headquarters,Size,Founded,Type of ownership,Industry,Sector,Revenue,Competitors
0,Digital Transformation and Data Analyst (Claims),$40k-$71k (Glassdoor Est.),"Are You Driven?® We Are.

We are a company of driven, enthusiastic and determined people. We celebrate achievement and success. We foster innovation, determination and recognition. Because of that, our employees feel recognized and rewarded for the contributions they make on a daily basis. At GAINSCO, It is our people that set us apart.

If you are looking for a place where you can make a difference, perceive how your work impacts the company, and be recognized for your efforts and passion, then GAINSCO is the company for you.

Why Join GAINSCO?

By joining GAINSCO, you become part of a dynamic and growing organization that has been recognized as a Top Workplace in both our Dallas and Miami offices.

GAINSCO’s work environment rewards engaged individuals who have a desire to contribute and succeed. That’s because our culture encourages individuals to grow their skills as they build their careers. Come join us and become a champion with GAINSCO.

What does a DIGITAL TRANSFORMATION& DATA ANALYST (CLAIMS) do?
Uncover and communicate performance trends and actionable insights to the business.
Leverage data insights and incorporate these findings to accelerate the digital transformation efforts of the Claims Department.
Complete ad-hoc analysis and offer recommendations based on your findings.
Proactively collaborate with all levels of the Claims organization and offer data-focused support to any relevant business challenges.
Interpret data and analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing reports
Develop, implement and maintain business monitoring reports
Perform data validation and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and data quality/accuracy
Work with IT to maintain accessibility to databases/data systems
Additional projects as requested
What is required?

Education:
Bachelor’s degree in Mathematics, Risk Management, Economics, Computer Science, Information Management, Statistics or Actuarial.
Experience:
1-2 years of working experience as a data analyst preferred
Ability to identify potentially hidden trends and communicate actionable insights based on your findings.
Experience working within an Auto Insurance Claims department is preferred.
Advanced skills in performing mathematical calculations
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
Technical expertise regarding data models, database design development, data mining and segmentation techniques
Advanced computer skills, specifically in databases and spreadsheets (Excel, SAS, MSSQL preferred, Python, R)
Experience with Machine Learning and Artificial Intelligence is preferred.
Excellent written and verbal communication
Excellent organization skills
Other skills and abilities:
A strong desire to be a part of the conversations that result in improving business processes and results.
Ability to communicate and simplify the complex with a wide variety of stakeholders.
Ability to manage own time while prioritizing multiple tasks
Required behaviors for all positions:
Communicate with co-workers, management, customers, vendors, and others in a courteous and professional manner
Conform with and abide by all Company codes, regulations, policies, values, work procedures and instructions
Regular attendance
What else do you need to know?
Competitive Salary based on experience.
Excellent benefits package: medical& dental (Basic plan FREE), vision insurance, life insurance, short term and long term disability insurance.
Parental Leave Policy.
401K + Company Match.
Paid Vacation + Sick days + Floating Holidays + Company determined Holidays.
All offers are contingent upon a background investigation (including employment, education, criminal and DMV verification- when applicable) and a pre-employment drug test with results satisfactory to GAINSCO.",3.8,"GAINSCO
3.8","Dallas, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1978,Company - Public,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
1,Sr. Data Science Analyst- Customer Analytics,$48k-$83k (Glassdoor Est.),"Sr. Data Science Analyst is reporting to the Director of Customer Analytics and is responsible for broad range of analytics used in establishing customer strategies and providing valuable customer-centric data insights for cross-functional audience including Merchandising, Marketing and Supply Chain.
In this role candidate will build out and automate reports & dashboards, extract data from multiple sources to build models/algorithms used to fine-tune customer strategies, and build more advanced AI/machine learning tools and processes.
The person in this role must possess strong data analytical skills and technical skills used in data engineering (mining from multiple sources/systems), predictive scenario modeling and machine learning knowledge.
In this role candidate will build out and automate reports & dashboards, extract data from multiple sources to build models/algorithms used to fine-tune customer strategies, and build more advanced AI/machine learning tools and processes.
The person in this role must possess strong data analytical skills and technical skills used in data engineering (mining from multiple sources/systems), predictive scenario modeling and machine learning knowledge.

Essential Functions:
Analytics & Data engineering:
• Automating reports, dashboards, and other performance tools
• Data engineering/mining (collecting, transforming, cleansing and analyzing)
• Providing valuable business analytics and insights out of data samples thru hypothesis testing
• Utilizing different databases and connections and 3rd party data sets to enhance analytics scope
• Building data visualizations in Tableau, R-Shiny or other
• Providing ad-hoc analysis and presenting results in a clear manner

AI/Machine Learning & Programing:
• Building AI/machine learning tools to optimize analytics and processes within the company
• Applying statistical methods and building machine learning algorithms (such as k-NN, Naive Bayes, SVM, Decision Forests)
• Using query languages such as SQL
• Utilizing data science toolkits such as R and Python (excellence in at least one of these)
• Maintaining expert-level knowledge on data science trends, technologies, and methodologies
• Scoring of key attributes used in deep statistical analysis and modeling
• Leading in defining the project methodologies and approach

Other skills:
• Data affinity with attention to detail
• Solution and problem-solving oriented
• Strong Communication Skills (ability to communicate complex data in a simple way)
• Strong Presentation Skills and Technical Writing Skills
• Ability to work within a diverse background team or independently

• Able to quickly interpret the data and transition it into tangible business recommendationd

Education / Experience Requirements:
Position Contribution Level :
Intermediate Level

Minimum Education & Experience:
• Bachelor's degree in data science, statistics, computer science, business or related field, required
• Proven success in using data-driven analysis to assess opportunities and drive results

Preferred Education & Experience:
• Master’s degree in data science, statistics, computer science or related field preferred
• Prior Retail Experience with min 3 years in Customer Analytics or Marketing preferred
• PhD in data science, statistics, computer science or related field welcome

Knowledge / Skills Requirements:
• Strong analytical and data wrangling skills allowing to move quickly through large volumes of data
• Aggressive in pursuing opportunities and focused on providing technical and analytical business solutions to drive store level results
• Creative thinker focused of problem solving, finding efficiencies and streamlining processes
• Strong communicator with ability to work in group environment
• Flexible and adaptable, team-player able to work in a dynamic group environment
• Passionate for coaching and development of talent
• Ability to manage time and workload effectively with flexibility to shift focus/priorities at a moment's notice
• An ability to influence cross-functionally across a wide range of business areas and levels
• Excellent written and verbal communication skills

Accessibility Guidelines:
Belkcareers.com is committed to making the on-line application experience easy and accessible to individuals with disabilities. We are constantly making improvements to comply with the spirit of the ""Americans with Disabilities Act,"" and the Web Content Accessibility Guidelines. If any of the information on the belkcareers.com website is not accessible to you due to a disability, please contact us via email at HRSharedServices@Belk.com. Please provide the location of the inaccessible information and the format you wish to have the information presented and we will be happy to send it to you, either via your email address or a separate mailing address you provide. If you prefer, you may contact one of our friendly Shared Services representatives at 1-800-588-3700 and we will be happy to assist you with the application process.

We are an Equal Opportunity Employer:
We treat all our associates and candidates as equals. We require all associates and managers to do so too and comply with employment laws and regulations. All personnel actions are conducted in the spirit of equal employment. We are committed to recruit, train, promote and retain associates without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identification and expression, national origin, marital status, age, disability, genetic information, military status, sexual orientation or any other characteristic protected by applicable local, state or federal laws.

#LI-SE1
#IND3",3.1,"Belk
3.1","Charlotte, NC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1888,Company - Private,"Department, Clothing, & Shoe Stores",Retail,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
2,Data Analyst,$34k-$59k (Glassdoor Est.),"Reduces risk of lost revenue to the company through research, monitoring system functions, and business rule development of system changes.

·
Locates, validates, and analyzes data utilizing tools such as Excel, SQL, Access, and VBA, from disparate sources to support Revenue Cycle goals.

·
Combines data from all systems in the RCM life cycle (credentialing, EMR, and clearinghouse), claim transactions, and data elements provided in policies from payers and government entities to influence and initiate changes in claim outcomes, payer behavior, or system processing.

·
Conducts trending on baseline metrics (billing, collection, and remittance) and assists with the development and resolution of action plans

·
Identifies issues and conducts analysis and/or audits (i.e. gap analysis, audit summary) of payer and/or clinic issues and escalations

·
Monitors key tasks to ensure turn-around time is being met and escalating issues timely

·
Compiles data in a systematic fashion, clearly documenting assumptions and validating accuracy of information to resolve inconsistencies

·
Identifies trends within large datasets and has the ability to summarize, graph, and communicate findings

·
Researches charging/billing questions for new and existing services to ensure appropriate revenue recognition

·
Analyzes data to identify likely relationships, summarizes data, and prepares summary materials for discussion with clinical and finance teams

·
Runs and extracts accurate reports from software tools

·
Prepares training materials to document a task and cross train for coverage

·
High School graduate or equivalent; college graduate preferred

·
Experience in health care or analyst position is an advantage

·
Experience in Excel

·
Strong attention to detail required",4.4,"Team Rehabilitation
4.4","Clinton, MI",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
3,Data Analyst,$41k-$77k (Glassdoor Est.),"Gupta Media is looking for a Data Analyst to join our Strategy & Analytics team to assist with reporting, tracking, data analysis, advertising strategy, and visualization needs. In this role you will work internally to assist paid media analysts with reporting requests as well as externally to provide clients with insights regarding their advertising campaigns. Advanced knowledge of Excel is a requirement, and 1-2 years of experience managing paid advertising campaigns or working in digital advertising is preferred.

Responsibilities:
Reporting
Comfort with Excel, Powerpoint, Google Data Studio, Google Docs and Google Sheets is required.
Maintaining customized dashboards in Google Sheets and Excel that are updated on a daily/weekly cadence.
Generating pivot tables and other visualizations that summarize thousands of lines of data.
Prefer candidates with experience in translating performance media metrics into a coherent, digestible reports for client ad campaigns.
Assist with the creation of Power Point/Google Slide decks.
Strategy
Understand advertising trends within a single project and across multiple projects to help guide media buying strategy.
Learn client’s business and align the media strategy with business goals. Understand concepts like LTV, ROAS and Incremental Revenue.
Discuss strategy with clients to gain trust and shareholder buy-in on media strategy and results.
Requirements:
Bachelor’s Degree or higher.
2-3 years of experience as a data analyst or comparable position.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Excel, Powerpoint, Google Data Studio, Google Docs and Google sheets.
Nice-to-have: Tableau, Python, SQL, ETL Services
An absolute love for data. You have no problem tearing apart a problem, and living inside a spreadsheet to find the answer to any question.
Driven, motivated, enthusiastic attitude. You want to take on challenges, and you are excited to find the solution in the most effective way possible.
About The Agency

Gupta Media is an agency with three specialties – media buying, creative services and technology solutions. We do our best work when all three are working in unison. Our client roster includes brands like Amazon, Red Bull, Movember and Fender, music festivals like Boston Calling, The Governor’s Ball and Afropunk, and record labels like Sony Music, Universal Music and Warner Music Group.

We pride ourselves on being innovative, competitive and disruptive in the digital space. Due to this, we’ve organically grown to dominate our target industries. Now, we want to apply what we already know to other industries.",2.9,"Gupta Media
2.9","Boston, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
4,Data Analyst,$34k-$60k (Glassdoor Est.),"When you’re the best, we’re the best. We instill an environment where employees feel engaged, satisfied and able to contribute their unique skills and talents. We provide extensive opportunities for personal and professional development, building both employee competence and organizational capability to fuel exceptional performance now and in the future.

Summary:

In this role, you will perform analyses, data management, and research. You will answer methodology and data source questions from internal teams through the use of available data sources, documentation processes, and data methodology tools.

Responsibilities:
Understand data source and business processes and how they fit into overall business needs.
Interpret trends, regulatory changes, and/or forecasts and anticipates impact for the company.
Define requirement dashboards and reports that enable information sharing with stakeholders.
Ensure quality and timely project delivery while working closely with stakeholders (internal and external).
Establish and maintain relationships with stakeholders to effectively manage expectations.
Assist with planning and participating in stakeholder meetings to gather requirements and/or understand current business processes.
Qualifications:
Relevant degree preferred. Mathematics, Accounting, or Finance degree a plus.
2 or more years of relevant work experience required.
Must be proficient in Microsoft Excel with the ability for creation, manipulation, and interpretation of data.
Strong analytical, database, and spreadsheet skills.
Tableau and Access database experience desirable.
Equal Opportunity Employer: Females/Minorities/Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities

The Company is committed to equal employment opportunity to all employees and applicants without regard to race, religion, color, gender identity, ethnicity, age, national origin, sexual orientation, disability status, veteran status or any other category protected by applicable law.",4.0,"Vizient
4.0","Irving, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1977,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
5,Data Analyst,$40k-$71k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Analyst

We are OpenSquare. We believe that people with a purpose need a place to be their best. From Seattle area skyscrapers to the Pacific Northwest’s premier Universities and medical facilities, we design and create insightful spaces with the latest technology providing our clients an environment that embodies their image and encourages success. Splice is the professional services division of OpenSquare, providing FF&E project integration, post-occupancy and MAC management for some of the most well-known companies in the Seattle area.

The Data Analyst provides critical business intelligence for the Splice team, specifically focused on building in-depth knowledge of relevant databases, processes and programs. Additionally, this role provides strategic information to key stakeholders through data mining of corporate databases and by deeply understanding business processes and programs. This role will also drive the development and communication of business performance reporting analysis

Location: South Lake Union

*Please note that due to an influx of candidate submittals, we are only reviewing candidates located in the Seattle/surrounding cities area*

The Data Analyst will:
Work closely with account managers and other stakeholders to support customer data questions and analysis
Interpret data and identify trends using statistical techniques, generate reports and visualizations
Support development and maintenance of databases, data collection systems, analytics and other strategies to optimize operational efficiency
Develop a deep understanding of the processes underlying our data to identify opportunities for data integrity, normalization and quality assurance initiatives
Develop metrics and dashboards for monitoring data trends or telling stories
Train end users on new tools, reports and dashboards
Qualified Candidates will have:
1-3 years’ experience in data analysis, modeling and/or visualization. Education may be substituted in lieu of work experience
Bachelor’s degree from an accredited university in a quantitative field
Experience with Python & SQL required
Experience with Tableau, Bokeh or other data visualization tools is heavily preferred.
Ability to work with stakeholders to assess potential risks
Ability to translate business needs into non-technical, lay terms
Experience handling large data sets
Benefits include:
15 days of PTO
9 Paid Holidays
Medical/Dental/Vision
401K
If this sounds like the right opportunity for you, please apply with your resume today! We look forward to connecting.",2.9,"OpenSquare
2.9","Seattle, WA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
6,Data Analyst,-1,"Data Analyst If you are a Data Analyst with SQL Server experience, please read on! We are a top rated financial firm that is looking to expand our Data Team. If you like to take the lead on projects, develop SQL scripts, and are a Data Wizard, this could be the job for you! What You Will Be Doing - Design/Develop SQL scrpts, Functions, Views, Triggers, Stored Procedures - Create SQL Mail Agent, Alerts, and schedule DTS and SSIS Packages - Migrate data from various formats into our SQL server database with automated processes - Work closely with the team to develop requirements for data What You Need for this Position Qualifications: - 2+ years working with SQL Server - Familiarity with SSIS Nice to haves: - SSRS - SSAS - Stored Procedures - SQL Mail Agent - DTS/SSIS Packages What's In It for You - Competitive base salary - Great benefits - Work for a talented data team in a well established financial firm So, if you are a Data Analyst with experience, please apply today! - Applicants must be authorized to work in the U.S.
CyberCoders, Inc is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.

Your Right to Work In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire.",4.2,"CyberCoders
4.2","Chesapeake, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1999,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
7,Data Analyst,$74k-$101k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Analyst
Position Summary
We have a need for Data Analyst with experience in data analytics and metrics optimization. We will need you to assist in collecting data and putting it to practical use, with the end goal of maximizing profits and increasing our efficiency. We are interested in furthering our data collection and analysis practices, so you will recommend new data procedures and programs. You’ll be responsible for processing several different types of data, including those related to our website and online presence, and our multi-channel marketing campaigns and launches.
Responsibilities
As our Data Analyst, you will report to the Director of Marketing Technology. Your role will be to work across the marketing organization and cross-functional teams (IT, sales operations, finance, and CRM salesforce) to gather, analyze and share qualitative and quantitative analysis.
Evaluate the multichannel impact of marketing activities on engagement, sales and ROI
Develop and refine techniques used to measure engagement, conversion and trends for marketing efforts, including campaigns and ongoing programs
Create a baseline marketing performance and build a process to streamline measurement
Ensure timely delivery of reporting and insights, and build user-friendly answers to basic marketing questions (e.g., executive dashboards)
Use data mining and other analytical techniques to gain insight into customers to improve the effectiveness of communications and products
Improve the presentation and communication of marketing analytics across the organization
Benchmark marketing metrics against relevant standards and competitors
Identify and suggest optimization opportunities to appropriate executional teams
Conduct other ad-hoc analysis and reporting on request
Required Qualifications
Our ideal candidate will have three years of professional experience with marketing data at an investment firm or in a financial services company’s investment unit.
Strong background in quantitative analysis (e.g., statistics, finance, mathematics or economics)
Ability to aggregate, standardize, interpret and model data, and to work independently within a decentralized environment
Analytic modeling using methods such as basic statistics, software-assisted segmentation and linear regression
Digital marketing platform skills, including common website analytics platforms, widely used ad serving and technology platforms, social listening and analytics platforms, and mobile site and mobile app analytics platforms
Advanced Excel skills (pivots, tables and functions)
Familiarity with database queries and programming languages (e.g., SQL)
Excellent written and verbal communication skills, including the ability to convey complex ideas clearly and to communicate with both technical and nontechnical audiences
Degree in Statistics, Mathematics, Operations Research or relevant experience",2.3,"The Rockridge Group
2.3","Concord, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
8,Data Analyst,-1,"Description:

***Note: This is a contingent opportunity***
SNA International seeks a bright, collaborative Data Analyst with a strong work ethic to join our team. SNA International’s team works together in pursuit of the same cause: build a safe and just world by empowering organizations in the use of forensics, biometrics, and identity intelligence.
Qualified candidates will utilize their statistical and analytical skills to conduct full lifecycle analysis to include requirements, activities, and design. Data analysts will develop analysis and reporting capabilities. They will also monitor performance documentation, and metrics to identify improvements.
The following list is representative of the types of activities and responsibilities anticipated to be performed, but are not limited to:
Responsibilities:
Interpret data and analyze results using statistical techniques.
Develop and implement data analyses, data collection systems, and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality.
Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintaining databases.
Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques, and provide ongoing reports.
Develop and implement databases, data collection systems, data analytics, and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality.
Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintain databases/data systems.
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets.
Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques, and provide ongoing reports.
Filter and “clean” data by reviewing computer reports, printouts, and performance indicators to locate and correct code problems.
Work with management to prioritize business and information needs.
Locate and define new process improvement opportunities.
Support additional activities, functions, or duties, as required.
Minimum Education and Experience Requirements:
Bachelor’s degree in Business, Economics, Computer Science, Information Management, Statistics, or in another field with demonstrable coursework in these areas.
Proven working experience as a data analyst or business data analyst.
Strong knowledge of and experience with reporting packages (e.g. Business Objects), databases (e.g. SQL), programming (e.g. XML, JavaScript, or ETL frameworks)
Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical packages for analyzing datasets (e.g. Excel, SPSS, SAS)
Possess strong written and verbal communication skills
Proficient in MS Word, PowerPoint, Excel, and Adobe Acrobat
Attention to detail and strong organizational skills
The ability to prioritize job responsibilities in a fast-paced environment while maintaining a focus on excellent customer service is a must.
This position is located in Quantico, Va.
Candidates must be US citizens and able to pass a background check, drug screening, and a polygraph (if required).

Please submit your resume and a cover letter that outlines why you should be considered for this position and position level. Applications without a cover letter will not be considered.

No phone calls

SNA International is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, or protected veteran status and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability.",4.1,"SNA International
4.1","Quantico, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Contract,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
9,Data Analyst,$37k-$67k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Overview

Donegal Insurance Group is a regional property-casualty insurance company doing business in 26 states, headquartered in Marietta, PA, with 7 regional offices located in Athens, GA, Le Mars, IA, Grand Rapids, MI, Albuquerque, NM, Greenville, OH, Glen Allen, VA, and Sheboygan Falls, WI.

Donegal offers a broad range of personal and commercial insurance products sold exclusively through our network of independent agents. We are committed to the independent agency system and proud of the company's heritage, which spans over 130 years. Donegal's strong financial foundation and successful operating strategies have earned the company a rating of 'A' (Excellent) by the A.M. Best Company, the nation's leading insurance rating organization.

Job Summary

Donegal Insurance Group has an opening for a Data Analyst to work in the Business Intelligence area. Primary responsibility will be to provide data for business intelligence solutions for all functional areas based on business need. This role will work closely with IT to acquire data, identify analytical requirements and perform business analysis using various techniques, e.g. statistical analysis, explanatory and predictive modeling, data mining. This role will help in determining best practices and develop actionable insights and recommendations for the current business operations. This role will help ensure business intelligence applications and analyses enhance business decision-making capabilities.

Responsibilities and Duties
Based on business requirements, provide data from multiple sources for use in building analytical solutions which enhance decision-making and/or refine operations.
Aid in the interpretation of results from multiple sources using a variety of techniques, ranging from simple data aggregation to complex data mining.
Coordinate the use of data to develop, modify, and enhance reports and dashboards based on user requirements.
Create, enhance, and maintain data models/sets.
Identify business trends and problems through data analysis.
Collaborate with business users and members of IT, including business analysts, database architects, and managers.
Gather and document user requirements.
Perform usability testing and report data validation against end user requirements.
Gain familiarity with data structure in the Donegal data warehouse and various data marts.
Exhibit a commitment to data quality by validating results against requirements.
Ensure duties are performed in adherence to all Federal, State, and Local laws and regulations.
Comply with guidelines, policies, and directives outlined in the company handbook and department manuals.
Provide timely, courteous, and quality customer service to customers.
Clearly demonstrate commitment and participation to team goals and objectives.
Reliable attendance and punctuality.
Qualifications and Skills
Bachelors Degree in Business Intelligence, Computer Sciences, Information Technology, Data Science, Data & Analytics, Mathematics, Statistics, Actuarial Science or related field required.
1-2 years of related experience preferred.
Experience working with property/casualty insurance preferred
PC skills to include:
Microsoft Office applications
Power BI, SSRS and Excel
SQL
Oracle
Relational and dimensional modeling concepts
DAX and M expression languages
Open-Source Software (e.g. R / Python)
Benefits

Donegal Insurance Group offers a comprehensive benefits package for all full-time, permanent positions. Learn more about our benefit offerings by visiting our Benefits page.

Additional Information

Donegal Insurance Group participates in E-Verify in the following states: Alabama, Arizona, Georgia, Louisiana, Mississippi, Nebraska, North Carolina, South Carolina, Tennessee, and Utah. If you reside in one of the listed states, please review the ""Notice of E-Verify Participation"" and the ""Right to Work Poster"" on the links below:
Notice of E-Verify Participation Poster (English and Spanish)
Right to Work Poster (English and Spanish)
Powered by JazzHR",3.7,"Donegal Insurance Group
3.7","Marietta, PA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1889,Company - Public,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
10,Data Analyst,$39k-$68k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Southcentral Foundation (SCF) Data Analyst is responsible for data mining, analysis and statistical reporting of data to support operations, research, and regulatory requirements using structured query language. May also be responsible for user training/support, application support and automation of business processes.

Minimum Qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree in information management, statistics, finance and/or healthcare related field; or combination of equivalent training/education and experience.
Two years experience in data mining, extraction, analysis and reporting using structured query language, analyzer, data and report writing tools such as MS Query Analyzer/SQL Enterprise Manager, PL/SQL, Aqua Data, Crystal Reports or SQL Reporting Services.

Additional Qualifications for Data Analyst II: Meets all requirements of Data Analyst I in addition to the following:

One year experience in using healthcare coding schemes and/or financial coding schemes

Additional Qualifications for Data Analyst III: Meets all requirements of Data Analyst II in addition to the following:

Master’s Degree with a focus in information management, statistics, healthcare related field; or equivalent training/education and experience.
One year of experience using statistical software such as SPSS, SAS or other analysis tools.
One year experience in using healthcare coding schemes and/or financial coding schemes.",3.5,"Southcentral Foundation
3.5","Anchorage, AK",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1982,Company - Private,Membership Organizations,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
11,Cybersecurity Data Analyst,-1,"Job Summary/Company:

Our partner, a Federal contractor, is seeking a Cybersecurity Data Analyst who can leverage a wide variety of data science capabilities and languages, analyze and resolve critical data issues using various methodologies and ensure data integrity. If you are interested in learning more about Sparks Group and the opportunity, please submit your resume today.

Responsibilities:

Collect, validate, model, and analyze data from different data sources
Create infographics and visualizations for inclusion Cybersecurity briefings and presentations
Collaborate with key stakeholders to gather reporting requirements
Develop key metrics, interpret performance trends, identify root causes, and support data-based performance improvement
Build a maintainable cyber risk reporting process

Qualifications/Background Profile:

Bachelor’s degree in Operation Research, Engineering, Analytics, Data Science, Economics, Applied Mathematics, Statistics, or related field
2 years of experience with data-oriented tasks for cybersecurity operations
Access experience needed
Public Trust security clearance

Qualified candidates should send their resume AND call Sparks Group for additional details. Please note, resume must include a valid email address in order to be considered. We look forward to discussing your background, your current job search, and your potential career path with Sparks Group!

Sparks Group is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, pregnancy, citizenship, family status, genetic information, disability, or protect veteran status.

Sponsored by Sparks Group",4.4,"Sparks Group
4.4","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Research & Development,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
12,Data Analyst,$45k-$63k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Analyst


Date Posted: 12/9/2018

Primary Duties
- Uses InfoMaker and/or SQL to run queries to extract student, graduate, faculty employee, and other information from the Jenzabar Ex software system
- Performs appropriate tests to ensure accuracy and consistency of all data, documents query/report criteria and processes to ensure consistent application of methodology in future projects
- Builds and maintains at least four database systems (student, graduate, faculty, and staff) for ease of completing multi-year data summaries for dissemination
- Acquires, organizes, analyzes, and synthesizes data and results from internal and external data sources to produce meaningful and accurate reports including the annual Fact Book
- Completes all required and requested institutional surveys
- Updates and maintains the Institutional Research and the Quality Enhancement Plan (IR/QEP) Manual
Other Duties
- Develops an effective system using sound strategies for obtaining quality data from various internal and external sources
- Prepares statistical reports on operational performance of the IR/QEP office and the IAER Title III activity as requested (weekly, monthly, quarterly and annually)
- Interacts with Paine's faculty, staff and administration as a group, sub-groups, or individually to identify suitable data, information, and research needs in collaboration with the IR/QEP and IAER
Qualifications
Education: Bachelor's degree required, master's degree preferred, in the field of computer science, statistics, mathematics, information systems, economics or other field that included significant coursework in a related field from a regionally or nationally accredited college or university.
Experience: Minimum of three (3) years' experience as a Data Analyst or in a related position, minimum of two (2) years of experience extracting data from a query system such as InfoMaker or from a relational database such as Jenzabar Ex using another query system, experience maintaining and reporting data for a college or university's Institutional Research office, advanced level experience collecting and analyzing complex data, both narrative and statistical; experience maintaining and reporting data for a college or university's Institutional Research website would be an excellent asset
Other
- Strong analytical skills including, but not limited to, data analysis A
- Ability to collect data from internally or externally developed surveys, process and analyze data, and prepare reports for dissemination of results to stakeholders with minimum supervision
- Intermediate to advanced ability to use all Microsoft Office 365 components
- Excellent communication (verbal and written)/interpersonal skills
- Successful history of handling confidential information and completing assignments when deadlines are critical
- Ability to explain concepts/data to technical and non-technical personas/groups
- Ability to work effectively alone and with a team
- Must be able to deliver work in a timely and consistent manner
- Self-motivated and Innovative

Salary
Salary Range: $35,000 - $37,250
FLSA Classification: Exempt
Terms of Employment: 12 months",3.4,"Paine College
3.4","Augusta, GA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1882,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
13,Data Analyst,-1,"Data Analyst

Category: Information Systems
Type: Contractor
Description: An International company, located in Plano, TX, is seeking a Data Analyst for a 4+ month contract role.

Description:

The Data Analyst is responsible for, but not limited to: monitoring the COVID-19 related data in Workday HR system and a custom Power BI application for missing / inaccurate data, performing data audits, troubleshooting and investigating data anomalies and issues, and working with the business and IT to resolve data issues (proactively and reactively). The role will be working across multiple business units (i.e. IT, local HR, third party nurses, etc.) and locations virtually to help guarantee the quality of the data. The position will require flexibility, adaptability, and advanced experience utilizing Workday and Excel. The desired candidate should be deadline driven, work well under pressure, possess a strong customer service mindset, have excellent communication skills, and can build and maintain relationships across the organization.

Requirements:

BS or BA degree in computer science, business administration, or related technical field or equivalent experience is preferred
1-3 years"" experience working with large datasets
Strong Excel proficiency
Workday functional expertise required (including EIB (Enterprise Interface Buildier) and advanced reporting)
Detail oriented
Critical thinker
Ability to formulate and present recommendations regarding functional and technical solutions
Excellent written and verbal communication, presentation and organizational skills, and the ability to build strong working relationships with technical and non-technical teams alike at all levels including senior management
Must be able to video interview
Location Plano , TX
Minimum Experience (yrs):
Required Education: Not Specified
Benefits:

Return to search results Email this job to a friend

*Logged in members may also add jobs to their job cart",3.8,"Login Consulting Services
3.8","El Segundo, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
14,Data Analyst,-1,"We are looking for an organized, detail-oriented Data Analyst to join our Operations team. You will be responsible for collecting, maintaining, and analyzing data that drives our day to day business as well as translating data into insights and working closely with our leadership to help guide our business strategy.

Responsibilities

The Data Analyst will:

• Collect data from primary or secondary data sources and maintain databases/data systems.

• Utilize strong Microsoft Excel and SQL skills to provide high-quality data analysis.

• Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing reports that effectively communicate trends, patterns and predictions using relevant data.

• Manage and complete time-sensitive monthly data tracking and reporting projects.

• Develop and implement databases, data collection systems, data analytics and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality.

• Fix coding errors investigate data anomalies and other data-related problems.

• Assist in building predictive systems to help catch issues before they arise and assist in building and supporting monthly financial reporting.

• Own the design of advanced analytics dashboards and KPI reports in our BI tool starting from requirements gathering across sales, product, and senior leadership teams to the delivery of a final, polished reports in production.

• Use data to answer key questions about the business and deliver takeaways from data with statistical significance.

• Provide timely, valuable solutions for ad hoc analyses via SQL with a focus to detail on crafting scripts that can be easily manipulated to efficiently address similar future analyses.

• Be the go-to person for any ad-hoc data-related questions.

Skills

• 2-5 years of experience in data, consulting, analytics, or a related function involving quantitative data analysis to solve problems.

• Technical expertise regarding data models, database design development, data mining and segmentation techniques.

• Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy.

• Proficiency in using SQL and advanced knowledge of Microsoft Excel.

• Experience designing reports and dashboards with data visualization tools such as Tableau and Microsoft Power BI.

• Experience with using an ETL management tool to collect data from various sources into analytical databases.

• Adept at queries, report writing and presenting findings.

• Data-oriented personality, great communication skills, and an excellent eye for details.

• Accountability is key needs to have drive, urgency and be self-motivated.

• BS in Mathematics, Economics, Computer Science, Information Management or Statistics is a plus.",-1,CompuForce,"New York, NY",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
15,Data Analyst,$78k-$136k (Glassdoor Est.),"Skills:

Data management (ability to run and manage large data sets) - MUST HAVE

Statistics and statistical modeling - MUST HAVE

REDCap Experience. Research Electronic Data Capture (REDCap) is a secure, HIPAA-compliant, web-based system for building and managing web-based research projects such as surveys and databases- MUST HAVE

Epidemiology

Quantitative Analysis

Qualitative Research

Skills in SAS, Stata, IMP SPSS

Survey design

Experience:

7+ Years of experience in data analysis, project design/planning

Quantitative/statistical methods

Qualitative research methods/analysis

Medical and clinical protocol writing

Business strategy including marking research

Data collection and management

Project management

Data scraping/wrangling

Multivariate modeling, data visualization

Years of data warehouse experience (ETL processes and DW modeling)

Management experience on database driven applications implementation",3.7,"Altimetrik Corp
3.7","Santa Clara, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
16,Data Analyst,-1,"Sprezzatura seeks a Data Analyst for the Department of Veteran Affairs VETPS contract. The qualified candidate will work collaboratively with both stakeholders and their Agile Scrum team members to serve as the team's data quality and process standards manager for an advanced cloud-based data and analytics platform. This 100% remote telework position requires candidates to demonstrate excellent communications and coordination skills as well as superior task ownership capabilities.

Roles/Responsibilities:

As the team's Data Analyst, you will work with ETL engineers, DBAs, solution architects, system SMEs, and the Product Management team member to:
Support the review, ingest, cleansing, testing, and release management activities of this D&A platform
Provide general IT and testing support to ensure VEO Ingest data meets quality standards
Scan and identify data anomalies, develop cleansing procedures, and support solution testing
Contribute to the development of customer deliverables, product artifacts, customer communications, and technical support efforts
Skills & Qualifications:
Experience interpreting and analyzing large data sets (1TB+)
Experience with Determine predictive models/ML algorithm a plus
Must be able to use qualitative and quantitative analytical skills to assess the effectiveness of IT operations.
Analytical and investigation skills
Must be able to develop processes for tracking configuration Items including customer provided items
Must be able to develop and maintain a Configuration Management plan, Configuration Management, and Document Management procedures
Must be able to track all problems and changes in work products and report changes and current configuration
Ability to work independently with minimal guidance and supervision
Well organized
Ability to meet deadlines
Works well in an agile IT solution delivery team environment
Ability to obtain a public trust clearance
Other Requirements:
A bachelor's degree in a technical field, is required.
5+ years of experience.
Exceptional organizational skills, attention to detail, and ability to work under tight deadlines
Location: Remote
Veteran Preference: Yes.
Citizenship/Security: Citizen/Green Card.
Must be able to hold a federal security clearance.",5.0,"Sprezzatura Management Consulting
5.0",Remote,-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
17,Data Analyst,$46k-$79k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Summary
Responsible for developing queries, stored procedures and/or subject specific data sets to use in the creation/maintenance of graphical and analytic reports in support of internal and external clients as well as assisting senior management with decision making. Compiles and analyzes information from various sources to support performance improvement, outreach, disease management, complex case management, and utilization management, financial and operational initiatives throughout MedStar Family Choice. Supports HEDIS throughout the year with proactive reporting of wellness measures. Responsible for accuracy, quality and timeliness of data and analytics delivered by fulfilling a data steward role. Interacts seamlessly with all levels of the organization, Technical and Non-Technical to gain an understanding of specific reporting requirements for regulatory reporting purposes.
Minimum Qualifications

Education/Training:

Bachelor’s degree in Healthcare Administration, Finance, Information Technology, Business Administration or related field or a combination of equivalent experience and education. Master’s degree preferred.

Experience:

5 years experience in relational database management and analysis, experience in managed care or healthcare related organizations preferred. Experience with Microsoft SQL Server, T-SQL, SQL Server Reporting Services (SRSS), MS Office, Email and Messaging Systems.

License/Cert/Reg:

No special certification, registration or licensure required.

Knowledge, Skills & Abilities:

Project management, problem resolution, strategic and tactical planning. Ability to convey verbal and written information effectively. Moderate level of problem solving. Identifies and proposes solutions to moderately complex problems. Must be skilled in healthcare payer data model, data governance, data quality and data management. Requires advanced knowledge of relational database management, SQL, various reporting tools, and other applications necessary for data analysis. Must be comfortable with initiating discussions with all levels of staff to clarify and understand complex reporting requirements.

Primary Duties and Responsibilities
Contributes to the achievement of established department goals and objectives and adheres to department policies, procedures, quality standards, and safety standards. Complies with governmental and accreditation regulations.
Analyzes and interprets both clinical and financial data using knowledge of healthcare claims, including various coding guidelines (e.g., CPT, HCPCS, ICD-9 & 10-CM), healthcare finance, and regulatory agency guidelines.
Collaborates with multidisciplinary staff and senior management to design, implement, and evaluate outcomes for operational improvement initiatives. Analyzes and presents results to cross-functional teams to help shape outreach and disease management initiatives.
Ensures that monthly and quarterly reports are prepared and delivered on a timely basis. Develops ad-hoc reports as necessary from data warehouses.
Establishes and maintains a functional documentation system including necessary rules/regulations and standardizes all related procedures.
Leads and implements improvements, enhancements, updates, and modifications to administrative, clinical and/or financial data that enhances overall business operations and effectiveness.
Maintains current knowledge of the Medicaid managed care industry, and researches potential policies, practices, and trends. Translates this knowledge into innovative reports and analyses for use by senior management.
Manages the design, implementation, and production of all reports; responsible for data integrity for all databases created by and for the decision support function. Accountable for problem identification and resolution with respect to accessing, accumulating, and processing information from various sources.
Participates in initiatives/projects both internally and externally as assigned, ensuring compliance with corporate policies, HIPAA, Delmarva standards, HEDIS measurement, NCQA accreditation, or regulatory compliance.
Performs other duties as assigned.
Stewards data utilized in reporting and analytics by capturing and implementing business rules for data validation and quality, practicing and documenting data management and transformation processes, collaborating to accurately determine data definitions, and contributing metadata to an enterprise data dictionary.
Works closely with information technology (IT) staff and monitors additions to the MSFC data warehouses for accuracy and relevance.
Works closely with IT and the Quality Improvement Department to assist with annual HEDIS audit.
Participates in multidisciplinary quality and service improvement teams as appropriate. Participates in meetings, serves on committees and represents the department and hospital/facility in community outreach efforts as appropriate.
About MedStar Health
MedStar Health is dedicated to providing the highest quality care for people in Maryland and the Washington, D.C., region, while advancing the practice of medicine through education, innovation and research. Our 30,000 associates and 5,400 affiliated physicians work in a variety of settings across our health system, including 10 hospitals and more than 300 community-based locations, the largest visiting nurse association in the region, and highly respected institutes dedicated to research and innovation. As the medical education and clinical partner of Georgetown University for more than 20 years, MedStar is dedicated not only to teaching the next generation of doctors, but also to the continuing education and professional development of our whole team. MedStar Health offers diverse opportunities for career advancement and personal fulfillment.",3.7,"MEDSTAR HEALTH
3.7","Washington, DC",-1,10000+ Employees,1985,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
18,Salesforce Data Analyst,$60k-$103k (Glassdoor Est.),"A pioneer in K–12 education since 2000, Amplify is leading the way in next-generation curriculum and assessment. Our captivating core and supplemental programs in ELA, math, and science engage all students in rigorous learning and inspire them to think deeply, creatively, and for themselves. Our formative assessment products turn data into practical instructional support to help students at every skill level build a strong foundation in early reading and math. Our programs provide teachers with powerful tools that help them understand and respond to the needs of all their students. Today, Amplify serves five million students in all 50 states.

The Salesforce Data Analyst will be responsible for the fidelity and accuracy of the data in the Salesforce system as well as the maintenance of data, processes, profiles and architecture of our Salesforce.com solution. The analyst will work closely with other CRM Team members and business subject matter experts to process data hygiene requests, update requirements and business processes specifications, and aid in large projects. The analyst will also work closely with IT development teams (CRM and Enterprise Data Mart) on projects intended to improve user experience and operational functionality; they must also work closely with SME’s to reconcile sales data between CRM and corporate systems of record. In addition, the analyst may assist in developing proposals for new policies and procedures, metrics, and for documenting process flows.

Responsibilities:
Specialize in collecting, organizing, and analyzing data from various systems
Develop an in-depth understanding of the interrelationships of data and multiple data domains
Create and maintain thorough documentation artifacts
Identify and document data migration paths and processes
Demonstrate commitment to providing customer-focused quality service
Develop and perform standard queries to ensure data quality, identify data inconsistencies, and missing data then resolve as needed
Standardize data naming, data definitions, and modeling
Perform data extraction, storage, manipulation, processing, and analysis
Collect, profile, collate, and map appropriate data for usage in new or existing solutions as well as for ongoing data analysis activities
Interpret customers’ functional and information needs and turn them into functional or data requirements, process models, etc.
Perform other duties as deemed relevant based upon experience
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor’s Degree or equivalent with 1 or more years of experience related to this position
1-3 years of demonstrated experience in data analysis, data manipulation, and decision support
Knowledge and application of relational database concepts
Experience or exposure to Extract/Transform/Load (ETL) and/or Business Intelligence
Greater than 1 year working in SQL
Experience completing technical design via iterative mockups
Several years experience using MS Office Suite (esp. Word and Excel)
Preferred Qualifications:
High-level knowledge of enterprise IT organizational, business, and technical environments
High aptitude in analytical and logical thinking
Demonstrated experience with data models and data mapping
Experience with ETL tools and procedures (any tool)
Prior experience working in the Cloud
Ability to perform ad-hoc analysis and maintain clear and comprehensive documentation of decision-making, data preparation, and processes
Openness to learning new skills and software as necessary
Demonstrated ability to manage simultaneous work flows while maintaining quality output and meeting deadlines
Demonstrated ability to learn new and exciting technologies with little assistance
Strong verbal and written communication skills with demonstrated ability to communicate at different levels of the organization
Demonstrated ability to produce highly detailed, comprehensive documentation artifacts
Client-focused attitude
Ability to analyze processes and recommend improvements as needed
We celebrate diversity and are committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees. To that end, we seek to recruit, develop and retain the most talented people from a diverse candidate pool.

Amplify is an Equal Opportunity Employer of Minorities, Females, Protected Veterans and Individuals with Disabilities.

This position may be funded, in whole or in part, through American Recovery & Reinvestment Act funds.

Amplify Education, Inc. is an E-Verify participant.",3.7,"Amplify
3.7","Brooklyn, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2000,Company - Private,K-12 Education,Education,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
19,Data Analyst,$38k-$67k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join a team recognized for leadership, innovation and diversity


The future is what you make it. When you join Honeywell, you become a member of our global team of thinkers, innovators, dreamers and doers who make the things that make the future. That means changing the way we fly, fueling jets in an eco-friendly way, keeping buildings smart and safe and even making it possible to breathe on Mars. Working at Honeywell isnt just about developing cool things. Thats why all our employees enjoy access to dynamic career opportunities across different fields and industries.

Are you ready to help us make the future?

Join a company that is transforming from a traditional industrial company to a contemporary digital industrial business, harnessing the power of cloud, big data, analytics, Internet of Things, and design thinking. You will lead change that brings value to our customers, partners, and shareholders through the creation of innovative software and data-driven products and services. You will work with customers to identify their high value business questions and work through their data to search for answers. You will be responsible for working within Honeywell to identify opportunities for new growth and efficiency based on data analysis.

Key Responsibilities:

As a Data Analyst, you will be part of a team that delivers contemporary analytics solutions for the Data Management & Analytics function at Honeywell. You will build strong relationships with leadership to effectively deliver contemporary data analytics solutions and contribute directly to business success. You will develop solutions on various Database systems viz. Hive, Hadoop, SnowFlake, etc.

You will identify and implement process improvements and if you dont like to do the same thing twice, you will automate where possible. You are always keeping an eye on scalability, optimization, and process. You have worked with Big Data before, IoT data, SQL, Azure, AWS, SnowFlake

You will work on a team including scrum masters, product owners, data architects, data engineers/analyst, data scientists and DevOps. You and your team collaborate to build products from the idea phase through launch and beyond. The software you write makes it to production in sprints. Your team will be working on creating a new platform using your experience of APIs, microservices, and platform development.

YOU MUST HAVE
US Citizenship due to export control restrictions
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Applied Mathematics, or other technical degree
4+ years of data engineering experience
2+ years in supply chain, materials planning, logistics/distribution, procurement, finance and/or order management.
WE VALUE
Should have developed and deployed complex big data ingestion jobs in Talend/Informatica BDM bringing prototypes to production on Hadoop/NoSQL/MPP platforms.
4+ years of hands on experience with MapReduce, Pig/Hive, Spark, etc. and automation of data flow using NiFi and Airflow/Oozie.
3+ years of experience in developing and building applications to process very large amounts of data (structured and unstructured), including streaming real-time data (Spark, R/Python, Scala, Kafka, Spark streaming or other such tools).
2+ years of experience in working with at least one NoSQL system (HBase, Cassandra, MongoDB etc.). In-depth knowledge of schema design to effectively tackle the requirement.
Experience in writing complex SQL statements
Experience in working with cloud-based deployments. Understanding of containers & container orchestration (Swarm or Kubernetes).
Hands on experience in Cloudera, Hortonworks and/or Cloud (AWS EMR, Azure Data Lake Storage) based Hadoop distributions.
Good understanding of branching, build, deployment, CI/CD methodologies such as Octopus and Bamboo
Experience working with in Agile Methodologies and Scrum Knowledge of software best practices, like Test-Driven Development (TDD)
Effective communication skills and succinct articulation
Experience in building advanced analytics solutions with data from enterprise systems like ERPs, CRMs, Marketing tools etc.
Experience with dimensional modeling, data warehousing and data mining
Experience with machine learning solutions and data science methods promotion
Database performance management and API development
Technology upgrade oversight
Experience with visualization software, Tableau preferred.
Understanding of best-in-class model and data configuration and development processes
Experience working with remote and global teams and cross team collaboration
Consistently makes timely decisions even in the face of complexity, balancing systematic analysis with decisiveness
Additional Information
JOB ID: req244867
Category: Information Technology
Location: 300 S. Tryon St, Suite 500 / 600,Charlotte,North Carolina,28202,United States
Exempt
Must be a US Citizen due to contractual requirements.
Global (ALL)

Honeywell is an equal opportunity employer. Qualified applicants will be considered without regard to age, race, creed, color, national origin, ancestry, marital status, affectional or sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, disability, nationality, sex, or veteran status.",3.7,"Honeywell
3.7","Charlotte, NC",-1,10000+ Employees,1885,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
20,Data Analyst,$49k-$86k (Glassdoor Est.),"More than any other, insurance is an industry whose foundation is based on trust – to provide peace of mind. So it is essential that, above all, Berkley Select is a company defined by the attributes that engender trust and confidence among our brokers and agents, and their clients. Berkley Select is the result of bringing together two of the industry’s most respected names in professional liability insurance.

We are a leading provider of professional liability insurance products across a full spectrum of disciplines and industries, for clients of virtually every size and level of complexity.
As a Berkley company, we enjoy operational flexibility that allows us to deliver quality coverage solutions. Berkley Select clients have access to a creative team of dedicated underwriters and the resources of W. R. Berkley Corporation. All member insurance companies are rated A+ (Superior) by A.M. Best Company, and carry Standard & Poor’s Financial Rating of A+ (Strong).

We are looking for an experienced Data Analyst to join our Business Intelligence team. The ideal candidate has exceptional analytical skills and is adept at solving complex problems and creating elegant business solutions. The Data Analyst assesses basic information needs, designs studies, analyzes results and delivers key findings in support of business leaders. The Data Analyst, with considerable latitude for independent action and judgment, will analyze, design, build, publish, program, maintain, test, troubleshoot, and implement and maintain legacy reports and PowerBI dashboards. Work on multiple projects independently and larger team based projects. Position requires excellent SQL programming skills and experience with the Microsoft BI Stack (SQL Server 2017, SSRS, SSAS), Visual Studio, and PowerBI.
Code and design SSRS reports, end user dashboards and retrieve Ad hoc data sets from the business intelligence environment.
Collaborate in collecting to define functional requirements, document and contribute to technical design discussions
Provide estimates and plans for report initiatives as requests are obtained from different departments and company stakeholders
Ability to handle multiple tasks and support special projects needs simultaneously.
Use optimized SQL server queries to efficiently and quickly retrieve data. Work with the Data Delivery Team Lead on different methods of SSRS query design and to find solutions that meet the requestors needs.
Create and design reports as best-practice solutions that support business reporting tasks. This will be achieved in using different programs and software, such as SSRS, SSAS, Microsoft Excel, MS SQL Server, SharePoint and other tools.
Ability to work in a fast paced team environment and self-manage, work well under pressure meeting tight deadlines and possess excellent interpersonal skills to work well with employees at all levels.
Resolve and Troubleshoot Report and data issues reported by end-users or support desk.
Maintain a record of different reporting processes in place and help to improve Report team goals with regard to report and data management.

Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, or at least 4 years of work-related experience
1-2 years of business intelligence experience building reports and/or dashboards
Insurance Industry Experience Highly Preferred
Required Experience:
Experience with Microsoft SQL Server 2017 tools and technologies (SSRS, SSAS)
Experience using data visualization tools (PowerBI or Tableau)
Strong analytical skills, able to translate complex business requirements into sound solutions
Demonstrates depth of knowledge in data modeling, data transformation & designing analytical data structures including tabular and multi-dimensional
Ability to work in a fast-paced, collaborative team environment
Excellent written and verbal communication skills and ability to express ideas clearly and concisely in good grammatical form, as well as effectiveness of expression in individual and group situations
An understanding of analysis and research with a basic understanding or dataset, programming, querying, report design and dashboard design required.
Experience with Power BI and/or Tableau
Experience developing multi-dimensional data models
Strong SQL skills with experience creating complex queries, building stored procedures, or creating views to support the data analysis requirements.",3.7,"Berkley
3.7","Chicago, IL",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1967,Company - Public,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
21,Data Science Division - Research Analyst,$66k-$132k (Glassdoor Est.),"Tuesday, July 7, 2020

The Data Science Division works on projects to help the Department of the Navy and other government agencies to develop advanced analytics and algorithms for systems, sensors, networks, and platforms to ensure America's defense in the 21st century. DSD researchers have relevant experience (either in course work, previous job experience, or military experience) in programming, machine learning, model building, and data visualization.

CNA fosters an inclusive culture that values diverse backgrounds and perspectives. Our flexible and engaging work environment encourages iterative and creative collaboration at every stage of the problem solving process. Our employees are committed to helping clients develop effective solutions to better manage their programs through scientific, data-driven approaches.

We are looking for creative and innovative individuals to help carry out our mission.

JOB DESCRIPTION/DUTIES
Analysts in the Data Science Division work on projects to help the Department of the Navy and other government agencies develop advanced analytics and algorithms for systems, sensors, networks, and platforms to ensure America’s defense in the 21st century. Analysts will learn CNA's unique approach to analytics that combines an understanding of the technical capabilities with insights gained from up close and current experience with real-world military operations.
Serve as an important contributing team member on projects or lead smaller/less complex activities. Demonstrate analytical competence. 1. Develop sound analytic frameworks and associated analytic methodologies/ techniques for addressing both structured and unstructured problems. Consistently produce high quality analysis. 2. Develop and maintain broad, general institutional knowledge of primary clients/sponsors; their culture, organization, and issues. 3. Support business development efforts and/or marketing activities by maintaining strong client relationships through high quality work, increasing the visibility of our work, and other related activities such as proposal preparation. 4. Interact with sponsors/clients under the supervision of an experienced colleague, and with study POCs independently. 5. Make significant contributions to research publications and analytic products for individual projects. 6. Communicate results of work in a clear and concise fashion. Effectively communicate one-on-one and in groups. Document work efficiently and accurately. Effectively present work to colleagues, sponsors, and small audiences that are familiar with content. 7. Work with minimal or no guidance on focused, well-structured pieces of projects. Work under closer supervision on more complex, less-structured tasks. Serve as task lead for pieces of projects by managing own activities. May lead small projects under the supervision of an RTL/CMD. 8. Exhibit a positive attitude in interactions with colleagues and clients/sponsors. Provide clear guidance to colleagues on tasks. Take responsibility for own actions and outcomes. 9. Perform other duties as assigned.

JOB REQUIREMENTS
1. Education: Minimum Master’s degree in a relevant field (Data Science related field) or equivalent experience, PhD preferred. 2. Experience: Typical minimum requirements Ph.D. & 0+ years or Master’s & 2+ years of experience in research and analysis. 3. Skills: Ability to construct effective briefings using MS PowerPoint and intermediate skills with MS Word and Excel and other standard software packages. Ability to apply machine learning techniques, building models (statistical, mathematical, simulation, etc.) in programming languages such as R or Python. Ability to analyze complex datasets using effective visualizations of data in achieved results; skilled in programming, statistics, machine learning, and data visualization. Working knowledge of data and information management analysis techniques and best practices. 4. Other: Ability to obtain and maintain an Active Secret Security Clearance.

CNA is committed to providing equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, religion, color, sex (including pregnancy, gender identity, and sexual orientation), parental status, national origin, age, disability, family medical history or genetic information, political affiliation, military service and protected veterans, or other non-merit based factors. In addition to federal legal requirements, CNA complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. These protections extend to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting and hiring practices, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation, and training and career development programs. For more information about EEO protections, please view the EEO is the law posters below: ""EEO is the Law"" Poster; ""EEO is the Law"" Poster Supplement. The pay transparency policy is available here: Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Poster

To be considered for hire, all individuals applying for positions with CNA are subject to a background investigation. For positions requiring access to classified information, U.S. citizenship is required. Individuals will also be subject to an additional government background investigation, and continued employment eligibility is contingent upon the ability to obtain and maintain an active security clearance.

Other details
Job Family
Research
Job Function
Career Path I - Research
Pay Type
Salary",3.3,"CNA Corporation
3.3","Arlington, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1942,Nonprofit Organization,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
22,Data Analyst,-1,"Bread is a technology company that aims to transform the way the world shops online. We build tools, technologies and APIs that allow e-commerce merchants to integrate installment loan financing and other alternative payment products anywhere in their customers' shopping journey. Bread was started in 2014 by financial technology veterans, and has experienced explosive growth to date. We're backed by top investors including Menlo Ventures, Bessemer Venture Partners, Kinnevik, among others.

Are you passionate about data? Are you someone who prides yourself on your ability to use data to shape decisions around business strategy, product design, and profitability? The Analytics team at Bread is tasked with navigating and understanding Bread's vast first and third party data and works closely with management stakeholders across Product, Finance, Engineering, and other departments to ensure that we are making the best data-backed decisions we possibly can. As a key member of our growing team, you will report directly to our Lead Analyst and work on some of the most exciting, cross-functional projects at Bread. This role will involve: modeling new products and growth opportunities, deep-dive research into consumer conversion and repayment behavior, and revenue and profitability reporting among other responsibilities. You will be the ""data expert"" in the room and a key partner to every business team at Bread. This will involve both 'teaching them to fish' through coaching, reporting, and self-service tools, as well as 'fishing' by providing your own analysis and insights. This will originally be an individual contributor role, however, there may be opportunities to manage other analysts as the team grows.

Your role at Bread:
Build: Build and maintain the company's central Enterprise Data Warehouse to support Reporting, Analysis, Dimensional Modeling, and Data Development for internal and external stakeholders
Idea Generation: Analyzing both our B2B and B2C funnels, identifying weak points and brainstorming ways to improve UX, conversion, and profitability
Product Development and Testing: Collaborating with senior leadership across teams as a statistics expert on A/B tests
Research: Further Bread's understanding of our business and customers by deep diving into Bread's data, building predictive models, and writing research reports
Prioritization: Supporting company leadership, including the C-suite, to identify the highest ROI projects
What we are looking for:

Must Have:
2-4 years of experience analyzing product or customer data at a software company
BA in a quantitative field: Stats, Finance, Economics, Math, or Computer Sciences are preferred
Fluency in SQL and at least one functional programming language, especially Python or R
Evidenced knowledge of statistics, i.e. confidence intervals, linear regression, and hypothesis testing
Experience with funnels and event tracking software, i.e. Heap or Mixpanel
Effective interpersonal skills
Nice to Have:
Experience with any technologies in our analytics stack: Snowflake, PostgreSQL, DBT, Databricks and/or Spark, Airflow, Python, Github, Looker, and Docker
Experience in financial services or credit
Experience with web applications
Familiarity with other languages in our technology stack: Golang and Javascript
An advanced degree
Familiarity with survey data, software, and methods
Familiarity with an agile working environment",4.7,"Bread Finance
4.7",Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
23,Data Business Analyst,$40k-$75k (Glassdoor Est.),"POSITION TITLE

Data Business Analyst

LOCATION

Raleigh, NC

YOUR ROLE

Reporting to the Senior Manager, Enterprise Data Management, this business facing data business analyst role will spearhead the onboarding of reporting and analytics data requests, identify stakeholders, engages experts cross functionally, triages highly complex data issues, identifies impacts, analyzes, and effectively communicates progress at all levels. This function will also be responsible for working closely with governance lead, ensuring completeness, accuracy and conducting root cause analysis. This role is highly collaborative and will directly support the data modernization efforts and work closely with data scientists, stewards, enterprise analytics team members, and business SMEs.

YOUR RESPONSIBILITIES

Triages and onboards highly complex data requests and issues, assigning priority and timelines for resolution
Provides subject matter expert knowledge and consulting on data usage, techniques, and accuracy
Supports business units in the resolution of in-depth user questions and issues
Engages as data SME with teams during the designing, building and testing phases of projects to clarify business requirements
Work with the testers and IT to ensure that all data components are tested adequately
Collaborates with other data analysts, data scientists, and data engineers to ensure implementations in accordance with the business specification.
Continually improves the integrity of governance and data through delivery of validated, accurate sources
Identify meaningful outcomes and analytical support needs to develop high-value, actionable reporting, insights, and data recommendations aimed at continually improving the overall health of Genworth data
Identify data patterns, attribute hierarchies and data relationships and organize into data dictionaries, entity diagrams, helps to create standardized definitions for metrics and critical metrics as needed
Provides a strong understanding of mortgage insurance business processes and data needs as well as technology capabilities, and participates in filtering and prioritizing requests accordingly

YOUR QUALIFICATIONS

Bachelor's degree in mathematics, statistics, marketing, management information systems, or related field
5+ years hands-on experience analyzing, testing, and spearheading data standards
Exposure to ETL and data warehousing techniques
Experience with large-scale systems, BI, data mining, and statistical analysis tools
Experienced in user centered design, preferably experience with front-end customer facing systems. High regard for exceptional customer service.
Expert level analytical, strategic and problem-solving skills
Self-starter and results oriented, with a focus on quality and attention to detail.
Creative presentation skills for packaging analytics in a simple and actionable way for teams and leadership, along with effective and persuasive communication skills.
Experience working with agile teams and processes; ability to establish and handle multiple priorities with multiple deadlines, manage time effectively, and communicate expectations to stakeholders
Ability to thrive in a fast paced, dynamic, demanding, and fluid environment and contribute positive attitude and approach to projects
Ability to support the creation of single source of truth for performance monitoring leveraging agreed upon data definitions, create a common data foundation, and semantic layers to be consumed by business
Working knowledge of data governance dependencies on an enterprise analytics platform, including data quality, metadata management, and data catalog

ADDITIONAL QUALIFICATIONS

Insurance industry experience
5+ years project management experience, PMP certified preferred

WHY WORK AT GENWORTH

We have a real impact on the lives of the people we serve
We work on challenging and rewarding projects
We give back to the communities where we live
We offer competitive benefits including:
Medical, Dental, Vision, Flexible Spending Account options beginning your first day
20 days of Choice Time Off your first full year
11 Paid Holidays
40 hours of volunteer time off
401K Account with matching contributions
Tuition Reimbursement and Student Loan Repayment
Paid Family Leave
Child Care Subsidy Program

COMPANY

Genworth Financial, Inc. is a leading insurance holding company committed to helping families achieve the dream of home ownership and address the financial challenges of aging through its leadership positions in mortgage insurance and long-term care insurance. Headquartered in Richmond, Virginia, Genworth traces its roots back to 1871.

Genworth Mortgage Insurance, headquartered in Raleigh, North Carolina, is a global mortgage insurer with a major presence in the United States and Australia. With origins dating back to 1980, Genworth Mortgage Insurance provides primary mortgage guaranty insurance coverage on residential mortgage loans, as well as mortgage pool insurance policies that enhance insurance coverage for various types of mortgage-related securities. Our mortgage insurance can help individuals secure low down payment loans and realize the dream of home ownership faster – even for the first time.

We know we can’t deliver on our mission unless we deliver for our employees. That’s why we’re committed to creating a work environment that fosters diversity, inclusion, excellence, improvement and connection. We know each employee contributes in their own unique way and we’re dedicated to supporting every one of them to help them reach their full potential.",3.5,"Genworth
3.5","Raleigh, NC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2004,Company - Public,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
24,Data Analyst,-1,"About Kraken

Our mission is to accelerate the adoption of cryptocurrency so that you and the rest of the world can achieve financial freedom and inclusion. Founded in 2011 and with over 4 million clients, Kraken is one of the world's largest, most successful bitcoin exchanges and we're growing faster than ever. Our range of successful products are playing an important role in the mainstream adoption of crypto assets. We attract people who constantly push themselves to think differently and chart exciting new paths in a rapidly growing industry. Kraken is a diverse group of dreamers and doers who see value in being radically transparent. Let's change the way the world thinks about money! Join the revolution!

About the role

This is a fully remote role, we will consider applicants based in North America, South America and Europe

We are looking for Data Analysts who will play a key role in driving decision making in building cutting-edge products at Kraken. You will transform large datasets from complex systems, generate actionable insights and share the results with stakeholders at all levels of the company. You will partner and lead projects with product management, engineering, client engagement, finance and other enterprise level teams.

You are a self-starter, results driven and passionate to drive success of products at Kraken using the power of data analytics.
Responsibilities
Conduct data analysis and generate actionable insights and make recommendations for improving, developing and launching products
Communicate key results with self-serve tools (dashboards, analytics tools) for your product teams and key stakeholders
Develop and automate reporting of key performance indicators of various Kraken’s products and services at scale, solving for business priorities
Partner with product managers to design experiments to test hypothesis and help with idea generation and refinement
Collaborate with engineering teams and relevant stakeholders to build key datasets and data pipelines using Python/ETL frameworks
Be a data evangelist and help Kraken improve its products and services
Requirements
3+ years industry experience in data analytics field
Advanced knowledge of SQL, scripting languages and database concepts
A consistent track record of performing data analysis using scripting language (Python, Javascript, etc) and/or experience with a programming language (Java, Scala, Golang, etc)
Strong understanding of statistical concepts
Experience with BI Software (Superset / Tableau / etc)
Experience with big data tools (Hadoop, Presto, Spark, Druid, etc)
Familiarity with data warehouse development and best practices
The versatility and willingness to learn new technologies on the job
The ability to clearly communicate complex results to technical and non-technical audiences
Nice to have
Familiarity with cryptocurrency ecosystem
BA/BS or MA/MS degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Information Systems, Computer Science, Business Analytics, Data Science or related technical field
We’re powered by people from around the world with their own unique backgrounds and experiences. We value all Krakenites and their talents, contributions, and perspectives.

Check out all our open roles at https://jobs.lever.co/kraken. We’re excited to see what you’re made of.

Learn more about us:
Watch ""Working at Kraken""
Follow us on Twitter
Catch up on our blog
Follow us on LinkedIn",4.5,"Kraken Digital Asset Exchange
4.5",Remote,-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
25,Data Analyst,-1,"Growing Insurance Software Company Seeks a Talented Business Analyst / Financial Analyst!

This Jobot Job is hosted by: Reed Kellick
Are you a fit? Easy Apply now by clicking the ""Apply Now"" button and sending us your resume.
Salary: $70,000 - $80,000

A bit about us:

Based in Philadelphia, we have built a cloud-based software platform for the insurance industry that is changing up the space. We have been around for about 10 years now, but we are still a small, agile team. We are currently looking to hire a FP&A Analyst / Accounting Analyst for our Philly location!

Why join us?
Competitive Base Salary Between $70k and $80k!
401k!
Bonuses!
Paid For Trips to California Twice a Year for Company Events!


Job Details

As a Software Analyst / Data Warehouse Analyst on our team, we are looking for:

Strong Excel background -- pivot tables, macros, etc.
Experience with XML / XSLT / JSON would be ideal
An accounting, finance, business intelligence, business analysis, or data analysis background
Good client-facing ability and willingness to interact with customers
Ability to communicate with engineers
APIs / Web Services experience would be preferred


Interested in hearing more? Easy Apply now by clicking the ""Apply Now"" button.",5.0,"Jobot
5.0","Philadelphia, PA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2018,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
26,Data Analyst,$35k-$66k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Analyst, Fandango
Our ideal candidate is a sharp, thoughtful problem solver, who enjoys identifying key business levers and challenges, and then building analytical framework to impact strategic decision making.

What you'll do

Business Performance, Reporting and Visualization: Define KPIs, build automated dashboards, reports, and models to help teams make faster better decisions.

Deep-Dive Analysis: Analyze user behavioral data to identify patterns, uncover opportunities, and create common understanding of how people are interacting with the platform and content. Able to work effectively on sometimes ambiguous data and constructs within a fast-changing environment, tight deadlines and priority changes.

Forecasting and Opportunity Sizing: Set goals and help evaluate potential opportunities, this analyst will be tasked with forecasting and opportunity sizing. This will help business stakeholders evaluate trade-offs in different approaches and create targets for driving business performance.

Stakeholder management: Partner cross-functionally with product/marketing/Engineering to identify opportunities using data.

Qualifications/Requirements

Who you are

 2+ years of analytical experience with product or marketing analytics.
 Very Strong SQL and data visualization skills
 Experience with Python/R or other statistical programming language a plus
 Familiarity with data exploration and data visualization tools like Looker, Tableau
 Understanding of statistics concepts (e.g., hypothesis testing, regression analysis).
 Strong communication skills, as well as written and verbal presentation skills.

Sub-Business

Fandango

Career Level

Experienced

City

Beverly Hills

State/Province

California

Country

United States

About Us

At Fandango, we love movies. From showtimes and ticketing, to engaging content and innovations in movie going- we strive to deliver the perfect movie going experience—anytime, anywhere. And to be the go-to destination for moviegoers, we think it’s all about collaboration. Anyone can build a website or app, but it takes a special group across many disciplines to create an experience that can live across multiple platforms and connected devices. Thanks to an exceptional team, we’re working hard to make Fandango a little bit better every day. Our 30 million (and growing!) online and mobile monthly visitors can now buy movie tickets at over 25,000 screens nationwide and stay for exclusive trailers, our award-winning original video series, movie reviews, celebrity interviews and more. So, if you’re looking to inspire, be inspired and work at the intersection of entertainment and technology look no further than Fandango. Visit Fandango.com/careers for a behind-the-scenes look at Fandango and follow us on LinkedIn for the latest news and updates. Fandango is an NBCUniversal Company.

Notices

NBCUniversal’s policy is to provide equal employment opportunities to all applicants and employees without regard to race, color, religion, creed, gender, gender identity or expression, age, national origin or ancestry, citizenship, disability, sexual orientation, marital status, pregnancy, veteran status, membership in the uniformed services, genetic information, or any other basis protected by applicable law. NBCUniversal will consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with relevant legal requirements, including the City of Los Angeles Fair Chance Initiative For Hiring Ordinance, where applicable.",4.0,"NBCUniversal
4.0","Beverly Hills, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1906,Company - Public,TV Broadcast & Cable Networks,Media,$10+ billion (USD),-1
27,Data Analyst,$48k-$89k (Glassdoor Est.),"Bigger challenges. Bolder ideas. Global impact. At Viasat, we’re on a mission to deliver connections with the capacity to change the world. We’re the company behind the world’s fastest satellite internet service, with technology that’s helping to bridge the digital divide and improve life for our customers around the globe. By providing powerful new ways for people to connect with one another, gain greater access to education, entertainment, medical research, commerce, and much more, our team is empowering millions of customers worldwide.

We’re looking for passionate, innovative professionals to join our team and connect the world to more. You’ll work in a collaborative and inclusive environment that values diverse perspectives and continuous learning, and provides industry-leading benefits with unmatched opportunities for career growth. Our team is fearless in pursuit of new ideas and uncompromising in our quest to become the world’s first truly global Internet Service Provider. Interested in joining our mission? Take a look at career opportunities at Viasat today.

Job Responsibilities

As a Data Analyst on the Quality team, you will provide analytics and insights into the manufacturing and quality systems in support of a wide range of functional groups. A

significant amount of this role’s responsibility is aggregating, cleansing, joining, and storing data from varied sources. The talented individual in this position will develop analytical models while automating reporting and bringing the data visualization to life by building dashboards for stakeholders to use. The Data Analyst will perform data analyses encompassing in a range of analytic capabilities including but not limited to: statistical analysis, regression, time-series analysis, control charting, simulation, and other mathematical techniques.

Parse and manipulate raw data leveraging tools including R, Python, Tableau, Alteryx, Pentaho or Informatic with a strong preference for Python
Analyze large data sets, while finding the truth in data, and develop efficient processes for data analysis and simple, elegant visualization
Identify improvement opportunities, proactively develop, produce, and track data quality reports, analyze data and report on trends
Determine root cause for data errors, make recommendations for long-term solutions, and implement fixes
Document data source management, monitoring, and continuous improvement processes and procedures
Develop and automate daily, monthly, quarterly reporting for multiple business areas within Viasat
Monitor big data with Business Intelligence tools, simulation, modeling, and statistics
Experience building intuitive and actionable dashboards and data visualizations that drive business decisions (Tableau or similar)
Act as a key point of contact for consulting with key stakeholders to ensure availability and continuously improve data quality and ensure business requirements are met
Undertake special projects or assignments as assigned

Requirements

3-5 years SQL experience
3-5 years data analysis experience with emphasis in reporting
2-3 years Python experience in data cleansing, statistics, and data visualization packages (i.e. pandas, scikit-learn, matplotlib, seaborn, plotly, etc.)
Strong statistics/SPC background
2-3 years Tableau experience or equivalent with data visualization tools
Background in data visualization and decision support leveraging open source libraries/packages and third-party tools (Tableau or similar)
Excellent judgment, critical-thinking, and decision-making skills; can balance attention to detail with swift execution
Able to identify stakeholders, build relationships, and influence others to drive progress
Excellent analytical and problem solving skills
Strong oral and written communication skills
Strong statistical background
BS/BA in a relevant subject
Up to 10% travel
US Citizenship is required
Preferences

Strong preference for personal projects and work in Python
Data Science experience
Alteryx experience preferred
Oracle EBS experience desired
Oracle Business Intelligence (OBIEE) highly preferred
Viasat is proud to be an equal opportunity employer, seeking to create a welcoming and diverse environment. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, ancestry, physical or mental disability, medical condition, marital status, genetics, age, or veteran status or any other applicable legally protected status or characteristic.",3.9,"ViaSat
3.9","Mesa, AZ",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1986,Company - Public,Telecommunications Services,Telecommunications,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
28,Data Analyst,$44k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description

Job ID#:
2359

Job Category:
Behavioral Health (Promesa)

Position Type:
Full Time

Details:


Acacia Network, the leading Latino integrated care nonprofit in the nation, offers the community, from children to seniors, a pathway to behavioral and primary healthcare, housing, and empowerment. We are visionary leaders transforming the triple aim of high quality, great experience at a lower cost. Acacia champions a collaborative environment to deliver vital health, housing and community building services, work we have been doing since 1969. By hiring talented individuals like you, we’ve been able to expand quickly, with offices in Albany, Buffalo, Syracuse, Orlando, Tennessee, Maryland and Puerto Rico.

The Data Analyst is responsible for entering information into the Nextgen EHR, importing data results for analysis, analyzing data trends, completing QA/QI to improve program performance and outcomes based on trends and will be a member of the integrated treatment team. Under supervision of the Program Director, the requirements listed below represent the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities as defined by the ADA to perform the essential functions of the job. The functions below outline the general responsibilities associated with this position. Each of these functions is considered critical to effective department operations and our Mission. It is expected that all staff in this position will have satisfactory attendance and will perform these functions as assigned in a competent, cooperative, and timely manner. The Job Description will be reviewed periodically for accuracy and/or adjusted according to business necessity.


KEY ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS:
Will enter all required data into Nextgen and run queries in SQL at the back end
Will run daily, weekly, monthly, and quarterly reports as per program needs and performance indicators.
Generates quality indicator reports from Nextgen database as requested and assigned by supervisor.
Maintains Data spreadsheet up-to-date by keeping all required data indicators as per program regulations by mapping from front end to back end and validating it.
Coordinates and maintains record of consumer participation in the program by conducting surveys, activities and integrating consumers to participate in activities as per program regulations.
Generates and inputs discharge and re-entry information for consumers on the Nextgen database as per program requirements and assigned by supervisor.
Participates in integrated team meetings, collects data information as per program requirements and maintain accuracy in data spreadsheet.
Complete quality improvement projects based on data trends.
Act as curator of new datasets, documenting and performing quality checks.
Completes all required training as per program regulations for entering consumer data and as assigned by supervisor.
Completes office duties as needed/required by Supervisor.
Completes additional tasks as assigned by Supervisor.

REQUIREMENTS:
College degree preferred
Knowledge of the Nextgen database and proficiency in SQL
Experience or desire to work with people who have a mental illness
Positive attitude and professional demeanor
A self starter
Ability to complete work independently as well as in collaboration with team members
Must be team oriented with a willingness to be flexible and helpful.
Excellent computer skills including, Microsoft Windows, Excel, PowerPoint, and electronic communications tools: internet and email
Ability to communicate effectively orally and in writing
Highly organized, motivated self-starter
Excellent time management skills.
Acacia Network is an equal opportunity employer*

Job Requirements


Already have an account? Log in here",3.3,"Acacia Network
3.3","Bronx, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1966,Nonprofit Organization,Social Assistance,Non-Profit,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
29,Data Analyst,$36k-$68k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Company

BlueLabs is a leading provider of analytics services and technology for government, business, and campaigns. Founded in 2013 by senior members of the Obama for America re-election campaign team, we help our clients optimize their engagements with individual customers, supporters and stakeholders to achieve their goals.

Today, our team counts over 40 data scientists, engineers, and strategists from diverse backgrounds who share a passion for using data to solve the world’s greatest social and analytical challenges. We’ve served more than 400 organizations ranging from political campaigns to advocacy groups, unions, government agencies, and international groups, as well as companies in the automotive, travel, consumer packaged goods, entertainment, healthcare, media, telecom, and other industries. Along the way, we’ve developed some of the most innovative tools available in analytics, media optimization, reporting, and influencer outreach.

Data Analyst

Data Analysts are instrumental members of BlueLabs Data Science and engagement teams. They gain exposure to all parts of our process, from collecting and organizing data, to analyzing trends and predicting outcomes, and working with clients to understand how these insights can be used to improve program efficiency. Data Analysts are able to work both as part of a team and independently, completing projects in a fast-paced environment, error-free, and on short deadlines. You will receive strong mentorship from senior members of the BlueLabs Data Science and Engagement teams, and also be given a chance to complete projects independently. BlueLabs Analysts have the opportunity to develop into the Data Science or Engagement tracks within BlueLabs.

What you'll do:
Analyzes data, as well as contributes to the design, implementation, and delivery of analytics products and services.
Builds predictive models, tools, and data visualizations.
Checks data and modeling results for quality and cleans, transforms, aggregates, and reports on data as needed.
Strives to support team excellence by documenting processes and evangelizing new approaches
Preferred Experience & Background
An undergraduate degree in a quantitative field or equivalent work experience.
Conceptual understanding of foundations of statistics and modeling (distributions, parameter estimation, confidence intervals and tests, etc.).
Proficient understanding of a statistical programming language such as R, Python, or Julia.
The ability to effectively communicate technical concepts to a non-technical audience, both in writing and verbally
The ability to manipulate data with SQL.
Experience building predictive models using regression and machine learning techniques.
Knowledge of experimental design and causal inference experience with GIS.
Experience creating informative and engaging data visualizations using industry leading tools.
The ability to create user interfaces for new products using frameworks such as Shiny or Django.
This position is available in DC, NY, & LA. We are currently accepting resumes and anticipate hiring for these positions in late winter/early spring of 2021.

At BlueLabs, we celebrate, support and thrive on differences. Not only do they benefit our services, products, and community, but most importantly, they are to the benefit of our team. Qualified people of all races, ethnicities, ages, sex, genders, sexual orientations, national origins, gender identities, marital status, religions, veterans statuses, and disabilities are strongly encouraged to apply. As an equal opportunity workplace and an affirmative action employer, BlueLabs is committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees.",4.7,"BlueLabs
4.7","Washington, DC",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Research & Development,Business Services,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
30,Data Analyst,-1,"NEW OPPORTUNITY! Growing billing company seeking a Data Analytics Manager. The Data Analytics Manager will be responsible for enhancing provided services through alignment of billing system analytic capabilities and effective communication with the client. This position serves as the subject matter expert for reporting analytics, standardization, and process improvement analyses. 5+ years in healthcare industry required; Radiology billing experience strongly preferred.

Telework arrangement, competitive wages, benefits, and potential for sign on bonus!

Key Responsibilities:
Regularly conduct client meetings to review accounts receivable performance, payer issues and trends, client's business strategies, and cash flow forecast.
Develop financial reports and processes for optimal revenue cycle outcomes.
Monitor/audit financial and reimbursement data.
Review of third-party contracts, analysis, and recommendation.
prioritize volume demands and determine coding productivity and ensuring productivity and quality metrics are achieved.
Will work directly with leadership and communicate with healthcare analytics regarding new initiatives.
May interview and hire appropriate talent across all specialties and job roles.
Will maintain positive relationships with internal and external leadership.
Must have full revenue cycle experience and understanding of clinical and billing systems.
Requirements:
Bachelor's Degree
5+ years' experience in healthcare industry
Revenue Cycle Management (RCM) experience
Advanced with Microsoft Excel",-1,Confidential Jobs,"Virginia Beach, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
31,Data Analyst,-1,"Description:
Projection analyst for forecasting and other business needs
Manager will accept a fresh college graduate.
Must have experience working with sales data
This is a part time position 8 am to noon.
It does have potential to go perm. at that point it would be full time hours.
Comments updated: 6.5.20 could go permanent.
Minimum Required Qualifications:
Must have Power BI & Excel experience.
Bachelor’s degree in information science, data management or related field or equivalent combination of education and experience.
Excellent knowledge of Microsoft Office using Excel, Power BI, PowerPoint
Comfortable working in newly forming, ambiguous areas where learning and adaptability
The Sales Data Analyst will be responsible for supporting the sr. global sales analyst on developing, implementing and automating global sales reporting and analytical models in support of the EP/HF commercial organization.
The analyst will ensure the portfolio enhances organizational strategy and global sales operations management through successful, consistent, and predictable delivery of programs, projects and applications.
This role will be reporting to the Director of Global Sales Operations, EP & HF
Nice to have:
NOT a must, would be nice if they have experience with ETL , DW and medical device experience.
1-2 years working experience in the medical device or healthcare industry with strong analytical and problem-solving skills
Strong business acumen with the ability to translate information into relevant and actionable insights
Related work experience and knowledge of ETL, data warehouse, and business intelligence tools.
Candidate can start as soon as completed onboarding.",4.0,"Horizontal
4.0","Austin, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2003,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
32,Data Management Analyst F-35 JPO,$36k-$75k (Glassdoor Est.),"JOB TITLE: Data Management Analyst F-35 JPO

PROJECT OVERVIEW:

Project provides support to the F-35 Lightning II Joint Strike Fighter Joint Program Office (JPO) located in Crystal City (Arlington), VA. The JPO manages the development, test, production, fielding and sustainment of the F-35 Lightning II Joint Strike Fighter for the USAF, USMC, USN, and International Partner and FMS customer nations worldwide.

JOB DESCRIPTION AND RESPONSIBILITIES:

The Data Management Analyst will assist the Configuration Management/Data Management IPT Lead and other team members in the review, processing disposition, and status accounting of DM documentation. Responsibilities will include the following:
Analyze program requirements, status, budget and schedules
Perform program management, technical, or business case analyses
Participate as a member of and/or supports the specified Program Integrated Product Teams (IPTs); and IPT directed business meetings
Collect, complete, organize and interpret technical data and financial information relating to aircraft acquisition and product programs
Track program/project status and schedules
Applies policies and procedures for financial planning
REQUIRED SKILLS AND QUALIFICATIONS:

Security Clearance: Secret
Active Secret Security Clearance is required
Bachelors degree from an accredited university in Business, Management or a degree relevant to the position Allowable substitution:
Associates degree from an accredited university and an additional four (4) years of experience;
Or an additional eight (8) years of experience may be substituted for a Bachelors degree
Demonstrated program experience in the configuration management process must include: configuration identification, control, audit, and status; DOD configuration management policies, procedures, review cycles, instructions and standards; engineering change proposal evaluations
Demonstrated Configuration Management experience with development, production, ancillary equipment, ground support equipment, test & evaluation, and fleet operations of a DoD acquisition domestic and international aircraft program
Analytical and communication abilities (both written and verbal)
DESIRED SKILLS AND QUALIFICATIONS:

WORK LOCATION: Crystal City, VA

TRAVEL: 5%

KEY WORDS: DoD, IT, configuration management, CM, configuration identification, control, audit, engineering change proposal evaluations, development, production, ancillary equipment, ground support equipment, test & evaluation, T&E, fleet, international, aircraft. #MON

WBB is a technical and management consulting company that provides innovative products and services that solve government and commercial customers toughest problems. For more than 30 years, WBB has set the standard for excellence in consulting services, while providing its employees with an outstanding work environment with ample opportunities for growth and success. WBB continues to enjoy impressive growth, which is directly attributed to the companys hiring practice of always hiring the very best professionals from government, military and industry.

We are proud of our diverse environment and are an Equal Opportunity Employer. WBB is committed to a policy of equal employment opportunity. WBB participates in E-Verify.

WBB does not accept unsolicited resumes through or from search firms or staffing agencies. All unsolicited resumes will be considered the property of WBB and WBB will not be obligated to pay a placement fee.",4.1,"Whitney, Bradley and Brown
4.1","Crystal City, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1981,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
33,Senior Product Data Analyst,$77k-$137k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Remitly, we help immigrant communities around the world send $6 billion a year to their loved ones. Sending money is faster, easier, and costs less with our all-digital money transfer platform. We want to transform the lives of immigrants and their families by providing the most trusted financial service products on the planet. At Remitly, your work has a direct and positive impact on people around the globe. Your work matters, every day.

The Role:

The North America Product team at Remitly is in charge of optimizing our customer experience through a test and learn agenda. As a Senior Product Analyst on this team, you will work with product managers, engineers, and UX designers to guide product improvements for our customers. You will propose data-driven hypotheses to improve our customer experience, design and analyze A/B tests. The quantitative insights you bring will have an out-sized impact on the business. You will report directly to our Director of Product Analytics.

What You'll Do:
You will uncover product insights in our conversion funnel, with the goal of increasing healthy customer conversion by increasing our new customer adoption rates and monthly active customers.
You will visualize a quantitative view of the performance of our customer acquisition and onboarding funnel that results in applicable analysis.
You ask, ""Why?"" and question the status quo. You view unexpected data results as a puzzle to be solved, a challenge that you accept.
You can explain the methods behind your analyses and validate your results. Once you have data to support your ideas, you're willing to advocate for and move your recommendations forward.
About you:
Bachelor's degree in a technical, business, or quantitative field (Computer Science, Engineering, Statistics, or related field).
Minimum five years of relevant experience in a product or customer analytics role.
Experience designing and analyzing A/B experiments and are comfortable with basic statistical techniques
Experience working at startups or large consumer internet/technology companies
Experience with technical skills (e.g. SQL, R, Python) and data visualization tools (e.g. Tableau)
Our Benefits:
Unlimited paid time off
Health, dental, and vision benefits + 401k plan with company matching
Company contributions to your HSA or FSA plan, if you choose one
Continuing education and corridor travel benefits
Scholars program
Remitly is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Equal employment opportunity has been, and will continue to be, a fundamental principle at Remitly. We are committed to nondiscrimination across our global organization and in all of our business operations. Employment is determined based upon personal capabilities and qualifications without discrimination on the basis of race, creed, color, religion, sex, gender identification and expression, marital status, military status or status as an honorably discharge/veteran, pregnancy (including a woman's potential to get pregnant, pregnancy-related conditions, and childbearing), sexual orientation, age (40 and over), national origin, ancestry, citizenship or immigration status, physical, mental, or sensory disability (including the use of a trained dog guide or service animal), HIV/AIDS or hepatitis C status, genetic information, status as an actual or perceived victim of domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking, or any other protected class as established by law.

Remitly is an E-Verify Employer",4.4,"Remitly
4.4","Seattle, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
34,Data Analyst,-1,"Downers Grove, Illinois
Skills : Alteryx ,Data Analysis,Tableau,Automate,SAP/SFDC
Description :
Senior Data Analyst

Duration : 6 to 9 M contract

Location : Downers Grove, IL

Description:


5+ years of experience as a data analyst working with Tableau data analysis and automation using Alteryx - Must have
Experience/knowledge with SAP/SFDC business terms
Analyses data and performs required transformations
Measure performance, identify choke points, exception paths, identify problem type, Alteryx automate data extraction/data de-duping, creation of output format, SAP/SFDC data knowledge
Should have excellent written and communication skills

Alteryx ,Data Analysis,Tableau,Automate,SAP/SFDC",4.1,"Collabera
4.1","Downers Grove, IL",-1,10000+ Employees,1991,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
35,Senior Data Analyst,$45k-$82k (Glassdoor Est.),"_\*\*This position is located in Irvine, CA. Relocation assistance may be offered.\*\*_*
Looking for an innovative, creative, passionate, and fun company in OC? Then, let us introduce ourselves. We are MobilityWare and we make fun for a living! Our mobile games have been rocking the app store since its inception and we regularly show up in top lists for most popular games. We recently reached over 350 million downloads across our portfolio of games!

We've been voted 2015, 2016, 2017 & 2018 Best Places to Work in Orange County by the Orange County Business Journal and OC Register! Headquartered in Irvine, CA., our flagship game, Solitaire, was released on the day the App Store opened in 2008. Other titles include Blackjack, FreeCell, Destination Solitaire and Spider Solitaire, to name a few. Our vision is to create the most exciting mobile games and have fun doing it.
Position Summary*
As a Data Analyst, you will support the product team within depth analyses related to in-game activity, user behaviors, retention, funnel and monetization analysis, and provide insights to enhance the user experience. Your work will directly influence what features are built, prioritization of the roadmap and estimate expected return on these efforts. Youll be responsible for creating, monitoring and building dashboards, models and ad hoc analyses to support product efforts to drive user retention and in-game monetization. In addition to the product team, you will work closely with the DBAs, Marketing, and Monetization teams to create actionable insights.
Responsibilities*
Create in-depth analyses, tools and dashboards to highlight the in-game behaviors that drive revenue activities and user retention
Work with our marketing and product teams to deliver insights into user performance and make recommendations that enhance the user acquisition activities
Work as a key member of the BI team to support in-game analyses including review of events captured, troubleshooting data discrepancies, and anomalies
Work closely with the monetization team on continuous forecasting of various revenue models
Stay up to date on current and upcoming innovations and capabilities in the mobile gaming space
Qualifications*
3+ Years Work Experience in *gaming, mobile gaming or lifestyle app analytics*, including experience with building predictive models
Bachelors degree (advanced preferred) in a quantitative field such as Statistics, Math, Economics or in Computer Science with Modeling/Data Science coursework
Advanced SQL skills
Familiarity with relational databases, MS SQL, data transformation, data mining, and ad hoc analysis
Experience with statistical inference and advanced analytics techniques (A|B testing, ANOVA, regression, decision trees etc.)
Understanding of basic Data Engineering principles like ETL and data warehousing
Familiarity with customer data platforms (CDP) like deltaDNA, LeanPlum, TreasureData etc.
Ability to work productively with others in a highly collaborative manner
Why you should work for us: *
Awesome Perks: free lunch, free snacks, free drink, free Annual Company trip
Casual workplace - yes, flip flops and shorts are pretty much an everyday thing
Growth, growth, growth - we are growing and we would love for you to join us on the ride
We also want to take care of our team so we've got profit sharing incentives, medical, dental (100% paid), vision (100% paid), Unlimited PTO/Vacation, life insurance (100% paid), and 401K
Awesome office smack dab in the middle of OC and 2 minutes off the 5 freeway
Amazing talent: We've got some heavy hitters from the industry who embody both brilliance AND humility
\_Indeed Hire and Mobilityware are working together to find the best candidate for this job. *\_
_\*By applying, you agree to be contacted by our agent, Indeed Hire, and receive updates via text and phone about your application._\*

Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
statistical inference: 3 years (Required)
Advanced analytics techniques: 3 years (Required)
relational databases: 3 years (Required)
building predictive models: 3 years (Required)
SQL: 3 years (Required)
mobile gaming or lifestyle mobile app data analysis: 3 years (Required)",4.4,"Mobilityware
4.4","Dallas, TX",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1990,Company - Private,Video Games,Media,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
36,Data Analyst,$43k-$80k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview
TekWissen Group is a workforce management provider throughout the USA and many other countries in the world. Our Client is a company operating a marketplace for consumers, sellers, and content creators. It offers merchandise and content purchased for resale from vendors and those offered by thirdparty sellers.
Responsibilities:
Design and build custom reporting and dashboards to support TES.
Run daily, weekly, monthly reports with an ongoing cadence to support the team with data to help with project execution.
Create reporting and metrics to facilitate analyses and drive data-driven decision making Own the development and maintenance of new and existing artifacts focused on the analysis of requirements, metrics, and reporting dashboards.
Report key insight trends, using statistical rigor to simplify and inform the larger team of noteworthy storylines. Deep dive into large data sets to answer key business questions using SQL, Excel, and other data manipulation languages.
Continually improve ongoing reporting and analysis processes, while automating or simplifying self-service support and access to authoritative data sets.
Partner with execution/business teams to consult, develop and implement KPIs, automated reporting/process solutions, and process improvements to meet business needs.
Prepare and deliver business requirements reviews to the senior management team regarding progress and roadblocks.
Own and perform individual deep-dive analyses, including communicating results and implications to leaders.
Generate weekly and monthly data reports for both internal and external business reviews.
Learn and understand a broad range of the client's data resources and know-how, when, and which to use and which not to use Translate complex or ambiguous business problem statements into analysis requirements Scale data processes and reports; write queries that clients can update themselves; lead work with data engineering for full-scale automation Participate in strategic and tactical planning discussions.
Excellent writing skills, to create artifacts easily digestible by business and tech partners.
To support this initiative, you must be able to think strategically, perform dive deep analytics, and communicate effectively with internal and external senior leadership. Excellent communication skills are required.

REQUIRED SKILLS
Bachelor's degree in Business, Engineering, Statistics, Computer Science, Mathematics or related field 3+ years of professional experience in a business analyst/data analyst/statistical analyst role
Expert-level skills in writing and optimizing SQL to handle extremely large datasets
Expert-level skills in excel and MS access
Experience in scripting languages for parsing and data analysis
Understanding of data warehousing and data modeling
Proficient and direct experience with one or more major data visualization tools including
Tableau/QuickSight/Power BI etc.

PREFERRED SKILLS
MBA or Master's Degree in a related field 5+ years of relevant experience in a business analyst/data analyst/statistical analysis role
Experience leading large-scale analytics projects with BI solutions development using AWS technologies Redshift, Athena, S3, EC2, Quicksight, etc
Proven success in designing and implementing ETL Pipelines, Query Performance Tuning, and other data engineering techniques
Self-driven and able to deliver on ambiguous projects with incomplete data Excellent communication (verbal and written) and able to effectively communicate with business and technical teams
Proven problem-solving skills, project management skills, attention to detail, ability to influence others, and exceptional organizational skills
Ability to deal with ambiguity and competing objectives in a fast paced environment

Top 3 must-have hard skills
Self-starter and quick learner. Only BA on the team so need to get started ASAP
3+ years of professional experience in a business analyst/data analyst/statistical analyst role
Creating dashboards in Tableau OR PowerBI OR QuickSite

TekWissen Group is an equal opportunity/affirmative action Employer (m/f/d/v) supporting workforce diversity.",4.3,"TekWissen LLC
4.3","Seattle, WA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
37,Data Analyst,$50k-$89k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Data Analyst is a dynamic position driven by the goal of delivering automated reporting of complex systems and data to achieve significant improvements in business visibility of trends and performance indicators. The ideal candidate for this role will lead discovery, design and testing sessions with cross functional business partners and stakeholders. In addition, the role is responsible for supporting data driven value analysis of top issues and business priorities. They collaborate with service operations data analysis teams while utilizing and leveraging Robotics Process Automation (RPA), Extract, Transform, Load (ETL) and Data Visualization tools such as Spotfire, AlterYX, and Thoughtonomy.

Role Responsibilities:
Work with product, service, and business process owners to execute RPA/ETL initiatives by connecting systems, analyzing and designing process workflows with multiple vested stakeholders; building, testing, and implementing RPA/ETL solutions; and ensuring quality of data usage, and standardization across projects.
Assist process owners in the construction of business cases to support the adoption of RPA/ETL solutions throughout the organization to ensure continuous identification of product quality and focus areas for investment and improvement.
Assist in the development of recommendations and solutions that are in-line with industry best practices.
Work with product and process owners (including product leaders, service teams, finance, quality, supply chain) to ensure knowledge, report/analysis handoffs are transferred with success.
Support stakeholders in managing project priorities, timelines, quality, budgets as well as end user relationships.
Support business and product leadership with top issue discovery of data, quality of existing systems and reports, and corrective actions to identify data driven projects for business and product quality performance and improvements.
Prioritize business needs and remain up to date with organizational goals.
Perform end to end validation on all finalized projects to ensure quality and compliance.
Maintain and update all data analysis models/tools as necessary to ensure accuracy and timeliness of reporting for our supported functions.
Partner with IT to develop permanent data connectors to improve the quality and efficiency of our analysis models.
Basic Qualifications
Bachelors Degree in Sciences or Business; Masters Degree in business or Data Analytics preferred.
5+ years of professional experience in Robotics Process Automation and/or Extract, Transform, Load tools.
Preferred Qualifications
Previous experience working analyzing end-to-end medical device manufacturing processes.
Previous experience working with ERP systems in support of a service organization.
Additional Preferred Skills
Ability to communicate, verbal and written, with all management levels.
Strong organization, project management and analytical skills, including the ability to identify trends and anomalies within statistical data.
Ability to work through complex situations in a fast-paced, unstructured environment.
Understanding of finance operations (revenue, labor costs, material costs, overhead, inventory, etc), preferred.
Understanding of IT data architectures, preferred
Experience with reporting in any or all of the following, a plus
SAP Intelligence
Spotfire
Tableau
Salesforce
Extensive Microsoft Office Experience.
Travel and office Requirements:
Must be able to travel both domestically and internationally up to approximately 20% of the time to other PKI sites.
For remote/virtual location, a home office with strong internet and cell phone or land line capabilities is a must.",3.3,"Perkinelmer
3.3","Waltham, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1937,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
38,Data Analyst,$47k-$73k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Analyst

Job Title

Data Analyst

Job
ID

26969311

Location

Phoenix,

AZ

Other Location

Description

Career Evolutions is searching for a Data Analyst for an exciting and rapidly-growing wellness company in Phoenix, Arizona. This is an excellent career opportunity with a competitive compensation.

Duties Will Include:
Perform data profiling and analysis to clarify the nature and scope of data issues.
Identify and document data-cleansing requirements.
Develop strategies for duplicate identification and merging.
Drive the definition, development, testing and application of data cleansing strategies in a hands-on fashion:
Work with Subject Matter Specialists (SMS) to identify and prioritize data quality issues
Profile data to determine scope, risk, and cleansing approaches
Present cleansing options with recommendations for addressing issues
Develop and test cleansing scripts to automate cleansing wherever possible
Coordinate cleansing using data verification services where appropriate
Coordinate the application of cleansing activities with production support staff
Coordinate data entry resources and tasks and where manual cleansing is required
Configure and manage environment for data profiling and analysis.
Qualifications:
SQL fluency required, especially SQL Server.
Experience cleansing consumer data in volume (address, phone, email, etc.)
Familiarity with profiling tools and data cleansing services is strongly desirable.
Great team player with a positive attitude.
A highly proactive, energetic, and enthusiastic approach, projecting a sense that business is being taken care of responsibly.
Ability to see the “big picture” while addressing critical details.
Problem solving and analysis skills, combined with strong business judgment.
Attention to details, consistency and reliability of performance under tight deadlines.
Excellent communication skills both written and verbal.
Superior organization and planning skills. Capable of handling multiple activities and ad-hoc requests simultaneously.
Willingness to adapt to fast-paced delivery cycles; ability to multi-task.
Local candidates in the greater Phoenix area preferred.",2.5,"Career Evolutions
2.5","Scottsdale, AZ",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
39,JPSC-8710 - Oracle Data Analysts,$43k-$80k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview

Must have Healthcare experience

 Bachelor’s degree with 8+ years of work experience in data analysis and visualization.

 Experience in preparing and conducting extensive business analysis and studies, process

assessments, data analysis and cost benefit analysis in an effort to support data driven strategies.

 Minimum 4 years of experience working with healthcare data and helping businesses make better data driven decisions.

 Minimum 4 years of strong troubleshooting and problem-solving skills

 Experience with various data platforms.

 Proficiency in PL/SQL coding with ETL

 Willingness to participate in team on‐call rotation, and perform off hours work as needed.",4.5,"Avani Technology Solutions
4.5","New York, NY",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2008,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
40,Data Analyst,$43k-$81k (Glassdoor Est.),"Are you ready for an amazing career opportunity? Are you a data-driven problem solver?

As a Data Analyst at MealPal, you will drive meaningful insights to help inform the business strategy. You will manage weekly and monthly KPIs, build reports and dashboards, and create processes to ensure we use data to make impactful business decisions.

MealPal is a food startup based in NYC that empowers restaurants to build better businesses and users to eat more intelligently in 20 international markets. We offer users affordable lunches from the best restaurants in their city, all easily available to reserve and pick up through our mobile app.

Responsibilities:
Generate, maintain, and automate reporting
Mine data for answers to business challenges
Develop insights and recommend business strategy based on data
Share data in a digestible way with the entire company
Define best practices and new processes to collect, analyze, and manage data
Requirements
3-6 years of experience in prior data team role
SQL coding and advanced Excel skills
Logical, problem-solving mentality
Expertise in data models, database design development, and segmentation techniques
Strong communication skills
Benefits
Competitive base salary
Meaningful equity and the opportunity to build something
401(k) with Employer Match
Health, Vision, & Dental benefits (healthcare is 100% covered by MealPal)
Paid vacation time
Opportunity to work with a smart, passionate team",2.7,"MealPal
2.7","New York, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
41,Data Analyst,$30k-$53k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company: FedEx Services
Job Title: Data Analyst
Job Requisition Number: RC295967
Category: Decision Science & Analytics
Locations:
Collierville, Tennessee 38017
United States

Job Summary:
Under general supervision, designs and implements processes and solutions associated with a wide variety of data sets used for data/text mining, analysis to enable informed business decisions. Gains insight into key business problems and deliverables by applying statistical analysis techniques to examine structured and unstructured data from multiple disparate sources. Uses current and emerging technologies to evaluate trends and develop actionable insights and recommendations to management, via an increasing understanding of the business model and the information available for analysis. Typically uses data, statistical and quantitative analysis, and fact-based management to drive decision-making.

Job Roles and Responsibilities:

Interpret security log data, analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing reports.
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex log data sets.
Work with management to prioritize business and information needs.
Build data architecture, data integration, preprocessing & enrichment, master data management, data quality monitoring, and develop data dashboard.

Knowledge/Skills Considered a Plus:

Proven working experience as a Data Analyst or Business Data Analyst
Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical packages for analyzing datasets
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
Familiar with at least one of these languages – Java, Python, or Perl.
Experience with one or more of the following: Hadoop, Splunk, Hive, NoSQL, Spark, Hive, Mahout, Impala, Pig, Cascading, Yarn,
knowledge in Cybersecurity, cloud platform (Azure or GCP)

Domicile:
Collierville, TN
The ability to work remotely may be available based on business needs

Relocation:
Relocation assistance may be available for this position based on business needs

Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in information systems, computer science, or a quantitative discipline such as mathematics, engineering, operations research, economics or Finance. Two (2) years work experience in measurement and analysis, quantitative business problem solving, operations analysis,marketing analysis, simulation development and/or predictive analytics. Proficient in analytics software and applications. Good interpersonal skills. Good written and oral communication skills.

Application Deadline / Criteria:
To be considered for this opening, upload current copy of Resume to include beginning and ending dates for each employer/position and answer job screening questionnaire by close of business (5:00 PM CST) on October 27th, 2020

Want a career where you are empowered to make a difference? Want to work for a company that is environmentally responsible? Want to grow and develop on the job? If so, FedEx is the place for you! Every day FedEx delivers for its customers with transportation and business solutions. FedEx serves more than 220 countries and territories around the globe. We can serve this global network due to our outstanding team of FedEx employees. FedEx has over 400,000 talented employees who are tasked with making every FedEx experience outstanding. FedEx has been recognized on many different lists both for business success and for being a great employer.

Here are some of the recognitions FedEx has received from the past couple of years:

Fortune ""World’s Most Admired Companies"" – 2019
Forbes ""Best Employers for Diversity"" - 2019
Reputation Institute ""World’s Most Reputable Companies"" – 2019
National Business Inclusion Consortium ""Best-of-the-Best Corporations for Inclusion"" - 2019
Women’s Business Enterprise National Council ""America’s Top Corporations for Women’s Business Enterprises"" - 2018
Corporate Responsibility Magazine ""100 Best Corporate Citizens"" – 2018
Black Enterprise ""50 Best Companies For Diversity"" – 2018

When 400,000 employees around the globe are all working together it is amazing what we can achieve! FedEx connects people and ideas. If you would like to make a difference on a global scale while receiving top notch benefits, competitive pay, and plenty of opportunities to develop, click ‘Apply’ and tell us more about yourself.

EEO Statement - FedEx is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer (minorities/females/disability/veterans) that is committed to diversifying its workforce.",3.4,"FedEx Services
3.4","Collierville, TN",-1,10000+ Employees,2004,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Business Service Centers & Copy Shops,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
42,Billing Data Analyst,$38k-$68k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Native American Rehabilitation Association (NARA) is private non-profit that provides culturally appropriate physical & mental health services and substance abuse treatment for Native Americans, Alaska Natives and other vulnerable people. Since 1970 we have provided culturally sensitive care and treatment to the urban Native American population in the Portland metro and surrounding areas.

NARA offers a full benefit package including medical, dental, vision and prescription insurance. We provide company paid STD, LTD, basic Life and A&D benefits. In addition, we offer a 401(k) plan with a company match and supplemental life and accident benefits. NARA provides employees 12 paid holidays a year with generous vacation and sick time benefits.

POSITION SUMMARY:

The Billing Data Analyst will monitor, analyze, distribute and communicate billing data from various sources in order to meet internal and regulatory reporting requirements, and specifically the Medicaid wraparound payment submission to the state. This includes using technical tools to build and maintain reporting solutions for the Medicaid wraparound payment and other initiatives that require a medical billing background. The Billing Data Analyst will identify and provide needed data and analysis through understanding medical and behavioral health billing guidelines within a Federally Qualified Health Center (FQHC)_._

ESSENTIAL JOB DUTIES:

· Design and maintain data collection system to capture encounters eligible for monthly or follow up Medicaid wraparound payment on monthly basis.

· Data analysis and reporting for the monthly and follow up Medicaid wraparound payment submission.

· Develops and maintains data collection, reporting and analysis systems.

· Develops, maintains and produces statistical and analytical reports and/or graphics for the purpose of data interpretation.

· Produces and distributes regularly scheduled reports to various levels in the organization.

· Conducts specialized queries and formulates spreadsheets to support and facilitate data analysis.

· Collaborates with Billing Operations Director and co-workers in design and preparation of data presentations.

· Provides accurate information to co-workers and other customers when requested in order to complete data analysis process.

· Makes sure that all reports are accurate and error free by testing, researching, and validating data in source systems.

· Identifies data quality issues in clinical and billing systems and works with clinical and administrative guidance to implement workflows that provide clean data for reports.

· Works with Billing Operations Director to identify deficiencies and problems with existing data and develops and coordinates plans to resolve

· Communicate effectively, and demonstrate good interpersonal and professional skills when interacting with others throughout NARA.

· May be required to attend group, or individual meetings with physicians or with administration.

· Must be flexible and adapt to changing work assignments.

· Perform other duties as assigned.

QUALIFICATIONS:

· One to two years of preparing and submitting Medicaid wraparound payments to the State preferred

· Bachelor’s degree in data management, business administration, healthcare administration or informatics, or the equivalent combination of classroom and/or job-related experience preferred.

· Experience working in or with Federally Qualified Health Centers preferred.

· Experience using and/or reporting from Electronic Health Records and Practice Management Systems. Centricity and RPMS preferred

· One to two years prior or current experience with insurance coding, billing, or accounts receivable processes in a medical clinic or allied medical entity required.

· Working knowledge of Medicare, Medicaid and private billing and reimbursement processes

· Advanced knowledge of Microsoft Office applications to conduct and deliver complex data reports

· Exceptional interpersonal verbal and written communication skills; organizational skills; high degree of accuracy; flexibility, ability to multi-task and prioritize effectively.

· Ability to maintain professional boundaries with clients, the community, and other staff members.

· Work collaboratively with clients, other NARA staff, team members, and to treat everyone with respect and dignity at all times.

· Demonstrated ability to manage multiple priorities.

· Experience working within the Native American/Alaska Native community is considered a plus.

· If in recovery, must have a minimum of two years sobriety/clean time.

· Ability to pass a pre-employment or for cause drug tests.

· Ability to pass criminal background and DMV checks.

To apply: Please respond to this posting or fax your cover letter, resume, and salary requirements to 503-224-4494.

A minimum of two years sobriety and clean time is required. All employees are asked to commit to model a drug and alcohol free lifestyle. Potential new hires are required to pass a pre-employment (post offer) drug screen and criminal background check.

EEO/AA Employer/Vets/Disabled/Race/Ethnicity/Gender/Age. Within scope of Indian Preference, all candidates receive equal consideration. Preference in hiring is given to qualified Native Americans in accordance with the Indian Preference (Title 25, US CODE, Section 472 & 473). We are mission driven and spirit led.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $16.00 - $23.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.9,"Native American Rehabilitation Association (NARA)
3.9","Portland, OR",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1970,Nonprofit Organization,Social Assistance,Non-Profit,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
43,Data Analyst,$47k-$85k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description

Job Description:


We are seeking a self-motivated Data Analyst to provide technical and analytic support to a small, high-impact team. This is a developmental position with opportunities for career growth along a Data Science track. The position requires an active TS/SCI with Polygraph security clearance.

The Data Analyst will be expected to work with Data Scientists to build statistical models, test hypotheses, and interpret, summarize, visualize, and succinctly report data findings. The Analyst may be required to leverage automation and machine learning models to manage data, predict scenarios, and make recommendations to a non-technical audience.

The Data Analyst will contribute to building new analytical tools in support of the IC customer, and will be expected to collaborate with team members in a highly technical environment. The Data Analyst will be expected to learn and leverage technical frameworks and collaboration technologies, including Amazon Web Service (AWS) and Git.

Requirements:
Experience with scripting in Python or R
Experience (either on-the-job or in an academic setting) working with data manipulation techniques and statistics
Knowledge of computer science concepts, data architecture, and common statistical models
Knowledge of all-source intelligence, including SIGINT, and/or HUMINT collection reports
Familiarity with cable writing styles and classified client databases, including specific targeting tools
Ability to communicate technical findings to non-technical audiences
Familiarity with key US foreign policy and national security Counterterrorism (CT) objectives
Knowledge of IC policies and procedures
Ability to work efficiently in a metrics-driven environment
Bachelor’s degree + a minimum of 4 years of experience
TS/SCI clearance with polygraph required
External Referral Bonus:
Eligible
Potential for Telework:
No
Clearance Level Required:
Top Secret/SCI with Polygraph
Travel:
No
Scheduled Weekly Hours:
40
Shift:
Day
Requisition Category:
Professional
Job Family:
Data Scientist

Leidos is a Fortune 500® information technology, engineering, and science solutions and services leader working to solve the world’s toughest challenges in the defense, intelligence, homeland security, civil, and health markets. The company’s 38,000 employees support vital missions for government and commercial customers. Headquartered in Reston, Va., Leidos reported annual revenues of approximately $11.09 billion for the fiscal year ended January 3, 2020. For more information, visit www.Leidos.com.

Pay and benefits are fundamental to any career decision. That's why we craft compensation packages that reflect the importance of the work we do for our customers. Employment benefits include competitive compensation, Health and Wellness programs, Income Protection, Paid Leave and Retirement. More details are available here.

Leidos will never ask you to provide payment-related information at any part of the employment application process. And Leidos will communicate with you only through emails that are sent from a Leidos.com email address. If you receive an email purporting to be from Leidos that asks for payment-related information or any other personal information, please report the email to spam.leidos@leidos.com.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, ethnicity, age, national origin, citizenship, religion, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, pregnancy, family structure, marital status, ancestry, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law. Leidos will also consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories consistent with relevant laws.",3.7,"Leidos
3.7","McLean, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1969,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
44,Data Analyst,$47k-$85k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Systems Data Analyst is responsible for performing extensive detailed data analysis necessary to ensure strict adherence to data quality guidelines. This role will conduct full lifecycle activities to include requirements analysis and design, develop analytics and reporting capabilities, and continuously monitor performance and quality control plans to identify improvements and alerting of potential issues. The Systems Data Analyst is essential to gaining a better insight into a client’s business problem to be solved, formulating a data-driven approach to solve the problem and finally, analyzing and drawing conclusions and presenting them to the client. The Data Analyst position is a client facing role, and is responsible for being able to communicate complex analytic findings and conclusions in an easy to understand way.

We offer a comprehensive benefits package which includes medical, dental, vision insurance as well as a wide-ranging list of supplemental benefits and discount programs. In addition to sixteen paid days off for employees, we also offer ten paid holidays.

Required Qualifications
• 2+ years’ experience with Data Analysis.
• 2+ years working with SQL daily.

Preferred Qualifications
• Prior experience or knowledge of pharmaceuticals or the health care industry.
• Develop analytical strategies to solve business problems – this involves understanding the business problem, identifying relevant data, gathering and summarizing data meaningfully and applying appropriate statistical analysis to identify causal relationships and predict future outcomes. Deliverables must be high-quality with strong attention to detail.
• Transform complex data into easy to follow reporting through graphing, charts and dashboards, utilizing tools such as SSRS, Powerpoint or Excel. May also be required to present findings and reporting to clients and internal executive management.
• Create repeatable jobs and procedures utilizing MS SQL Server platform to gather and analyze data, to evaluate effectiveness of controls, determine accuracy of reports and efficiency of operations.
• Work with Wellpartner’s customers and vendors, to analyze and provide solutions for their data issues.
• Collaborating with and influencing clients and customers to develop analytic models, methodologies and reports that support Wellpartner products and services.
• Prioritizing competing client requests to ensure focus on highest impact activities.
• Experience working with various data feeds and understanding of EDI.
• Experience extracting, manipulating, and analyzing data and then using it to draw relevant conclusions.
• Bachelor’s Degree preferred.

Education
High School Diploma or GED required

Business Overview
At CVS Health, we are joined in a common purpose: helping people on their path to better health. We are working to transform health care through innovations that make quality care more accessible, easier to use, less expensive and patient-focused. Working together and organizing around the individual, we are pioneering a new approach to total health that puts people at the heart.

We strive to promote and sustain a culture of diversity, inclusion and belonging every day. CVS Health is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer. We do not discriminate in recruiting, hiring or promotion based on race, ethnicity, sex/gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, disability or protected veteran status or on any other basis or characteristic prohibited by applicable federal, state, or local law. We proudly support and encourage people with military experience (active, veterans, reservists and National Guard) as well as military spouses to apply for CVS Health job opportunities.",2.9,"CVS Health
2.9","Florham Park, NJ",-1,10000+ Employees,1963,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$10+ billion (USD),-1
45,Data Analyst,$41k-$72k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company: FedEx Services
Job Title: Data Analyst
Job Requisition Number: RC294638
Category: Decision Science & Analytics
Locations:
Collierville, Tennessee 38017
United States

Job Summary: Under general supervision, designs and implements processes and solutions associated with a wide variety of data sets used for data/text mining, analysis to enable informed business decisions. Gains insight into key business problems and deliverables by applying statistical analysis techniques to examine structured and unstructured data from multiple disparate sources. Uses current and emerging technologies to evaluate trends and develop actionable insights and recommendations to management, via an increasing understanding of the business model and the information available for analysis. Typically uses data, statistical and quantitative analysis, and fact-based management to drive decision-making.

Job Specific Information: Act as a primary resource in one discipline, backup and assistant in others. Applying skills to supplement the overall team, such as such as product development, quality control, engineering design, analytics/reporting, hardware testing, analytical thinking, and technical writing. Support the manufacturing, production, inventory, and analytics of TRON/SenseAware hardware, plus 3D printing capabilities central to our hardware design process.

Abilities/Skills/Knowledge Considered a Plus
MS Office Tools (Excel, MS-Word, PowerPoint, Visio, etc.)
Inventory management skills
Technical writing skills
SQL and RDBMS query writing
Communications and reporting skills
Knowledge of electronic circuitry and component level design
Application of sensors and Internet of Things (IoT) technologies
Process Engineering
Statistical Process Control
Familiarity with embedded systems design, technology, and software
CAD / CAM Software such as SolidWorks, FreeCAD, Blender, AutoDesk Fusion, etc.
Additive Manufacturing engineering skills
Quality control methodologies
Manufacturing process development
Application of big data analytic tools to solve real-world problems
Scripting programming languages such as Python, PHP, VBScript, etc.
3D printing design and tools for usage in manufacture of electronics products
Domicile: This position will be domiciled in Collierville, Tennessee (suburb of Memphis, Tennessee).

Remote Work: The ability to work remotely within the United States may be available based on business need.

Relocation: Relocation assistance may be available based on business need.

Minimum Qualifications: Bachelor's degree in information systems, computer science, or a quantitative discipline such as mathematics, engineering, operations research, economics or Finance. Two (2) years work experience in measurement and analysis, quantitative business problem solving, operations analysis,marketing analysis, simulation development and/or predictive analytics. Proficient in analytics software and applications. Good interpersonal skills. Good written and oral communication skills.

Application Criteria: To be considered, please upload a copy of your current resume to include beginning and ending dates for each employer/position and answer job screening questionnaire by close of business (5:00 PM CST) on Monday, October 26, 2020.

Want a career where you are empowered to make a difference? Want to work for a company that is environmentally responsible? Want to grow and develop on the job? If so, FedEx is the place for you! Every day FedEx delivers for its customers with transportation and business solutions. FedEx serves more than 220 countries and territories around the globe. We can serve this global network due to our outstanding team of FedEx employees. FedEx has over 400,000 talented employees who are tasked with making every FedEx experience outstanding. FedEx has been recognized on many different lists both for business success and for being a great employer.

Here are some of the recognitions FedEx has received from the past couple of years:
Fortune ""World’s Most Admired Companies"" – 2019
Forbes ""Best Employers for Diversity"" - 2019
Reputation Institute ""World’s Most Reputable Companies"" – 2019
National Business Inclusion Consortium ""Best-of-the-Best Corporations for Inclusion"" - 2019
Women’s Business Enterprise National Council ""America’s Top Corporations for Women’s Business Enterprises"" - 2018
Corporate Responsibility Magazine ""100 Best Corporate Citizens"" – 2018
Black Enterprise ""50 Best Companies For Diversity"" – 2018
When 400,000 employees around the globe are all working together it is amazing what we can achieve! FedEx connects people and ideas. If you would like to make a difference on a global scale while receiving top notch benefits, competitive pay, and plenty of opportunities to develop, click ‘Apply’ and tell us more about yourself.

EEO Statement - FedEx is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer (minorities/females/disability/veterans) that is committed to diversifying its workforce.

, street_address=920 W. Poplar Ave",3.8,"FedEx
3.8","Collierville, TN",-1,10000+ Employees,1973,Company - Public,Express Delivery Services,Transportation & Logistics,$10+ billion (USD),-1
46,Data Analyst,-1,"Salary: $15.72 - 26.93 per hour
Reference: 804497

job summary:

A Data Analyst is needed for a manufacturing company considered one of the world's leading innovators in materials science in the Tewksbury, MA area. Support for analyzing capability of processes and activities (tracking, performance standards, conformity and compliance) within the Supply Chain Group

location: Tewksbury, Massachusetts
job type: Contract
salary: $15.72 - 26.93 per hour
work hours: 8am to 5pm
education: Associates

responsibilities:

Run operational KPI targets (e.g. Line Fill, Order Promise, Backorders, Steris)
Inform the stakeholders on key metrics, reports and analysis which will support Supply Chain Performance
Update master data, KPI and analysis reporting on a regular level, and automate reporting tool

qualifications:

Minimum of an associate's degree
Knowledge and at least 5 years' experience in Supply Chain systems: forecasting, planning, inventory management, warehousing and distribution
Knowledge of Supply Chain processes

skills:
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills (customer focused, enabling, engaging).
Results oriented, detailed oriented, rigorous, forward looking.
Technical education and experience in query tools, data compilation and manipulation for trend analysis and suggested solutions.
Advanced Excel skills
Excellent analytical skills
Experienced with Project management

#LI-SJ1

Equal Opportunity Employer: Race, Color, Religion, Sex, Sexual Orientation, Gender Identity, National Origin, Age, Genetic Information, Disability, Protected Veteran Status, or any other legally protected group status.",3.8,"Randstad Engineering
3.8","Tewksbury, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1960,Company - Public,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$10+ billion (USD),-1
47,Data Analyst,$34k-$61k (Glassdoor Est.),"Title:
Data Analyst

Reports To:
Senior Manger of Business Intelligence

Job Responsibilities:

Identify business and technical requirements for a BI solution to generate accurate answers, valuable insights, on-time information, and actionable conclusions
Systematically assess the quality and completeness of available data
Expand database concepts and develop analytical models to further business performance
Use an analytics-driven approach in analyzing business problems
Implement statistical methodologies to predict, forecast, or diagnose business outcomes
Interpret and validate analysis results
Integrate components of analytical solution into business processes efficiently and effectively
Communicate insights through data visualizations and storytelling
Develop cross functional uses and training for CRM throughout the organization
Present findings and recommendations to bring about insights for decision making
Additional responsibilities as assigned by the Head of Business Intelligence

Qualifications:
Bachelors degree in business, economics or mathematics, or related field
Practical experience with analytics tool(s): SAS EG, SAS EM, Stata, Python, R, etc.
Working knowledge of data visualization software like Tableau or SAS Viya
Understanding of CRM and database marketing. Practical experience is preferred, but not required.
Advanced working knowledge of Excel; Strong Power Point skills
Attention to detail and organizational skills with ability to meet firm deadlines
Strong time management and project management skills
Excellent interpersonal and communication skills, both written and verbal
Ability to work autonomously and use excellent judgment in escalating issues to supervisors
Willingness to learn in a fast-paced, entrepreneurial, high-performing work environment

We are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.",3.6,"Chicago Fire FC
3.6","Chicago, IL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Sports & Recreation,"Arts, Entertainment & Recreation",$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
48,Data Analyst,-1,"OUR COMMITMENT TO DIVERSITY AND EQUITY

HPN is committed to creating a diverse and equitable environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. HPN recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status. We believe that the more inclusive we are, the better our work will be. We aspire to build a diverse team, one that better reflects the people and communities we serve. Applicants who contribute to this diversity are strongly encouraged to apply.

WE VALUE

Collaboration - We are a true network. We believe in the power and benefits of broad engagement, empowerment, and collaboration.

Connection - We actively build relationships that connect people, ideas, and organizations to forge new paths for improving communities.

Inclusion - We recognize our power comes from the collective and cooperative nature of our work, based on an environment that is inclusive of diverse experiences, backgrounds, and perspectives.

Respect - We are open, honest, and respectful in all our interactions which strengthens our relationships, our mission, our work with colleagues and members, and ultimately the lives of the people we all serve.

Transformation - We work with our members to transform our industry by creating systemic solutions to help people who live in our communities to thrive.

ABOUT THE ORGANIZATION

HPN Select is a national procurement solution for HPN members — organizations that share a common goal of helping people live in cleaner, safer, healthier, and more affordable homes. Our goal is to ensure the future of procurement for affordable housing, is simpler, more streamlined, and built for sustainability and efficiency. We are working to help developers and owner-managers connect with vendors in ways that make it easier to access quality and nationally available products at a fair price. And we are enabling greater visibility and transparency in buying decisions and smarter dollar allocations.

ABOUT THE ROLE

The role of the Procurement Data Analyst Associate is multifaceted. You will work with major customers to gather and analyze purchasing data associated with their properties so that optimal purchasing compliance across major vendor categories can be realized. You will also work on special projects that require an in-depth analysis of purchasing patterns that will inform specific actions that provide value to our customers. In addition, you will lead data-driven analysis around customer service KPIs.

You will help manage, interpret, and leverage its data and facilitate small and medium-size projects involving cross-department collaboration. You will translate data into information via reports and dashboards used to inform key organizational goals in business development, partnership management, product development, digital marketing, etc. This is a position with a great opportunity for professional development and growth. We are looking for an individual who is passionate about data and its value to an organization. The ideal candidate is a problem solver, pays attention to detail, and is comfortable in a fast-paced startup environment.

Designs and implements reports to support account, client, and global sourcing requirements.

Maintain data integrity of databases and make changes as required to enhance accuracy, usefulness, and access. Collects and rationalizes data from multiple sources. Ensures data integrity and accuracy.

Coordinates with the global sourcing team and peers to aggregate data and align reporting.

In addition, the role requires a capacity for analysis of data and both financial and statistical information, the administration and/or management of purchasing related projects and contracts, such as benchmarking and mini-competitions while also contributing to the wider work of the Housing Partnership Network, Inc. (“HPN”).

The role will report directly to the VP, Operations of HPN Select.

MAJOR DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES

Support Account Management staff so that they can provide outstanding service to HPN Select customers and exceed customer service benchmarks
Analyze data generated by company systems and other sources to prepare reports for HPN Select for both internal and external publication
Measure sales performance against defined targets, reporting monthly on performance to the President of HPN Select
Communicate with client members via telephone, mailings, newsletters, electronic media, and site visits as appropriate
Undertake such training as may be reasonably required to maintain an appropriate level of technical competence for the post
Extract, cleanse, and upload various types of data to/from several systems
Monitor data integrations and troubleshoot problems as they arise
Develop and manage various types of internal and external reports and dashboards
Play an integral role in the documentation and implementation of a business intelligence system
Develop data collection procedures and policies to be implemented company-wide
Be a storyteller; translate complex data into meaningful insights to share with diverse stakeholder groups
Conducts basic financial analysis.
Assists senior personnel in establishing and defining program requirements.
Monitors progress of program requirements.
Interacts regularly with customers and other industry representatives to ensure conformance to customer requirements.
Assist in business development activities.
Performs administrative and analytical tasks in support of a contract program.
Participates in special projects as required.
Other duties may be assigned

QUALIFICATIONS

Bachelor’s Degree in a related field of study
A minimum of 2 years of equivalent expertise
Extensive knowledge and skills with tools to create complex queries, analyze data and create meaningful reports
Experience extracting, transforming, and analyzing complex and distributed data sets
Strong written and communication skills with the ability to organize and present clear and concise oral and written reports of findings and recommendations.
Ability to establish and maintain effective working relationships with internal and external partners.
Experience working in a consultative, customer-facing environment
Knowledge of QlikSense is desired, but not necessary
Knowledge in using Microsoft Excel at an above-average level
A background in procurement analysis
Ability to quickly learn new tools and technologies
You love data and understand how to manage it accurately and effectively
You have a proven track record of managing multiple data sources and maintaining integration of those data systems to present a complete picture of the customer
Basic knowledge of financial terms and principles. Ability to calculate intermediate figures such as percentages, discounts, and/or commissions.
You consider the customer at the heart of everything you do and support and nurture an environment of innovation and creativity
Enthusiasm for the delivery of a high-quality service to internal and external stakeholders

OTHER

Position may be performed remotely in the US
Moderate travel required",4.7,"Housing Partnership Network
4.7","Boston, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,1990,Nonprofit Organization,Social Assistance,Non-Profit,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
49,Data Analyst,$57k-$98k (Glassdoor Est.),"Houston-Galveston Area Council Overview

Home to more than 7 million people, the Houston-Galveston region is one of the fastest growing and most diverse regions in the country. Making sure the region remains one of the nation’s leading places to live, work, and prosper doesn’t just happen—it takes planning and partnerships.

The Houston-Galveston Area Council serves as a forum where the region’s leaders and decision-makers come together to address local and regional issues related to transportation, the environment, public safety, aging, community planning, workforce training, and economic development. To support these efforts, the Houston-Galveston Area Council employs a robust team whose members are highly qualified, resourceful, and passionate about enhancing the region’s quality of life.

If you are looking for a career where you can help make a difference in urban, suburban, and rural communities, the Houston-Galveston Area Council has exciting opportunities for you. Learn more about why the Houston-Galveston Area Council is the right place for you to learn, grow, and excel.

Opportunity

H-GAC’s Community & Environmental Socio-Economic team has an exciting opportunity for a Data Analyst. H-GAC’s Socio-Economic Modeling program produces a regional growth forecast, an essential tool used by local governments in transportation and other long-range planning. The program conducts the ongoing collection and analysis of employment, population, and land use data, and provides tools for local governments to access US Census Data.

In this role, you will be responsible for developing and managing regional growth forecasting models with large data sets from various sources. The Data Analyst will provide complex analytical support and serve as a point of contact for internal and external requests for data. Quality control to ensure the accuracy and integrity of data and providing innovative solutions to improve forecasting efforts is an integral part of this job. Strong experience reading and writing SAS code for data processing and management is crucial for success in this role.

Requirements

The successful candidate will have at a minimum:
Bachelor’s degree in Economics, Sociology, Planning, Statistics or a related field of study.
Three (3)-Five (5) years of experience in data frames, data set designs, maintaining large volumes of data, producing forecasting models and reporting.
Master’s thesis, doctoral dissertation or research work relevant to this position may substitute for some work experience.
Experience in reading and writing SAS code for data processing and management.
Strong background in demographic and economic theory and models.
Exposure and understanding of various theories, principles and presentation techniques.

Preferred qualifications include:
Five (5)-Eight (8) years of experience in a previous data analytics role.
Strong hands on experience in BASE SAS, SAS SQL, and SAS MACRO.
Proven experience with population, employment and land use forecast modeling.",2.6,"Houston-Galveston Area Council
2.6","Galveston, TX",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1966,Government,Municipal Governments,Government,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
50,Data Analyst,$35k-$64k (Glassdoor Est.),"This is a part-time position working 20 hours per week. This is a limited term position ending September 30, 2020. This is a grant funded position and is not eligible for severance pay.

The Gerald J. and Dorothy R. Friedman School of Nutrition Science and Policy, established in 1981, is the only self-governing graduate and professional school of nutrition in North America. Its mission is to improve the nutritional well-being of people worldwide through the creation of new knowledge; the application and dissemination of information to inform evidence-based policy making; and the education and training of future leaders in the field. This mission is fulfilled by bringing together experts from the areas of clinical nutrition, social and public policy, and biomedicine. Faculty at the school include biomedical scientists, economists, epidemiologists, nutritionists, physicians, political scientists and psychologists who focus on a myriad of issues with the common thread of nutrition and its role in fostering the growth and development of human populations.

Some of the important research conducted by the Friedman School has included participation in two separate, five-year nutrition projects in Ethiopia. The first, Empowering New Generations to Improve Nutrition and Economic Opportunities (ENGINE) from 2011-2016, aimed to strengthen nutrition specific and nutrition sensitive (agriculture, education, social protection) programs to improve the health and nutritional status of pregnant women and children up to age five in select regions of Ethiopia. The second project, Growth through Nutrition, continues with some of the same objectives of ENGINE but with more of an emphasis on operational research, and a new component dealing with Water, Sanitation and Health (WASH). Growth through Nutrition, also, for the first time, includes a small grants research component.

Both ENGINE and Growth through Nutrition have generated an enormous amount of quantitative and qualitative data, only some of which has been analyzed to date. The role of the part-time data analyst is to assist in the continued analyses of existing data sets.

This part-time, limited appointment Data Analyst position based in Boston will assist Dr. Eileen Kennedy, Principal Investigator (PI) for Growth through Nutrition, to conduct analyses of existing data from ENGINE and Growth through Nutrition.

This description is not intended to be all-inclusive. Employee may perform other duties as assigned to meet the ongoing needs of the organization. The funding for this position is through September 30, 2020, with the possibility of extension.

Essential Functions:
Provide technical support in data cleaning and documentation of existing data sets
Carry out the analytical tasks specified in the analysis protocol developed by the PI
Prepare tables with analysis results, assist in interpretation and write-up of methods and results for publication
Conduct literature reviews to support the interpretation of results and any other related tasks as needed.

Qualifications

Basic Requirements:

1-3 years related experience;
Master’s Degree (or in progress) in nutrition, public health/epidemiology, biostatistics, or econometrics;
Microsoft Office Suite, fluency in SPSS or STATA
Ability to take initiative and to function independently; skills in creative problem-solving; capacity to respond to the pressure and multiple demands and timetable; takes responsibility for his/her tasks; brings energy and dedication to day-to-day duties; offers ideas for improving functioning of team and workplace.
Relevant graduate level training in statistics and data analysis; experience with both quantitative and qualitative analysis techniques; strong organizational skills; ability to work independently under deadlines; and familiarity with survey research methods.
Preferred Qualifications:

Experience working with large, complex data sets; experience with large longitudinal data sets.

Special Work Schedule Requirements:
This position will involve flexibility in working schedule. This is a part-time position working 20 hours per week.

An employee in this position must complete all appropriate background checks at the time of hire, promotion, or transfer.

Equal Opportunity Employer – minority/females/veterans/disability/sexual orientation/gender identity.

Primary Location: United States-Massachusetts-Boston
Job: Research
Organization: Friedman School of Nutrition
Employee Status: Limited Appointment

Schedule: Part-time
Job Posting: Jul 10, 2020, 11:11:53 AM",4.4,"TUFTS University
4.4","Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1852,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
51,Data Analyst,-1,"We are looking for a Data Entry clerk for a Retail Point of Sale environment. Work duties include but are not limited to: heavy use of Microsoft Excel and its functions, history of support for Microsoft Windows OS, Database analysis, PC networking skills, Anti-virus implementation and support, and assistance in various PC based day to day operations. We are willing to train but a history in these areas is required to apply for this position. Please be sure to include a Resume.

Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
Data Entry: 2 years (Required)
Additional Compensation:
Bonuses
Store Discounts
Benefits:
Health insurance
Retirement plan
Paid time off",-1,McFadden-Dale Hardware,"Corona, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
52,Senior Data Content Analyst,$45k-$84k (Glassdoor Est.),"About us

Designed for unlimited discovery and unmatched safety, Epic isthe leading digital library for kids. With tens of thousands of high-quality books, audiobooks, and videos from the world's best publishers, every year millions of kids read, learn and explore on Epic.

To learn more about our vision to unlock the potential of every child, visit us at www.getepic.com.

About the job

Keeping kids engaged through a fun experience is the core of our service. If kids are not happy, nothing else matters. This is as core to Epic as it gets. Content is a key driver of engagement and developing deep content insights on what children like and how they interact with our content is core to our mission. We are looking for a Senior Data Content Analyst to increase our understanding of content drivers for engagement and optimize user engagement via awesome content!

What you will be doing
Build the most engaging content catalog from scratch
Develop an understanding of content engagement paths by title
Increase performance of our original content
Help build a world-class Analytics function
What you should have
Bachelor's degree + 4 years relevant experience or Masters degree + 2 years of relevant experience
Strong SQL and another programming language (preferably Python / R)
Strong analytics experience - good statistics background; experience with visualization tooling such as Looker or Tableau.
Experience working with ambiguity in business problem definition
Sharp business judgement and the ability to see past the noise in large datasets to synthesize and present actionable insights
Strong verbal and written communication skills
Ability to multitask and take on diverse projects in a dynamic environment
Exposure to Economics, Math, Statistics, Computer Science and/or Business.
Benefits
Full medical, dental and vision coverage
401(k) plan
Take as you need vacation plan
$80/month transportation reimbursement
Weekly yoga
Unlimited access to our product!",4.9,"Epic
4.9","Redwood City, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
53,Data Analyst,-1,"QUALIFICATION REQUIRED Bachelor Degree
EXPERIANCE REQUIRED 11 years
DESCRIPTION Data Analyst Hadoop",1.0,"HyreU
1.0",Alabama,-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
54,Data/Business Analyst,-1,"Company: *
We start with biometric health screenings because the journey toward better health starts with good data. From there, we provide health coaching and customized programming, as well as our Elevate Platform, a scalable, user-friendly, online engagement tool that meets the needs of all employers, from those just starting a wellness program, to those wanting a robust full engagement platform. We provide a regional focus with national reach.

HealthWorks is an independent, woman-owned, health and well-being company. Consecutive winner of Top Workplace (’19 & ’20).
Job Summary: *
Functions as the principal day-to-day is responsible for partnering with HealthWorks’s Account Manage in the collection of biometric, health & wellness and related business data, interpret and analyze, summarize/report findings. Communication to broader groups is a requirement (e.g. HR, Leadership, Program Participants, etc.) . Strong proficiency in MS, (Excel, PP- must), Power BI or other data analytics tools is beneficial.

The Analyst is responsible for building deep relationships with our clients and HW colleagues to ensure that he/she can proactively identify new insights that will enable HW’s clients to enhance the over health and wellness of their employee base.
Duties and responsibilities *
Work with internal team to manage interface to external data base
Manage changes and enhancements to Portal
Perform user testing of system changes
Collaborate with team members to collect and analyze data
Use graphs, infographics, and other methods to visualize data
Create reports for internal teams and external clients
Manage data uploads to third party vendors
Maintain integrity of data in database
Processing team management
Manage data security, protection, and control
Manage SharePoint file structure
Skills & Qualifications: *
Analytical and problem-solving skills
Balancing multiple priorities
Expert Excel -Advanced data analysis
Example Functions for data cleaning and manipulation: Logic Functions, IfError, Macros, Pivot Tables, LOOKUP, LEN, Filter & Sort, Advanced Charts
Microsoft Office (Advance – Expert)
Proficient in Salesforce
Ability to set and meet deadlines
Project Management skills -
Reporting and data visualization skills
Excellent Attention to detail
SQL Databases
SFTP and/or other secure file transfer protocols, WinSCP, FileZilla
SharePoint
Increasing awareness (exposure to) HIPPA / Healthcare Regulatory Compliance
Strong desire to leverage data analytics talents (tactics) and expand into leadership role (strategic / mgmt)
Education/Experience: *
Bachelor’s degree from an accredited college or university (preferably in Business Administration, or Marketing). Aspirational desire or current pursuit of master’s degree preferred.
Familiarity working within small / fast paced / growth-oriented business environment.
3 – 4-year business experience within fast paced, high growth health & wellness and / or insurance.
Health & Wellness / Healthcare experience strongly preferred.
Workplace Requirements: *
Work in an office environment in close proximity to coworkers (cubicle environment), with limited opportunities to participate in client health & wellness events.

HealthWorks strives to have high-performing, well-balanced individuals who are generous community contributors.

_This job includes the above requirements but is not limited to them._

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Paid time off
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Experience:
Microsoft Office: 3 years (Preferred)
Business Analysis: 2 years (Required)
small / entrepreneurial company: 2 years (Preferred)
Data Analytics: 3 years (Required)
Healthcare / Health & Wellness: 1 year (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Cincinnati, OH 45227 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Working Days:
Monday (Required)
Tuesday (Required)
Wednesday (Required)
Thursday (Required)
Friday (Required)
Work Remotely:
No",4.5,"HealthWorks
4.5","Cincinnati, OH",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Private Practice / Firm,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
55,Senior Business Analyst - Data Warehouse,$69k-$124k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview:

Seattle Cancer Care Alliance (SCCA) brings together the leading research teams and cancer specialists of Fred Hutch, Seattle Children’s, and UW Medicine. One extraordinary group whose sole mission is the pursuit of better, longer, richer lives for our patients. SCCA's purpose is to provide state-of-the-art, patient and family centered care; support the conduct of cancer clinical research and education; enhance access to improved cancer interventions; and advance the standard of cancer care regionally and beyond. Our goal, every day, is to turn cancer patients into cancer survivors. Join us and make a difference!

SCCA’s Data Warehouse Team is responsible for designing, developing and supporting the enterprise data platform for operational and analytical purposes. Under the guidance of the Data Warehouse Manager, the Senior Business Analyst will engage business and clinical leaders and subject domain experts to analyze functional requirements and data sources to support the development of our new enterprise data warehouse. Responsibilities include defining requirements, analyzing/profiling data, developing technical specifications, designing and modeling solutions in alignment with data warehousing best practices and creating prototypes that will be developed and integrated into the data warehouse.

The Senior Business Analyst is a subject matter and process leader who works with business partners, technical teams, and other stakeholders to design and deliver data and analytics capabilities to support SCCA’s business and clinical mission. Finally, this individual performs a key role in promoting the adoption and utilization of SCCA’s data assets to enhance the organization’s reputation as a healthcare analytical leader.

Responsibilities:
Works with business users and subject matter experts to analyze, define, and document data requirements to support SCCA’s clinical, business, operational, and research activities
Leads requirements gathering process with business partners to understand their data needs and translate those needs into technical specifications
Facilitates meetings with technical and non-technical staff to clarify business requirements and document technical specifications for the data warehouse development team
Conducts data profiling and other analyses to determine the efficacy of available data sources
Communicates technical specifications to the data warehouse developers
Guides data warehouse team members on investigation of bugs and data quality issues
Participates in testing and QA processes to ensure business requirements are met
Designs, organizes, and executes strategies that advance the data warehouse platform
Establish standards for technical specifications and supporting project documentation
Mentors other analysts in skills and methods in order to demonstrate and increase the business value delivered by the data warehouse team
Qualifications:

Required

BA/BS in healthcare informatics, other similar degree, or equivalent experience
5+ years of demonstrated data warehousing & business intelligence experience
2+ years business analysis experience in a data warehouse environment or data consulting services role
Minimum 3 years’ experience using T-SQL
Expert at documenting functional and data requirements into executable technical specifications
Exceptional at meeting facilitation to translate abstract concepts into tangible solutions
Strong communication skills, especially between technical and non-technical audiences
Build cross team collaboration to produce high-quality work products
Manage business expectations and deliver customer-focused solutions
Excellent written and verbal communication skills

Preferred

Master’s degree or 5-8 years of experience in data development/business intelligence/analytics
Familiarity with healthcare industry and terminology and/or experience working with healthcare data (e.g. scheduling, billing, clinical, research data)
Understanding of HIPAA regulations
Experience with Epic healthcare systems
Familiarly with the Systems/Software Development Life Cycle
Experience with Agile software development
Our Commitment to Diversity: We are proud to be an Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) and Vietnam Era Veterans Readjustment Assistance Act (VEVRAA) Employer. We are committed to cultivating a workplace in which diverse perspectives and experiences are welcomed and respected. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, creed, ancestry, national origin, sex, age, disability (physical or mental), marital or veteran status, genetic information, sexual orientation, gender identity, political ideology, or membership in any other legally protected class. We are an Affirmative Action employer. We encourage individuals with diverse backgrounds to apply and desire priority referrals of protected veterans. If due to a disability you need assistance/and or a reasonable accommodation during the application or recruiting process, please send a request to our Employee Services Center at hrops@fredhutch.org or by calling 206-667-4700.",3.2,"Seattle Cancer Care Alliance
3.2","Seattle, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1998,Hospital,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
56,Data Analyst,$69k-$121k (Glassdoor Est.),"Apply now

Data Analyst
Plano, TX

Responsibilities:
• Utilize 3rd party resources to maintain up-to-date competitive benchmarking for advanced technology products, safety, and color and materials.
• Track and monitor regulatory, compliance, and safety ratings changes for competitors and all Toyota and Lexus models
• Monitor competitive landscape and closely follow rapidly changing trends in advanced technologies
• Disseminate information and data changes and report out to management
• Create a report and database that shows the exterior paint color palettes, interior colors, seat material, and ornament trim levels for competitor vehicles. Research will be gathered from web sites and brochures.
• Maintain accurate records of data gathered for all models.
Job category

Branch

Pay rate

Posted date
10/15/2020

Job ID

Job type

Requirements:
Strong Microsoft Office skills (Outlook, Excel, Word, PowerPoint)
Strong analytical skills and experience with large amounts of data
Detail oriented, strong communication, presentation and time management skills
Ability to identify gaps between product lines
Some knowledge of data analysis and familiarity reading spreadsheets of numerical data.",3.3,"Cenergy International
3.3","Plano, TX",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
57,Data Analyst,$33k-$60k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position:
Data Analyst

Department:
James T. George School of Business

Date Posted:
06/21/2019

Closing Date:
Open Until filled

Description

The Hampton University James T. George School of Business invites applications for Data Analyst beginning August 2019.

Founded in 1868, Hampton University is a leading historically black university (HBCU) located on the Virginia Peninsula in the City of Hampton. It is a privately endowed, co-educational, nonsectarian institution.

Duties and Responsibilities

The successful candidate will work with the School Dean, faculty, staff and students to create and maintain data sets for the School. In particular, he/she will:

Create and maintain Undergraduate/Graduate student databases and recordkeeping for the following:
School wide internship activity to include students who have registered for internship credit, internship evaluation outcomes, and employer data. Internships are now a requirement for the entire school
Senior Survey results regarding plans post-graduation permanent placement/ graduate programs
Alumni Survey Results
School wide student profile with various demographics (race, gender, permanent residency, phone/ email, GPA, career interests, etc)
Students At-Risk by major
Individual student advisement progression
Student Achievement: Scholarships, Case Competition, Conferences, publications etc.
Trends of enrollment, retention, graduation
School of Business Website updates
Accreditation compliance data support
Other duties related to student support: Digitize student handbook and maintain updates, support departments with special student data requests, support with graduation clearance process
Create and maintain faculty databases and recordkeeping for the following:

Faculty intellectual contributions (journal publications, research presentations, books, editors, consulting activities, other professional recognitions/contributions in research or practice )
Electronic file of faculty CVs
Electronic file of Syllabi
Tracking Update/Annual report activity
Collection and Input of TracDat Data
Other duties as assigned by Dean

Qualifications

Bachelor’s Degree in Business
Demonstrated skills in Excel
Experience with building databases and recordkeeping
Strong communication and Interpersonal Skills
Self –Starter with lots of initiative
Great organization skills

How to Apply

Review of applications will begin immediately and will continue until the positions are filled. Applicants should submit a Hampton University Application for Faculty Employment, resume, and a recommendation letter Applications may be submitted electronically to anabel.palmer@hamptonu.edu or mailed to:

Dr. Ziette Hayes

119 Buckman Hall

Hampton University

Hampton, VA 23668

(757)727-5472",2.5,"Hampton University
2.5","Hampton, VA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1868,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
58,Data Analyst,$43k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),"Senior Data Analyst Denver, CO

Are you a highly motivated individual that is fascinated by IT systems data, analysis, problem-solving and programming? Do you want to be part of a niche team that analyzes data with the purpose of identifying and stopping money laundering, terrorist financing, and other fraudulent activities before it affects our customers? Join Western Union as a Senior Data Analyst serving our AML division.

Motivated by our values: purpose driven, globally minded, and trustworthy & respectful

Were a FinTech thats using insight from customers and colleagues worldwide to improve financial services for families, small businesses, multinational corporations, and non-profit organizations. Were a team of over 10,000 people spanning 200 countries and territories. We believe when money moves, better things happen.

Better requires process, discipline, and simplification

This role is the perfect opportunity to develop data analysis and data science skills, deriving insights from complex system data that can drive valuable enhancements to Western Unions compliance program. In this role you will source and query data from a variety of compliance systems and databases. You will analyze large and complex data sets, visualize data, document analyses and processes and present findings. You will also work with IT partners to understand system expectations

For this role, you will need a degree in a related field. Certifications, bootcamps or related studies in data science, programming or other quantitative subject matter a strong plus. You will also need 1-3 years of professional experience in a corporate environment, preferably in a data-focused capacity as well as experience with SQL, Python, R Studio, Hadoop, or Snowflake.

Join us, and lets move money for better

Western Union is transforming its business and shaping the financial services sector by driving quality, convenience, and customer service to new levels of excellence. Its an exciting time for our organization, as the largest cross-border money transfer operator, trusted by millions of consumers around the world. If youre ready to unleash your potential to help drive change through bottom-up innovation, apply now.

Were a company on the move, and we want our people to grow and develop. Youll have plenty of opportunities to learn new skills and build a career, as well as a great salary and benefits package. You will be a whiz with Microsoft Office and good at building relationships with internal & external stakeholders.

Inclusion and diversity are fundamental to our culture and success. Western Union is proud to be an Equal Opportunity-Affirmative Action Employer. The company will provide accommodation to applicants, including those with disabilities, during the recruitment process, in accordance with applicable laws. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, religion, sex (including pregnancy or related medical conditions), national origin, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, disability, marital status, or any other protected category.

#Li-RC1",3.6,"Western Union
3.6","Denver, CO",-1,10000+ Employees,1851,Company - Public,Financial Transaction Processing,Finance,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
59,Senior Systems Analyst (Data Modeling),$73k-$126k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description

At Freddie Mac, you will do important work to build a better housing finance system and you’ll be part of a team helping to make homeownership and rental housing more accessible and affordable across the nation. Position Overview:

We are looking for a dynamic Sr. Data Analyst to join our diverse Enterprise Operations Technology Resiliency Assurance team. We are looking for someone who is collaborative, innovative and motivated to enable data driven business decisions. Apply now and learn why there’s #MoreAtFreddieMac!

Our Impact:

Our team is the liaison between business and IT to deliver optimal solutions for business requirements.
Continuously innovate and improve the data pipeline and data consumption aligning with enterprise objectives.
Identify trends, issues, and opportunities to improve user experience and generate new insights to drive better decisions.

Your Impact:

The individual will ensure that the organization is data driven in decision making and will utilize analytics to develop informed and meaningful insights. This includes developing data models in support of analytics and insights, data quality management and potentially some master data management in addition to supporting the data governance function. The role also facilitates data and reporting requirements, defines standard metrics and scorecards, strongly influences the associated enabling technology platforms, and investigates new opportunities to acquire data for use in enterprise decision making. The role will work closely with business and technology partners.
Qualifications:
5+ years of experience in systems development, or an equivalent combination of education and experience
Bachelor's Degree or equivalent work experience
Hands-on experience with data analysis and data visualization
Significant experience in facilitating the discovery process with business, identify requirements and solution the outcomes.
Must have hands-on experience in designing data ingestion and consumption capabilities out of data lake / federated repositories
Strong knowledge of ETL, API and connector-based integration to facilitate / direct IT practitioners.
Experience of Informatica suite of tools, Tableau / Micro Strategy or similar BI tools.
Requires a complete understanding of the system development life cycle and of enterprise architecture
Knowledge of Data governance. Catalog/Glossary/Metadata Tools such as Collibra and Software AG’s ARIS tool would be a plus
Hands-on experience with Big Data technologies. Data Lake experience would be a plus
Experience with AWS, APIs would be a plus
Knows how to work within the organization; understands the agendas and perspectives of others
Experience or knowledge of Machine Learning (ML) in Augmented analytics.
Keys to Success in this Role:
Excellent analytical, organization, project, and time management skills, strong judgement, and ability to work independently and effectively with team members, senior management, other technology personnel, clients and vendors.
Excellent oral and written communication skills with the ability to effectively present to the target audience.
Excellent problem-solving skills to assist in issue resolution.
Ability to assert ideas and gain support and commitment from others.

Excellent data modelling skills for Predictive analytics.

Current Freddie Mac employees please apply through the internal career site.

Today, Freddie Mac makes home possible for one in four home borrowers and is one of the largest sources of financing for multifamily housing. Join our smart, creative and dedicated team and you’ll do important work for the housing finance system and make a difference in the lives of others.

We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity and inclusion at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, disability status or any other characteristic protected by applicable law. We will ensure that individuals with differing abilities are provided reasonable accommodation to participate in the job application or interview process, to perform essential job functions, and to receive other benefits and privileges of employment. Please contact us to request accommodation.

Notice to External Search Firms: Freddie Mac partners with BountyJobs for contingency search business through outside firms. Resumes received outside the BountyJobs system will be considered unsolicited and Freddie Mac will not be obligated to pay a placement fee. If interested in learning more, please visit www.BountyJobs.com and register with our referral code: MAC.

Time-type: Full time

Job Category: Information Technology

FLSA Status: Exempt",3.9,"Freddie Mac
3.9","McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1970,Company - Public,-1,-1,$10+ billion (USD),-1
60,Data Analyst,$33k-$59k (Glassdoor Est.),"Classification Title:
Data Analyst

Working Title:
Data Analyst

Campus:
UNC-Chapel Hill

Region:
Piedmont/Triangle

Job Summary:
The COVID-19 virus (SARS-CoV-2) is especially devastating for those who are housed or work in criminal justice settings due to restricted access to sanitizing supplies and personal protective equipment, close congregant living conditions, and exposure to correctional staff who unknowingly transmit the infection from the community. These populations are also more likely to experience severe and life-threatening symptoms of COVID-19, due to higher rates of underlying medical conditions. This position is funded by an NIH funded RADx-UP grant, which aims to increased access to COVID-19 testing among historically marginalized and underserved populations. The hired candidate will join an interdisciplinary research team, led by Dr. Lauren Brinkley-Rubinstein, that will investigate, develop, and implement long-term COVID-19 testing strategies among incarcerated populations and correctional staff in diverse criminal justice settings across the country. The hired candidate will have experience in computer science and web scraping (experience with Python, R, etc.) who is also able to manage data sets and provide analyses, as needed. Their job activities would be to help make the COVID Prison Project (which is getting support from the RADx) more sustainable through improved web scraping functionality, helping build out the CPP website as needed, providing support around the data management of the RADx, and assist with analyses and data visualizations for external partners to digest the data more easily. This position provides informatics expertise to facilitate design, development, and provisioning of research datasets tailored to individual study needs. The position will perform hands-on data mining using graphical user interface (GUI) tools (i2b2/SHRINE, PopMedNet, CLARK, SAS, SAP Business Objects, et cetera) and SQL to extract aggregate and patient-level datasets to meet study requirements, provision datasets to requesters, provide consultation and help sessions to requesters, and assist with regulatory matters as they relate to PHI data. This position will interface with workgroup teams, project management staff, governance committees, and others on a regular basis. This position will also be responsible for attending webinars and conference calls, as well as offering consultations, recommendations, and basic training to internal and external faculty and other stakeholders.

Minimum Qualifications:
Preference for the selected candidate to have a master's degree in computer, business, math/science related curriculum. A certificate and/or degree in clinical informatics is highly preferred. Minimum of 1 year of experience working with database systems and data mining. -Proven understanding of security and regulatory requirements surrounding protected health information (PHI). -Understanding of clinical research study design and methodologies. -Basic knowledge of SQL is preferred, as well as experience with GUI data mining tools such as i2b2 and/or SAP Business Objects. -Ability to maintain a high degree of accuracy and professionalism with strong attention to detail. -Excellent written and oral interpersonal communication skills. -Proven ability to work in a team environment.Master's or Bachelor's degree and 0-2 years' experience or will accept a combination of related education and experience in substitution. Degree or coursework in Clinical or Biomedical Informatics strongly preferred.



Position Number:
NF0004593

Posting Date:
10/19/2020

Closing Date:
11/02/2020

American Recovery & Reinvestment Act Funded:
No",4.2,"UNC-Chapel Hill
4.2","Chapel Hill, NC",-1,10000+ Employees,1789,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
61,Data Analyst,-1,"Job Summary:

The Driver Acquisition and Retention Analyst will be responsible for analyzing, identifying and optimizing the on boarding and retention of independent contractor delivery drivers for the Point Pickup Platform.

This position requires exceptional attention to detail, inquisitive mindset and ability to synthesize multiple sources of information to make informed decisions and develop results oriented processes. Analyze data to uncover trends and communicate results to relevant stakeholders. Creativity is key. We are looking for someone who is able to own and drive projects to completion.

The ideal candidate will have work experience in an analyst role as well as strong computer skills with a mindset for marketing.

Duties/Responsibilities:
Development of recruiting programs for new market launches.
Analyzing delivery markets and optimizing capacity.
Job Requirements:
High proficiency with Excel.
Understanding of database and analysis platforms such as DOMO.
Great communicator.
Independent and inquisitive thinker.
Prior Experience:
BA or higher degree;
1-3 years + post college work experience in marketing, finance as analyst or gig-economy platform.",2.5,"Point Pickup
2.5","Greenwich, CT",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
62,Direct to Consumer Data Analyst,-1,"We are hiring a Direct to Consumer Data Analyst to join one of the biggest publishing companies in the world. If you are a Data Analyst looking to take your direct to consumer experience and lead a newly created business unit, then this is the job for you. Our headquarters are in downtown Manhattan (although we are remote at this time).

What Is The Job?

As a Data analyst, you will be collecting and preparing data for a completely new business unit and guiding the team as to what the best practices are to drive the new platform. You will be the only Analyst to start. This role has a clear path to management within two years. Once the platform is up and running the goal is to build a team underneath you.

What Skills Do We Need?
Direct to Consumer Experience as an Analyst
Proficient in Python & SQL
You're excited, energetic and a go getter
Excited about helping to start a new group within a name brand company
Who Are We?

We are one of the largest publishing companies in the world, and one of the Big Five English-language publishing companies.

Compensation:
$115,000 $130,000 base salary
Full medical
Full Dental
401k
Very reasonable work hours
Whats in it for you?

This is an amazing opportunity for a Data analyst to work for one of the biggest publishing companies in the world. This is a unique opportunity for you to come in and build a brand new business unit from the ground up. If you are someone who would like to get into management this is the role for you because the goal is to eventually build a team underneath you!

We are hiring for this role as soon as possible, so if you are interested, please apply today or reach out to me directly at: Chris.Decrescenzo@Averityteam.com.",5.0,"Averity
5.0","New York, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
63,Data Analyst,$41k-$75k (Glassdoor Est.),"We are CirrusLabs. Our vision is to become the world’s most sought-after niche digital transformation company that helps customers realize value through innovation. Our mission is to co-create success with our customers, partners and community. Our goal is to enable employees to dream, grow and make things happen. We are committed to excellence. We are a dependable partner organization that delivers on commitments. We strive to maintain integrity with our employees and customers. Every action we take is driven by value. The core of who we are is through our well knit teams and employees.
You are the core of a values driven organization. You have an entrepreneurial spirit. You enjoy working as a part of well-knit teams. You value the team over the individual. You welcome diversity at work and within the greater community. You aren’t afraid to take risks. You appreciate a growth path with your leadership team that journeys how you can grow inside and outside of the organization. You thrive upon continuing education programs that your company sponsors to strengthen your skills and for you to become a thought leader ahead of the industry curve. You are excited about creating change because your skills can help the greater good of every customer, industry and community.

Requirements

Role: Data Analyst
Location: Plano, TX

Duration: Short Term

Job Description

Data Analyst with strong SQL, Python",3.8,"CirrusLabs
3.8","Plano, TX",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
64,Senior Business Analyst - Data Ops,-1,"About the Role:

We are seeking a detailed-oriented analytical team member for our Revenue Operations team to support our Industry Partnerships Team. You will work at the intersection of consumers and providers, helping our Industry Partnerships team sell innovative data products, transform their operations, and drive results with insightful analytics.

If the idea of transforming a business unit with your unique data-storytelling skills, thoughtful scoping, and push for operational efficiency excites you, read on!

You will work with a multi-sided marketplace:
Consumers that want to conduct research and potentially have procedures completed
Providers that want to attract quality patients and help them by performing procedures
Brands that want to get their products in front of consumers and into the hands of providers
In this role, you will also:
Feel comfortable with statistical significance and are prepared to set up tests for humans (product tests) and by humans (sales tests)
Write in-depth assessments that change behavior and drive significant revenue for our Industry Partnerships Team
Be comfortable rapidly building data visualizations to tell a compelling data-driven narrative
Be ready to use the right tool for the job: Looker, DBT, Google Slides & Sheets, Salesforce, or Python all could be tools you would use
Work with significant autonomy and discretion, setting the direction for your work as a business owner
Avoid providing raw data dumps, inspiring stakeholders with insightful recommendations that push the business towards innovation and growth
Mentor more junior-level team members on best-practices and diagnostic techniques
Work on sample projects like standardizing ad product ROI, automating framework for data-driven storytelling, and operationalizing Sales Metrics
Other duties, responsibilities, and activities may change or be assigned at any time with or without notice.

About You:

You love developing your analytical skills and have the grit to make smart changes happen. You enjoy working with a small team and know you can rely on them to help you along the way. Below are some of the qualifications we'd love for you to have.

You may be the right fit if you have:
Prior experience in a high-impact analytics role
The ability to communicate with your stakeholders and set clear expectations throughout your work
Experience using SQL and a scripting language in a business setting
Advanced Excel/Google Sheets and/or data manipulation skills
A passion for using data to find ways to create clear visualizations that tell a compelling story
A desire to grow with a team that will push and inspire you to be your best
Rigor, fortitude, and a self-disciplined approach to quality
Prolific analytic skills that bring high-performance results
The ability to take an ambiguous request and translate it into a scoped action plan with clear timelines and milestones stakeholders understand and appreciate
Highly analytical and positive mindset -- you're curious, quantitative, and meticulous
Experience with Google Analytics, Google Ad Manager, or other web analytics tools is a plus
Don't think you fully fit the bill? Apply anyway! Internally, we're in the business of building leaders.

Travel

Not expected for this role

Work Environment

The RealSelf office sits in a historic Pioneer Square building. Employees also have the option to bring their dogs to work! Telecommute option dependent on job function at the discretion of the manager. *Due to COVID-19, RealSelf employees are currently remote.

About RealSelf

RealSelf is the world's largest online destination to learn about elective cosmetic procedures and to find the right doctor or clinic for you. More than 10 million people visit RealSelf each month to find out which treatments and providers live up to their promise of being ""Worth It."" RealSelf is powered by unbiased experiences shared by consumers for hundreds of treatments, ranging from simple skincare to high consideration cosmetic surgeries. Offering millions of photos and medical expert answers, RealSelf has become an essential resource and service for those seeking to find the right local provider.

About the Industry

According to a 2016 ASAPS (American Society for Aesthetic Plastic Surgery) study, Americans spent more than 13.5 billion dollars on combined (surgical and nonsurgical) aesthetic procedures in a single calendar year for the first time on record. The total reflects a 1.5-billion-dollar increase from 2014. Surgical procedures accounted for 58% of the total expenditures, surpassing the 8-billion-dollar mark for the first time, and nonsurgical procedures accounted for 42% of the total spending, surpassing the 5-billion-dollar mark for the first time. This dramatic increase in demand speaks to the rapidly increasing need for consumer education and engagement - a role RealSelf is proud to own in the industry. RealSelf is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, or protected veteran status.

RealSelf is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, or protected veteran status.",4.0,"RealSelf
4.0",Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2006,Company - Private,"Health, Beauty, & Fitness",Consumer Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
65,"Data Analyst ""Insurance Experience Required""",-1,"Client is seeking to add a Database Design Analyst with Data Warehouse and Business Analyst experience to staff the Enterprise Data Services team reporting to the AVP Enterprise Data Services at our office in Chicago, Illinois.

This position is responsible for the development and maintenance of data warehouse and analytical environments to support financial, management and statutory reporting requirements along with enhancing and facilitating corporate decision-making capabilities.
Position Responsibilities: *
Independently work with business customers and members of the EDS team to create solutions that support reporting, analytic and warehouse needs using the appropriate platforms and tools.
Analyze business requirements and work with client areas to produce functional specifications for use as reference in creation of reporting and analytical solutions.
Perform the first level of testing for a new and/or enhanced functionality and provide support for user acceptance testing.
Analyze source data to understand relationships and determine business rules.
Assist in designing the data warehouse and assure that data is stored and maintained in consistent formats.
Create source to target mapping documents to transform the source data into the target warehouse and test final transformations.
Develop and/or maintain relationships with business customers to identify and acquire additional data sources to incorporate into the warehouse.
Train and assist users with retrieving data from the warehouse.
Provide guidance in the creation of reporting and analytical solutions.
Position Qualifications: *
Requires a bachelor's degree or equivalent certifications in technical system design.
Insurance industry experience.
4+ years of experience developing data warehouse solutions preferably within the insurance industry.
Sound understanding of data warehouse best practices, relational data structures and dimensional data modeling.
Strong knowledge of current relational database and big data software and query concepts
Advanced SQL skills
Experience supporting large scale Enterprise Data Warehouses
Business Analyst experience.
Ability to analyze and solve complex problems and to work independently on multiple tasks
Must be able to communicate effectively verbally and in writing with technical and non-technical associates
Job Types: Full-time, Contract

Pay: Up to $1.00 per hour

Schedule:
8 hour shift
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
SQL: 6 years (Required)
Databases: 8 years (Required)
Data warehouse: 8 years (Required)
Work Remotely:
No",4.3,"Peterson Technology Partners
4.3","Chicago, IL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1997,Contract,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
66,Data Analyst,-1,"Requirements:
Candidate must be experienced working in projects involving SAS
Other ideal qualifications include experiences in:
• SAS (Base SAS)
• Teradata
SAS EG
• Experience with text analytics and access methods for semi-structured and unstructured data.
• Understands where to obtain information needed to make the appropriate decisions
• Demonstrates ability to break down a problem to manageable pieces and implement effective, timely solutions
• Identifies the problem versus the symptom
• Manages problems that require involvement of others to solve
• Reaches sound decisions quickly
• Carefully evaluates alternative risks and solutions before taking action
• Optimizes the use of all available resources
• Develops solutions to meet business needs that reflect a clear understanding of the objectives, practices and procedures of the corporation, department and business unit

Skills:
• The Candidate must have 4-6 yrs of experience in SAS especially in the DW/BI area.
•Exceptionally strong analytical and problem solving skills.
•Strong experience with ETL methods and with retrieving data from dimensional data models and data warehouses.
•Strong experience with relational databases and data access methods, especially SQL.
•Excellent collaboration and cross-functional leadership skills.
•Excellent communication skills, both written and verbal.
•Ability to manage multiple initiatives and priorities in a fast-paced collaborative environment.
•Ability to leverage data assets to respond to complex questions that require timely answe

Job Segment:
Database, Developer, Business Intelligence, Data Warehouse, SQL, Technology",3.6,"LTI
3.6",United States,-1,10000+ Employees,1997,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
67,Data Analyst,$41k-$75k (Glassdoor Est.),"We are CirrusLabs. Our vision is to become the world’s most sought-after niche digital transformation company that helps customers realize value through innovation. Our mission is to co-create success with our customers, partners and community. Our goal is to enable employees to dream, grow and make things happen. We are committed to excellence. We are a dependable partner organization that delivers on commitments. We strive to maintain integrity with our employees and customers. Every action we take is driven by value. The core of who we are is through our well knit teams and employees.
You are the core of a values driven organization. You have an entrepreneurial spirit. You enjoy working as a part of well-knit teams. You value the team over the individual. You welcome diversity at work and within the greater community. You aren’t afraid to take risks. You appreciate a growth path with your leadership team that journeys how you can grow inside and outside of the organization. You thrive upon continuing education programs that your company sponsors to strengthen your skills and for you to become a thought leader ahead of the industry curve. You are excited about creating change because your skills can help the greater good of every customer, industry and community.

Requirements

Role: Data Analyst
Location: Plano, TX

Duration: Short Term

Job Description

Data Analyst with strong SQL, Python",3.8,"CirrusLabs
3.8","Plano, TX",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
68,Data Analyst,$35k-$63k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why Work Here?
Arkatechture began in 2012 with a passion for data, business, and getting things done. We are a team of data lovers and technical experts who use our skills to help businesses big and small harness, utilize, and optimize their data. At Arkatechture, we work hard and we play hard-we genuinely love what we do and that's what makes us different.

We take great pride in being New England's Data Resource. We've been based in Maine and New Hampshire since our founding and have no plans on leaving. We love being a part in our communities, and many of our team members are involved in local activities and organizations. We offer a competitive benefits package that includes health and life insurance, an annual bonus based on company performance and generous paid time off!

Note: Due to COVID-19, all Arkatechture employees are working remotely through July 2021

The Position
Arkatechture is seeking candidates for a Data Analyst position to support our BI platform, Arkalytics. Arkalytics is Arkatechture’s newest product. Candidates should be excited about helping develop the platform and client implementation processes.

As a Data Analyst, you are required to perform requirements gathering, data profiling and data mapping, and data visualization analysis. Data Analysis requires proficiency in interpreting data, trends, patterns in complex data sets, technical expertise with SQL conformance layers, databases, and reporting packages like Tableau or Business Objects. Ability to interpret and use artifacts like business requirement documents, system requirements documents, requirement traceability matrix, workflows, data mapping, etc. Should be able to work efficiently with the business and the technology teams collaborating with the project/program managers.

How to Apply
Please send a cover letter and resume with your application. If you do not currently live in the Portland, ME area please explain your relocation plans in your cover letter. You must submit all requested documents to be considered for the position.

Responsibilities
Requirement gathering for Data pipeline development
Develop Source to Target Mappings
Data Profiling, analyzing source system data and metadata and collecting requirements from the client about their business logic
Developing Views for Business Conformance layers
Develop data quality rules
Implementing data warehouses, data collection systems, data analytics and other strategies that optimize business intelligence and analytical efficiency and quality
Building reference data for hierarchies, lookups and grouping purposes
Acquiring data from primary or secondary data sources and developing and maintaining Data Dictionaries
Testing using SQL and providing development sign off
Review SQL code and deliverables of junior Data analyst
Data visualization
Locate and define new process improvement opportunities
Documentation of processes and workflows
Additional responsibilities as assigned

Skills, Knowledge & Expertise
Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor's Degree in a relevant field or 2-4 years of experience in a similar role
Expert in SQL
Enthusiastic, learner and driven with a positive attitude
Strong critical and analytical thinking and problem solving skills
Experience working on any one Database such as Snowflake, SQLServer, Oracle, Aurora, PostgreSQL, Redshift, MySQL etc.
A strong understanding of Agile software development life cycle and methodology
Experience working on Data Management projects for Data-lakes/Data-warehousing
Preferred Experience
Understanding of cloud platforms such as AWS
Experience in working with financial institutions
About Arkatechture
At Arkatechture, we love data — we play with it and learn from it every day, and we want you to love your data, too.

We are a data consultation and services company specializing in data quality, visualization, and management, as well as customized enterprise-level solutions. We work with companies big and small to help solve their data challenges and reveal how they can leverage their data in brand new ways. Need to collect, clean, or visualize your data? We can help.",4.7,"Arkatechture
4.7","Portland, ME",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2012,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
69,Data Analyst,$43k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),Great new contact with Employee Benefits at Equitable running the Data Streams,3.4,"DISYS
3.4","Syracuse, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1994,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
70,Data Analyst,-1,"Join our fast growing beauty brand and become a fundamental member of our expanding team. At OSEA Malibu, we are always looking to apply the power of data-driven insights to more efficiently manage and accelerate the growth of our business. Our Data Analyst will be central to this and a critical role in the company. This role will have interaction with all functional areas of the business (Sales, Finance, Operations, Marketing and Product Development) and focus on generating both backward and forward looking data insights to help support a majority of our business decisions. The ideal candidate will additionally share our commitment to wellness in both our products and work-life balance. Our mission is to create effective, results-driven skincare that is safe for the planet and humankind.

Key Responsibilities:
Demand Planning
Develop demand forecasts at multiple levels (i.e. Per Customer, Per Channel, etc…).
Review historical sales trends, research demand drivers (i.e. Customer POS data, industry trends, etc…) and evaluate forecast accuracy on a continual basis.
Coordinate cross-functional research activities to reconcile significant variances and refine the model(s) to reflect updated sales and marketing assumptions.
Utilize a collaborative approach with Sales, Marketing and Finance to ensure that current and accurate information is driving the demand forecast.
Provide input to Operations and Sales to collaboratively develop inventory strategies on existing items, new products and product exits.
Generalized Reporting
Manage and help create all monthly KPI reports/Dashboards.
Update current reports on the prescribed frequency and generate key insights/takeaways that key stakeholders should be aware of.
Work to automate and simplify current reports as much as possible to drive to real-time visibility where it makes sense.
Learn the various systems utilized by each functional area (i.e. ERP, Google Analytics, Shopify, Quickbooks) and work within them to generate actionable reporting and insights that can be used by key stakeholders to drive the business.
Make suggestions on future reporting needs, systems and strategies to ensure we have accurate, well organized and ‘clean’ data.
Finance
Aid in the development and maintenance of a rolling 3-year financial model for the company.
Help the various functional areas develop business cases around key investments or revenue generating initiatives.
Regularly review and analyze how our products pricing impacts sales velocity with an eye on margin. Make recommendations to suggested changes that align with company goals.
Visibility
Facilitate and manage demand planning for customer meetings to achieve ongoing consensus between the business and the supply chain.
Publish data to the key functions on at the right frequency to ensure each team has what they need to do their job.
Requirements
4 year degree preferred
Interest and enthusiasm for health, wellness and beauty and keeping up with trends in the industry
Enjoy solving problems. You love taking on difficult challenges and finding creative solutions. You don’t get flustered easily. If you don’t know the answer you dig until you find it, or until you have enough evidence to make a strong recommendation.
Highly proficient in Microsoft Excel, Statistics, Forecasting and Forecasting Methods, SQL and CSV.
You have a strong knowledge in the following areas:
Demand planning software
Google Analytics
Cordial
Shopify
Have a strong understanding of the KPI’s in retail.
Have experience with business and revenue modeling techniques.
Have an ability to conduct a cost/benefit analysis.
Are experienced in developing business cases.
Have great attention to detail and organization.
Have excellent written and verbal communication that enables you to work collaboratively across functions.
Must be willing to fall in love with our products, work in a collaborative environment and most importantly have fun while we work.
Benefits

Medical, dental and vision insurance, generous vacation benefits, 401k, facials, team lunches and more!",5.0,"OSEA
5.0","Los Angeles, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
71,Data Analyst,$69k-$131k (Glassdoor Est.),"Update (Oct. 30): This job is still opening. According to previous screening landscape, good technical skills in data manipulation, especially in SQL, is a must and the client prefer candidates in Bay Area. Thanks!

Title: Data Analyst

Duration: 12 months with good extension possibility (W2 contractor)

Location: Sunnyvale, CA

Analytics team of our client (one in FLAG) leverages big data to develop and deliver data-driven tools, metrics, insights, and ultimately drive the companys monetization efforts. Were looking for a creative and technical candidate who is passionate about mining big data, turning data into insights, and making an impact through creative storytelling and timely actions. This role will be focusing on product security areas.

Responsibilities:
Create and automate reports and dashboards to track business metrics for Security areas
ETL data, clean and validate data when needed
Monitor trend metrics and quickly identify the root cause of anomaly
Analyze and draw insights from data and make recommendations based on the analysis
Develop and improve predictive models to optimize user experience and operational efficiency
Partner with cross-functional teams to lead or contribute to large-scale projects as well as ongoing operational activities
Craft compelling stories, make logical recommendations, drive informed actions
Perform Ad hoc analytics tasks
Required skills and experience:
Strong technical skills: Proficiency with SQL/relational databases (Teradata, Oracle etc.)
Experience in data analysis in Hadoop/HDFS and Hive/Pig
Experience with Python, Javascript or other scripting language, web development a plus
Candidates must have strong business mindset, logical thinking and problem solving skills
Excellent communications skills are required. Candidate must be able to explain complex problems to a variety of audience. Candidate must be able to drive meetings, presentation and lead discussions
2+ years hands-on experience in business analytics
Successful candidate needs to have a strong passion in analytics and curiosity to learn new skills in a fast-paced environment
Preferred Skills:
Experience with Tableau or other visualization tools
Advanced degree in quantitative fields - Computer Science, Engineering, Operational Research, Statistics, Economics, etc.
Powered by JazzHR",4.2,"IntelliPro Group Inc.
4.2","Sunnyvale, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
72,Data Analyst,$45k-$85k (Glassdoor Est.),"Technomics is a growing employee-owned, decision analytics company that specializes in cost and economic analysis to facilitate better decisions faster. We enable a wide range of clients across the Federal government, from senior level policy makers to program managers, to choose smartly, buy effectively and operate efficiently. We deliver practical, credible and defensible results offering actionable insights by applying data-driven and analytics-based approaches in combination with multidisciplinary talent,subject matter experts, and tangible and repeatable assets in the form of databases, models, approaches and techniques.
Associates use problem-solving principles, processes and methods and complementary software applications to support client engagements and have a direct and significant impact on deliverables to clients. Your work will be guided by more experienced team members, but you will work with autonomy.
Our employee-owners pride themselves on their ability to apply deep analytical rigor and innovative thought that assist clients in understanding and solving a myriad of challenging resource planning and management problems.
This position is located in Arlington, VA and Washington DC.

Collect, organize, and integrate data sets from various data sources, including EVM, accounting,schedule, budget, execution, quantity, technical and programmatic data.
Exhibit the analytical creativity required to tie data together and develop schemes/tools to regularly update databases.
Develop, update and execute policy/procedures for data management and data accessibility.
Develop dashboards and visualizations to show data collection status and provide first-pass analysis.
Contribute to cost estimates for large weapons systems or facilities projects.
Develop knowledge and understanding of technical and programmatic requirements for a variety of systems and projects.

Bachelor's degree in a quantitative discipline (e.g., economics, engineering, mathematics, operations research or statistics) or a discipline that fosters problem solving, structured thought, and creativity.
Experience utilizing Tableau, PowerBI, and/or Oracle Data Analytics/Visualization tools
A strong understanding of creating SQL queries
Minimum of 1-3 years of quantitative analysis and problem solving experience.
Ability to effectively communicate technical work in writing and verbally
Strong Microsoft Office skills, especially Excel skills
Strong interest in solving government resource allocation problems
Ability to manage multiple deadlines and work products at the same time
Ability to obtain and/or maintain a minimum of a DoD Secret clearance or DHS Suitability
Candidates must be U.S. Citizens
Interest in contributing to the success of an employee-owned company that offers you a stake in the business
Technomics is an Equal Opportunity Employer. As an Equal Opportunity Employer, we do not discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, age, marital status, disability or veteran status.",4.1,"Technomics, Inc
4.1","Arlington, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1984,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
73,Data Analyst,$53k-$95k (Glassdoor Est.),"JOB POSTING

APPOINTMENT TYPE: Full-Time Regular (FTR-A)

LOCATION: Quantico, VA

PURPOSE: The Data Analyst conducts full lifecycle analysis to include requirements, activities and design. Data analysts will develop analysis and reporting capabilities. They will also monitor performance documentation, and metrics to identify improvements.

ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS:
Interpret data and analyze results using statistical techniques.
Develop and implement data analyses, data collection systems, and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality.
Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintaining databases.
Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques, and provide ongoing reports.
Develop and implement databases, data collection systems, data analytics, and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality.
Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintain databases/data systems.
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets.
Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques, and provide ongoing reports.
Filter and “clean” data by reviewing computer reports, printouts, and performance indicators to locate and correct code problems.
Work with management to prioritize business and information needs.
Locate and define new process improvement opportunities.
Support additional activities, functions, or duties, as required.

JOB REQUIREMENTS:
Bachelor’s degree in Business, Economics, Computer Science, Information Management, Statistics, or in another field with demonstrable coursework in these areas.
Proven working experience as a data analyst or business data analyst.
Strong knowledge of and experience with reporting packages (e.g. Business Objects), databases (e.g. SQL), programming (e.g. XML, JavaScript, or ETL frameworks)
Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical packages for analyzing datasets (e.g. Excel, SPSS, SAS)
Possess strong written and verbal communication skills
Proficient in MS Word, PowerPoint, Excel, and Adobe Acrobat
Attention to detail and strong organizational skills
The ability to prioritize job responsibilities in a fast-paced environment while maintaining a focus on excellent customer service is a must.
Candidates must be US citizens and able to pass a background check, drug screening, and a polygraph (if required).


* This is a contingent opportunity",3.8,"ORAU
3.8","Quantico, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1946,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
74,Data Analyst,$52k-$93k (Glassdoor Est.),"As the world's leading provider of cloud-based software and technology solutions delivered by managed service providers (MSPs), Datto believes there is no limit to what small and medium businesses can achieve with the right technology. Datto offers Unified Continuity, Networking, and Business Management solutions and has created a one-of-a-kind ecosystem of MSP partners. These partners provide Datto solutions to over one million businesses across the globe. Since its founding in 2007, Datto continues to win awards each year for its rapid growth, product excellence, superior technical support, and for fostering an outstanding workplace. With headquarters in Norwalk, Connecticut, Datto has global offices in the United Kingdom, Netherlands, Denmark, Germany, Canada, Australia, China, and Singapore. Learn more at datto.com.

As a data analyst you will be responsible for collecting processes and performing statistical analysis of data, which will have an important role to play on the decision making within Datto. You will be working cross functionally, across multiple platforms in a fast paced environment, which will provide you with exposure to new tools, technologies and business processes.

This is an opportunity to build the data strategy for the world's leading provider of cloud-based, software and technology solutions, delivered by Managed Service Providers. We're a fast growing company and it's an exciting time to join us!

Key responsibilities:
Develops breadth of expertise across business domain and is able to navigate company's data warehouse
Ensures data integrity and analyzes business performance using data across data sources
Identify relationships between product experiences and post-purchase customer support
Synthesize and way-find to the appropriate data from client survey data, case management data, saleforce etc and quickly understand their synergies, potential and limitations
Explore unstructured (open-ended text/speech) and structured (surveys) data
Create and maintain custom dashboards and deliver analysis focused on in-market product sentiment and post-care support that jointly tell a holistic story of the customer journey
Document and measure progress and business performance against project outcomes and goals to ensure experience gaps have been resolved and the customer journey is improved
Use your insights to 'show and tell' relevant customer journey stories drawn from data that provide a clear view of consumer trends, improvement areas and assist in decision making
Interpret and communicate complex ideas and findings into meaningful insights easily understood by audiences of varying levels of seniority and analytical understanding
Desired Skills:
A minimum of a Bachelor's degree
3-5 years of relevant experience in customer insights, business intelligence or related field, preferably working with large datasets from multiple sources
Proficiency using Tableau to build 'Cards' and dashboards to drive insights discovery
Mindset geared toward back-end of innovation and a willingness to ask tough business questions and challenge the status quo
Comfort with complexity and ambiguity
Demonstrated success in uncovering and solving challenging customer issues in a dynamic business setting and delivering high quality results in a challenging environment
Curiosity to explore complex and customer focused qualitative/quantitative data sets, experimenting to see what insights it uncovers
Experience managing all phases of customer experience projects including designing, executing, research, analyzing data, summarizing insights and communicating recommendations
Ability to transform complex ideas into easily understood concepts
Demonstrated ability to utilize advanced analytic techniques and develop strategic frameworks to synthesize insights from multiple data sources
Skilled Excel user with the ability to understand and build complex spreadsheets and analysis
Strong consultative and storytelling abilities (visual, written and oral) to convey your findings and knowledge and bring the customer experience to life and influence teams members at various levels with the organization
Well-developed project management skills and ability to prioritize, manage multiple projects simultaneously and organize effectively in a fast-paced environment
Ensures deadlines are met and proactively communicates when deadlines are at risk and associated roadblocks
Proven relationship building abilities across multi-functional teams with excellent interpersonal and communication skills, both written (presentations/emails) and oral (personal interactions)
Ability to work both independently and collaboratively to complete tasks and identify solutions
About you:
You're analytical and process driven
You're able to understand data at a granular level
Experience working with financial data specifically
Extensive experience within Financial/Accounting/Statistical background
The ability to work across different platforms and able to learn new platforms quickly
Excel proficient, familiar with Python, R
Tech savvy
Bonus points:
Salesforce experience
Oracle / Netsuite exposure",3.9,"Datto Inc.
3.9","Norwalk, CT",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2007,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
75,Data Analyst,$28k-$52k (Glassdoor Est.),"Olive is healthcare’s first intelligent digital workforce and has been successfully deployed at numerous healthcare systems across the country. Olive helps streamline and automate the most high-volume, repetitive tasks so healthcare professionals can concentrate on their patients and solving healthcare’s most challenging problems. Olive’s promise to her customers is that she finds out where she can make an impact, onboards quickly, shows up to work everyday, does her job extremely well, and gets smarter over time.Omega is Olive’s digital workforce operations center dedicated to ensuring that Olive keeps her promise, by providing support, analysis, communications, and continual improvements to all live customer bots.The Data Analyst at Olive is part of Omega’s rapidly growing Omega Analysis team. With Olive being deployed across the country, the Data Analyst will work cross-functionally to help make Olive more efficient and elevate customer insights to internal stakeholders. The Data Analyst will perform data manipulation and in-depth analysis of complex health care data to produce analysis on customer quality, utilization and outcomes. The ideal candidate is inquisitive, creative, self-driven and flexible with the ability to work within a dynamic high-growth startup environment.

Requirements
Bachelor’s degree in Mathematics, Economics, Computer Science, Statistics, or equivalent professional experience
0-3 years of professional experience in data analysis, data management and manipulation, report writing, and/or database design
Technical expertise regarding data modeling, database development, data mining and segmentation techniques
Strong working knowledge of databases (Amazon Redshift and Athena), and querying languages (SQL)
Experience building data visualizations using tools like Tableau or similar
Ability to analyze large data sets and collect insights in a fast-paced, agile environment
Experience with predictive analysis and statistical methods
Previous experience with analytical programing languages (Python, R) and related data manipulation packages (Pandas, Numpy, dplyr, tidyr) is a plus",4.0,"Olive
4.0","Columbus, OH",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
76,"Fraud Intelligence, Data Operations Analyst",-1,"At White Ops, we are all about keeping it human. We are the global leader in bot mitigation. We protect more than 200 enterprises—including the largest internet platforms—from sophisticated bots by verifying the humanity of nearly one trillion online interactions every week. The most sophisticated bots look and act like humans when they click on ads, visit websites, fill out forms, take over accounts, and commit payment fraud. We stop them.

Founded in 2012 in a Brooklyn sci-fi bookstore, our Bot Mitigation Platform protects enterprises from the sophisticated bots that threaten them. It's an ongoing war that we fight passionately every day. Join our mission to stop bots, disrupt the economics of cyber crime, and keep it human.

The Data Operations team is responsible for surfacing useful insights from the terabytes of data we amass every day. We value ethics, experimentation, efficiency, and intellectual curiosity. We are looking for someone who will compliment the team to innovate without regard to conventions, accelerate us through new tooling, and deliver quality data intelligence to our internal and external stakeholders.

What you'll do:
Identify impactful detection leads that increase velocity from time of threat identification to implementation of detection/blocking in White Ops products
Deploy stop-gap defenses for emerging threats through the development of analyses, models, algorithms, and dashboards
Create complex queries and reports to analyze historical data, including the use of techniques such as: subqueries, temp tables, complex joins, variables
Lead the design and architecture of data models and dashboards used to present key information to detection and customer success teams
Triage customer and internal inquiries about fraud efficacy by acting as first line of analysis
Implement best practices and tooling that will improve the time to understand a new detection lead and process it
Assist in research for case studies and white papers on fraud patterns
Create detailed documentation of models, algorithms, and analyses to create transparency and auditability of work
Who you are:
You have a strong sense of ownership which drives you to find ways to do things better, faster, and leaner; you hold yourself accountable for the quality and accuracy of your work
You look to find new and innovative ways to solve complex problems through rigorous experimentation and application of emerging technologies
You are open and transparent and work in tight collaboration with other team members on data projects and cross-departmentally across the rest of White Ops
You are communicative and go out of your way to support your team
Proficiency in SQL
Experience working with multi TB to PB data sets in cloud databases
Experience working with both structured and unstructured data sets
Experience improving processes and implementing tooling to accelerate analysis
Python experience or exposure preferred
Benefits and Perks
Unlimited vacation policy
Stock options, 401(k), and commuter benefits
Competitive salary and benefits
Medical and dental insurance for all full-time employees
Fully paid parental leave
Professional development fund
Great coaching from senior leaders and challenging development opportunities
Life at White Ops:

Our HQ office is located in the heart of New York City. We are growing the company deliberately with a keen eye towards maintaining a culture that values diversity, lifestyle, and career growth. We are doing meaningful work and we need people to join our mighty team. We are proud of our overwhelmingly positive presence on Glassdoor and Built in NYC. We have offices located in NYC, DC, Victoria, and London.",3.8,"White Ops
3.8","New York, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
77,ETL/Data Warehouse Test Analyst,$51k-$59k (Glassdoor Est.),"Infosys is seeking an ETL/ Data Warehouse Testing with SQL.

As a QA Test Analyst you will act as a validation and quality assurance expert and review the functionality of existing systems. You will conduct requirement analysis, define test strategy & design and lead execution to guarantee superior outcomes. You will also be required to design an optimal test environment to simulate real-time scenarios. You will have the opportunity to collaborate with some of the best talent in the industry to create innovative high quality and defect-free solutions to meet our clients’ business needs. You will be part of a learning culture, where teamwork and collaboration are encouraged, excellence is rewarded, and diversity is respected and valued.

Required Qualifications:
• Bachelor’s degree or foreign equivalent required from an accredited institution. Will also consider three years of progressive experience in the specialty in lieu of every year of education.
• At least 2 years of Information Technology experience
• U.S. citizens and those authorized to work in the U.S. are encouraged to apply. We are unable to sponsor at this time.
• Candidate must be located within commuting distance of Providence, RI or be willing to relocate to the area. This position may require travel in the US
• Experience with Testing strategies and Test Execution
• 2+ years of experience ETL/Datawarehouse Testing
• Knowledge and experience with full SDLC lifecycle
• Experience with Lean / Agile development methodologies

Preferred Experience :
• Strong skills in writing SQL queries
• At least 2 year of strong experience in Agile Testing projects.
• Excellent verbal and written communication skills
• Experience and desire to work in a Global delivery environment

The job entails sitting as well as working at a computer for extended periods of time. Should be able to communicate by telephone, email or face to face. Travel may be required as per the job requirements.

About Us
Infosys is a global leader in next-generation digital services and consulting. We enable clients in 46 countries to navigate their digital transformation.

With over three decades of experience in managing the systems and workings of global enterprises, we expertly steer our clients through their digital journey. We do it by enabling the enterprise with an AI-powered core that helps prioritize the execution of change. We also empower the business with agile digital at scale to deliver unprecedented levels of performance and customer delight. Our always-on learning agenda drives their continuous improvement through building and transferring digital skills, expertise, and ideas from our innovation ecosystem.

EOE/Minority/Female/Veteran/Disabled/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/National Origin

To learn more about Infosys and see our ideas in action please visit us at www.Infosys.com.",3.3,"Infosys Limited
3.3","Providence, RI",-1,10000+ Employees,1981,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
78,Data Analyst,-1,"KellyMitchell matches the best IT and business talent with premier organizations nationwide. Our clients, ranging from Fortune 500 corporations to rapidly growing high-tech companies, are exceptionally served by our 1500+ IT and business consultants. Our industry is growing rapidly, and now is a great time to launch your career with the KellyMitchell team.

Data Analyst

Job Summary

Candidates with a background in data analysis are highly desired for this position. The individual will be responsible for performing exploratory data analysis (EDA) across a range of datasets that will require communicating with domain experts to validate results. This role will also be expected to solve problems to ensure the delivery of data products as well as assist in fetching, munging, and qualifying data from multiple sources.

Duties

This position is expected to interact with various functions within the company, including data analytics, science, engineering, and product. Attention to detail, intellectual curiosity, and clear technical communication are key for the success of this role.

Desired Skills/ Experience
BA/BS in Computer Science, Physics, Applied Math, Agronomy, Engineering or a related quantitative discipline with at least a year of data analytics or data science experience.
Intermediate skill using Python (eg pandas, numpy, matplotlib / seaborn, etc.)
Intermediate skill using SQL or PySpark dataframe manipulations
Knowledgeable of version control, e.g. git
Detail oriented and capable of performing deep dives into datasets
Strong communication skills to solicit information from domain experts and present results back to a technical audience
Self starter as well as able to work as part of a team
Basic knowledge of predictive analytic techniques and statistics.
M.Sc. in an analytics field
Experience with exploratory Big Data discovery through the use of technologies such as PySpark
Experience with complex data formats and data of varying quality
Experience building data pipelines and interacting with APIs
Data storytelling with meaningful, interpretable visualizations
Knowledge of agricultural technology especially with regard to row crops
Curiosity and an open-mind towards unfamiliar data sources and unfamiliar quantitative domains
*mjp123",3.4,"Kelly Mitchell Group
3.4","Creve Coeur, MO",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1998,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
79,Data Analyst,$35k-$66k (Glassdoor Est.),"IDG Communications connects the world of tech buyers with insights, intent and engagement. We are the world’s largest media, data and marketing services company that activates and engages the most influential technology buyers. Our premium brands, including CIO, Computerworld, CSO, InfoWorld, Macworld, Network World, and PCWorld engage a quality audience of the most powerful audience of technology buyers providing essential guidance on the evolving technology landscape.
We require a smart, proactive and savvy individual with the ability to analyze large sets of data, organize it and put it work for the business. Your experience will help support the growing demands of IDG’s data business. A successful candidate has ability to work with large data sets and analyze trends and provide global insights into how to get the most out of IDG’s data.
The role is ideal for an individual with at least 2-4 years data analytics or data science experience with a data driven background with strong analytic skills who wants to work within the fastest growing division of the company.

This role is open to all locations.

Providing support to the global data team to strengthen and enhance our reporting and analytics capabilities
Provide metric reporting, data-driven analysis, and insights for strategic business initiatives
Help develop models to understand LTV, for various customer segments and acquisition channels
Providing insight from our BI platform on trends by country, region, industry and taxonomy
Working with the central data group on enhancing our platform and providing support to the team as we continue to build our data analytics capabilities
Look to apply predictive modelling opportunities where possible
Proactive in making recommendations on platform and model improvements
Working with sales teams to actively push data lead solutions to market
Provide technical assistance and support for improving data tracking, collection and systems
Perform and document procedures for data preparation, including data cleaning and standardization.
Support data storytelling efforts by translating data into meaningful communication and presentation tools (dashboards, presentations, reports, etc.) for a variety of audiences.
Build strong relationships across the different business units to become a point of contact.
Keeping on top of data driven trends
Creative mindset, with an outlook of always looking to improve on reporting and designs

Experience using the Microsoft Office package
Advanced understanding of Excel formulas is a must
Strong data analytic skills required, proficiency with analytical and database tools (e.g. SQL, No-SQL) or programming languages (e.g. R, Python, etc.) nice to have
Able to work independently, managing own workload to meet weekly deadlines for reports and analytics.
Must be able to work with multiple departments to deliver on responsibilities whilst maintaining a good level of communication.
Experience with data manipulation (merging datasets, identifying missing data, data cleansing)
Experience with Business Intelligence (BI) platforms
Strong data communication, report writing and presentation skills, including the ability to present complex information to a wide variety of audiences.
Willingness to develop skills around the role to improve on carrying out responsibilities.
Comfortable in a varied role.
Able to solve problems proactively.
Strong background in technology would be beneficial.
Excellent attention to detail.
Please be sure to upload a formatted version of your resume and cover letter during the application process.",3.3,"International Data Group
3.3","Framingham, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1964,Company - Private,Publishing,Media,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
80,Data Analyst,$51k-$94k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Analyst
Location


MD - Ft. Meade

Job Code

4545

# of openings

1

Apply Now

PSI is seeking a talented Data Analyst with experience within the Intelligence Community.

Essential Functions and Job Responsibilities:
Provide operations research analysis to support a US CYBERCOM’s J2 and Joint Intelligence Operations Center. Work with security defense and combatant command assessments of past activities to progress toward campaign objectives. Leverage advanced technologies, scientific principles, theories, and concepts to assist the client with advancing performance and operating efficiently. Assist the client with planning programs, including recommending technological application programs to accomplish long-range objectives.

Minimum Requirements:
Five (5) years minimum experience. Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Engineering Management, Math, or equivalent. An additional four years of relevant of experience may be considered as a substitute.
Prior experience as an Data or Operations Research Analyst
Experience in working with web developers to create leadership and SME dashboards, including web-enabled data collection for operations, activities, and investments (OAIs)
Ability to build analytical models for strategic and campaign assessments, including military assessment and strategic risks
Knowledge of programming languages (e.g. XML, Javascript, ETL Frameworks) and databases (e.g. SQL, SQLite, etc).
Knowledge of database design, data models, data mining, and segmentation techniques
Knowledge on statistical packages for analyzing large datasets (e.g. SAS, Excel, SPSS, etc).
Experience with data analysis tools (e.g. Tableau, RapidMiner, OpenRefine, KNIME, Google Search Operators, NodeXL, etc.).
High Desirable: Prior Intelligence Experience (such as All-Source, CI, HUMINT, SIGINT).
Strong ability to use and create MS Office products such as word documents, PowerPoint, access and excel databases.
Able to work independently and without direct supervision.
Ability to safely and successfully perform the essential job functions consistent with the ADA, FMLA and other federal, state and local standards, including meeting qualitative and/or quantitative productivity standards.
Ability to maintain regular, punctual attendance consistent with the ADA, FMLA and other federal, state, local, and organizational standards.
Must be able to talk, listen and speak clearly on telephone.
Expert-level command of the English language.
Active TS/SCI w/ CI POLY required.
Planned Systems International provides our customers with value-added management consulting and information technology services that consistently deliver success, and we are recognized as a world-class provider of innovative solutions that benefit mankind. From Systems Lifecycle Support and Healthcare IT Solutions to Network and Desktop Solutions and e-Business, PSI is focused on making our clients’ businesses run smoother and better. With a highly trained technical staff, we apply state-of-the-art information technologies, the industry's most advanced methodologies, and broad-based support services to clients in U.S. Government agencies and the commercial sector.

PSI is an Equal Opportunity Employer.
All qualified candidates are encouraged to apply, including:
Minorities, Women, Individuals with Disabilities, and Protected Veterans.
NOTE TO JOB SERVICE: VEVRAA Federal Contractor requesting priority referrals of Protected Veterans.",4.4,"Planned Systems International
4.4","Fort Meade, MD",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1988,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
81,Data Analyst,$69k-$115k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Fund for Public Health in New York City (FPHNYC) is a 501(c)3 non-profit organization that is dedicated to the advancement of the health and well-being of all New Yorkers. To this end, in partnership with the New York City Department of Health and Mental Hygiene (DOHMH), FPHNYC incubates innovative public health initiatives implemented by DOHMH to advance community health throughout the city. It facilitates partnerships, often new and unconventional, between government and the private sector to develop, test, and launch new initiatives. These collaborations speed the execution of demonstration projects, effect expansion of successful pilot programs, and support rapid implementation to meet the public health needs of individuals, families, and communities across New York City (NYC).

PROGRAM OVERVIEW
The Bureau of Alcohol and Drug Use Prevention, Care and Treatment (BADUPCT) works to reduce morbidity and mortality related to alcohol and substance use among New Yorkers through contracting and oversight of prevention, treatment, harm reduction, and recovery and support services; policy analysis and development; epidemiology, surveillance, and evaluation; development and dissemination of treatment and management guidelines; harm reduction initiatives; public and provider outreach and education; and community involvement and interagency collaboration.

The Research and Surveillance unit conducts alcohol- and drug-related surveillance, program evaluation and research, maintains databases, designs research protocols, produces reports, writes scientific articles for peer review journals, and facilitates program and policy development.

With an annual budget of approximately $2 million dollars per year, Strategies To Operationalize the Prevention of Overdose Death (STOP OD) aims to strengthen NYC’s response to the opioid overdose epidemic and reduce overdose deaths. Informed by critical new surveillance and in collaboration with cross-sector partners across levels of government, DOHMH will implement focused prevention and response strategies to reach populations that bear the heaviest burden of opioid use and associated morbidity and mortality.

BADUPCT seeks one Data Analyst to work across the Surveillance and Prevention components of the STOP OD project, supporting the collection, organization and analysis of data elements as they are generated.

STOP OD is funded by a one-year (with potential for two additional years) cooperative agreement with the Centers for Disease Control. This position is housed at the New York City Department of Health and Mental Hygiene in Long Island City.

POSITION OVERVIEW
Under the direction of the Senior Evaluation Manager, the Data Analyst will be responsible for supporting data collection, organization, and analysis across all Surveillance and Prevention grant-related activities. The Data Analyst will ensure these processes and systematic and conform to the overall project plan.

RESPONSIBILITIES
• Provide overall support to all data-related grant-funded activities of the STOP OD project, including evaluation
• Contribute to data collection, including quantitative and qualitative data
• Support the organization of data, including assisting with database creation, developing data entry procedures, and preparing preliminary documentation
• Conduct preliminary checks for data accuracy
• Extract, clean, manipulate, organize and analyze data using SAS, R, SQL, Excel and other platforms
• Other duties as assigned

QUALIFICATIONS
• A master's degree from an accredited college or university with a specialization in an appropriate field of physical, biological or environmental science or in public health.
• Experience in a field related to substance use
• Excellent computer skills, including MS Office; experience with data organization and visualization and effective reporting of program metrics
• Experience cleaning and analyzing data using SAS, R, or SPSS
• Knowledge of relational databases, Transact SQL-based databases, and management systems preferred
• Excellent written, oral and interpersonal skills
• Experience with tools and practices for effective data collection and analysis
• Demonstrated analytical and problem-solving skills
• Excellent organizational skills and attention to detail
• Ability to manage multiple priorities in a fast-paced environment

RESIDENCY REQUIREMENT
New York City residency is generally required within 90 days of appointment. However, City Employees in certain titles who have worked for the City for 2 continuous years may also be eligible to reside in Nassau, Suffolk, Putnam, Westchester, Rockland, or Orange County. To determine if the residency requirement applies to you, please discuss with the agency representative at the time of interview.

SALARY AND BENEFITS
FPHNYC offers a comprehensive benefits package. The salary range for this position is commensurate with experience

The Fund for Public Health in New York City is an Equal Opportunity Employer and encourages a diverse pool of candidates to apply.",3.0,"Fund for Public Health
3.0","Long Island City, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Nonprofit Organization,Social Assistance,Non-Profit,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
82,Data Analyst,-1,"Number of positions : Multiple

Position Duties: Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing reports, Develop and implement databases, data collection systems, data analytics and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality. Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets. Filter and “clean” data by reviewing computer reports, printouts, and performance indicators to locate and correct code problems, work with management to prioritize business and information needs

Education & Experience Requirements: Candidate must have at least BS Computer Science, Information Management or Electronic Engineering. Business Objects, databases (SQL etc), programming (XML, Javascript, or ETL frameworks), BTEQ, FastExport, FastLoad, MultiLoad, Tpump, TPT, OLE DB, SQL, Teradata, MS SQL Server, DB2, Sybase and Access",4.0,"Dizer Corp
4.0","Painesville, OH",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
83,Data Analyst,$55k-$102k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Description


Spry is a certified Small Business (SB) headquartered in McLean, VA. Spry provides Enterprise, C4IT, Management, and Cyber Solutions to the federal government and commercial entities. Founded in 2001, Spry Methods was built on the foundation of combining industry knowledge with unmatched responsiveness to produce results for our customers. Our goal is to build a business dedicated to the maximization of value for all stakeholders starting with our employees, our customers, and our community. We recognize that talented and dedicated employees are our most valued assets and the foundation of our success. Guided by these principles, we have established an impressive track record of proven past performance serving our customers within the Commercial, Federal Civilian, DoD, and Intelligence Communities. A CMMI Level 3 certified and ISO 9001:2008 registered company, Spry is committed to quality and continuous improvement.

Overview


***This is a contingent opportunity***

Spry Methods seeks a bright, collaborative Data Analyst with a strong work ethic, attention to detail and mission focused to join our team. Qualified candidates will utilize their statistical and analytical skills to conduct full life-cycle analysis to include requirements, activities, and design. Data analysts will develop analysis and reporting capabilities. They will also monitor performance documentation, and metrics to identify improvements.

Job Responsibilities and/or Success Factors
Interpret data and analyze results using statistical techniques
Develop and implement data analyses, data collection systems, and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality
Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintaining databases
Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques, and provide ongoing reports
Develop and implement databases, data collection systems, data analytics, and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality.
Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintain databases/data systems
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets
Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques, and provide ongoing reports
Filter and “clean” data by reviewing computer reports, printouts, and performance indicators to locate and correct code problems
Work with management to prioritize business and information needs
Locate and define new process improvement opportunities
Support additional activities, functions, or duties, as required
Required skills and experience include
Bachelor’s degree in Business, Economics, Computer Science, Information Management, Statistics, or in another field with demonstrable coursework in these areas
Proven working experience as a data analyst or business data analyst
Strong knowledge of and experience with reporting packages (e.g. Business Objects), databases (e.g. SQL), programming (e.g. XML, JavaScript, or ETL frameworks)
Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical packages for analyzing datasets (e.g. Excel, SPSS, SAS)
Possess strong written and verbal communication skills
Proficient in MS Word, PowerPoint, Excel, and Adobe Acrobat
Attention to detail and strong organizational skills
The ability to prioritize job responsibilities in a fast-paced environment while maintaining a focus on excellent customer service is a must
Candidates must be US citizens and able to pass a background check, drug screening, and a polygraph (if required)
EEO Statement


At Spry, we believe talented and dedicated employees are our most valued assets and the foundation of our success. We are committed to crafting a diverse and inclusive workplace that endorses engagement, creativity, quality and innovation.

We are proud to be an Affirmative Action and Equal Opportunity Employer and as such, we evaluate qualified candidates in full consideration without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, disability status, protected veteran status, and any other protected status.",3.6,"Spry Methods
3.6","Quantico, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2001,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
84,Data Analyst,$35k-$67k (Glassdoor Est.),"General Summary:

ConnectWise, Inc. is seeking a self-motivated and results-driven Data Analystfor the Partner Success team in support of the delivery of strategic insights to the greater organization. This individual will be responsible for building reports, data analysis, gathering requirements, prioritizing projects, documenting processes and communicating business needs into business intelligence solutions.

Successful candidates will understand Business Intelligence and analysis concepts and best practices so they can effectively translate the needs of various product leadership throughout the organization into actionable reports and self-service reports. They will also need to be able to manage multiple projects simultaneously and align them with overall organizational priorities. Candidates must also be able to analyze and communicate findings from these projects to leadership teams throughout the organization.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Build, document, analyze and communicate product metrics, KPIs and reports to various leaders throughout the organization.
Work with leaders to build various reports and dashboards. Analyze various data related to these teams and work to align these findings with corporate goals.
Perform requirements and data gathering for business review. Interact with various team members to ensure reports are fulfilling user requirements, are efficiently designed and are easy to support and maintain.
Analyze business requirements and document existing processes and proposed solutions.
Understand various concepts and terminologies, including highly technical content, and express them in a clear and concise manner to non-technical personnel.
Work with Business Intelligence and other teams across the organization to ensure data is organized, captured and designed to support the business need.
Participate in multiple projects simultaneously.
Prioritize projects assigned based on organizational need.
Define understand and recommend changes to existing reporting environment in alignment with the current business needs and direction.
Work with the Project Management Office on corporate projects to ensure stakeholders and other participants are aligned with the project’s desired outcome.
Knowledge, Skills, and/or Abilities Required:

To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily.
The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Demonstrated ability to analyze business needs and work with technical staff to formulate technical solutions consistent with organizational objectives.
Strong strategic thinking skills, with a demonstrated ability to identify business issues/opportunities and to frame business questions.
Strong communication skills (oral and written).
Good analytical and problem-solving skills.
Excellent organizational skill, attention to detail, self-motivation and a desire to succeed.
Must possess a professional presence suitable for interaction in meetings, in-person or via email. Must have excellent communication skills.
Familiar with relational database and data processing concepts.
Fluent with Microsoft applications, particularly Excel, Access, etc.
Strong knowledge of SQL and MS Power BI.
Experience with JSON and XML a plus.
Experience with Python a plus.
Strong knowledge of a variety of report design tools, Microsoft BI stack (SSRS, SSIS, SSAS) a plus
Basic knowledge of how SaaS companies operate
Educational/Vocational/Previous Experience Recommendations:
Bachelor’s Degree or equivalent experience required.
2 years relevant experience
Working Conditions:
Professional office environment
Some travel may be required
Only local candidates need apply.

The statements above are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by people assigned to this job. Other duties may be assigned as needed.Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

ConnectWise is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",3.5,"ConnectWise
3.5","Tampa, FL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1982,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
85,Data Analyst,-1,"About Us

Swisslog is part of the KUKA group, a leading global supplier of intelligent automation solutions.

www.kuka.com
www.swisslog.com

Swisslog designs, develops and delivers best-in-class automation solutions for forward-thinking hospitals, warehouses and distribution centers. We offer integrated systems and services from a single source – from consulting to design, implementation and lifetime customer service. Behind the company’s success are 2 300 employees worldwide, supporting customers in more than 50 countries.
The WDS services portfolio ranges from building complex warehouses and distribution centers, to software and consulting services in the field of supply chain
management. WDS designs, develops and delivers efficient intralogistics automation solutions that enable forward thinking customers to provide the right products, to the right place, at
the right time.

Data Analyst

Mason, Ohio

Your Tasks

With guidance from senior Design and Consulting team members develop data driven solutions based on Swisslog products using client data. Interpret client’s data to give key insights into the day to day needs of their warehouses and distribution centers.
Data-analysis using tools like Excel, Python, Power BI, Tableau, SQL
Mathematical formulas commonly used in material handling business
Developing analytical tools and processes for efficient data analysis
Understand basics in material handling systems (will get training
Understand typical warehouse operations (will get training

Your Profile

Bachelor’s in Business, Applied Mathematics, Engineering or equivalent.

Experience with Python, R or other statistical software

Experience in Data Visualization software

Excellent oral and visual presentation skills

Strong Technical writing skills

Strong Problem solving and Critical thinking skills

Proficient in PowerPoint, Word, Excel and project management software.

Understands potential industry specific client’s business processes, drivers, issues and determining professional consulting and engineering solutions

1 to 2 years of Data Analysis Experience

We Offer

Swisslog offers challenging work in a globally networked environment as well as competitive base salary, comprehensive benefits including health/dental and 401k! United efforts of our employees represent the basis for developing and delivering the best solutions for our customers.

To apply please complete the online application form.

SWISSLOG IS AN EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER

Contact
Michael Brogan
Talent Acquisition Manager",3.5,"Swisslog Healthcare
3.5",Ohio,-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1915,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
86,Data Analyst,-1,"ITAC Solutions is searching for a Data Analyst for a direct hire position in Huntsville, AL. Our client is searching for someone to support business development, practice development and project delivery activities. You will be responsible for managing daily support and delivery to government clients.

What you’ll need to be considered (requirements):

3+ years of experience working financial management systems and leading data analytics support functions for DoD customers
Bachelor’s degree in Business Administration, Accounting, Finance or Management Information Systems
Technical knowledge and work experience operating within SAP platform
Experience with DoD financial statement audit, internal control testing or analysis, and coordinating with external auditors
Ability to interact effectively with people at all organizational levels of the firm
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Ability to work independently within a team environment and with a customer service focus
Active Secret Clearance is required",4.0,"ITAC Solutions
4.0","Huntsville, AL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2000,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
87,Morgan Stanley Research - AlphaWise Data Analytics Analyst / Associate,$50k-$90k (Glassdoor Est.),"Morgan Stanley Research - AlphaWise Data Analytics Analyst / Associate

Job Number: 3159505
POSTING DATE: Oct 15, 2020
PRIMARY LOCATION: Americas-United States of America-New York-New York
JOB: Research
EMPLOYMENT TYPE: Full Time
JOB LEVEL: Associate

DESCRIPTION

The AlphaWise Primary Research team collaborates closely with Morgan Stanley fundamental analysts, strategists, and economists on key investment debates. Building on a decade of experience, the AlphaWise Primary Research team gathers alternative data to generate unique analytics and insights. The group is seeking an associate with experience in data science to create, evaluate and analyze alternative data sets, in support of our Morgan Stanley Research Analysts. The role is dynamic, fast paced and interacts with multiple stakeholders.

Key Responsibilities
• Partner with Research teams, quants/data scientists, and technology to create and enhance data sets that provide insights into key investment debates
• Identify signal in alternative data sets to help forecast key company KPI’s
• Analyze proprietary and/or third party data, develop transformation scripts, and remediate quality issues
• Communicate and collaborate with Morgan Stanley Research teams around idea generation, proof of concept and data analysis / deliverables related to alternative data projects
• Create efficient and reusable code meant for the improvement, manipulation, and analysis of data
• Be aware of common pitfalls with basic ML algorithms (Linear/Logistic Regression) and how to combat these issues
• Create and maintain standards and documentation (mapping, rulebooks, etc.)
• Work with off-shore team members on product development efforts

QUALIFICATIONS

• Bachelor’s Degree from an accredited higher learning institution (required area of study: Computer Science Mathematics, Statistics, Physics or related engineering degrees)
• 2-4 years of experience as a data analyst, data scientist, or related quantitative role; experience in banking/financial services preferred
• Strong analytical and reasoning skills; able to decompose complex problems and projects into manageable pieces; comfortable suggesting and presenting solutions
• Comfortable working in a large organization with a broad set of stakeholders across various functions (i.e., Business, IT, Operations)
• Excellent verbal and written communication skills presenting complex analytical results to technical and non-technical audiences
• Ability and desire to work in a start-up paced environment and culture

Technical Qualifications
• Experience with using data profiling tools to query the data, identify anomalies, gaps and issues
• Experience in Python and/or R (other modern programming languages such as Perl, JavaScript are a bonus) and statistical packages
• Experience configuring technical architecture to support data analysis activities
• Experience in data quality management
• Experience in working with data in various forms (data warehouses/SQL, unstructured data environments/PIG,HIVE, Impala)
• General awareness of data management practices, emerging trends, and issues",3.9,"Morgan Stanley
3.9","New York, NY",-1,10000+ Employees,1935,Company - Public,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
88,Data Analyst,$35k-$58k (Glassdoor Est.),"This position supports analysis of complex, multi-organizational clinical and financial data to assess quality, cost, and access outcomes and various supporting healthcare practice patterns. This positions supports holistic analysis across health system and independent provider services. Technical experience with SQL, coding and in one or more languages, database architecture principles, and business intelligence tools are required. A Master's degree in Health Information Technology, Computer Science, Statistics, Business or a related discipline is preferred; a Bachelor's Degree is required combined with 3-5 years of experience delivering credible and timely analysis.

Job Posted by ApplicantPro",3.4,"Cayuga Medical Center
3.4","Ithaca, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,-1,Hospital,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
89,Data Analyst,$49k-$86k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Analyst - Hemophilia Center

Req #: 16310
Category: Research
Status: Full-Time
Shift: Day
Facility: Newark Beth Israel Medical Center
Location:
GR-Hemophilia Center,

201 LYONS AVENUE, NEWARK, NJ 07112-2027

Provide Data Analysis and Management for Hemophilia and Sickle Cell grants.--Provide data management for Hemophilia grant by: entering weekly stats from nursing and social worker, entering patient data into Clinical Manager database, and other hemophilia databases or programs --Provide data management for sickle cell grant by: setting up and maintain database for sickle cell program and entering all nursing and community outreach workers stats on a weekly basis. Provide reports as needed. Enter data on quality improvement projects for Federal Sickle Cell Grant. --The Data Analyst will be responsible for supporting quality improvement efforts, IRB applications, and collecting and submitting data required for program evaluation by the regional collaborative and HRSA for the Federal Sickle Cell Grant. (S) He will attend an annual webinar through the duration of the grant. --The Data Analyst will be responsible for development and maintenance of data capture and data entry tools; data collection; data entry; and preparation of reports, as required--Review database and verifies information in order to ensure accuracy and consistency of reports --Compiles and analyzes information from standardized reports on a monthly/quarterly basis as necessary. --Reports to program manager of sickle cell/hemophilia programs and principal investigator. Prepares reports and analyzes data with PI and program manager. --Provide data management for clinical trials and research projects by entering data and submitting to company/coordinating center as per the protocol. Review database and verifies information in order to ensure accuracy and consistency of reports. Responsible for ensuring integrity of information reported for all sickle cell and hemophilia grant reports Experience in Excel, Access and Microsoft Office required. Experience with database set up management required. Experience with analysis of data required. Experience in a health care setting preferred. Experience abstracting data from Electronic Medical Records. Attention to detail and ability to track and organize multiple projects.

RWJBarnabas Health is an Equal Opportunity Employer",2.2,"Barnabas Health
2.2","Newark, NJ",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
90,Senior Data Analyst,$71k-$129k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Us

Today's economy requires business owners to adapt quickly and think on their feet. ShopKeep's software-first commerce solutions make that possible.

Our cloud-based point of sale, payment processing, flexible hardware, and business-friendly financing let owners start, run, and grow their businesses in person and online. They can manage inventory, optimize staffing, streamline their operations, and market to their customers from one intuitive dashboard.

We understand what it's like to run a business, because we've been helping business owners succeed for over a decade, and we share their mindset. ShopKeep, after all, is also a small business, born to give our peers the tools they need to dream big, fight smart, and succeed on their own terms.

Today that mission is more relevant than ever, driven by team members around the world. ShopKeep is headquartered in New York City, with offices in Portland, Chicago, and Belfast. We're innovators, technologists, and customer advocates who are obsessed with helping independent businesses survive and thrive.

About This Role

As a Senior Data Analyst you'll help leverage our vast amounts of data to inform actionable insights and data-driven decisions. We're a start-up with a huge opportunity in front of us and we are looking for an awesome person to join the Data team. We want someone who embraces aggressive goals, works hard to achieve them, thrives in uncertainty and brings passion to their work.

What You Will Do
Build and maintain new data models to answer questions and provide visibility for various teams throughout the organization
Make a measurable contribution to our internal analytics platform
Automate manual processes in order to increase efficiency and provide more time for analysis
Partner with business users to help them make smarter decisions
Analyze data to understand key trends and drivers of performance
Develop and present actionable insights to help inform decision-making
What You Need
3 - 5 years of experience working with large amounts of data, including building, managing and working with databases (SQL, Redshift, etc) and using analytical tools (Looker, Tableau, etc).
Advanced SQL skills
Demonstrated problem solving skills
Strong attention to detail and able to effectively prioritize and manage multiple priorities
Ability to navigate ambiguity and a strong drive to succeed
Ability to learn quickly and thrive in a fast-paced changing environment
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Benefits


We provide the essentials…
Medical, Dental, and Vision Insurance
Flexible Paid Time Off (PTO)
Commuter Benefits
401k Match
...and the fun-damentals:
Lively and enriching Engineering culture
Regularly scheduled hackathons, meetups and Tech Talks
Opportunity to attend Engineering Conferences, thanks to our generous company conference budget
Newsletters produced by Engineering teams
Cross-office collaboration between our NYC and Belfast teams with the opportunity to travel to our different offices
Regular team events, including Happy Hours and Game Nights
Catered lunches
Break area to play and relax
Standing desks
Meditation Sessions
And more to come as we work on ideas to help us keep the community feel connected while working remote
ShopKeep is an Equal Opportunity Employer

We are an Equal Opportunities Employer. We don't discriminate based on gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, nationality, or any other individual characteristics. We practice equality of opportunity in employment and select the best person for the job.",3.5,"ShopKeep
3.5","New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
91,Business Analyst/Data Scientist,$39k-$78k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description:

SpinSys, a leading Health IT solution provider focuses on advancing healthcare innovations through leveraging industry leading technologies. We are looking to add integral members to our Big Data team to provide leading industry, cloud-based, big data solutions.

Teaming up with software engineers, scrum masters, leads, managers and directors, you will work in an Agile environment to support process improvement processes related to big data efforts and projects. You will be team member of a team responsible for defining business requirements business process improvement and change management methodologies as part of Business Process Improvement activities. Will work closely with data analysis and data Scientist to provide support in defining requirements, data analysis as well as help develop approach and provide data analytics support.

If you are looking for an opportunity to work in a small team of high caliber developers, administrators and engineers focused on solving challenges then the SpinSys team is where you want to be. Learn more about our unique culture at jobs.spinsys.com.

Benefits

SpinSys offers an exceptional package of benefits including a comprehensive subsidized health insurance through a nationwide Blue Cross Blue Shield provider and fully paid dental, and vision insurance. We have unlimited vacation and sick leave as well as 10 paid holidays every year. Our 401(k) program is matched and is immediately vested upon entry to the plan. Tuition reimbursement, flexible spending accounts, casual open work environment, flexible work arrangements and paid training are just some of the other benefits we offer.

. Requirements:
Bachelor's degree in Information Systems, business administration, MBA preferred.
5+ years as a data scientist/data analysts
2+ years mining and analyzing data sets to extract meaningful trends, producing meaningful and actionable reports
Previous experience writing documentation and procedural materials for multiple audiences
Superior written and verbal communication skills, with a keen eye for detail
Experience in developing and maintaining appropriate reference materials, including research, usability tests, and design specifications as they relate the big data efforts
Experience using statistical programming languages, machine learning and other toolkits and techniques for analyzing large, complex datasets is a plus
Technical proficiency with transforming structured and unstructured data sets is a plus
Experience in mentoring and supporting multiple business/technical area’s is a plus
Background as a data analyst, DBA and/or data scientist is a plus
Experience in big data migration strategies and best practices is a plus
Expertise in Talend platform for MDM practices is plus
Expertise in working in a cloud based environment and tools is a plus",4.7,"Spin Systems
4.7","Falls Church, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1998,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
92,Data Analyst,$48k-$84k (Glassdoor Est.),"We are currently seeking a Data Analyst for our Glendale, CA office. You will be an essential player in Reveleer's Data Management function who will support and coordinate the full lifecycle of data operations: data intake and extract operations, ad hoc reporting, and analysis for client data ingest processing. This team member will also act as a primary contact for data management research and data systems analysis for both internal and external customers. The role will report to the Director of Data Management and will also include substantial interaction with Reveleer's Product and Engineering teams as well as Reveleer's technical client contacts. What You'll Do: Take receipt of client proprietary healthcare member, provider, and clinical data and stage the data for up front data validations and review Create and implement procedures to validate, process, and refine Client project data sets Execute data conversion processes to enable data translations and integrations from third-party platforms into Reveleer specifications for loading Execute the data loading operations that will apply client data to the Reveleer production environment Act as a primary support contact for data loading questions and data validation operations Perform ad hoc analyses against data load validation databases as well as production databases Support client data extracts operations for all products and act as the primary contact for issue investigation providing baseline details for the development team in the event break/fix work is needed Interact directly with internal clients and with external technical contacts to work through and document requirements related to important deliveries. Support Clients' efforts to self-service their data efforts and needs About You: Up to two years of experience working with SQL Server 2014 and higher including the use of the SQL Server Management Studio, SQL Server Integration Services (SSIS), and SQL Server Reporting Services (SSRS). Must be able to utilize tools to import raw text and XML data receipts from clients into table structures to be used for building client load files for our main clinical coding platform. Amongst these tools must be SSIS, SQL Server Import Export Wizard, bcp, or Powershell. Ability to write executable SQL using multiple table joins for the purposes of performing data analysis, researching issues, and delivering ad hoc reports. Experience supporting and executing processes developed on SQL Server including but not limited to researching tables and views, executing stored procedures, and utilizing user-defined functions within client specific data validation databases. Experience of at least one year in the healthcare industry is strongly preferred with background specific to quality measures (HEDIS), risk adjustment, and medical record review or audit. Experience with healthcare claims or any type of insurance claim data (e.g. auto, property) will also be considered. All candidates will be required to exhibit basic SQL programming skills and demonstrate usage of a few Microsoft T-SQL specific language functions in a timed short written exam BS or BA in Computer Science, Engineering, Information Systems, or the Sciences is preferred. What You'll Receive: Competitive salary Medical, Dental and Vision benefits 401k Generous PTO plan Full stocked kitchen with drinks and snacks Dog friendly office No commute to the Westside! Reveleer is an equal opportunity employer. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, disability status or genetic information, in compliance with applicable federal, state and local law.",4.0,"reveleer
4.0","Glendale, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
93,Data Analyst,-1,"The Role
Come help our customers learn more about the world. Below is a small sample of the questions we’ve asked of our data over the last year.

Did Lyft’s prospects improve in politically progressive areas in the aftermath of Uber’s press woes?
Is Amazon’s revenue growth in the fourth quarter primarily driven by customers in rural areas?
How did the path of the solar eclipse affect hotel bookings across the United States?

As part of the client-focused function on the data team, you will be responsible for helping industry-leading companies understand how purchase and travel behavior is changing in America. You will become an expert in our dataset and answers questions from prospects, customers, and internal stakeholders to help extract value from our data.

You
You creatively work through problems with statistically sound thinking and have the natural itch to follow obstacles to their root cause. You think deeply about the problems ahead and are comfortable moving between tools in your toolbelt. And you are quick to learn, implementing new approaches when facing questions that demand it. You are a stickler for quality and pay careful attention to the details that matter.

You are a gifted communicator and are passionate about helping others make sense of data. You are comfortable juggling multiple projects at one time and relish the opportunity to empower leaders in finance, technology, and consumer goods with data to shape their long term strategy.

Requirements
1+ years of SQL experience
Ability to communicate findings to non-experts
Desire to learn data modeling technologies (python, spark) and build on statistical knowledge
Bachelors in social science (Economics, Sociology, ...), related discipline or equivalent experience
Excited by a high learning curve
Excellent written and oral communicator

Compensation and Benefits
Highly competitive salary and benefits
Stock grants pre-IPO at a company backed by top investors
Take unlimited, responsible vacation

About Us
Edison provides intelligent email solutions for users and competitive intelligence for businesses. The largest, most valuable and as yet untapped data on earth is in mail; 3x larger than the worldwide web. Through our user base of more than 3 million users, we empower investors, brands, and technology companies to understand trends in the marketplace and gain deep insights into consumer behavior patterns.

As a team, we’re collaborative, engaged, and committed to continually improving as we serve our mission. None of us are on an island-- we trust our teammates to lend a hand when we’re stuck and our egos take a backseat to figuring out the best approach to tackling problems. We’re energized by tough problems and are excited to know that a challenge ahead of us does not have a textbook solution. Finally, we’re always in a posture of learning-- there is a lot we do not know but that does not hold us back from making an attempt at solutions. We lead thorough blameless postmortems to become better analysts, scientists, and leaders.
We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, reproductive health decisions, or related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, genetic information, political views or activity, or other applicable legally protected characteristics.",5.0,"Edison Software
5.0","Denver, CO",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
94,Data Analyst,-1,"How will this role have an impact?

The Data Analyst is accountable for providing analysis and business solutions to stakeholders with respect to all healthcare data ingested and reported by the organization. The Analyst will assist in providing support and communicating back to the customer. The Analyst will need to be able to assemble basic reports and load data for analysis when needed.

This role will report to our Lead Data Integration Engineer

What will you do?

Perform analysis for business stakeholders using T-SQL
Build reports and dashboards
Communicate with account executives regarding client data
Ability to load flat files into SSMS for ad-hoc analysis

We are looking for someone with:

3+ years of experience with data analysis
Strong experience in writing SQL scripts, functions, stored procedures and triggers
A minimum of 1 year of experience in Business Intelligence
Proven experience analyzing and providing solutions to complex business issues through data-related tools
Ability to export results to Excel and build reports (Power BI experience
Knowledge of ETL tools and SQL process to understand/build/debug the sources of visualization data is a plus

About Us:

Signify Health is helping build the healthcare system we all want to experience by transforming the home into the healthcare hub. We coordinate care holistically across individuals' clinical, social, and behavioral needs so they can enjoy more healthy days at home. By building strong connections to primary care providers and community resources, we're able to close critical care and social gaps, as well as manage risk for individuals who need help the most. This leads to better outcomes and a better experience for everyone involved.

Our high-performance networks are powered by more than 9,000 mobile doctors and nurses covering every county in the U.S., 3,500 healthcare providers and facilities in value-based arrangements, and hundreds of community-based organizations. Signify's intelligent technology and decision-support services enable these resources to radically simplify care coordination for more than 1.5 million individuals each year while helping payers and providers more effectively implement value-based care programs.

To learn more about how we're driving outcomes and making healthcare work better, please visit us at www.signifyhealth.com.",3.7,"Signify Health
3.7","Dallas, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2017,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
95,Data Analyst,-1,"Under general supervision, plans, coordinates, and oversees reporting, analytics, and research projects for the Authority’s Disadvantaged Business Enterprise (DBE), Small Business Enterprise (SBE), Labor Compliance, and Workforce Initiatives Programs.

PRIMARY RESPONSIBILITIES

Develops regular and special reports and analysis from data on department programs.

Develops and prepares reports regarding DBE and SBE participation on Authority contracts.
Prepares reports illustrating economic impact of projects’ workforce by ethnicity, gender, and job classification.
Prepares reports based on participation at Small Business Development events.
Tracks and prepares reports regarding the DBE and SBE certification process.
Creates and maintain compliance reports that identify discrepancies within computerized databases.

Coordinates with various Authority departments and systems to compile and analyze data.

Researches special and/or complex DBE/SBE and workforce issues and develops related documents and solutions.

Identifies trends in DBE/SBE participation and economic impact on Authority contracts.

Assists with the preparation of statistical reports, tabulations, and charts as needed for the DBE attainments required by the Federal Transit Administration (FTA) and General Assembly.

Prepares ad-hoc reports based on requests from Executive Management.

Performs related duties as assigned.

MANAGEMENT RESPONSIBILITIES

Reporting to this position are the following jobs:

Job Title

None

CHALLENGES

Keeping abreast of all federal program regulations, changes, and challenges to ensure accurate reporting.
Organizing and analyzing data from numerous and diverse sources.
Maintaining accuracy and integrity of database.

Qualifications

EDUCATION/EXPERIENCE REQUIREMENTS
Bachelor’s degree in Business Administration, Statistics, or a related field, plus one (1) year data analysis experience, or a combination of education and experience related to the position.
Previous experience with B2GNow and/or LCPTracker software preferred.

PHYSICAL REQUIREMENTS

Requires sitting for extended periods of time, standing, visual acumen, manual dexterity and fingering for working with computer keyboards.

KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS, AND ABILITIES

Working knowledge of applicable laws and regulations.
Working knowledge of the methods and techniques of operations analysis.
Working knowledge of the needs and concerns of participants in the DBE program.
Working knowledge of web-based contract and labor compliance systems (B2GNow, LCPTracker, etc.).
Working knowledge of research design, statistical analysis, measurement, and assessment methodologies.
Strong analytical skills.
Strong computer skills applicable to this position, i.e., related database software and statistical analysis and reporting.
Strong oral and written communication skills.
Strong organizational skills and attention to detail.
Strong interpersonal skills in dealing with external groups and/or organizations.
Good customer service skills.
Ability to work independently.
Ability to work with sensitive information while maintaining strict confidentiality.
Ability to work collaboratively with other operational departments i.e., Finance and Purchasing Departments.

WORKING CONDITIONS

General office environment.
Occasionally required to travel to various work locations within the Chicago Metropolitan Area during standard office hours.

EQUIPMENT, TOOLS, AND MATERIALS UTILIZED

Personal computer and related software (Microsoft Word, Power Point, Excel); B2GNow, LCPtracker and other reference materials as needed.
Standard office equipment.

Additional Details

Please note, employees and/or union members will be given priority consideration in the hiring process, per the applicable labor contracts.

Final salary will be determined in part by the qualifications of the selected candidate and may be higher or lower than target.

Applicants, if hired,must comply with CTA's residency ordinance.

CTA IS AN EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER

No employee or applicant for employment will be discriminated against because of race, color, creed, religion, sex, marital status, national origin, sexual orientation, ancestry, age, unfavorable military discharge, disability or any other status protected by federal, state, or local laws; except where a bona fide occupational qualification exists We are committed to providing an inclusive environment for our workforce and supporting the communities we serve. CTA will make reasonable accommodations for the known disabilities of otherwise qualified applicants for employment as well as its employees, unless undue hardship would result. If you require an accommodation in the application or hiring process, please contact arc@transitchicago.com prior to the submission of your application or upon notification of your actual test date. CTA will work with you to determine if an accommodation can be provided.

Primary Location: USA-Illinois-Chicago
Job: Diversity & Small Business Compliance
Job Posting: Oct 9, 2020, 9:03:09 AM
Position Type: Full-time Permanent (FTP)",3.5,"Chicago Transit Authority
3.5","Chicago, IL",-1,10000+ Employees,1947,Government,Bus Transportation Services,Travel & Tourism,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
96,Sr Data Analyst - Digital,$80k-$136k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview:

The Data Analyst - Digital role provides a fantastic opportunity to work with a fast-paced and highly functioning Digital Marketing team. This role is responsible for modeling complex Industry problems, discovering Industry insights and identifying opportunities through the use of statistical, algorithmic, mining and visualization techniques. This role is also proficient at integrating and preparing large, varied datasets, architecting specialized database and computing environments, that will integrate with the Adobe Experience Cloud (e.g. Adobe Campaign, Adobe Analytics, Audience Manager etc.) focusing in areas of customer segmentation and analytics. Data Analyst work closely with SMEs, data stewards, project/scrum teams, and other IT teams to turn data into critical information.

They will need to validate their findings using an experimental and iterative approach. Also, the Data Analyst will need to be able to present their findings by exposing their assumptions and validation work in a way that can be easily understood using strong written and communication skills. These professionals will need a combination of business focus, strong analytical and problem-solving skills, and programming knowledge to be able to quickly cycle hypothesis validation.

Responsibilities:

JOB DUTIES

Leads discovery processes with GMF stakeholders to identify the business requirements and the expected outcome
Models and frames business scenarios that are meaningful and which impact on critical business processes and/or decisions
Works with and alongside business SMEs by suggesting other products of interest
Collaborates with Institute subject matter experts to select the relevant sources of information
Identifies what data is available and relevant, including internal and external data sources, leveraging new data collection processes
Makes strategic recommendations on data collection, integration and retention requirements incorporating business requirements and knowledge of best practices
Develops innovative and effective approaches to solve client's analytics problems and communicates results and methodologies
Works in iterative processes with the client and validates findings
Develops experimental design approaches to validate finding or test hypotheses
Validates analysis using scenario modeling
Identifies/creates the appropriate algorithm to discover patterns
Assesses, with the business, opportunities to enhance the qualification and assurance of the information to strengthen the use case
Defines the validity of the information, how long the information is meaningful, and what other information it is related to
Partners with the data SMEs in continuous improvement processes impacting data quality in the context of the specific use case
Recommends ongoing improvements to methods and algorithms that lead to findings, including new information
Educates the organization both from IT and the business perspectives on new approaches, such as testing hypotheses and validation of results
Helps the organization understand the principles and the math behind the process to drive organizational buy-in
Contributes business metrics to show performance contribution over iterations
Contributes to on-going reporting metrics and data usage patterns to provide feedback to Marketing Management
Leads the design and deployment of enhancements and fixes to systems as needed
Interface with customers to provide issue resolution for products and processes
Maintain technical and functional awareness and competence of supported business applications, and organizational and industry technology standards
May participate in an on-call rotation that requires after-hours and weekend support for production outages and issues
Perform other duties as assigned
Conform with all company policies and procedures
Qualifications:

Knowledge

Data Strategies including customer segmentation, market segmentation
Marketing Campaign architecture
Marketing Analytics
Data Modeling/Engineering best practices
Delivery Methodologies including Agile, Waterfall, etc.
Thorough working knowledge of information systems and operations
Functional knowledge of the business area or areas assigned to them
Full technical knowledge of systems analysis techniques
Preferred Marketing/CRM platform(s) knowledge such as Adobe Experience Cloud and Google Marketing Suite

Skill

Analysis and reporting using knowledge in one or more of the following frameworks: SQL Server, SAS, or Power-BI
Excellent analytical, organizational, problem solving and follow-up skills with the ability to meet time sensitive deadlines
Must be a self-starter and able to manage the investigations function with minimal supervision
Proficiency with Microsoft Office products
Ability to interact with staff at all levels
Ability to make sound decisions and exercise good judgment
Promote a cooperative and productive team environment
Strong communication and interpersonal skills

Education

Bachelor’s Degree in mathematics, statistics or computer science or related field

Experience

5-7 years of relevant quantitative and qualitative research, analytics experience and SQL experience preferred
Knowledge in statistical analysis, quantitative analytics, forecasting/predictive analytics, multivariate testing, and optimization algorithms

Working Conditions

Normal office environment subject to stressful situations

Work is conducted in a professional office environment subject to stressful situations arising from meeting deadlines and managing multiple priorities

Evening and weekend work as required

Some travel to company and vendor sites may be required, including outside the United States

A passport is recommended

#DICE

#LI-KD2",3.2,"GM Financial
3.2","Irving, TX",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1992,Company - Public,Lending,Finance,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
97,Data Analyst Intern (3DS-PE),-1,"It's fun to work in a company where people truly BELIEVE in what they're doing!
We're committed to bringing passion and customer focus to the business.

If you like wild growth and working with happy, enthusiastic over-achievers, you'll enjoy your career with us!

We are looking for a self-motivated, data analyst intern based in San Jose, Ridder Park. This Data analyst will be responsible for analyzing data, help in automation of data both NPI and production data help support 3DS-PE team for faster and efficient analysis.

In this position you will:
Gain a deep understanding and experience with high volume data using JMP, Minitab and Python
Perform statistical data analysis and trouble shoot with help of data pattern recognition
Run process vs product parameter correlation to understand process/product margin and drive improvement
Co-ordinate with R&D, Product Engineering, process integration and contract manufacturer and collect necessary information to provide faster response to the customer for field failures
Required Qualifications
Qualified candidates will be enrolled in a Bachelor’s or Master’s degree program in Electrical Engineering, Materials Science, Applied Physics, Mathematics, Statistics or related technical major. Students must be returning to school following the internship.",3.6,"Lumentum Operations
3.6","San Jose, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2015,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
98,Clinical Data Analyst - Epic,$50k-$85k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Us

Akron Children’s Hospital is one of the largest independent pediatric hospitals in the U.S., and ranked among the best children’s hospitals by U.S. News and World Report. Our dedicated staff serves nearly 900,000 patient visits per year through our 2 hospital campuses and a large network of locations offering primary and specialty care.

We are leading the way to healthier futures for children and communities through expert medical care, research, and prevention and wellness programs. As a teaching affiliate of Northeast Ohio Medical University and other universities, we train new generations of pediatricians, specialists, nurses and pharmacists every year.

OUR PROMISES

To treat every child as we would our own
To treat others as they would like to be treated
To turn no child away for any reason

We are seeking people who are committed to fostering a diverse environment in which patients, family and staff from a variety of backgrounds, cultures, and personal experiences are welcomed, included and can thrive.

Summary:
The Clinical Data Analyst/Analytics Coordinator is responsible for designing, performing, and documenting data analysis in support of clinical improvement.

Responsibilities:
Designs, performs, and documents data analysis in support of clinical improvement.
Works with operational leaders, physicians and clinical staff to design analyses that identify opportunities for improvement in care, evaluates adherence to clinical best practice, and measures outcomes.
Provides tactical support to the organization by analyzing and interpreting data to suggest creative solutions.
Uses technical tools to query, manipulate, and summarize data from various data sources.
Generates reports detailing the results of analysis, including narrative, tabular, and graphical depictions of the data, results, and recommendations.
Presents findings to business leaders in a language that can be readily understood by non-analysts.
Utilizes data, results and recommendations to develop and deliver presentations
Works with other data analysts and the VP, Analytics and Performance Management as required to standardize metrics, resolve data quality issues, and ensure conformity and compliance with all aspects of clinical data analysis.
Other information:
Technical Expertise
Experience working with all levels within an organization is required.
Experience creating reports from a data source is required.
Experience with Webi, QlikSense or similar reporting tool is preferred.
Experience in healthcare is preferred.
Experience working with Epic is preferred.
Proficiency in MS Office [Outlook, Excel, Word] or similar software is required.
Bachelors Degree is required, Masters Degree is preferred.
Full Time

FTE: 1.000000

Akron Children's Hospital is an Equal Opportunity Employer of Minorities, Females, Protected Veterans, and Individual with Disabilities.

Position: IT IS",3.9,"Akron Children's Hospital
3.9","Akron, OH",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1890,Hospital,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
99,Analyst/ Sr Analyst / Manager Data Science,$98k-$193k (Glassdoor Est.),"Become part of the digital transformation and help revolutionize the financial services industry.

At American Express, we provide customers with access to products, insights and experiences that enrich lives and build business success. Our customers include our Cardmembers as well as the small businesses, merchants, corporations, and bank partners that are all members of the dynamic American Express network.

As a Data Science colleague, you have the opportunity to make your mark on technology and life at American Express. Youll be challenged everyday as we work together to create digital products and develop actionable data-driven insights to meet the customers of tomorrow. It is an exciting opportunity for someone who wants to help shape digital experiences for one of the worlds top brands.

Where are these roles located within American Express?

Data Science colleagues will serve as a key member of teams in the Credit and Fraud Risk and Enterprise Digital & Analytics organizations. We seek a thought-leader and a problem-solver who can blend business, technical, and industry best practices sweating every fine detail when it comes to developing the analyses, models, and algorithms that power our customers digital experiences.

Enterprise & Digital Analytics:

An exciting opportunity for someone who wants to help shape, refine and build, Prospect and Customer digital connections, experiences and interactions for one of the worlds most respected companies, through advanced statistical techniques, AI, and machine learning. Enterprise Digital and Analytics team charter is to be an engine of growth, marketplace differentiation and efficiency for American Express.

Big Data Labs:

Develop Big Data capabilities, tools and techniques to enhance Credit and Fraud Risk, and Information Management functions.
Credit and Fraud Risk:

This critical team is responsible for managing enterprise risks throughout the customer lifecycle, across our consumer and commercial businesses, and across all our global products. We develop industry-first data capabilities, build profitable decision-making frameworks, create machine learning-powered predictive models, and improve customer servicing strategies

Decision Science roles in these teams:

Our Decision Science teams use industry leading modeling and AI practices to predict customer behavior. Development, deployment and validation of predictive model(s) and supporting use of models in economic logic to enable profitable decisions across risk, fraud and marketing.

What type of work can you expect to do in Data Science at American Express?

The specific job responsibilities would depend on the team you are selected in for a full-time role. Broadly the role could entail some of the below listed responsibilities:
Work with massive amounts of digital data (Web, App, API) and sophisticated tools in an industry leading Big Data environment.
Build everything from basic reports to advanced machine learning models and algos to drive improvements to our customers online and mobile app experiences.
Develop insights into customer behavior and introduce new approaches to transform complex behavioral data into actionable information
Leverage the power of closed loop through Amex network to make decisions more intelligent and relevant
Innovate with a focus on developing newer and better approaches using big data & machine learning solutions
Minimum Qualifications
We have the know-how, creative platform and global reach to make nearly any idea a reality. Do these describe you?

Skills/Experience

Passion for improving end-to-end customer experience, innovation and customer first thinking
Strong interest in analytics and data mining space and ability to collaborate with technology and product partners
Independent thinker who’s organized, has great attention to detail, and can multi-task
Ability to blend big picture thinking with fine details and manage many stakeholders
Strong analytical, problem-solving/quantitative skills
Willing to take risks, experiment, and share fresh perspectives
Proficient in presentation tools, including Excel and PowerPoint
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Ability to handle large datasets using SAS, SQL, R, Python or another similar programming language
Educational Requirements
Advanced Degree (i.e. MS or PhD) in a quantitative field such as Economics, Statistics, Mathematics, Operations Research, Engineering, Computer Science
Currently enrolled in full-time Graduate degree or PhD program - Students must have a graduation date between December 2020 and June 2021
Candidates with relevant industry experience of 1-5 years can also apply
Why American Express?

There’s a difference between having a job and making a difference.

American Express has been making a difference in people’s lives for over 160 years, backing them in moments big and small, granting access, tools, and resources to take on their biggest challenges and reap the greatest rewards.

We’ve also made a difference in the lives of our people, providing a culture of learning and collaboration, and helping them with what they need to succeed and thrive. We have their backs as they grow their skills, conquer new challenges, or even take time to spend with their family or community. And when they’re ready to take on a new career path, we’re right there with them, giving them the guidance and momentum into the best future they envision.

Because we believe that the best way to back our customers is to back our people.

The powerful backing of American Express.

Don’t make a difference without it.
Don’t live life without it.

Learn more about our Digital groups at American Express by visiting https://careers.americanexpress.com.\\

Our team will review completed applications on a rolling basis. We appreciate your patiencewhile we consider your application and will be in contact with you by October 30th.

Depending on factors such as business unit requirements, the nature of the position, cost and applicable laws, American Express may provide visa sponsorship for certain positions.

American Express is an equal opportunity employer and makes employment decisions without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, disability status, or any other status protected by law.
Click here to view the ""EEO is the Law"" poster and supplement and the Pay Transparency Policy Statement..

If the links do not work, please copy and paste the following URLs in a new browser window: http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/ofccpost.htm and http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/pdf/.pdf

American Express is an equal opportunity employer and makes employment decisions without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status, disability status, age, or any other status protected by law.

Tags: CFE-11160
ReqID: 20006645
Schedule (Full-Time/Part-Time): Full-time
Date Posted: Oct 13, 2020, 9:06:52 PM
EEO Statement


American Express is an equal opportunity employer and makes employment decisions without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status, disability status, age, or any other status protected by law.",4.2,"American Express
4.2","New York, NY",-1,10000+ Employees,1850,Company - Public,Financial Transaction Processing,Finance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
100,Data Analyst,$33k-$63k (Glassdoor Est.),"View All Jobs

Data Analyst


New York, New York, United States

You’re curious, organized, methodical, and proactive. You like to use substantiated data to both identify and solve problems, rather than trust your gut alone.

As the core team of global communications powerhouse Weber Shandwick, we are leveraging bleeding edge data science approaches and development tools to provide unparalleled access to unexplored insights derived from the world’s most important digital, social and e-commerce platforms.

Our clients span five continents, and their consumers are everywhere. The systems and tools we are designing will be one of a kind and unique in their value to meet the global marketplace's current and future needs.

We Are Seeking:

As a key player in our organization, you will focus on contributing to complex multi-continental engagements and liaise with global executives at top performing organizations. The work we do is unique and requires a synthesis of many diverse data points, methodologies and perspectives to create differentiated analyses for our clients. We operate with a very lean structure built on mutual trust

We are seeking a talented team member to work with a small but entrepreneurial group to leverage our proprietary tools and data sets to provide unique insights to the world’s leading telecom, automotive, energy, CPG, healthcare, biotech and luxury brands

What You Will Be Doing:
Build data pipelines and deploy data integration solutions
Use client's standard data analysis and data integration tools and technologies to operationalize the solution.
Ability to deploy solutions to cloud and schedule ETL
Build and deploy machine learning models for client projects using internal and external pipelines.
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in math, computer science or other related STEM fields
1-2 years relevant full-time experience; preferably in professional services
Strong programming experience with Python and data analysis tools; Prefer experience with front-end data visualization tools (e.g., Plotly, Tableau, Looker)
Experienced in working AWS, GCP or other cloud solutions in the work environment
Experience in natural language processing is a plus
Ability to work independently and in an integrated team setting
Startup experience is a plus but not a must
Weber Shandwick is proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. Weber Shandwick recruits qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, gender, age, ethnic or national origin, protected veteran status, physical or mental disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status or citizenship status.

We make our careers website accessible to any and all users. If you need an accommodation to participate in the application process, please contact us at JobAppAccommodation@cmgrp.com. This email address is not for general employment inquiries or vendors; rather it is strictly for applicants who require special assistance accessing our employment website. Due to volume, messages sent to this email address that are not related to an accommodation cannot be answered.",3.6,"Weber Shandwick
3.6","New York, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1921,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
101,Data Analyst,$29k-$55k (Glassdoor Est.),"Are you ready for a change? At ZT Systems, we put People First, and from day one our team members make a difference. A fast-growing key player in a multibillion-dollar market, ZT designs and builds hyperscale compute and storage solutions for the worlds largest datacenter customers. We are passionate about teamwork, and the consistent high quality of our solutions differentiates us in the minds of our customers. Here at ZT, we recognize hard work, commitment, leadership, and results, and we truly believe that behind every quality solution is a team of highly talented individuals. Join us and become part of an industry-leading team that transforms ideas into reality.

About the Role

Support the Global Supply Chain organization by enabling and improving the availability of accurate and timely data. Work with various teams to understand their data needs, identify the correct data sources and develop tools, templates or visuals to help support the business needs. Independently search through large data sets to identify usable information and discover actionable insights through various analytics models and frameworks.

What you will do
Coordinate with internal cross-functional teams to define and support new customer data requirements
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data set
Work with management and planners to prioritize business information needs
Help to locate and define new process improvements through predictive analytics
Participate in the design and development of new tools to enable better data visibility throughout the organization
Ability to communicate complex data in a simple, actionable way
Ability to visualize data in the most effective way possible for a given project or study
Be flexible to support rapidly changing customer requirements in a positive manner
Excellent attention to detail
What you bring
BS degree in computer science, technology, data analytics, informatics or equivalent
0-3 years work experience (with degree)
Masters degree strongly preferred
Course level technical expertise regarding data models, database design development, data mining and segmentation techniques
Knowledge of and experience with reporting packages (Business Objects etc), databases (SQL etc programming (Python, R, XML, Javascript, or ETL frameworks)
Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical packages for analyzing datasets (Excel, SPSS, SAS, STATA, etc)
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, and analyze, with attention to detail and accuracy
Basic Level experience with queries, report writing and presenting findings (Tableu, PowerBI, etc.)
ZT Systems offers a highly competitive salary commensurate with work experience and/or education, an excellent benefits program that includes a 401(k) plan, health and dental insurance, and paid time off.

We are an Equal Opportunity Employer (EOE) and do not discriminate against otherwise qualified applicants on the basis of race, color, creed, religion, ancestry, age, gender, marital status, national origin, disability or handicap, or veteran status. ZT Systems is a Drug-Free Workplace.",3.3,"ZT Systems
3.3","Secaucus, NJ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1994,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
102,Data Analyst,$42k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Summary
Zimmer Biomet is a world leader in musculoskeletal health solutions. Our team members are part of a company with a heritage of leadership, a focus on shaping the future, and a mission dedicated to alleviating pain and improving the quality of life for people around the world.

The field audit analyst provides support for Zimmer Biomet by maintaining and expanding relationships with our customers who include distributors, independent agents, direct sales, and support staff. The Analyst’s overall objective is to satisfy, and often exceed, our customer’s needs by conducting periodic inventory audits that are complete and conciliatory, ensuring inventory records and traceability are transacted appropriately.
Principal Duties and Responsibilities
•Field travel to conduct physical audits throughout the US on a monthly basis.
•Lead and/or assist with cycle count activities for US distributors
•Provides recommendations for and implements process improvements to the auditing & cycle counting of US distributor inventory.
•Collaborates with Field Audit Leadership & Inventory Control department maintaining proper inventory controls and traceability for inventory across physical locations and lots.
•Performs audit and reconciliation process for distributor transitions.
•Assists in training, guidance and support, as necessary, to distributors and sales management regarding inventory management policies, procedures and best practices.
•Interfaces with distributors, sales management, finance and operations personnel to discuss inventory discrepancies; provides supporting documentation to Field Audit Leadership to lead and guides those discussions to conclusion.
•Maintains and/or inducts information for Field Audit dashboards around audit completion, discrepancies, and other related metrics.
•Follow all standard operating procedures, written and oral, at all times.
Expected Areas of Competence
•Hands on experience with SQL/relational database applications
•Advanced familiarity with Microsoft Suite, specifically MS Excel formulas, functions and pivot tables.
•Strong customer service orientation.
•Strong written and verbal communication skills, especially the ability to foster positive relationships with all internal and external (sales) personnel.
•Results oriented with the ability to accomplish work in a team environment.
•Strong attention to detail.
•Demonstrated enthusiasm and willingness to learn.
•Ability to work unsupervised on assigned tasks.
•Demonstrated analytical skills, especially in the areas of process improvement and problem solving.
•Highly developed organizational skills – able to handle multiple high priority tasks/projects concurrently

Education/Experience Requirements
•Bachelor of Science or equivalent degree required, preferably in a related field.
•2+ years of proven work experience with SQL.
•Minimum of two years\' related experience, preferably within the medical device industry.
•Experience with Inventory Control practices and physical audits is preferred.
•Warehouse inventory system experience and proficiency preferred.
Travel Requirements
Required up to 50% travel annually.
Additional Information
EOE M/W/Vet/Disability

At Zimmer Biomet, we believe in The Power of Us, which means that we are stronger together. We are committed to creating an environment where every team member feels included, respected, empowered, and celebrated.",3.4,"Zimmer Biomet
3.4","Warsaw, IN",-1,10000+ Employees,1927,Company - Public,Health Care Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
103,Data Analyst,-1,"Data Analyst - REMOTE

Our client is a data and technology company fostering on innovation, growth and collaboration.

They are seeking a Data Analyst to join their team!

Here's what you'll be doing:
Making outbound calls to customers to gather contact information
Utilizing Microsoft Excel and Google Sheets to set up and execute advanced data files
Adhering to company compliance requirements
Searching company websites, message via LinkedIn, and more to find contact info for various organizations
Here's what our ideal candidate has:
Knowledge of Microsoft Excel and Google Sheets
Excel and/or Google Sheets certification preferred
2+ years of advanced data handling and analytics
Experience making outbound calls with a script
Tableau experience preferred but not required
Keywords: Data Analysis, Data Acquisition, Microsoft Excel, Google Sheets, Tableau",3.6,"Agile
3.6","Atlanta, GA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
104,Data and Integration Business Analyst,$46k-$90k (Glassdoor Est.),"A career at T. Rowe Price says you want to contribute and make a difference at a leading global investment management firm where success results from the dedication our associates have in building success for our clients. We are a growing organization of associates from diverse backgrounds, experiences, and perspectives.
We take a long-term view on associates and their careers. Our associates do phenomenal work with purpose, and as a result, we provide growth opportunities through in-person and online training, management development programs, and career development on the job.
If you are seeking a meaningful work experience along with a workplace culture that thrives on teamwork, we invite you to explore the opportunity to join us.


T. Rowe Price seeks a Data and Integration Business Analyst in Owings Mills, MD to partner with the technical project teams and business partners to elicit, clarify and translate complex business requirements into application functional and detailed technical solution documentation and conceptual designs. Define and translate business needs for new and/or enhanced products, services or optimized business processes. Participate in all phases of project lifecycle with internal and external business and technical partners to ensure business requirements are understood, documented and met.

Position requires a Master’s degree in Computer Science, Electrical/Electronics Engineering or a related technical field plus two years of experience as a systems analyst or a related field, or in the alternate a Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Electrical/Electronics Engineering or a related technical field plus five years of experience as a systems analyst or a related field. Requires two years of experience with gathering, documenting, analyzing system specifications and requirements, testing concepts, SDLC Processes (Agile Scrum, Waterfall), and Visio. At least 1 year of experience with strong testing strategy and formulating test strategies.

T. Rowe Price is an equal opportunity employer and values diversity of thought, gender, and race. We believe our continued success depends upon the equal treatment of all associates and applicants for employment without discrimination on the basis of race, religion, creed, colour, national origin, sex, gender, age, mental or physical disability, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, citizenship status, military or veteran status, pregnancy, or any other classification protected by country, federal, state, or local law.",3.8,"T. Rowe Price
3.8","Owings Mills, MD",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1937,Company - Public,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
105,Data Analyst,$55k-$99k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview


Nuvance Health is a family of award-winning nonprofit hospitals and healthcare professionals in the Hudson Valley and western Connecticut. Nuvance Health combines highly skilled physicians, state-of-the-art facilities and technology, and compassionate caregivers dedicated to providing quality care across a variety of clinical areas, including Cardiovascular, Neurosciences, Oncology, Orthopedics, and Primary Care.

Nuvance Health has a network of convenient hospital and outpatient locations — Danbury Hospital, New Milford Hospital, Norwalk Hospital and Sharon Hospital in Connecticut, and Northern Dutchess Hospital, Putnam Hospital Center and Vassar Brothers Medical Center in New York — plus multiple primary and specialty care physician practices locations, including The Heart Center, a leading provider of cardiology care, and two urgent care offices. Non-acute care is offered through various affiliates, including the Thompson House for rehabilitation and skilled nursing services, and the Home Care organizations. For more information about Nuvance Health, visit www.nuvancehealth.org.

Responsibilities


Title: Data Analyst

Reports To: Director of Clinical Quality & Performance Improvement

Department: CPCI

FLSA Status: Exempt

Purpose: The Data Analyst is responsible for providing analytical support to the Clinical Quality and Practice Transformation department at Health Quest Medical Practice (HQMP). The Analyst will provide support for activities related to quality measurement, population health management, value-based payment programs, pay-for-performance, predictive modeling, and managed care contracting requirements.

Essential Responsibilities:
Responsible for creating reports to quantify and analyze quality performance improvement and value-based payment initiatives, including Patient-Centered Medical Home and Comprehensive Primary Care Plus (CPC+) initiatives.
Performs monthly and quarterly analysis of quality measure performance, and actual versus expected revenue results for value-based payer contracts.
Develops reports and analyzes data in support of population health management initiatives, such as, improved clinical outcome measures, reduced utilization measures, and increased preventive health measures.
Maintains attribution and metrics databases to support payer contracting, pay-for-performance initiatives, and develops models for reporting purposes.
Maintains and integrates system-wide data for use in the development of quality measurement and decision support.
Develops reports using data pulled from multiple databases including hospital, emergency department, outpatient, laboratory and testing facilities, in support of performance improvement and population health initiatives.
Automates retrieval of data to meet on-going reporting needs by collaborating with IT Department or external vendors.
Prepares and presents data analyses to senior executives, physicians, clinical staff and other stakeholders.
Maintain and Model REACH Values (Respect, Excellence, Accountability, Compassion, Honor).
Demonstrates regular, reliable and predictable attendance.
Performs other duties as assigned.
Qualifications


Education and Experience Requirements:
Bachelor’s Degree in Business Administration.
Minimum of five (5) years job-related experience.
STRONGLY PREFER: Three to five (3-5) years’ experience using electronic medical records systems such as, eClinical Works and/or Cerner.
PREFER: Three to five (3-5) years of health care and/or health insurance experience.
Minimum Knowledge, Skills and Abilities Requirements:
Expertise in data mining.
Ability to present complex information in an understandable way.
Effective English communication skills, both written and oral.
Strong analytical skills.
Proficient in database tools and applications including, Microsoft Office, Access, Excel, IBM/Phytel, Cognos, or other statistical packages.


License, Registration, or Certification Requirements:
N/A",2.6,"Health Quest
2.6","Lagrangeville, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,-1,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
106,Data Analyst,$40k-$74k (Glassdoor Est.),"Essen Health Care is an integrated healthcare delivery organization that provides high quality, compassionate, and accessible medical care to many of the most under-served residents of New York State. Guided by a population health model of care delivery, Essen’s patient-centric approach is focused on meeting patient needs in all care settings. Founded in 1999, Essen clinicians provide care in all five boroughs of New York City. With 150 primary and specialty care physicians and almost 100 advanced clinicians, Essen Health Care is one of the largest, most comprehensive private medical groups in New York City, and is recognized for excellence in patient satisfaction and clinical care. With five clinical divisions, patient care is provided in medical offices, 16 urgent care centers, hospitals, and nursing homes, as well as directly to patients in their homes. The Care Management division cares for the community by addressing social determinants of health through RNs, care managers and care coordinators. Essen clinicians provide quality care for nearly 30,000 patient lives across our five clinical divisions. Essen was one of the initial practices to have achieved ‘Level 3 Patient Centered Medical Home’ designation in New York by the National Committee for Quality Assurance. In 2018, Essen Health Care was nominated for the Heritage Innovation Award. Essen continues to expand and grow in the five boroughs while extending its breadth of services and continuing to provide the communities with leading edge care.

Essen is currently seeking a Full-time Data Analyst for our IT Department. The selected candidate will be responsible for gathering and analyzing healthcare data from multiple sources (e.g. insurance processing, clinical operations, and patient behavior) to extract trends and business insights. Then evaluates encounter data and identifies errors created by operational processes, claims and eligibility processes. Must research the analysis and categorize the encounter. The primary responsibility for this position is to fully support the ongoing healthcare business intelligence and data analytics objectives. To succeed in this role, you should be analytical, resourceful and works under moderate supervision.

Essen is seeking an individual who is skilled in the use of Power BI, Excel, SharePoint and SQL databases for data analysis with scripting via Python.

The selected candidate will be responsible to perform daily Physicians duties including but not limited to:

Provides consulting and analytic services to leadership, operations and finance.
Monitors encounter data from various databases and creates monthly, quarterly and ad-hoc reports
Deliver reports in pre-defined formats based on submitted and agreed upon requirements
Analyze, present and explain information in accessible and actionable way (i.e. budgeting reports, cost and claims or clinical data)
Summarizes large volumes of encounter data in analytical reports that include tables and graphs for management review and use
Reviews and ensures accuracy of all ad-hoc and automated reports and corrects discrepancies
Programs using Excel and SQL or other appropriate software to generate reports based on input/direction from management and other report users
Collaborates with other departments and vendors to identify missing data, errors or other anomalies; works with them to correct these encounter data errors, gather necessary information and provide guidance on regulatory reporting needs
Building models and analyzing data to discover discrepancies and patterns
Pull and integrate data from disparate sources (i.e. budgeting reports, cost and claims or clinical data)
Collaborate with management and internal teams to implement and evaluate improvements
Expert knowledge of MS Excel
Strong knowledge of SQL – Formulate analytic questions as database queries
Strong hands-on familiarity with eClinicalWorks (ECW)

The successful candidate will have the following Qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree in health services research, actuarial science, statistics, or economics OR minimum four (4) years of data analyst or related experience, including proficiency with analytical software.
At least 1-year experience Data Mining complex sets and formulating custom reports.
Experience performing data analysis from ECW, Claims, Rosters, etc. in a health care or health plan organization, required.
Formal informatics training a plus.
Strong analytic and reporting skills required.
Effective oral, written and interpersonal communication skills required.

ESSEN HEALTH CARE IS PROUD TO BE AN EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER

Essen Health care is proud to be an equal opportunity employer, and we seek candidates who desire to work in and serve an ethnically diverse population.",3.0,"Essen Health Care
3.0","New York, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
107,Data Analyst,$46k-$88k (Glassdoor Est.),"Podium is a suite of messaging tools for local business. Using our platform, businesses of all sizes can connect with customers via text to do things like request payments, collect reviews, and sell products, in a modern, convenient way. Our work streamlining this process for local businesses has awarded us recognition on top industry lists, such as Forbes' Next Billion Dollar Startups, Forbes' Cloud 100, the Inc. 5000 (#13), and Fast Company's World's Most Innovative Companies — in the last year alone. For more about our product, watch this video.

Podium has a positive, diverse, and supportive culture and was recently named one of Inc. Magazine's Best Workplaces for 2019. We look for people who are curious, creative and work to be a little better every day. In our work together we embody our values: Be a founder, Murder drama, and Enjoy the ride.

As a data analyst at Podium, you will be a critical part of illustrating ROI to clients, and keeping those clients loyal to Podium. You will work with clients and analyze and recommend strategic, data-driven decisions to clients and build reports based on the strategy. You will be on email threads and phone calls with clients, talking through their reporting needs and proposing solutions. You will also help train these clients on the custom reports that you build.

If you are someone who is passionate about building a business, turns curiosity into valuable deliverables, can creatively solve problems using quantitative metrics, and thrives in a fast-paced, open environment, then this is the right role for you!

What you will be doing:
Build reporting dashboards for Podium's clients, providing insights into their messaging behaviors, public online reviews, and private internal feedback.
Present reporting dashboards to clients, and train them on all aspects of the reporting.
Create new ways to visualize data for our clients, and build those new reports in a scalable manner
Become an expert on all data infrastructure and Podium's products, and know how to quickly answer any question that crosses your plate
Partner and collaborate with all other teams at Podium (sales, engineering, product, marketing, etc.) to design and build internal dashboards
Foster relationships with our Strategic account managers, and make recommendations on how to best handle their accounts (identify at-risk clients, provide ad-hoc charts for slide deck presentations, etc.)
What you should have:
2+ years professional experience with SQL and relational databases
The ability to clearly and effectively communicate the results of complex analyses
Scripting language experience (R preferred)
An understanding of common statistical applications and methods (correlation, summary statistics, regression)
Experience managing multiple, simultaneous projects, and do so with minimal guidance
A passion for identifying and understanding stories in data, and an innate curiosity to find more stories
Experience with Domo/Tableau/PowerBI preferred
BENEFITS
Transparent culture
Flexibility to work in this building in Lehi, UT
Great opportunities for career growth
401k with a competitive matching contribution plan
Unlimited Vacation (yes, we want you to have a work-life balance)
Great medical, dental, vision benefits
If in Utah, a stellar onsite gym with local professional coaches, morning and night classes offered
Life insurance, long and short-term disability coverage
Paid maternity and paternity leave
Swag
Podium is an equal opportunity employer. Podium provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, disability, genetic information, marital status or veteran status.",4.2,"Podium
4.2","Lehi, UT",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
108,Data Analyst,-1,"Â Master's degree in Computer Science or related degree preferred

Â 10 + years of experience delivering enterprise solutions to financial services organizations as a hands-on engineer developing complex systems architecture

Professional Skills/Competency

Â Experience with Foreign Exchange Upgrade or Implementation Program (FX Domain Experience preferred)

Â Working experience on Data Architecture

Â Working experience with APIs (Open Shift Containers, Micro services, Kubernetes preferred). Exposure to Apigee gateways.

Â Working experience on System and Data Integrations â Batch and Real-Time Integration.

Â Working experience on Messaging Service (Kafka Topics Preferred)

Â Experience in SSO Setup, Knowledge on SAML2.0, OAuth2.0 protocols

Â Knowledge on SWIFT protocols and MT message types.

Â Knowledge on OFAC Screening, Fraud Detection and Pattern analysis.

Â Deep understanding of Infrastructure Architecture (Firewall Rules, VPN Tunnel, Proxy Bypass configuration)

Â Deep understanding on foundational aspects (Security, DevOps & Governance)

Â Deep understanding of Enterprise Frameworks

Â Knowledge and Understanding of Industry Trends and Best Practices

Â Experience with delivering enterprise design patterns and end to end solution for mission critical highly available and scalable application involving vendors, custom development and matrixed IS organization",4.8,"InvenTech Info
4.8","Boston, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2010,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
109,Data Analyst,$46k-$79k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Description

A best-in-class city that attracts best-in-class talent, Philadelphia is an incredible place to build a career. From our thriving arts scene and rich history to our culture of passion and grit, there are countless reasons to love living and working here. With a workforce of over 30,000 people, and more than 1,000 different job categories, the City of Philadelphia offers boundless opportunities to make an impact.

As an employer, the City of Philadelphia values inclusion, integrity, innovation, empowerment, and hard work above all else. We offer a vibrant work environment, comprehensive health care and benefits, and the experience you need to grow and excel. If you’re interested in working with a passionate team of people who care about the future of Philadelphia, start here.

What We Offer:

Impact - The work you do here matters to millions.

Growth - Philadelphia is growing, why not grow with it?

Diversity & Inclusion - Find a career in a place where everyone belongs.

Opportunities in Tech - Don’t wait for the future, shape it.

Benefits - We care about your well being.

Agency Description

The City of Philadelphia’s Energy Office serves to manage energy supply and demand for city government operations. The mission of the Energy Office is to:

Strategically procure cost-effective, reliable, clean energy and conventional energy systems for city government
Promote energy conservation and efficiency within City departments by providing education, technical expertise, promoting systems change, and analysis of energy used
Develop and implement projects and programs that promote the efficient use of energy and reduce the City's environmental impact
Support Philadelphia’s climate and energy goals; and position City government to lead by example

The Energy Office is housed within the City of Philadelphia’s Office of Sustainability (OOS). OOS works with partners around the City to improve quality of life in all Philadelphia neighborhoods, reduce the City’s carbon emissions, and prepare Philadelphia for a hotter, wetter future.

Job Description

This position reports to the City’s Senior Energy Management Analyst and collaborates with other members of the Energy Office, the Office of Sustainability (OOS), and additional partner departments and agencies. This is an opportunity to help solve complex problems, gain valuable experience in energy and facilities management, and contribute to the sustainability goals outlined in the City’s Municipal Energy Master Plan.

Essential Functions

Assist in managing the City’s energy management database, including bill upkeep and uploads, user training and major data changes.
Ensure data is accurate and work to apply solutions when it is not.
Manage day-to-day issues with utility bills and meters working with facilities personnel and utility companies.
Work closely with the Senior Energy Management Analyst in identifying areas for automation in utility billing and energy management tasks and work together to develop solutions.
Track and analyze energy use at the facility and department level and offer direct support to departments in achieving energy reductions.
Track and verify savings of completed energy efficiency and conservation projects.
Develop a reporting process for completed work and projects.
Support Energy Office staff in running reports, analyzing data, supporting energy conservation and efficiency programs, and office administrative items.
Support regular updates to the City’s municipal greenhouse gas inventory.
Work closely with the Senior Energy Management Analyst to support municipal building benchmarking.
Support work to advance racial equity and environmental justice principles across OOS priority areas, portfolio, and initiatives.

Qualifications

4 years of experience in energy management, utilities, data analysis, or other relevant experience (for example, data processing). Each year of relevant post-secondary education will be counted toward experience.

Preferred Qualifications

LEED Green Associate credential.
Familiarity with energy systems and passion for sustainability.
Knowledge of new and emerging trends in the area of energy efficiency and energy management.
Familiarity with racial equity and environmental justice issues.
Energy management database experience.

Competencies, Knowledge, Skills and Abilities

Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Strong organizational and analytical skills.
Ability to manipulate, analyze, and organize large data sets.
Experience with Microsoft Excel.
Comfortable and effective working both independently and on teams.
Experience with data analysis platforms: R, Python, etc.
Willingness to engage in and support the office’s racial equity and environmental justice work.

Additional Information

Salary: $45,000 - $55,000

Cover letters and other supporting documents will be accepted but not required.

Closing Date: October 27th, 2020.

Job Training & Professional Development Statement

OOS is committed to building the capacity of staff members. In addition to access to external trainings, certifications or other professional development opportunities, learning also occurs in a shared setting. All team members jointly participate in exploring new concepts, resources, and skills. The entire OOS team convenes regularly to strengthen skills and competencies through knowledge exchange, resource sharing, and peer-to-peer support.

Staff further build skills and knowledge through mentoring with members of the senior leadership team and peer-to-peer mentoring. Staff receive guidance and coaching from other OOS staff as well as other partners based on professional growth interests.

Did you know?

We are a Public Service Loan Forgiveness Program qualified employer
Employees are eligible for a 25% tuition discount program (and sometimes spouses and dependents as well) in partnership with area colleges and universities
We offer comprehensive health coverage for employees and their eligible dependents
Our wellness program offers eligibility into the discounted medical plan
Employees receive paid vacation, sick leave, and holidays
Generous retirement savings options are available

Successful candidate must be a city of Philadelphia resident within six months of hire

The City of Philadelphia is an Equal Opportunity employer and does not permit discrimination based on race, ethnicity, color, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, religion, national origin, ancestry, age, disability, marital status, source of income, familial status, genetic information or domestic or sexual violence victim status. If you believe you were discriminated against, call the Philadelphia Commission on Human Relations at 215-686-4670 or send an email to faqpchr@phila.gov. For more information, go to: Human Relations Website: http://www.phila.gov/humanrelations/Pages/default.aspx

#LI-OHR",3.7,"City of Philadelphia
3.7","Philadelphia, PA",-1,10000+ Employees,1682,Government,Municipal Governments,Government,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
110,Data Analyst,$49k-$87k (Glassdoor Est.),"Skills :

Â

Required Skills:

Â

* Java, SQL

Â

* Experience with developing

Â

* and productionizing data processing pipeline using tools like Apache Beam, Spark and/or Flink

Â

* Data visualization and dashboard creation

Â

* Experience with statistical modeling approaches.

Â

* Experience implementing software to make data accessible through simple Web and APIs.

Â

Preferred skills:

Â

* Experience with query development and data management tools like PLX.

Â

* Experience with creating effective data visualizations using tools like Google Data Studio and Tableau

Â

* Experience using Flume Java

Â

Tech

Â

The job role would require knowledge/ability to learn the following technologies:

Â

* Frontend: Angular Dart

Â

* Backend : Java

Â

* Tools : Plx, Google Data Studio

Â

* Call Delivery

Â

* Audio Quality

Â

* System Latency

Â

* Resource Utilization efficiency

Â

* Correlate system performance Vs Performance Trend Analysis.

Â
Please send resumes to njettam@esharpedge.com",4.7,"Sharpedge Solutions Inc
4.7","Kirkland, WA",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Private,Publishing,Media,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
111,Data Analyst,$53k-$92k (Glassdoor Est.),"Due to continued organizational growth, Liberty Healthcare is now hiring for a new full-time Data Analyst position.

This position will be a key contributor with a statewide program which endeavors to ensure the quality of health care and human services provided to people who have intellectual and developmental disabilities.

You will work in close partnership with various program stakeholders, as well as the Liberty Healthcare’s Manager of Data Analytics and Chief Technology Officer.

In this role, you will primarily focus on data analytics to support the program, it’s leadership team, and health and human service clients. This will involve importing and managing data as well as reporting. Above and beyond, you will contribute to the large-scale enhancement of Liberty Healthcare’s companywide / national data analytics and information technology infrastructure and capacity.

Other responsibilities include:

· Determines and manages data course and develops systems to ensure data quality and integrity

· Collaborates with internal SMEs to identify and understand their analytical needs and translates these into impactful solutions

· Cleanses, merges, and processes data required to generate dashboards and reports for quality, operational, and financial purposes

· Analyzes existing and proposed workflows to ensure they support efficient business practices and align with key performance indicators

· Assists operations staff in the preparation of monthly, quarterly, and yearly reports and invoices

· Advocates and champions for the development and use of analytic platforms and tools – aligned to overall Liberty data analytics strategy – by operational business managers

· Maintains currency in current and emerging analytic techniques, tools, patterns and practices

· Establishes, documents, and manages stakeholder expectations regarding delivery scope and timeline

As a highly-valued employee of Liberty Healthcare Corporation in this key role, you will have an opportunity to collaborate with a talented and experienced team of healthcare subject matter experts and information technology professionals. The end result of your work should directly translate into improved quality of life and healthcare outcomes for a significant number of people who have disabilities.

This position offers a competitive salary and comprehensive compensation package – click here for details.

The knowledge, skills and abilities required of this role include:

· Minimum of a Bachelor’s degree in Business, Computer Science, Mathematics, or related field

· Professional experience in a comparable Business Analyst role

· Strong critical thinking and problem-solving skills

· 5+ years of experience with SQL, VBA, SAS, or another similar programming language

· Experience with one or more process improvement methodologies

· Experience with Power BI, Tableau, or similar data visualization tools a plus

· Excellent written and verbal communication skills

· Possesses very strong interpersonal and communication skills

· Strong orientation to customer service

· Must be able to manage ambiguity and work in fast paced environment

· Ability to organize and manage multiple priorities

· 3+ years of experience translating business requirements into alternative solution strategies and architectures, working in partnership with business leaders.

· Experience with analytics solution delivery and support in a business setting reflective of the specific assignment.

· Deep understanding of utilization of Office desktop applications, including Excel, PowerPoint, Word, etc.

· Operational knowledge of healthcare-specific industry and/or regulatory standards – including HIPAA

The following are not required, but preferred:

· Experience with and understand of data security standards and regulations, including but not limited to NIST, SOCII

· Experience in a healthcare environment dealing with highly secure data and PHI

· Knowledge of utilizing Office 365, Azure, AWS and other related cloud solutions

Liberty Healthcare Corporation is an equal opportunity employer and diverse organization which actively seeks veterans, people who have disabilities, and individuals of all backgrounds to join our growing organization – click here to learn more about us.

If the above describes you well - and you are looking for an opportunity to positively impact the lives of others while elevating your career, click “Apply” and submit your resume for immediate consideration.",4.4,"Liberty Healthcare Corporation
4.4","Lincoln, NE",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1986,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
112,Data Quality Analyst (Baldwin Co),$35k-$61k (Glassdoor Est.),"Are you ready to take the next step in your career? Do you want to do meaningful work that improves quality of life? At Tetra Tech, you will work with high-performing teams who are passionate about using their expertise to find solutions to complex problems in water, environment, infrastructure, resource management, energy, and international development.

Summary:

Tetra Tech specializes in the recovery of communities after being significantly impacted by disasters or weather events. We are currently hiring Data Analysts. Employees in these positions are responsible for managing field data and documentation. The Data Quality Analyst performs Quality Assurance and Quality Control (QA/QC) checks on field data and provides the project manager with regular updates regarding project metrics.

Responsibilities:

Gathers preliminary information for database setup at the outset of a project

Reviews and understands project contracts for the purposes of contactor billings

Reviews automated reports and provides them to the Project Manager or distribution group

Quality assurance and quality control of project data

Generating daily reports in regard to project metrics, work completion, and cost
Strong computer skills
Must have strong written and verbal communication skills
Ability to work under pressure and meet deadlines
Self-motivated and highly organized with high-level attention to detail and ability to multi-task
Investigative and problem solving skills
May be required to work long hours
May require background check
About Tetra Tech:

Tetra Tech is a leading provider of high-end consulting and engineering services for projects worldwide. We combine the resources of a global, multibillion dollar company with local, client-focused delivery in more than 400 locations around the world. We are Leading with Science® to provide sustainable and resilient solutions for our clients.

At Tetra Tech, we provide a collaborative environment that supports individual performance, innovation, and creativity.

For more information on our company, please visit our website at www.tetratech.com. To apply, please submit your resume and cover letter on the Careers portion of our website at www.tetratech.com/careers.

We thank all applicants for their interest; however only those selected for an interview will be contacted. Tetra Tech is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. We invite resumes from all interested parties including women, minorities, veterans and persons with disabilities.

Tetra Tech is a VEVRAA federal contractor and we request priority referral of veterans for available positions.

EOE AA M/F/Vet/Disability - No calls or agencies

Additional Information



Organization: 105 TDR",3.7,"Tetra Tech
3.7","Daphne, AL",-1,10000+ Employees,1966,Company - Public,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
113,Data Analyst,-1,"Description:

The Data Analyst is responsible for analysis of business objectives, measurement strategy and specific performance metrics.

Action items include:

Ability to execute efficiently regarding data connection set-up, dashboard development, visualization and analysis.
Communicate with the strategist and other applicable stakeholders efficiently about the deliverable, results, findings and insights.
Communicate with the strategist in a timely manner about any changes to deliverable, including timeline and output, making sure both analyst and strategist are on the same page before meeting with the client.
Manage and optimize processes for data intake, validation, mining and engineering as well as modeling, visualization and communication deliverables.
Adhere to internal processes and requirements in data management, communication and documentation.
Ability to show and share expertise with the team to support mutual-learning environment.
Responsible for reporting automation and use of BI tools.
. Requirements:
Ability to use and experience with industry tools and systems, digital research tools, visualization tools analytics platforms, etc. Examples include Tableau, Amazon Redshift, Google Products, social platforms and programmatic platforms.
Understanding of analytics, business intelligence, client strategy, and storytelling process.
Must be a self-starter that takes personal responsibility for education in relevant digital marketing, and sales analytics
Must be able to multi-task, be detail oriented, organized and analytical
Must have intermediate Tableau experience
Superior skills with Excel and/or other software to leverage statistical analysis
Ability to problem solve and think creatively to overcome obstacles
Able to work within a team environment while handling multiple projects with deadlines
Bachelor's degree from four-year college or university, degree or concentration in advertising, marketing or communications preferred; or one to two years related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience.
One to three years experience in Digital Media Strategy, Analytics or related agency experience.",5.0,"Radar LLC
5.0","Columbia, MO",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
114,Data Analyst,-1,"Data Analyst

Location Name

IL, Chicago - 550 W Jackson Blvd - 4th Floor

ID

2020-4309

Date Posted

2 days ago(10/19/2020 5:25 PM)

Company

Berkley Select

Primary Location

US-IL-Chicago

Category

Information Technology



Company Details

More than any other, insurance is an industry whose foundation is based on trust – to provide peace of mind. So it is essential that, above all, Berkley Select is a company defined by the attributes that engender trust and confidence among our brokers and agents, and their clients. Berkley Select is the result of bringing together two of the industry’s most respected names in professional liability insurance.

We are a leading provider of professional liability insurance products across a full spectrum of disciplines and industries, for clients of virtually every size and level of complexity.

As a Berkley company, we enjoy operational flexibility that allows us to deliver quality coverage solutions. Berkley Select clients have access to a creative team of dedicated underwriters and the resources of W. R. Berkley Corporation. All member insurance companies are rated A+ (Superior) by A.M. Best Company, and carry Standard & Poor’s Financial Rating of A+ (Strong).



Responsibilities

We are looking for an experienced Data Analyst to join our Business Intelligence team. The ideal candidate has exceptional analytical skills and is adept at solving complex problems and creating elegant business solutions. The Data Analyst assesses basic information needs, designs studies, analyzes results and delivers key findings in support of business leaders. The Data Analyst, with considerable latitude for independent action and judgment, will analyze, design, build, publish, program, maintain, test, troubleshoot, and implement and maintain legacy reports and PowerBI dashboards. Work on multiple projects independently and larger team based projects. Position requires excellent SQL programming skills and experience with the Microsoft BI Stack (SQL Server 2017, SSRS, SSAS), Visual Studio, and PowerBI.
Code and design SSRS reports, end user dashboards and retrieve Ad hoc data sets from the business intelligence environment.
Collaborate in collecting to define functional requirements, document and contribute to technical design discussions
Provide estimates and plans for report initiatives as requests are obtained from different departments and company stakeholders
Ability to handle multiple tasks and support special projects needs simultaneously.
Use optimized SQL server queries to efficiently and quickly retrieve data. Work with the Data Delivery Team Lead on different methods of SSRS query design and to find solutions that meet the requestors needs.
Create and design reports as best-practice solutions that support business reporting tasks. This will be achieved in using different programs and software, such as SSRS, SSAS, Microsoft Excel, MS SQL Server, SharePoint and other tools.
Ability to work in a fast paced team environment and self-manage, work well under pressure meeting tight deadlines and possess excellent interpersonal skills to work well with employees at all levels.
Resolve and Troubleshoot Report and data issues reported by end-users or support desk.
Maintain a record of different reporting processes in place and help to improve Report team goals with regard to report and data management.



Qualifications

Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, or at least 4 years of work-related experience

1-2 years of business intelligence experience building reports and/or dashboards

Insurance Industry Experience Highly Preferred

Required Experience:
Experience with Microsoft SQL Server 2017 tools and technologies (SSRS, SSAS)
Experience using data visualization tools (PowerBI or Tableau)
Strong analytical skills, able to translate complex business requirements into sound solutions
Demonstrates depth of knowledge in data modeling, data transformation & designing analytical data structures including tabular and multi-dimensional
Ability to work in a fast-paced, collaborative team environment
Excellent written and verbal communication skills and ability to express ideas clearly and concisely in good grammatical form, as well as effectiveness of expression in individual and group situations
An understanding of analysis and research with a basic understanding or dataset, programming, querying, report design and dashboard design required.
Experience with Power BI and/or Tableau
Experience developing multi-dimensional data models
Strong SQL skills with experience creating complex queries, building stored procedures, or creating views to support the data analysis requirements.

Options

Create Profile & ApplyApply
Share",4.7,"Berkley
4.7","Chicago, IL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Logistics & Supply Chain,Transportation & Logistics,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
115,Data Analyst,-1,"Our Company
Wecker Associates is a world class consulting firm helping Fortune 500 companies with sophisticated data, statistical and mathematical analyses for corporate decision making, research and development, and expert testimony in litigations. We are looking for the right individual to join our team in Jackson, WY.

General Purpose
Data Analysts and Consultants work closely with Project Managers and Senior Consultants to solve client problems.

Desirable Qualifications
M.S. or B.S. in quantitative field;
Strong computer and data analysis skills (we use SAS, S-plus, Mathematica, and other scientific and general business software in a UNIX environment);
Good communication skills;
Ability to work collaboratively in an informal, collegial environment;
Ability to work effectively under deadlines.
Compensation and Benefits
Compensation strongly competitive with business, government, and academia;
Company-sponsored health and dental coverage.
Applicants should mail or email their resume with a cover letter and compensation history to the following address. No telephone calls please.

Recruitment
William E. Wecker Associates, Inc.
270 E Simpson Avenue
PO Box 1010
Jackson WY 83001-1010
employment@wecker.com",5.0,"William E Wecker Assoc
5.0","Jackson, WY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
116,"Data Analyst, Deal Desk",$63k-$114k (Glassdoor Est.),"Your Opportunity More than twelve years ago, New Relic established an entirely new market with the first SaaS full-service application performance management, an offering previously available only through on-premise enterprise software. We are disrupting a multi-billion dollar software market and having fun doing it! Our customers are a broad range of tech-oriented companies – from start-ups to global Fortune 50 enterprises – all of whom depend on us for the performance of their web and mobile applications. Our growth continues to be explosive and that’s where you come in! We are looking for a highly motivated, results orientated Data Analyst to join our Finance organization. This role will be key in maximizing the value of New Relic products sold along with the related revenue associated with those sales. The primary focus of this position will be to turn the finance data from our deals into information, information into insight and insight into business decisions. The right person for this job has a team player approach, attention to detail, an analytical mind that excels at problem solving through critical analysis and someone who is challenged by process review and continuous improvement. What You’ll Do Ability to analyze multiple streams of data and make the necessary adjustments to ensure accuracy of reporting for both New Relic sales and finance teams respectively Acquiring data from primary or secondary data sources and maintaining databases Developing and implementing data analyses, data collection systems and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing reports to the wider Deal Desk team and finance management Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets Engage with the wider Deal Desk team as well as Sales Enablement in order to support communication and training efforts related to new process enhancements and best practices Work with cross-functional teams to help arrive at business decisions based on our finance data to help give the means to Sales to address and surmount customer objections while maximizing revenue/bookings Work with management to prioritize business and information needs Locate and define new process improvement opportunities for both the Deal Desk team as well a number of cross functional teams in New Relic Your Qualifications 2+ years experience as a Data Analyst or Business Data Analyst (in a high-tech environment, in a Finance/Operations role) Demonstrated capability to build strong working relationships with internal business units and across regions Ability to work without supervision in a fast-paced high-tech environment Technical expertise regarding data models, database design development, data mining and segmentation techniques Strong knowledge of and experience with reporting packages (Business Objects etc) Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical packages for analyzing datasets (Excel, SPSS, SAS etc) Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy Adept at queries, report writing and presenting findings Strong communication, organizational and problem-solving skills. Experience with Zuora preferred BS in Mathematics, Economics, Computer Science, Information Management or Statistics preferred Please note that visa sponsorship is not available for this position. Our Office Our office is in the tech-rich urban center of San Francisco, with easy commute access and a plethora of good eats. We provide competitive compensation, equity, and big-company benefits (medical, dental, etc.)—all while maintaining the energy, agility, and fun of a start-up. About Us New Relic (NYSE: NEWR) is a cloud-based platform that gives developers, engineers, operations, and management a clear view of what’s happening in today’s complex software environments. So they can find and fix problems faster, and deliver delightful experiences for their customers. That's why the world’s best engineering teams rely on New Relic to visualize, analyze, and troubleshoot their software. It’s the simplest, most powerful cloud-based observability platform, built to create more perfect software. All from one place. Founded in 2008, we’re a global company passionate about building a culture where all employees feel a deep sense of belonging, where every ‘Relic’ can bring their whole self to work and feel supported and empowered to thrive. We’re consistently recognized as a distinguished employer and are committed to building world-class products and an award-winning culture. For more information, visit newrelic.com. Our Hiring Process New Relic takes seriously our stewardship of the data of our thousands of customers worldwide. In compliance with applicable law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work and to complete employment eligibility verification. We will consider qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records based on individual circumstances and in accordance with applicable law including, but not limited to, the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance. https://sfgov.org/olse/sites/default/files/Document/FCO%20Poster%20Set%20All%20Languages%2010%2001%2018.pdf Headhunters and recruitment agencies may not submit resumes/CVs through this website or directly to managers. New Relic does not accept unsolicited headhunter and agency resumes, and will not pay fees to any third-party agency or company that does not have a signed agreement with New Relic. New Relic is an equal opportunity employer. We eagerly seek a diverse applicant pool and hire without regard to race, color, gender identity, religion, national origin, ancestry, citizenship, physical abilities (or disability), age, sexual orientation, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Interested in the details of our privacy policy? Read more here: https://newrelic.com/termsandconditions/applicant-privacy-policy",4.3,"New Relic
4.3","San Francisco, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2008,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
117,Data Analyst,$49k-$88k (Glassdoor Est.),"SundaySky has a unique and exciting opportunity to join an analytics group for a rapidly growing startup. Our product combines digital technology, advertising, consumer relationship management, and big data for the most recognizable brand names across multiple industries. We are seeking an energetic, self-starter that combines an analytical mind with creative problem-solving skills to use data to drive success. The ideal candidate approaches analysis as a path to strategic thinking that culminates in actionable insights through intuitive visualizations and tools. If you're the kind of person who obsesses over details, thrives in a dynamic, fast-paced collaborative startup environment, wants an opportunity to make a significant impact and jumps at the opportunity to take on new challenges, SundaySky is the place for you.

In a fast paced, ever-changing environment, you will be involved in the following –

Developing a reporting platform to provide a unified view of results through dashboards and reports that will be accessed by all levels within SundaySky and external clients.
Partner with Product to drive priorities across reporting needs and implement analytics roadmap solutions
Actively communicate project progress and solution decisions across range of technical and business stakeholders
Maintaining data integrity working closely with R&D to organize and store data in a format that provides accurate data and allows the business to quickly identify both data and operational issues.
Building proactive analysis through data mining to identify trends and opportunities for product optimization.
Finding areas of opportunity to revenue expansion in client programs.
Proving value to strategic clients by developing data-driven stories in dynamic presentations.
Discovering best practices to reduce subjectivity, display industry leadership, and further develop our product.
Analyze and solve business problems at their root - stepping back to understand broader context and develop solutions to meet many different needs
Packaging and presenting analytical findings and clearly communicating (both written and verbal) program results and complex concepts to success managers, marketing, sales team, and the end client in both statistical and non-statistical terms.
Supporting sales and success management teams by providing data-driven industry overviews, information on research products, assisting with trouble-shooting issues, and answering questions that may arise from data issues and reports.
Become an expert in industry, customer and SundaySky measurement methodologies.

Requirements:

The ideal candidate will have the following experience and skillet:

• Minimum 3 years of experience in business analytics

• 3 years of experience and expertise with Tableau development

• Competency in statistical analytic techniques such as: time series data analysis, forecasting segmentation, uni-variate & multivariate statistical analysis, various metrics and key performance indicators, research & test design, significance testing, hypothesis testing, variance and growth calculations, return on investment

• Project management skills, including the abilities to handle multiple projects in a fast-paced environment and work effectively with colleagues and clients in diverse departments, geographic locations, and time zones. Balances desire for quantitative rigor with realities of inconsistent business data

• Critical thinking: capable of generating consistently accurate, useful reports as well as enthusiasm for translating data into actionable insight relevant to marketing program objectives

• Experience with the following tools:

• MS Office: Advanced Excel (Pivot tables, advanced macros, etc.) and PowerPoint

• Web analytics tools: Google Analytics, Omniture, DART, Coremetrics, etc.

• Open source statistical software: R or Python (similar to SAS, SPSS, etc.)

• Database (SQL, MySQL, NoSQL, Splunk, etc.)

• Experience with data visualization and/or an eye for design

• Proactive, independent thinker with high energy and positive attitude

• Bachelor’s degree (B.A. or B.Sc.) or equivalent.

• Experience with eCommerce / digital advertising best practices

• Willingness to take coaching for continuous personal development

• Experience working with a distributed team of Sales managers, project managers and technical support.

• Must be authorized to work in the US",4.2,"SundaySky
4.2","New York, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
118,Data Analyst,-1,"Location Indianapolis
Type Freelance
Duration Ongoing
Start Within a Couple Weeks
Rate DOE
Description Our Indy-local healthcare client is seeking a Data Analyst for a contract opportunity.

Data Analyst Responsibilities:
Lead cross-functional projects using advanced data modeling and analysis techniques to discover insights that will guide strategic decisions and uncover optimization opportunities that align with customer needs and help to improve and differentiate the customer experience
Develop campaign performance metrics, funnel metrics, executive staff reporting, and KPI reporting
Identify data gaps and create ways to capture that data
Define, manage, and share VoC reporting methodology, standards and best practices. Influence internal stakeholders to move from insights to action to improve CX metrics
Create effective, concise reports and proposals that quickly inform and influence leadership at various levels
Data Analyst Must Haves:
5+ years relevant experience in business intelligence and customer insights or 5+ years in a data analyst position
Customer experience
Data modeling
Developing reporting and KPI reporting
Experience with B2B and B2C marketing operations
Proficiency in Analytics tools (Google analytics, Adobe analytics, Datastudio, PowerBI, Tableau)
Strong analytical skills with an ability to translate data into meaningful and actionable information
Data Analyst Nice to Haves:
Experience working in a regulated healthcare environment
Experience working in a complex global environment
Experience using VOC platforms (e.g. Medallia, Qualtrics)
Presenting data to executive stakeholders
OCT. 2020",3.8,"Creative Circle
3.8","Indianapolis, IN",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2002,Company - Public,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
119,Data Analyst,-1,"The Data Analyst/Visualization Developer plays an important role in our team’s success. As a member of an Agile Delivery team, they are the primary creators of new features and functionality within the software. This role understands how data is analyzed, visualized and interacted with to fulfill business needs.

The Data Analyst is responsible for:
Understanding and assessing business needs and use cases for data and analytics solutions.
Designing and developing Data Visualization solution alternatives and recommendations to fulfill use case requirements.
Analyzing data to find anomalies, outliers, inconsistent formats and other data quality items that would impact the data visualizations.
Adapt data components to accommodate changes in source data and new business requirements.
Creating source to target data mappings to specify data movement and rules required to prepare data for visualization.
Design, develop, and deploy optimal extraction, transformation, and loading of data
Modeling data to optimize interacting with visuals and dimensions efficiently.
Collaborate with the rest of the Big Data Team, subject matter experts and department leaders to understand, analyze, build and deliver new data-related processes and/or reports.
Requirements

Required Skills:
Problem-solving, investigation and analysis skills to understand needs and use cases
Understanding of various visualization methods, approaches and interaction patterns.
Hands on experience with data visualization tools, such as Tableau, QlikView, Looker, PowerBI, and others.
Strong SQL skills and understanding of how to write efficient queries.
Experience with databases such as BigQuery, PostgresSQL and others.
Basic understanding of statistical analysis.
Strong initiative and self-starting skills, ability to join a team and contribute quickly.
Other Valuable Experience:
Implementations with cloud-based solutions and Google Cloud Platform.
Client-facing experience.
1-3 years experience of implementing technology solutions
Experience in Python including in modules/libraries such as pandas, NumPy, Flask, scikit-learn, and sci-py.
Proven experience extracting data from structured data sources (SQL, Excel, CSV files) and unstructured data sources
Experience consuming data from web services, REST and SOAP, HTML, XML and JSON.",3.2,"Tectonic
3.2","Denver, CO",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
120,Data Analyst,-1,"Title: Data Analyst @ Des Moines, IA
Terms of Hire: Full time
Salary: $ 100-105 K/ YR + Benefits.

Job description:
Position Purpose: Responsible for analytic data needs of the business unit. Handle complex data projects and acts as a lead for other Data Analysts.
Provide advanced analytical support for business operations in all or some of the following areas: claims, provider data, member data, clinical data, HEDIS, pharmacy, external reporting
Extract, load, model, and reconcile large amounts of data across multiple system platforms and sources
Review data to determine operational impacts and needed actions; elevate issues, trends, areas for improvement and opportunities to management.
Develop reports and deliverables and make recommendations to management
Model data using MS Excel, Access, SQL, and/or other data warehouse analytical tools
Assist management in driving business decisions based on data
Ensure compliance with federal and state deliverable reporting requirements by performing data quality audits and analysis.
Assist with training and mentoring other Data Analysts.
Assist with determining workload and related activities for other Data Analysts
Qualifications:::
Education/Experience:
Bachelor’s degree in related field or equivalent experience. 6+ years of statistical analysis or data analysis experience. Healthcare experience preferred. Advanced knowledge of Enterprise Reporting and Analysis tools, SQL, and Microsoft Office applications, including Excel and Access. Experience managing projects or heavy involvement in project implementation.
HEDIS:
Bachelor’s degree related field or equivalent experience. 6+ years of statistical analysis or data analysis experience or 3+ years of HEDIS data analysis experience including measurement and rates impacted. Advanced knowledge of Business Intelligence Tools, SQL, and Microsoft Applications, including Excel and Access.
BUSINESS ANALYTIC:
Bachelor’s degree’s related field or equivalent experience. 6+ years of statistical analysis or 3+ years of related IT experience, including data warehouse, coding or ETL experience. Healthcare experience preferred. Advanced knowledge of Enterprise Reporting and Analysis tools, SQL, and Microsoft Office applications, including Excel and Access. Experience managing projects or heavy involvement in project implementation. Encounters experience preferred.
PHARMACY UNDERWRITING
Bachelor’s degree in related field or equivalent experience. 5+ years of experience in underwriting analysis (preferred in pharmacy or medical field), or 6+ years of experience in data analysis, or financial reporting/auditing, data warehouse, coding, or predictive analytics. Expert knowledge of SQL, Excel, and Microsoft Applications
You Will Enjoy:
An opportunity to be a part of a great culture, an awesome team, a challenging work environment, and some fun along the way!
Apply today to learn more and be part of our Growth story.
All applications will be kept strictly confidential and once shortlisted, our team will be in touch with you for further discussions.",-1,CEDENT,"Des Moines, IA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Contract,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
121,Data Analyst,-1,"We are looking for a Data Analytics professionals to join our Analytics Team.This is a unique opportunity for a creative and charismatic individual to lead a key advanced data analytics team for a fast growing Products organization for Gartner. Our mission is to drive increasing business impact by building world class data analytics practices. Required Skills: Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Engineering or Information Technology. Minimum of 5 year’s experience in Business Intelligence or Information Management Advanced SQL skills Strong communication skills across all mediums and audience types (technical, business, executive, etc.) Have a keen eye for visual aesthetics Passion for data analysis and solving problems with data Strong analytical mind-set and ability to use data and logic to create solutions to solve customer problems Ability to decompose complex business problems into their constituent parts Ability to use innate curiosity to collaborate with different business units to co-create solutions Experience with Birst, Tableau, or other industry leading BI tools Experience with Big Data technologies such as Hadoop, Hive,Spark, Columnar databases, etc. Knowledge of relational and dimensional modelling, theories,principles, and practice (Kimball methodology, star schemas,Normalization, etc.…) Key Responsibilities: Must be data-driven with strong problem solving and analytical skills Must have technical capabilities : SQL & Excel Good to have technical capabilities : Knowledge of at least one of R, Python & SAS Prior experience as a Product Data, a marketing analyst is preferred Strong communication and organization skills, with the ability to synthesize a lot of information quickly, highlight the key takeaways and disseminate actionable insights. High degree of ownership in taking things to completion. Ability to multitask and work on a diverse range of requirements",3.6,"Contus
3.6","San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
122,Data Analyst,-1,"Overview:
Based in Northern, VA, Axiologic Solutions LLC has opportunities for you to become part of our high-quality team that delivers innovative solutions to key Federal clients.

Position is contingent based on awarded contract.

Responsibilities: Data Analysts use technology to mine complex, voluminous, and different varieties of data from various sources and platforms in order to collect, analyze, and compile data to meet customer needs. Data Analysts will perform the following duties:

Identify new sources of data and methods to improve data collection, analysis, and reporting
Collect customer requirements
Determine technical issues
Design algorithms and data manipulation capabilities using R, Python, C++, JavaScript, Go, and other known programming languages.
Build data solutions, tools, and capabilities to enable self-service frameworks for data consumers to monitor and report on data.
Improve the quality of data use and usability by driving an understanding and adherence to the principles of data quality management including metadata, lineage, and business definitions
Work collaboratively with Intelligence and Data analysis teams to produce qualitative and quantitative data that support Intelligence products.
Qualifications:

Possess a minimum of a bachelor's degree in a computer science discipline.
Experience providing services similar in required tasks, scope, and complexity.
Equal Opportunity Employer–minorities/females/veterans/individuals with disabilities/sexual orientation/gender identity.

Equal Opportunity Employer–minorities/females/veterans/individuals with disabilities/sexual orientation/gender identity.

Applicants with a physical or mental disability, who require a reasonable accommodation for any part of the application or hiring process, may e-mail their request to Jennifer.chavira@axiologicsolutions.com, call 571-758-3780, or visit our office at 8280 Willow Oaks Corp. Dr. Suite 450, Fairfax Virginia for assistance. Determinations on request for reasonable accommodation will be made on a case-by-case basis.",4.5,"Axiologic Solutions
4.5",Colorado,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
123,Data Analyst,$58k-$102k (Glassdoor Est.),"Work Location

Orange, California

Work Shift
Day – 08hrs (United States of America)

Why CHOC?

At CHOC Children’s, we strive to be the leading destination of children’s health by providing exceptional and innovative care. We are responsible for the overall health of our community’s pediatric population in our hospitals, clinics, and practices. And because of our breadth of care, your career at CHOC Children’s can be as diverse and fulfilling as you determine. CHOC Children’s compensation structure, benefits offerings, and career development programs are geared to helping you achieve your professional and personal goals. Apply now to see where your career at CHOC Children’s can take you.

Job Summary

The Data Analyst assists and contributes to the design, development and execution of an organization-wide analytics program, with a focus on capturing, analyzing and leveraging critical patient and financial data that will be used to positively impact care outcomes, cost and value. Works to ensure accurate data exchange between CHOC and community pediatricians and family practitioners, and to reduce costly duplication of services. Assists with the design, development and testing of reports and works closely with other team members to support the data and knowledge needs of the program. Has strong knowledge and understanding about database design and maintenance.

Experience

* Required: Minimum five (5) years of related experience. Strong knowledge, understanding and experience related to database design, structure and maintenance. Must have extensive knowledge of electronic medical record technology.

* Preferred: Five (5) years of experience in the field of healthcare informatics and database management. Knowledge of McKesson's HBI product highly desired.

Education

* Required: Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or related field. Relative experience in lieu of education may be considered.

* Preferred: Master's degree in related field.

Training

* Required: None required.

Specialized Skills

* Required: Excellent verbal, written, presentation and interpersonal skills, within the framework of CHOC’s corporate values. Ability to work collaboratively with other disciplines across the hospital. Ability to perform effectively in a complex changing environment. Ability to deliver projects on time and within budget.

Licensure

* Required: None required",3.6,"CHOC Children's
3.6","Orange, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1964,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
124,Data Analyst,-1,"Data Analyst Port Hueneme, CA About Us: JSL Technologies, Inc. (JSL) is a certified Small Disadvantaged Business (SDB) and Veteran-Owned government contractor providing engineering, logistics, and program support services to the Department of Defense (DoD). Our team of over 350 employees is committed to delivering practical, innovative, and affordable solutions. We are headquartered in Oxnard, CA and provide top tier services across the nation. JSL fosters an inclusive environment of diverse, ethical, committed, and highly accomplished professionals who respect each other, hold themselves accountable, and continually strive for improvement. We offer competitive salary and a comprehensive benefits package. Security Clearance: Applicants must have an active security clearance and/or the ability to obtain and maintain a US government security clearance. Selected candidates will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements to obtain a DoD government-granted security clearance. Individuals will be subject to a background investigation to include but not limited to, criminal history, employment and education verification, drug testing, and creditworthiness. Job Description: Support the Naval Surface Warfare Station in Port Hueneme, CA. Provide logistics services in support of modernization efforts to include identification of related material required, ship/site configuration validation, tracking metrics, collecting & analyzing data, maintaining & updating databases, developing & updating SOP documents, and working as part of a team. Responsibilities: Perform logistics management operations that involve planning, coordinating, monitoring and evaluating logistics actions required to certify and ensure adequate logistics support for assigned combat systems and major weapon systems installed in ships during various types of overhaul and repair activities Minimum Qualifications: Minimum of one (1) year data analysis experience within logistics Ability to communicate orally and in writing to a variety of personnel within NSWC PHD and at external activities High School Diploma or equivalent Valid U.S. government secret clearance Desired: Bachelor's degree preferred Navy Shipboard Experience with Aegis CG or DDG background preferred JSL Technologies, Inc. is an equal opportunity employer. All applicants are considered for employment without attention to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, veteran, or disability status. To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed must be representative of the knowledge, skills, minimum education, training, licensure, experience, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.",4.2,"JSL Technologies, Inc.
4.2","Port Hueneme, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
125,Data Analyst - Junior,-1,"High Reliability Solutions (HRS) is our name.

Junior Data Analyst
Washington, DC 20571

HRS Consulting, Inc. is staffed by human performance and training professionals who specialize in assisting our clients to adopt the best practices of High Reliability Organizations. Our experts include professionals with extensive experience introducing HRO principles and enthusiasm for HROs in healthcare. We have a portfolio of proven tools and systems to advance our customers goals.

Position Description:


HRS Consulting, Inc. is seeking a Data Analyst Junior to work in support of the Department of Veterans Affairs to provide best value healthcare and professional consulting services to the Veterans Health Administration (VHA). Qualified candidates will have experience working with advanced computerized models to extrapolate data patterns using advanced algorithms. Experience in VA information systems and databases and ability to utilize Pyramid analytics and/or Tableau is preferred.

Duties/Responsibilities:

Providing consultation and process improvements for availability, usability, integrity, and security of the VHAs healthcare data
Working closely with VHA Systems and files to obtain data through advanced computerized models
Evaluating and recommending solutions for records management in compliance with healthcare industry standards
Extrapolating data patterns through advanced algorithms
Evaluating current data needs and establishing a reporting process
Developing graphs and charts and provide mathematical information to support projects
Maintaining communication with stakeholders and presenting data collection information and analysis to support business models, predictions, and profitable future trends
Identifying patterns in data and producing and producing reports to provide alternative approaches
Experience/Education Requirements:

U.S. Citizen or Green Card Holder
Eligibility to obtain Veterans Affairs (VA) suitability approval to access agency computer systems and facilities required to start work; current VA credentials preferred
Bachelors degree required; Studies in Mathematics, Data Science, or related discipline preferred
3+ years of related experience supporting data analysis and making recommendations on business models for a government healthcare organization
Experience conducting analysis and generating reports and documentation identifying patterns in data, using advanced algorithms, suggesting alternative approaches, etc.
Experience with data driven technologies and visualization tools
Experience in VA information systems and databases and ability to utilize Pyramid analytics and/or Tableau is preferred
Ability to clearly communicate and exchange information with co-workers, teammates, stakeholders, and other personnel, as required.
Experience evaluating and recommending records management solutions to compile, evaluate, analyze, control, and secure data in accordance with healthcare regulations
Expertise to assess existing legacy systems and document storage approaches following healthcare industry standards
Proficiency working across the Microsoft Office Suite, including advanced Excel skills
Work Environment/Physical Demands:

This job operates in a professional office environment with prolonged periods sitting at a desk, attending meetings, and using standard office equipment such as computers, phones, photocopiers, and video teleconferencing equipment.
This is a largely sedentary role; however, the ability to move office items such as files, laptop/computer equipment, meeting materials, and other work supplies may require carrying and lifting items up to 15 pounds at times.
Business travel may be required.
HRS Consulting, Inc. provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment and prohibits discrimination and harassment of any type without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, disability status, genetics, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, or local laws. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation, and training.

We comply with Form I-9 identity and legal work authorization requirements and utilize E-Verify for Employment Eligibility Verification in accordance the Immigration Reform and Control Act of 1986 (IRCA).

Individuals with disabilities who need assistance with the application process can reach us by email at recruiting@ihthrs.com or telephone 954-217-6241.

www.hrsconsults.com",-1,"HRS Consulting, Inc.","Washington, DC",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
126,Junior Data Analytics Solutions Analyst,$37k-$69k (Glassdoor Est.),"Praescient Analytics, LLC (Praescient) is a Veteran-led, certified Woman-Owned Small Business (WOSB) founded in 2011 that specializes in implementing advanced analytics solutions across the defense, intelligence, and law enforcement communities. With over 40 contracts across 6 continents, over 70% of our employees are veterans and or have intel/law enforcement experience. We fully understand the unique challenges of our clients and work to identify, vet, implement, and enhance commercial and proprietary technologies to provide full scope solutions, because we have been there. Praescient has extensive experience designing, developing, and integrating solutions for customers including the US Army, Special Operations Command (SOCOM), US Navy (USN), US Marine Corps (USMC), US Coast Guard (USCG), Department of Justice (DOJ), Drug Enforcement Administration (DEA), and Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI), Immigration and Customs Enforcement (ICE), intelligence community, and local law enforcement agencies, among others.

This position is in support of the Department of Justice US Attorney's Office, Eastern District of New York (EDNY). The organization requires a modern big data solution to support broad and high profile investigative priorities. As a Praescient employee supporting this effort, you will be on the front lines implementing EDNY's premier investigative analysis platform. Praescient Analytics is in search of a Junior Data Analytics Solutions Analyst to provide support for projects related to investigations and litigation cases. This includes assisting the Data Analytics Solutions Analyst team as needed in support of analytics solutions for attorneys, investigators, and case teams.

Primary Responsibilities:

• Gather a wide variety of data types from primary and secondary sources through diverse channels using a combination of methods that will be researched and employed by the Data Analytics Management team.
• Assist with developing, maintaining, and enforcing streamlined and efficient processes for project lifecycles, from collection through transformation of data; and will support the team's goals for timelines, training, resources, and budgets in support of the finalization of client deliverables.
• Support the collection, documentation, vetting and onboarding of data, will provide input to the Data Analytics Engineer team on the database development and set up, and assist with validating the population of data into the appropriate analytical tools.
• Assist in the defining, developing, and communicating data analytics solutions to support the customer which includes:

• Corresponding with key stakeholder personnel via regular consultations with clients to elicit requirements and provide regular status updates, performing data analysis and modeling to understand and identify data relationships/trends/classifications/predictions
• Building experience in all available analysis and visualization software, proposing reporting solutions that best present the information to their supervisor.
• Providing regular status updates to the Data Analytics Solutions Analyst - Senior regarding assigned tasks.
• Ensuring successful completion of work, timeliness of deliverables, and quality control.

Required Qualifications:

• Bachelor's degree or equivalent
• Minimum of 1 year of experience using analytics tools, methods, and visualization software.
• Strong analytical, problem solving, and communication skills with a keen attention to detail.
• Experience in one or more of the following tools: Tableau Software; IBM I2/EIA; IBM Analyst Notebook; Database (SQL Server, Teradata, Oracle, PostgreSQL, MySQL); Programming and/or scripting (Python, R, Java); Natural Language Processing; Neo4j or other graph databases; Amazon Web Services (AWS) cloud environment; and Other analytic and visualization tools.
• General understanding of database, ETL, and analytics tools and concepts.

Desired Qualifications:

• The candidate should take the initiative to attack new challenges and learn new skills independently.
• Must be well organized and flexible.
• Interested in a diverse skillset in data analytics and has current skills in either data analysis, litigation support, statistical software, analytic programming languages (Python, R, Java, SAS), visualization software, or database management.

What you can expect from us:

• Real opportunity for career growth in an environment where your achievements will be celebrated
• Constant collaboration with numerous teams to ensure client success
• A team that respects and embraces your ideas and expertise
• Coworkers that are motivated by pursuing excellence, rather than the prospect of personal gain
• A workplace dedicated to supporting and bettering public safety and government agencies

Benefits:

• Very competitive salary based on qualifications and experience
• Comprehensive, Company paid United Health Care Medical for you and your family (We pay your premiums and deductibles)
• 401(k) & 4% matching
• Travel & performance incentives
• 3 weeks paid time off (plus Federal Holidays)
• $5K annual training allowance
• $500 book allowance
• Tuition reimbursement program

Praescient Analytics is committed to providing equal employment opportunities for all. Employees and applicants without regard to race, color, age, religion, sex, sexual orientation, marital status, gender identity, national origin, legally protected physical or mental disability, genetic information, citizenship status, or status in the uniformed services of the United States, status as a disabled veteran or veteran of the Vietnam era, or on any other basis which is protected under applicable law. This includes a commitment to provide a work environment that is free from all forms of illegal harassment including sexual harassment.

This covers all terms and conditions of employment including (but not limited to):

• Hiring, placement, promotion, transfer, or demotion of all job classifications;
• Recruiting, advertising or solicitation for employment;
• Treatment during employment;
• Rates of pay or other forms of compensation;
• Benefits;
• Selection for training;
• Company sponsored social and recreational activities; and
• Layoff or termination

Applicants selected will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information.
US Citizenship Required
Praescient Analytics is an Equal Opportunity Employer.
Interested Candidates: Please forward your resume to recruiting@praescientanalytics.com and please visit our website to apply online at www.praescientanalytics.applicantstack.com/x/opening.",3.2,"Praescient Analytics
3.2","Arlington, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
127,Data Analyst,$56k-$103k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description
AWS, Data solution, parallel architecture, business intelligence, data analytics, data modelling, reporting analytics, statistical analysis
Job Function
TECHNOLOGY
Role
Analyst
Job Id
166904
Desired Skills
Data Analyst",3.7,"Tata Consultancy Services (North America)
3.7","Long Island City, NY",-1,10000+ Employees,1968,Subsidiary or Business Segment,IT Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
128,Laboratory Analyst I (Data Review),-1,"URGENTLY HIRING!!! *
Job Description*
Overview: * ACS Laboratory is the largest Cannabis testing laboratory in the Southeastern USA and we want YOU to join our dynamic team! We are currently seeking a Laboratory Analyst I for Data Review (Full Time).
At ACS Laboratory, we provide a cutting-edge training program with excellent opportunities for growth!

We also offer a total benefits package that includes: 401k, PTO and Flex time off, medical, dental, vision and life insurance. If you are highly motivated, reliable and want to experience working in one of the top laboratories in the nation, please send resume and cover letter.

The Laboratory Analyst I, will play an integral role in the overall support of the laboratory. The Laboratory Analyst I may coordinate and perform tasks and activities in several areas of the laboratory. Each day the Laboratory Analyst I may be assigned specific areas of responsibility within the scope of the job as outlined herein. Depending upon the area of responsibility the Laboratory Analyst I will monitor and prioritize tasks involved, in addition to routine laboratory support duties.
YOU MUST HAVE LABORATORY WORKI**NG EXPERIENCE* (Chemistry degree or Florida licensed technician preferred).
Duties and responsibilities

Reviews and prepares accurate sample results

Assists with training of new employees

Performs and maintains documentation to comply with laboratory requirements

Reviews, maintains, and assists in updating internal SOP. Collects & records QC data or other similar data. Participates in QA processes, accordingly

Practices and actively participates in laboratory safety

Meets annual training requirements

Review instrument qualification documents in compliance with internal guidelines.

Perform data review for analytical test results generated by QC department for compliance with internal SOPs, and Specifications.

Review, support and escalate Out of Specifications (OOS) events. Ensures that investigations assigned to data or documentation are appropriately resolved prior to data verification and final sign.

Discusses data interpretation with individual analysts and elevate, if necessary, to determine data disposition.

Facilitates laboratory data or documentation corrections with analysts to ensure accuracy.

Support in maintaining and updating relevant SOPs for data review and reporting as needed.

Support Laboratory Inspection Readiness at site in coordination with Site QA.

Ensures data integrity through the use of data review controls and electronic data audit trails.

Review stability protocols and reports for commercial and R&D products in compliance with internal SOPs and Regulatory guidelines.

CMTL Analysts must be trained by the CMTL on the minimum requirements for sampling and the Standard Operating Procedures for sampling and security.

Qualifications:

Ability to read and comprehend methods and other instructional documents

Attention to detail and the ability to perform and document work in an accurate and repeatable fashion.

Hands on experience with HPLC and GC including computerized software required for the operation of the equipment or analysis of results, preferred.

Proficiency in computer skills (Microsoft Office: Outlook, Excel, Word etc.…)
Knowledge in sample preprocess, complex preparation, data review, reporting, and instrument maintenance.
Stress and time management skills
Excellent written and verbal communication
Adheres to safety and compliance policies and procedures
Must be available to train and work on weekends
Must be a minimum of 21 years of age
Must be able to pass a comprehensive background check and drug/alcohol test
CMTL Employees must not work for an MMTC, regardless of whether compensation is received; nor shall CMTL Employees receive any form of compensation or benefits of any kind from an MMTC while employed by a CMTL.
CMTL Analysts must have, at a minimum, a bachelor's degree in a natural science, to include, but not be limited to, biology, chemistry, physics, engineering, or environmental sciences; or hold a current license as a Clinical Laboratory Personnel, as defined in s. 483.803, F.S, from the Florida Board of Clinical Laboratory Personnel.
YOU MUST HAVE LABORATORY WORKING EXPERIENCE*
Must demonstrate the following attributes:
Honest and trustworthy
Respectful
Possess cultural awareness and sensitivity
Exceptional attendance & punctuality
Chemistry degree or Florida licensed technician preferred

Hours: Rotating schedules and weekends are required.

Available Shift(s): 6:00 am- 2:30 pm, 8:00 am- 4:30 pm, and 11:30 am- 8:00 pm (this position requires working a full shift every Saturday, taking off one day during the week).

Please note: this job description is not designed to cover or contain a comprehensive list of activities, duties, or responsibilities that are required of the employee for this job. Duties, responsibilities, and activities may change at any time with or without notice.

$15-$17/hr

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $15.00 - $17.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Night shift
Overtime
Weekends
Experience:
Laboratory: 2 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Sun City Center, FL 33573 (Required)
Shifts:
Evening (Required)
Mid-Day (Required)
Morning (Required)
Working Days:
Saturday (Required)
Work Location:
One location
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes
People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
acslabcannabis.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",4.0,"ACS Laboratory
4.0","Sun City Center, FL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
129,Senior Health Data Analyst I,$74k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Senior Health Data Analyst contributes to the overall success of the organization by developing analytic solutions that support activities related to health services utilization management, care coordination, quality improvement and population health. Through analyzing patient claims, member enrollment, and other data, the Senior Health Data Analyst participates in identifying progress, performance and opportunities for improvement on programs, quality of care, patient experience, and other metrics. The Senior Health Data Analyst requires a thorough understanding of healthcare data and workflows, combined with an extensive experience creating large data sets, conducting statistical data analysis (SAS), and using BI tools (Tableau).

Works closely with other members of the Health Analytics team, as well as the Financial Analytics and Data Warehouse teams to gather key data from various internal and external systems.
Creates data sets, extracts and synthesizes data; conducts and interprets quantitative analyses.
Prepares a variety of reports, including statistical analyses and dashboards that allow key stakeholders to make informed business decisions based on data.
Assists in design and development of data collection strategies, aggregation, analysis, and reporting to ensure data integrity and enhance information value.
Generates a quality work product, presentable for content and audience, in a timely manner while maintaining strong attention to detail.
Manages and prioritizes workload while meeting deliverables and expectations.
Works autonomously and collaboratively with report requestors, providing guidance to define report requirements and validate results.
Works collaboratively across departments to understand and meet analytic needs.
Researches and recommends areas for improvement of data quality and reporting.
Maintains in-depth knowledge of health plan operations, including claims processing, utilization management, quality improvement activities and pay for performance programs
Documents report processes/logic and actively engages in department’s documentation efforts to improve knowledge base of team.
SECONDARY DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Performs other assigned or needed activities required to assure success of the organization.
Participates in special projects as needed.
Performs other duties as assigned.

Education and Experience
Bachelor’s degree with concentration in health informatics, health administration, public health, computing, epidemiology, statistics or related field, Master’s degree preferred. Minimum four (4) years of experience in data analysis and reporting.
Special Skills, Licenses and Certifications
Knowledge of major health plan operations: healthcare claims processing, membership, provider, and benefits; or equivalent combination of education and experience. Excellent knowledge of data collection, analysis, statistics and data presentation with experience in data mining techniques and procedures. Experience using statistical packages for analyzing large data sets. Experience working with administrative data, ideally health care data. Understanding of health data formats including claims, lab and pharmacy. Knowledge of clinical coding systems (e.g., ICD9, ICD10, CPT). Proficiency in inferential and predictive statistical analysis. Proficiency in business software applications such as Microsoft Office Suite, SQL, SAS, and Tableau.
Performance Based Competencies
Must demonstrate strong verbal and written communication skills. Ability to clearly communicate complex information to diverse audiences. Ability to communicate data needs to various customers (internal and external) in order to compile and produce necessary reports. Excellent analytical, problem solving, investigative and research ability. Ability to work in a team environment, take and give direction, follow through with tasks and projects, compromise, negotiate and achieve consensus decisions, support consensus decisions, be flexible and adaptable to changes in assignments and the work environment, work independently, manage time efficiently and multi-task effectively. Ability to make decisions that require significant analysis and investigation with solutions requiring critical thinking. Ability to quickly acquire in-depth knowledge of various systems related to claims processing, membership, provider, and benefits at PHC. Ability to present complex information in an understandable and compelling manner. Ability to interpret and understand technical requirements. Must be highly organized and proficient at multi-tasking. Must be willing and able to provide gracious assistance to users, providers, and other constituents of PHC.
Work Environment And Physical Demands
More than 50% of work time is spent at a video display terminal. May be required to bend, stoop, kneel, crawl, or work in other non-standing and non-sitting positions to install cabling, systems hardware, and other related equipment.
All HealthPlan employees are expected to:
Provide the highest possible level of service to clients;
Promote teamwork and cooperative effort among employees;
Maintain safe practices; and
Abide by the HealthPlan’s policies and procedures, as they may from time to time be updated.
IMPORTANT DISCLAIMER NOTICE
The job duties, elements, responsibilities, skills, functions, experience, educational factors and the requirements and conditions listed in this job description are representative only and not exhaustive or definitive of the tasks that an employee may be required to perform. The employer reserves the right to revise this job description at any time and to require employees to perform other tasks as circumstances or conditions of its business, competitive considerations, or work environment change.",3.5,"Partnership HealthPlan of California
3.5","Fairfield, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1994,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
130,Data Analyst,-1,"Position Overview:

Deep Labs is seeking an experienced, enthusiastic Data Analyst to join our growing Deep Labs AI team that is designing and building solutions for some of our client's most challenging problems. The ideal candidate will have a strong background collecting and interpreting big data, mining for and reporting insights, and presenting to a variety of audiences as part of a fast-paced and growing, product-driven technology team. This role reports to the VP, Data Science & Engineering.

Responsibilities:
Collect and integrate large datasets from a variety of sources
Use data mining and descriptive analytics to explore & profile large datasets
Produce high-impact reports, visualizations and dashboards to tell a story with data
Present and explain analysis outputs across a variety of technical and non-technical audiences
Assess and improve the quality of new and existing large data sets
Identify and pursue opportunities to enrich data from multiple, diverse sources
Follow a methodical, analytical approach and have a natural curiosity to understand and get the best from data
Collaborate across teams: communicate effectively across a variety of technical and non-technical audiences
Experience:
Minimum of 3 years of experience in a dedicated Data Analyst role in one or more of the following industries: finance, payments, banking, risk, fraud, identity or behavioral analytics
Understand problems from both a business and data perspective
Proficient in developing code in one or more of the following: Python, Go, Scala, Java or R
Working knowledge with a variety of data storage and query engines: RDBMS, SQL, NoSQL, object stores, search engines and files
Knowledge and/or work experience of public cloud environments (e.g. Google GCP or Amazon AWS)
Previous experience working in a “Big-4” consulting environment or similar, a plus
Education: Degree-level qualification in computer science, mathematics, or related discipline

Specific Skills:
Knowledge and experience of good software engineering practices
Keen interest and desire to stay abreast of the latest developments in AI research and industry
Demonstrated ability to take initiative and interact within a global team environment
Strong analytical and quantitative skills; strong attention to detail
Why Deep Labs?

At Deep Labs there is tremendous potential to learn and grow, while also contributing to policies, decisions, and the direction of the company. We offer competitive compensation and benefits, and provide a highly open, honest, and fun work environment.

Our company is committed to equal employment opportunity. We will not discriminate against employees or applicants for employment on any legally-recognized basis [""protected class""] including, but not limited to: age, race, gender, pregnancy, religion or creed, color, national origin, sexual orientation, disability, genetic characteristics, military or veteran status, uniform service member status or any other protected class under federal, state or local law.

We are interested in every qualified candidate who is eligible to work in the United States. However, we are not able to sponsor visas.",3.8,"Deep Labs
3.8","New York, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
131,Data Analyst,$50k-$92k (Glassdoor Est.),"Academic Partnerships is growing! We're hiring a Data Analyst who will be responsible for regularly analyzing our university partners’ performance and providing insights and root cause analysis to the business and helping them to continuously identify areas of improvement. You will utilize your superior visualization and analytical abilities to help our stakeholders to better forecast demand, track performance, and assess the impact of operational changes on the business. You will work closely with our stakeholders to understand their business questions, translate those questions into an analytical strategy, and execute that strategy in order to provide the needed insights to move the business forward.

This role is based in downtown Dallas but will be remote till business operations resume.

Responsibilities Include:
Own the enrollment forecasting process and build/maintain a model to better predict new weekly enrollments.
Develop Tableau dashboards and SSRS/Excel reports to help our stakeholders track the trends of key performance indicators.
Field ad hoc data analytic requests and provide the Business with data and insights to answer their immediate business questions.
Assist in developing predictive models by pulling, cleaning and combining all source modeling data for the Data Science team.
Work closely with the Information Technology team on all MDM and Data Governance improvement initiatives where analytic support is needed.
Work closely with the Performance Analyst team and functional stakeholders to regularly identify areas for improvement and potential opportunities from observed data trends.
Test the impact of operational and marketing changes and perform ROI analyses to quantify the value of these improvements.
At the direction of the Business Analytics leadership, work collaboratively with other stakeholders to provide the business with analysis on insights into areas of opportunity across the organization.
Qualifications Include:
Bachelor’s Degree required with a preferred major in a quantitative field such as; Data Analytics, Computer Science, Finance/Economics, Natural Sciences, Engineering, Mathematics, or similar
At least 2 years of corporate experience monitoring, managing, manipulating and drawing insights from data.
Expert using SQL to collect, clean and join data from disparate traditional and cloud-based databases, and performing descriptive/diagnostic analytics on resulting datasets to create insights for business stakeholders.
Expert creating world class visualizations using Tableau and/or Power BI to help business stakeholders easily identify performance trends and diagnose areas for improvement.
Experience in building, maintaining and continuously improving operational or demand forecasting models preferred.
Highly proficient with Excel formulas and macros, Word, and PowerPoint.
Solid understanding of relational database structure and data management principles.
Experience developing and supporting static reports in SSRS or Business Objects
Experience with A/B testing and building predictive models in Python or R preferred
Experience with Google Analytics and Big Query preferred.
Solid understanding of sales funnels and experience analyzing CRM data (ie: MS Dynamics, Salesforce, Adobe Campaign, etc) preferred
Strong problem solving, quantitative and analytical abilities.
Strong ability to plan and manage numerous processes and projects simultaneously.
Proven effective communication, collaboration and presentation skills.
Ability to effectively communicate difficult messages while being able to maintain strong relationships. Seen as a trusted advisor to functional leaders across the business.
**Must have U.S. work visa. No H1-B visa sponsorship available or will be considered***
Academic Partnerships is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse and inclusive workforce.",4.2,"Academic Partnerships
4.2","Dallas, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Colleges & Universities,Education,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
132,Data Analyst,-1,"Overview:

Nuvance Health is a family of award-winning nonprofit hospitals and healthcare professionals in the Hudson Valley and western Connecticut. Nuvance Health combines highly skilled physicians, state-of-the-art facilities and technology, and compassionate caregivers dedicated to providing quality care across a variety of clinical areas, including Cardiovascular, Neurosciences, Oncology, Orthopedics, and Primary Care.

Nuvance Health has a network of convenient hospital and outpatient locations — Danbury Hospital, New Milford Hospital, Norwalk Hospital and Sharon Hospital in Connecticut, and Northern Dutchess Hospital, Putnam Hospital Center and Vassar Brothers Medical Center in New York — plus multiple primary and specialty care physician practices locations, including The Heart Center, a leading provider of cardiology care, and two urgent care offices. Non-acute care is offered through various affiliates, including the Thompson House for rehabilitation and skilled nursing services, and the Home Care organizations. For more information about Nuvance Health, visit www.nuvancehealth.org.

Responsibilities:

Title: Data Analyst

Reports To: Director of Clinical Quality & Performance Improvement

Department: CPCI

FLSA Status: Exempt

Purpose: The Data Analyst is responsible for providing analytical support to the Clinical Quality and Practice Transformation department at Health Quest Medical Practice (HQMP). The Analyst will provide support for activities related to quality measurement, population health management, value-based payment programs, pay-for-performance, predictive modeling, and managed care contracting requirements.

Essential Responsibilities:

Responsible for creating reports to quantify and analyze quality performance improvement and value-based payment initiatives, including Patient-Centered Medical Home and Comprehensive Primary Care Plus (CPC+) initiatives.
Performs monthly and quarterly analysis of quality measure performance, and actual versus expected revenue results for value-based payer contracts.
Develops reports and analyzes data in support of population health management initiatives, such as, improved clinical outcome measures, reduced utilization measures, and increased preventive health measures.
Maintains attribution and metrics databases to support payer contracting, pay-for-performance initiatives, and develops models for reporting purposes.
Maintains and integrates system-wide data for use in the development of quality measurement and decision support.
Develops reports using data pulled from multiple databases including hospital, emergency department, outpatient, laboratory and testing facilities, in support of performance improvement and population health initiatives.
Automates retrieval of data to meet on-going reporting needs by collaborating with IT Department or external vendors.
Prepares and presents data analyses to senior executives, physicians, clinical staff and other stakeholders.
Maintain and Model REACH Values (Respect, Excellence, Accountability, Compassion, Honor).
Demonstrates regular, reliable and predictable attendance.
Performs other duties as assigned.

Qualifications:

Education and Experience Requirements:

Bachelor’s Degree in Business Administration.
Minimum of five (5) years job-related experience.
STRONGLY PREFER: Three to five (3-5) years’ experience using electronic medical records systems such as, eClinical Works and/or Cerner.
PREFER: Three to five (3-5) years of health care and/or health insurance experience.

Minimum Knowledge, Skills and Abilities Requirements:

Expertise in data mining.
Ability to present complex information in an understandable way.
Effective English communication skills, both written and oral.
Strong analytical skills.
Proficient in database tools and applications including, Microsoft Office, Access, Excel, IBM/Phytel, Cognos, or other statistical packages.

License, Registration, or Certification Requirements:

N/A",-1,"Health Quest Systems, Inc.","Lagrangeville, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
133,Data Analyst,-1,"Data Analyst *
RPh Innovations provides pharmacy support services to various healthcare provider organizations. Ingesting, integrating, and reporting medical and pharmacy data is at the core of what we do. We are looking for a data management professional to join our team and take our services to the next level.
Overview*
This position requires experience in designing, developing and executing data pipelines in a cloud environment. We are looking for someone with
The required technical skills to perform the duties outlined below
Communication skills to gather requirement and convey proposed solutions
Passion to work with a group of dedicated individuals committed to improving prescription drug affordability and access.
Responsibilities*
Integrate and transform data from different sources for reporting or analytical purposes
Support the design, development and automation of data pipelines to support routine BI reports and analytical workstreams
Train end users to appropriately use different data sets. Collaborate with stakeholders such as business leaders and project managers to gather data requirements and deliver projects on time
Support ad-hoc data requests from business or senior management
Partner with Market Data and Infrastructure Cloud teams to optimize data pipelines and ensure data quality
Analyze and visualize data and present business insights to business partners
Qualifications*
BA/BS in Computer Science, Math, Physics, Engineering, Statistics or other technical fields.
3+ years of experience working in Business Intelligence or Data analytics within the investment and asset management industry
Very strong in SQL
Experience in Microsoft's Azure Cloud technologies
Experience in data visualization tools such as Power BI
Proficient in Python and familiarity / experience in the following python Libraries (Pandas, Numpy, Matplotlib and and/or SkLearn)
Strong communication capabilities
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience developing data pipelines in Azure and familiar with cloud technologies (Data Factory, Data Bricks and Machine Learning Service etc.)
SalesForce/SQL server integration
Experience in partnering with business owners to understand requirements, develop project timelines and deliver data sets or analysis on time
Education: Bachelor's (Required)

Location: Downers Grove, IL 60515

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $1.00 - $2.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
SQL: 2 years (Preferred)
Company's website:
www.rphinnovations.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",5.0,"RPh Innovations, LLC
5.0","Downers Grove, IL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
134,Data Analyst,-1,"Archimedes Global is currently recruiting a Data Analyst to join our team in Quantico, VA. This position is anticipated to start within the next 60 days so we are actively recruiting and building our team at this time.

The selected individual will:

Conduct full lifecycle analysis to include requirements, activities and design
Develop analysis and reporting capabilities
Monitor performance documentation, and metrics to identify improvements
Interpret data and analyze results using statistical techniques
Develop and implement data analyses, data collection systems, and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality
Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintaining databases
Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques, and provide ongoing reports
Develop and implement databases, data collection systems, data analytics, and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality
Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintain databases / data systems. Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets
Filter and “clean” data by reviewing computer reports, printouts, and performance indicators to locate and correct code problems
Work with management to prioritize business and information needs
Locate and define new process improvement opportunities

Required Qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree in Business, Economics, Computer Science, Information Management, Statistics, or in another field with demonstrable coursework in these areas.
Working experience as a data analyst or business data analyst
Strong knowledge of and experience with reporting packages (e.g. Business Objects), databases (e.g. SQL), programming (e.g. XML, JavaScript, or ETL frameworks)
Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical packages for analyzing datasets (e.g. Excel, SPSS, SAS)
Active Top Secret security clearance required

Archimedes Global, Inc. is a diversified technology company providing information and engineering solutions to government and businesses worldwide. Archimedes delivers superior results by combining deep domain expertise with technology-enabled innovations. We are proud to offer highly competitive compensation packages and outstanding benefits. If you feel you have what it takes, turn your interest into action & apply now!",3.8,"Archimedes Global
3.8","Quantico, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Contract,Consulting,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
135,Data Analyst,$36k-$66k (Glassdoor Est.),"Valid USA is a secure, make-it-happen partner. We are a global company with a market capitalization of more than $1 billion and 6,000 associates worldwide. Our job is to ensure every solution is seamless and secure - whether it’s for big data, payment cards, government issued identification, mobile financial services or highly targeted direct marketing campaign management. Our website is www.valid.com.

Valid is hiring a Data Analyst at our Downers Grove location. This individual will maintain and update data conversion scripts and layouts, and create new scripts for clients. The Data Conversion Analyst will deliver products according to a pre-defined schedule in a self-managed environment. Interfaces with IT, Manufacturing Engineering, Product Engineering, Service and Support and Sales

What will you do?
Use basic programming and logic skills to create, update, and maintain data layouts and conversion scripts for various clients (Python and FoxPro are the main programming languages used).
Receive data files from clients and then convert the data into scripts we can use with our production machinery.
Perform accurate and timely completion of reports and tasks related to data conversion.
Demonstrate knowledge about data’s role in the card personalization process. Understand how we get the data, how it is converted, and how it is used after conversion.
Meet the requirements and deadlines established for a given project.
Follow internal processes and procedures.
Investigate and resolve reported defects.
Work closely with other team members to coordinate assignments and communicate status.
Actively participate in departmental and project design meetings. Effectively communicate project status with direct supervisor and functional project owner. Meet the desired due date for all assigned projects
Work to understand clients' needs and analyze user requirements.
Perform related responsibilities and duties as required.
What are we looking for?
Associate's degree in Information Technology or related field and a minimum of 3 years experience in a similar position.
Demonstrated programming experience in Python and/or FoxPro.
Experience in the plastic card manufacturing and packaging industry is a big plus.
A team player with strong problem solving and organizational skills.
Excellent verbal, written and interpersonal communication skills; the ability to effectively communicate with all levels of employees and a service orientation.
Intermediate to advanced skills in Microsoft Word and Excel.
What we offer:
Benefits are effective on the 1st of the month following 30 days of employment and include a choice of 4 medical plan options under the Blue Cross Blue Shield, Dental, Vision, Disability and Life Insurance, 401(K), 2 weeks of vacation and 6 additional days of paid time off and paid holidays",3.6,"Valid USA
3.6","Downers Grove, IL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1957,Company - Public,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
136,Data Analyst,$62k-$113k (Glassdoor Est.),"Xbox is one of the world’s most valuable brands and enjoys millions of players and passionate fans. An important part of our plan is to grow our global player base and our multi-billion dollar a year Xbox console and accessories business.

At Xbox, we believe Gamer Happiness is at the core to our mission of empowering every person and organization on the planet to achieve more. The Gaming Data Services (GDS) team provides strategic, data, operational, reporting and analytics services in pursuit of this mission and strategy. Come join us to support the gaming reporting and analytics needs as a Data Analyst.

This role is critical to the success of delivering regularly scheduled reports, tools, and analysis to multiple disciplines across gaming including marketing, engineering, finance and business development teams managing content, subscriptions and services available through Xbox. This role will partner closely with team peers on the development, validation, deployment and on-going operations of new reports and toolsets that provide vital key performance indicators on measuring the impact of our gaming programs and initiatives. This role will be hands-on, working with big data environments, querying internal data sources to analyze behavior data and provide insights on customer engagement, preferences, and monetization.

Responsibilities
Create & maintain operational processes of existing and new reports
Partner with onshore & offshore resources assisting with report development and operational processes
Troubleshoot & unblock processing issues as they occur during routine report refreshes
Maintain and enhance game title metadata classifications
Interface with business users and engineering teams to bridge the gap in terms of data needs and business term/logic understanding
Leverage industry best practices in establishing repeatable BI practices, principles & processes
Qualifications
A passion for gaming and curiosity for the overall gaming and PC industry
A desire to learn and understand how data flows, starting from our gamers interacting with our products and services to seeing that data land in our systems and converting this data into actionable insights
Unique balance of technical, development, project and program management skills
Competency in database (relational and columnar) and development programming frameworks - e.g. experience with technologies such as SQL (Server/SSIS/SSAS), C#, Cosmos, Azure Data Lake, Kusto Redshift, Hadoop or similar
Hands-on experience with Microsoft BI toolsets, in particular building PowerBIs visualizations and supporting data models
Proficiency in advanced Excel functions (e.g., creating formulas, pivot tables)
Self-starter with the ability to handle ambiguity and bring clarity and vision to such situations
Strong ability to articulate vision, requirements & benefits, providing a solid rationale to multiple business and technical partners
Strong communication skills, excellent collaboration and negotiation skills and the ability to work effectively across teams and organizations in a global work environment
Ability to thrive in a fast-paced, dynamic business environment among a diversity of disciplines
Ability to lead by example through personally delivering high-impact work results
Ability to influence diverse audiences
Bachelor’s degree in technology, business, or similar field preferred

#gamingjobs

Microsoft is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, ancestry, color, family or medical care leave, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, medical condition, national origin, physical or mental disability, political affiliation, protected veteran status, race, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by applicable laws, regulations and ordinances. We also consider qualified applicants regardless of criminal histories, consistent with legal requirements. If you need assistance and/or a reasonable accommodation due to a disability during the application or the recruiting process, please send a request via the Accommodation request form.

Benefits/perks listed below may vary depending on the nature of your employment with Microsoft and the country where you work.",4.3,"Microsoft
4.3","Redmond, WA",-1,10000+ Employees,1975,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
137,Data Analyst,-1,"At Caserta, we work with leading organizations to deliver innovative data & analytics solutions. A project-based approach to solving our clients’ toughest data challenges with the fastest time-to-value is a hallmark of our firm. Our consultants are force multipliers that strengthen our clients’ teams with deep domain expertise in data architecture, data engineering, and data science.

Our team is looking for creative, entrepreneurial, and highly-motivated people to carry out our mission of designing, architecting, and implementing the most innovative, forward-looking data-driven solutions available to our clients.

The Role:


As a Data Analyst at Caserta, you will work on a team to deliver innovative solutions on Amazon Web Services, Azure, and Google Cloud using core cloud data warehouse tools like Spark, Event Stream platforms, and other Big Data related technologies. In addition to building the next generation of data platforms, you will be working with some of the most forward-thinking organizations in data and analytics

Responsibilities:
Interview stakeholders and document business requirements
Document technical specifications
Provide support to Data Engineers and Data Architects on source to target mappings
Provide technical expertise on BI, Reporting and Dashboard capabilities
Develop Cloud enabled Data and Analytics solutions
Work on cloud based and hybrid data warehouses & business intelligence platforms
Gain hands-on experience with new data platforms and programming languages
Requirements
2-5+ years of experience working in Data Analysis, Data Science, Data Engineering or Data Warehousing
Importing and working with large datasets in GCP/BigQuery
Knowledge of data modeling and data structures
Maintaining tracking log of changes
Working directly with Accounting and Finance stakeholders
Hands-on experience with leading commercial Cloud platforms, including AWS, Azure, or Google
SQL & Python skills
Strong aptitude for learning new technologies and analytics techniques
Highly self-motivated and able to work independently as well as in a team environment
Understanding of agile project approaches and methodologies
Experience working with Business Stakeholders to elicit business requirements
Bachelor’s degree in Business Analytics, Computer Science or a closely related field required
Benefits
Profit Sharing
Health/Medical Benefits
Dental & Vision benefits
Highly competitive PTO/Holiday package
401-k
And more
See what people are saying on Glassdoor and Follow Us on LinkedIn for company updates and valuable data insights.",4.2,"Caserta
4.2","New York, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2001,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
138,Clinical Data Analyst,$56k-$99k (Glassdoor Est.),"Search by Keyword
More Options

Search by Location

Clear

Loading...

Department

All

State

All

×

Send me alerts every days
alert frequency in every certain days
Create Alert

form.emailsubscribe-form {
display: none;
}
×

Send me alerts every days
alert frequency in every certain days

Share this Job

AddThis
Email
Facebook
Twitter
LinkedIn
Pinterest

Apply now »



Clinical Data Analyst

Date:

Sep 26, 2020

Location:

Danvers, MA, US

#job-location.job-location-inline {
display: inline;
}

Abiomed is a pioneer and global leader in healthcare technology and innovation, with a mission of Recovering Hearts & Saving Lives. With corporate headquarters in Danvers, Massachusetts, offices in Aachen & Berlin, Germany and Tokyo, Japan, Abiomed’s 1,500 employees form one of the fastest growing medical device companies in the world. We attract and retain exceptional talent with our collaborative culture, passion for our work, and a strong commitment to employee professional development.

Patients First | Innovation | Winning Culture | Heart Recovery

The Sr. Clinical Data Analyst is responsible for assisting Clinical Data Managers and ensuring that data management services (clinical data and data structure) are delivered in a complete, consistent, accurate and high quality manner for assigned Abiomed Clinical Study(ies). The Sr. Clinical Data Analyst works closely with Senior Clinical Data Manager and Clinical Program Manager(s), and Clinical Research Associates, to execute the trial. She/he may need to engage and work closely with CROs and Vendors that execute the data management and Core Lab services.

Primary Duties and Responsibilities:
Works independently to provide data review listings as requested by clinical and medical teams
Reviews data and manages queries based on programmed edit checks and Data Management Plan
Reviews data listings to clean data and issue queries if needed
Performs external vendor (i.e. Core Labs) data processing and external vendor data reconciliation
Performs EDC User Acceptance Testing (UAT)
Contributes to preparation and maintenance of data management documents
Works with clinical programming team/vendor to achieve eCRF development
Supports and provides cross-functional collaboration and communications to increase quality of data management deliverables
Provides data review metrics, query metrics and other metrics as requested
Reviews, analyzes, validates and maintains clinical trial data ensuring consistency, integrity and accuracy
Works collaboratively with Programming (Clinical and Statistical), Clinical Operations, Biostatistics and others to meet project deliverables and timelines
Utilizes reports to track study progress and ensure timeliness and quality expectations are met
Develops, tracks, analyze and reports, as applicable, on data management performance metrics
Participates in the review of Clinical research documents (e.g. Protocols, Safety Monitoring Plans, Data Management Plans, Communication Plans).
Ensures the clinical data within EDC is in quality to lock/unlock and freeze/unfreeze as appropriate for statistical review, interim review, and/or final database lock
Identifies potential project risks and drafts mitigation strategies with the internal project team to proactively address issues
Maintains a consistent, manageable workflow for DM project team by monitoring enrollment information and communicating with project team to actively influence data collection
Capable of handling studies that are complex in scope and volume
Job Qualifications:
BS degree in Life Sciences, Computer Sciences, Mathematics or related medical/scientific field; MS or graduate degree preferred
Minimum of four years’ data management experience in pharmaceutical or biotechnology; prior medical device experience highly desirable
Experience with Electronic Data Capture (EDC) process and platforms such as RaveX, Veeva EDC; experience with Data Review in JReview or other review tools
CRO/vendor management experience required
Expertise with GCP and regulatory compliance guidelines for clinical trials required
Must be computer savvy and highly proficient in Microsoft Office
Competence in SAS programming a plus
High attention to details and accuracy; able to work independently and to prioritize and organize work to meet deadlines
Excellent interpersonal communication skills; Works effectively on cross-functional teams
~5% travel to Vendors
Abiomed is an Equal Opportunity Employer committed to a diverse workforce. Abiomed will not discriminate against any worker or job applicant on the basis of race, color, religion, gender, gender identity, national origin, ancestry, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital or civil partnership status, pregnancy, gender reassignment, non-job related mental or physical disability, genetic information, veteran status, military service, application for military service, or membership in any other category protected under law.

Nearest Major Market: Boston

Apply now »

Find similar jobs:
Clinical Research

Apply now »



Clinical Data Analyst

Date:

Sep 26, 2020

Location:

Danvers, MA, US

#job-location.job-location-inline {
display: inline;
}

Abiomed is a pioneer and global leader in healthcare technology and innovation, with a mission of Recovering Hearts & Saving Lives. With corporate headquarters in Danvers, Massachusetts, offices in Aachen & Berlin, Germany and Tokyo, Japan, Abiomed’s 1,500 employees form one of the fastest growing medical device companies in the world. We attract and retain exceptional talent with our collaborative culture, passion for our work, and a strong commitment to employee professional development.

Patients First | Innovation | Winning Culture | Heart Recovery

The Sr. Clinical Data Analyst is responsible for assisting Clinical Data Managers and ensuring that data management services (clinical data and data structure) are delivered in a complete, consistent, accurate and high quality manner for assigned Abiomed Clinical Study(ies). The Sr. Clinical Data Analyst works closely with Senior Clinical Data Manager and Clinical Program Manager(s), and Clinical Research Associates, to execute the trial. She/he may need to engage and work closely with CROs and Vendors that execute the data management and Core Lab services.

Primary Duties and Responsibilities:
Works independently to provide data review listings as requested by clinical and medical teams
Reviews data and manages queries based on programmed edit checks and Data Management Plan
Reviews data listings to clean data and issue queries if needed
Performs external vendor (i.e. Core Labs) data processing and external vendor data reconciliation
Performs EDC User Acceptance Testing (UAT)
Contributes to preparation and maintenance of data management documents
Works with clinical programming team/vendor to achieve eCRF development
Supports and provides cross-functional collaboration and communications to increase quality of data management deliverables
Provides data review metrics, query metrics and other metrics as requested
Reviews, analyzes, validates and maintains clinical trial data ensuring consistency, integrity and accuracy
Works collaboratively with Programming (Clinical and Statistical), Clinical Operations, Biostatistics and others to meet project deliverables and timelines
Utilizes reports to track study progress and ensure timeliness and quality expectations are met
Develops, tracks, analyze and reports, as applicable, on data management performance metrics
Participates in the review of Clinical research documents (e.g. Protocols, Safety Monitoring Plans, Data Management Plans, Communication Plans).
Ensures the clinical data within EDC is in quality to lock/unlock and freeze/unfreeze as appropriate for statistical review, interim review, and/or final database lock
Identifies potential project risks and drafts mitigation strategies with the internal project team to proactively address issues
Maintains a consistent, manageable workflow for DM project team by monitoring enrollment information and communicating with project team to actively influence data collection
Capable of handling studies that are complex in scope and volume
Job Qualifications:
BS degree in Life Sciences, Computer Sciences, Mathematics or related medical/scientific field; MS or graduate degree preferred
Minimum of four years’ data management experience in pharmaceutical or biotechnology; prior medical device experience highly desirable
Experience with Electronic Data Capture (EDC) process and platforms such as RaveX, Veeva EDC; experience with Data Review in JReview or other review tools
CRO/vendor management experience required
Expertise with GCP and regulatory compliance guidelines for clinical trials required
Must be computer savvy and highly proficient in Microsoft Office
Competence in SAS programming a plus
High attention to details and accuracy; able to work independently and to prioritize and organize work to meet deadlines
Excellent interpersonal communication skills; Works effectively on cross-functional teams
~5% travel to Vendors
Abiomed is an Equal Opportunity Employer committed to a diverse workforce. Abiomed will not discriminate against any worker or job applicant on the basis of race, color, religion, gender, gender identity, national origin, ancestry, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital or civil partnership status, pregnancy, gender reassignment, non-job related mental or physical disability, genetic information, veteran status, military service, application for military service, or membership in any other category protected under law.

Nearest Major Market: Boston

Apply now »",3.7,"ABIOMED
3.7","Danvers, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1981,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
139,Sr. Data Science Analyst- Customer Analytics,$48k-$83k (Glassdoor Est.),"Sr. Data Science Analyst is reporting to the Director of Customer Analytics and is responsible for broad range of analytics used in establishing customer strategies and providing valuable customer-centric data insights for cross-functional audience including Merchandising, Marketing and Supply Chain.
In this role candidate will build out and automate reports & dashboards, extract data from multiple sources to build models/algorithms used to fine-tune customer strategies, and build more advanced AI/machine learning tools and processes.
The person in this role must possess strong data analytical skills and technical skills used in data engineering (mining from multiple sources/systems), predictive scenario modeling and machine learning knowledge.
In this role candidate will build out and automate reports & dashboards, extract data from multiple sources to build models/algorithms used to fine-tune customer strategies, and build more advanced AI/machine learning tools and processes.
The person in this role must possess strong data analytical skills and technical skills used in data engineering (mining from multiple sources/systems), predictive scenario modeling and machine learning knowledge.

Essential Functions:
Analytics & Data engineering:
• Automating reports, dashboards, and other performance tools
• Data engineering/mining (collecting, transforming, cleansing and analyzing)
• Providing valuable business analytics and insights out of data samples thru hypothesis testing
• Utilizing different databases and connections and 3rd party data sets to enhance analytics scope
• Building data visualizations in Tableau, R-Shiny or other
• Providing ad-hoc analysis and presenting results in a clear manner

AI/Machine Learning & Programing:
• Building AI/machine learning tools to optimize analytics and processes within the company
• Applying statistical methods and building machine learning algorithms (such as k-NN, Naive Bayes, SVM, Decision Forests)
• Using query languages such as SQL
• Utilizing data science toolkits such as R and Python (excellence in at least one of these)
• Maintaining expert-level knowledge on data science trends, technologies, and methodologies
• Scoring of key attributes used in deep statistical analysis and modeling
• Leading in defining the project methodologies and approach

Other skills:
• Data affinity with attention to detail
• Solution and problem-solving oriented
• Strong Communication Skills (ability to communicate complex data in a simple way)
• Strong Presentation Skills and Technical Writing Skills
• Ability to work within a diverse background team or independently

• Able to quickly interpret the data and transition it into tangible business recommendationd

Education / Experience Requirements:
Position Contribution Level :
Intermediate Level

Minimum Education & Experience:
• Bachelor's degree in data science, statistics, computer science, business or related field, required
• Proven success in using data-driven analysis to assess opportunities and drive results

Preferred Education & Experience:
• Master’s degree in data science, statistics, computer science or related field preferred
• Prior Retail Experience with min 3 years in Customer Analytics or Marketing preferred
• PhD in data science, statistics, computer science or related field welcome

Knowledge / Skills Requirements:
• Strong analytical and data wrangling skills allowing to move quickly through large volumes of data
• Aggressive in pursuing opportunities and focused on providing technical and analytical business solutions to drive store level results
• Creative thinker focused of problem solving, finding efficiencies and streamlining processes
• Strong communicator with ability to work in group environment
• Flexible and adaptable, team-player able to work in a dynamic group environment
• Passionate for coaching and development of talent
• Ability to manage time and workload effectively with flexibility to shift focus/priorities at a moment's notice
• An ability to influence cross-functionally across a wide range of business areas and levels
• Excellent written and verbal communication skills

Accessibility Guidelines:
Belkcareers.com is committed to making the on-line application experience easy and accessible to individuals with disabilities. We are constantly making improvements to comply with the spirit of the ""Americans with Disabilities Act,"" and the Web Content Accessibility Guidelines. If any of the information on the belkcareers.com website is not accessible to you due to a disability, please contact us via email at HRSharedServices@Belk.com. Please provide the location of the inaccessible information and the format you wish to have the information presented and we will be happy to send it to you, either via your email address or a separate mailing address you provide. If you prefer, you may contact one of our friendly Shared Services representatives at 1-800-588-3700 and we will be happy to assist you with the application process.

We are an Equal Opportunity Employer:
We treat all our associates and candidates as equals. We require all associates and managers to do so too and comply with employment laws and regulations. All personnel actions are conducted in the spirit of equal employment. We are committed to recruit, train, promote and retain associates without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identification and expression, national origin, marital status, age, disability, genetic information, military status, sexual orientation or any other characteristic protected by applicable local, state or federal laws.

#LI-SE1
#IND3",3.1,"Belk
3.1","Charlotte, NC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1888,Company - Private,"Department, Clothing, & Shoe Stores",Retail,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
140,Data Analyst,$37k-$65k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Summary:

The BHCHP Institute is a multidisciplinary, collaborative center of excellence in homeless health care that supports the mission of BHCHP to provide or assure access to the highest quality health care for individuals and families experiencing homelessness through research, quality, value-based care, writing & ethics, policy & advocacy, and educational initiatives.

You are responsible for working within the Institutes multi-disciplinary team and collaborating with a variety of internal and external colleagues to develop reports and dashboards, respond to ad hoc requests, analyze utilization and cost data, and assist in furthering our health equity work by applying an equity lens to clinical data from our patient population. You will gain the opportunity to learn about equity, research, quality, and policy directly within a homeless health care setting and develop professional skills in data analytics, data visualizations, homeless health care, harm reduction strategies, verbal and written communication, project management, and related areas.

Responsibilities:
Work, with supervision and guidance, to develop reports and extract data from multiple data sources, including health care insurance claims data, electronic medical records (EMRs), reports on hospital utilization, quality reports, Bostons Homeless Management Information System (HMIS), and other datasets as needed.
Actively engage in discussions with various internal and external stakeholders to understand their needs on specific projects.
Work closely with the internal equity team, Equity and Social Justice Committee, Consumer Advisory Board, and external consultants on the health equity initiative, including implementation of the framework developed to apply the data and guide interventions that promote health equity.
Assist with quantitative and qualitative data collection activities, including chart reviews, surveys, key informant interviews, and focus group discussions.
Code, collect, clean, and manage quantitative data and perform statistical analysis, using standard statistical packages, such as Excel, SAS and Stata.
Support qualitative data collection by helping to develop data collection protocols, taking interview notes, and helping to summarize interview data.
Prepare reports for BHCHP leadership that highlight findings on clinical care and equity.
Assist in the preparation of monthly, quarterly, semi-annual, and annual reports for various programs and projects, including the Accountable Care Organization (ACO) of which BHCHP is a part.
Apply project management techniques by implementing project timelines and coordinating the appropriate staff to meet scheduled milestones for a task.
Provide administrative support to the Institute, including helping to schedule and coordinate meetings with internal staff and external partners.
Participate in meetings with internal and external partners by telephone or in-person and take meeting notes and prepare summaries.
Contribute to the development of Institute papers and presentations by drafting sections and preparing tables and charts.
Support program-wide research initiatives as needed.
Assist the Managing Director in the formulation of the strategic growth plan for the BHCHP Institute.
Assist the Director of Quality in fielding, reviewing, and tracking quality improvement project requests.
Develop and maintain relationships with BHCHP IT and Development departments, clinical staff, the Consumer Advisory Board, and others in the program.
Coordinate and schedule meetings with outside researchers, policymakers, and other interested stakeholders in improving patient health and program services.
Support BHCHP staff in preparation of research studies, conference presentations, data collection, or quality improvement initiatives.
Qualifications:
Bachelors degree or equivalent experience required in Public Health, Epidemiology, Psychology, Social Work (preferably macro) or related field.
1+ years of experience with data collection, database development, report writing and data analysis is required.
Demonstrated knowledge of the use of SAS, SPSS, or other statistical analysis programs, along with electronic medical records (EMR), are highly preferred. Knowledge of SQL and Crystal Reports a plus.
Must have good working knowledge of Microsoft Office Suite (Word, Excel, PowerPoint).
Excellent quantitative research, qualitative research, writing, and analytical thinking skills required.
Sound judgment and discretion is necessary.
Ability to work well in a fast-paced environment, multitask, and collaborate on teams are highly essential.
Ability to ensure that information is complete and accurate, and demonstrated ability to follow through with others to keep projects on track.
Strong theoretical and methodological grounding in public health, epidemiology, macro social work or a related area, including research and evaluation.
Excellent interpersonal, verbal and written communication skills are essential for working with clinical and non-clinical staff.
Must be highly motivated, self-directed, and possess strong organizational and problem-solving skills.
Must have the ability to work independently in a small department as well as to work collaboratively in a mission-oriented organization that uses a team approach.
Understanding of homeless and multicultural issues, addictions, mental health, harm reduction, and the complex health problems of homeless patients, as well as demonstrated interest in working with an underserved population, is preferred.
Does this amazing opportunity interest you? Then we'd love to hear from you.

An Equal Opportunity Employer.

Powered by JazzHR",4.4,"Boston Health Care for the Homeless Program
4.4","Boston, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1984,Nonprofit Organization,Social Assistance,Non-Profit,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
141,Data Analyst,-1,"DEPARTMENT: Advancement CLASSIFICATION: Regular, Full Time, Non-Exempt REPORTS TO: Vice President, Advancement LOCATION: Burbank, CA COMPENSATION: Commensurate with Experience BENEFITS: Medical Insurance, Dental Insurance, Vision Insurance, Life Insurance, Retirement Plan and Professional Development Opportunities Work With Purpose! Public Media Group of Southern California (PMGSC) is looking for a talented professional to join our organization. If you enjoy performing data analytics, working with database systems, and producing reports, then send your cover letter and resume to hr@pmgsocal.org today! About Public Media Group of Southern California (PMGSC) Public Media Group of Southern California (KCET, PBS SoCal and LINK TV) tell stories that matter through original programs that reflect the diversity of the region, and the full schedule of trusted PBS programs. Our content channels – KCET and PBS SoCal – are available for free on internet – connected screens and seven local broadcast channels. LINK TV can be accessed through national satellite channels. A donor- supported community institution, PMGSC sparks the sharing of ideas at in-person cultural events and community conversations and delivers social impact through services that prepare our most vulnerable children for school. Job Overview Reporting directly to the Vice President of Advancement, the Data Analyst will support Major Gift Officers, and Institutional Giving, Major & Planned Giving, and Special Events efforts by entering transactions, producing and presenting reports, researching prospects, and collaborating with other departments, including Membership and Finance, to reconcile transactions. Primary Duties/Responsibilities: Data Entry Enter daily advancement financial transactions/batches in database and verify data quality Manage and maintain constituent data Act as liaison between the Finance, Membership, and Advancement departments to solve problems Reporting Design, run and write queries to retrieve financial data from database Generate monthly major donor, board member, institutional and planned giving, and ad-hoc reports, and present results monthly to the Advancement team. Create weekly Leadership Circle and Foundation revenue recognition reports Make bi-monthly Revenue to Goal reports at Advancement Department meetings Work with Chair of the Advancement Committee to create reports as requested. Prospect & Donor Research Identify, interpret, and present donor giving trends and future projections Using iWave and Relationship Science, research donor giving capacity and participate in strategy conversations Special Projects As requested QUALIFICATIONS 2+ years of CRM system experience or equivalent experience and an understanding of database concepts and application. Familiarity with Blackbaud products: RENXT, Luminate Online, Financial Edge Demonstrate problem-solving capabilities with a high degree of integrity, ethics, and dedication to the mission of Public Media Group of Southern California Fundraising experience preferred Attention to detail Equal Opportunity Employer PMGSC provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment and prohibits discrimination and harassment of any type without regards to race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, disability status, genetics, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, or local laws. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training. To apply, please submit your cover letter and resume to hr@pmgsocal.org",-1,PBS SoCal,"Burbank, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
142,Data Analyst,-1,"An experienced Data Analyst (""Analyst"") who is familiar with systems applications and products (""SAP"")

Scope of Services
A. Working with a project manager assigned by the client, provide leadership with SAP data solution planning and design;
B. Build a relationship with business users to understand SAP analytical needs;
C. Deliver views through SAP platform and Microsoft Power business intelligence (""BI""); and
D. Work as a liaison between business users and SAP implementation team.",4.7,"Elegant Enterprise- Wide Solutions Inc
4.7","Springfield, IL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Food Production,Agriculture & Forestry,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
143,Data Analyst with sql,-1,"*Job Summary*
*Role-Data Analyst with Sql*
*Location-Richmond, VA & Vienna,VA*
*Contract Duration-Long Term*
*Visa-Any*

JD- Our Client is looking for a candidate with 1+years of relevant experience with SQL experience

* High level of AWS experience
* Python knowledge or experience.

Job Type: Contract

Pay: $22.00 per hour",-1,First Notch Technology,"Richmond, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
144,Data Analyst,$44k-$85k (Glassdoor Est.),"U.S. healthcare today is confusing, inefficient, and expensive. Maestro Health is on a mission to change that. Our team of Maestronites (yep, that's what we call ourselves) is revolutionizing not only the way we view health and benefits but also the way we live with our benefits using a tech-meets-service approach.

We're owned by AXA and we're growing fast. Really fast. So, we're looking for hard-working, talented, passionate, and like-minded people who want to join us on our mission. Sound like a team you'd love to join? Good news for you: we're hiring.

WHAT YOU'LL BE DOING:

The Data Analyst is a key member of the Intensive Outpatient Care Program (IOCP) team. The IOCP is a care management program for very complex patients, relying on accurate, credible, and timely data to identify patients to enroll in the program, manage patient care while enrolled in the program, and share program results with patients, providers, and senior leaders and stakeholders.

The data analyst will provide expertise and leadership in the analysis of health data for the IOCP team. Responsibilities will include the collection, aggregation, validation, and analysis of complex data from varying sources, and developing analytical reporting solutions and methods for displaying data for multiple audiences.

WHAT SUCCESS LOOKS LIKE:

Data Analysis (70%)

Act as the data expert, leading the way in data analysis, both proactively and by request, to identify key insights and trends.
Acts as a single point of contact for IOCP team's direct requests for data support and analytics.
Participate in complex data related analytical projects to drive program decisions and efficiencies.
Perform data abstraction, cleansing, validation, modeling, interpretation, and reporting.
Gather and prepares data for analysis based on information from various internal and external sources (databases, SAS, Excel, and text files); summarize and present data for easy decision making; conduct descriptive and inferential statistical analyzes.
Perform analysis of utilization and outcome trends, support identification of root cause, and develop recommendations and solutions to drive improvement.
Work closely with other members of the Maestro Health Data team, as well as the Technology team to pull key data from various internal and external systems.
Maintain in-depth knowledge of IOCP program operations, including care management team functions, provider engagement, key performance metrics, and required reporting.

Report and System Development (30%)

Responsible for the creation of reporting tools and processes that allow key stakeholders to clearly understand the data, enabling informed business decisions based on the data.
Design and develop reports and dashboards, making recommendations on data comparisons to be used for benchmark purposes.
Document current reporting requirements and recommend future reporting requirements.
Analyze and recommend new ways to distribute reports via internet/intranet technologies.
Work with IOCP team to ensure reports are being developed that result in measurable outcomes, and/or assist in performing variance analysis, data manipulation, and reporting of both clinical and financial information to both internal and external parties as needed.
Work with the Technology department for changes to support the reports/dashboards to be created.
Deliver ad hoc reporting and analytics as needed.

WHAT SUCCESS LOOKS LIKE:

Communicate clearly and directly, relate well to others, engage people, and help them understand change, provide and seek feedback, articulate clearly, actively listen.
Open-minded, willing to acquire new skills and knowledge, flexible, self-motivated, and curious.
Creative problem-solver, critical thinker, independent worker, data-driven mentality.
Create analytic solutions by exploring innovative data and techniques
Demonstrate accountability and integrity
Juggle multiple priorities and projects meeting all deadlines
Provide reporting deliverables with exceptional quality and data accuracy
Learn quickly and apply what you learn to what you do

WHAT YOU NEED:

Bachelor's degree in related field or equivalent experience
5+ years of experience in data analysis preferably healthcare
Requires strong experience in querying and structuring relational databases using SQL, with 5 or more years of experience developing operational reporting and performing complex data analysis
3+ year of experience in the business intelligence platform such as Qlik or like platforms
Experience with Oracle programming a big plus
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills
Expert Microsoft Office skills (Excel, Access, and PowerPoint)
Ability to integrate and analyze multiple sources of data
Ability to effectively interact with business partners and external clients
Excellent prioritization, multi-tasking, and organizational skills
Commitment to quality, motivated self-starter and takes ownership of work
Ability to work independently and self-directed
Effective problem-solving ability

WHY WORK AT MAESTRO HEALTH?

Personal, Vacation and Sick Time
Medical and Prescription
Dental
Vision
Life and Disability
Health and Wellness programs
401k with Employee Match
Figo – Pet Insurance
Kashable

We have great perks in each of our offices, along with a fun, energetic, and fast-paced environment, and what will really drive you is our vision. Maestro Health is making employee health & benefits people-friendly again by making healthcare easy to understand, tools easy to use, and costs easy to control. We are aiming to become a household name within the employee health & benefits space.

We can't do that without great people. We want to hear “WOW! That was the best job and business experience I ever had!” from every Maestronite – past, present, and future. You should be personally challenged, laugh, work your tail off, and look forward to coming to work.

Are you ready to become a Maestronite? Let's do this.

Maestro Health is an equal opportunity workplace. We are committed to equal opportunity regardless of race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, or veteran status.",3.7,"Maestro Health
3.7","Charlotte, NC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
145,Data Analyst,$44k-$66k (Glassdoor Est.),"Does optimizing marketing efficiency and effectiveness get you all hot and bothered?

Do well written formulas make you all tingly inside? We are hiring a digital analyst who sees the stories and humans inside the numbers. Someone who can transform data into actionable insights to drive our clients’ websites, applications and digital/social marketing.

The Mandatories
Love of big ideas.
Assist in the design and planning of campaign/site success measurements.
Work collaboratively with the Digital Strategy, Account Management, Media, and Social departments to develop hypothesis, establish KPIs and ask pointed questions.
Collect and aggregate consumer, business, campaign and media data from a number of different sources.
Monitor and analyze performance to provide insights and recommendations for optimizations and improvements.
Help drive the creation of dashboards and periodic reports for clients as well agency-wide reporting processes and templates.
Demonstrated passion for telling stories with quantitative data.
2+ years of relevant work experience, agency side is a plus.
Extensive knowledge of performance metrics, especially within digital and emerging media.
Skilled using data tools to design and build reports.
Experience in setup & implementation of GA / GTM.
Extra Credit:
Experience in setup, implementation and maintenance of a Data Management Platform.
Media experience and working knowledge of media tools, such as, Adwords, Doubleclick, Facebook, etc.
Experience with the design and implementation of GA goal and conversion tracking.
Extra Extra Credit:
Ability to study the past, and predict the future, to act in the present.
The Perks
A competitive salary.
Solid Health Bennies.
401k and Profit Share Programs.
A stocked Kegerator with rotating brews.
The office - built into John Wanamaker’s old penthouse apartment, smack in the middle of the city. Like none you’ve ever seen.
Vacation policy: We all take them and love the refreshing feeling they offer and so our policy is unlimited vacay.
A work environment that enthusiastically encourages creativity, risk-taking and growth.
BE UNFORGETTABLE.
That's our mission. Simple to say. Nearly impossible to pull off. But when you set the bar that high, every single jump has meaning.",3.5,"Red Tettemer
3.5","Philadelphia, PA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
146,Data Analyst,-1,"FLORIDA ASSOCIATION OF HEALTHY START COALITIONS, INC.

HEALTHY START MOMCARE NETWORK, INC.

ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICE ORGANIZATION

EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER
POSITION DESCRIPTION*
Job Title: *DATA ANALYST
Department: *ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
Unit: INFORMATICS
Location: *Tallahassee, Florida
Salary Range: *$50,000 - $60,000
Status: *Exempt
Employment Type: *Full-time
Reports To: *DIRECTOR OF INFORMATICS
JOB SUMMARY*
The Data Analyst is responsible for compiling, interpreting, and analyzing data to ensure Healthy Start program compliance with contract requirements. The Data Analyst is responsible for identifying trends and addressing issues in order to optimize program efficiency. The Data Analyst is required to work independently using critical thinking and discretion to make recommendations and keep management informed on data system trends and issues and comply with organizational policies and procedures.
DUTIES & RESPONSIBILITIES*
Assists with the liaison of the data system contractor on operational and data quality issues.
Achieves and maintains working knowledge of contract requirements regarding business rules for data entry, claims payment, and compliance reporting.
Gather necessary data and claims information for payment of claims to Healthy Start Coalitions. Prepares the payment statements and all backup information required for payment.
Identify and recommend resolutions involving data submission and payment issues including, but not limited to, potential quality issues in the way data is collected stored, processed or used.
Develops appropriate algorithms and/or protocols regarding data input and the assignment of codes to ensure standardization of data entry and reporting.
Design, collect, analyze and report on data quality assurance. Develop a statewide report card on critical metrics
Manage agent roles in the Medicaid Fiscal Agent Claims System.
Assist in the preparation of necessary data driven reports for contractual compliance.
Assist in continuous quality improvement activities regarding the approved data used for invoicing for Medicaid services and Medicaid claims reports, including researching and analyzing Medicaid claims reports to determine statewide trends and potential missing or incomplete data.
Reconciles the statewide approved data base used for payment with the Medicaid claim reports.
Monitors statewide monthly payments, including submitted claims by fee type to provide trend analysis for the year as compared to previous years to determine trends in volume and claims payments.
Performs other duties as assigned by the Informatics Director.
Works with significant degree of autonomy and discretion.
RELATED FUNCTIONS*
Experience extracting and manipulating data from multiple sources.
Experience developing reports and/or dashboards and presenting the findings.
Advanced knowledge and experience with Microsoft Excel (vlookups, pivot tables, etc.) and Word.
Completes other projects assigned.
SKILLS AND ABILITIES: *
Strong problem-solving skills.
Strong SQL skills, ability to perform effective querying involving multiple tables and subqueries.
Effective verbal and written communications skills.
Ability to effectively and independently organize assigned work activities and to complete tasks in a timely manner.
Ability to manage contacts with the public in a professional, tactful, courteous, and effective manner and to maintain effective working relationships with clients and other employees.
REQUIREMENTS*
MINIMUM EDUCATION:

Graduation from an accredited college or university with a bachelor’s degree, majoring in a relevant discipline (e.g. Mathematics, Economics, Statistics, Computer Science or related field) and 2-3 years of overall data analysis experience with at least 1 year analyzing health claims data.
COMPETENCIES: *
Self-motivated
Forward thinking
Attention to detail
Excellent oral/written communication
Problem solver
Self-confidence
Personal credibility
Stress management
Flexibility
Fostering teamwork
Customer-oriented
Diagnostic information gathering
Conceptual thinking
Initiative Thoroughness
Interpersonal awareness
OTHER: *
Upon hiring, candidate will be finger-printed and a background screening will be conducted.
This position is in Tallahassee, Florida.
PHYSICAL DEMANDS AND WORK ENVIRONMENT*
The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. While performing the duties of this job, the employee is frequently required to sit, talk, hear, and use hands and fingers to operate and handle keyboards and controls. The employee is occasionally required to walk and reach with hands and arms. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision and the ability to adjust focus.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $50,000.00 - $60,000.00 per year

Work Location:
One location
Benefits:
Health insurance
Dental insurance
Retirement plan
Paid time off
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,"Healthy Start MomCare Network, Inc.","Tallahassee, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
147,Data Scientist / Product Analyst,-1,"ClassDojo's ultimate goal is to create an education system that gives every child on Earth an education they love. We are doing this by bringing together communities of teachers, children and families, and then helping them get learning experiences their children love. Last school year, we served over 40 million children—with a team of just 45. Data is core to how ClassDojo makes decisions. As our third Data Scientist / Product Analyst, you'll help build a global consumer education business reaching tens of millions of parents, teachers, and children by creating, monetizing and analyzing products,. You'll grow ClassDojo to our next major milestone: reach 100 million+ active families, and 100 million+ in revenue, while deepening our brand love. As a data science team, we work closely with partners across product, engineering, design, research and marketing to develop business insights and inform product and company strategy. We're looking for high-performing generalist data scientists, with experience in product and/or business analytics, to come work alongside us to take on some of the most interesting and impactful problems in education. You'll shape direction as part of a high context, cross-functional team, where we value learning quickly to build a modern education system for hundreds of millions of teachers, children and families. You'll pursue a variety of problems ranging from understanding our users, to ensuring we invest in the right growth strategies in each of the 180+ countries we operate in, to growing our community, to empowering teams to find their own answers. You'll work with colleagues across the business to uncover insights, design experiments and measure the impact, and ultimately help influence decision-making across the entire company. What you'll do: Partner with product managers, engineers, marketers, designers, and operators to define product strategy and direction Develop analytical frameworks to monitor business and product performance, including growth and engagement Identify opportunities for growth by designing and analyzing product experiments, working with cross-functional teams to translate insights into action Empower teammates with the skills and tools to make data-driven decisions. Relevant skills / experience 3+ years of industry experience in a data science or analytics role Ability to write structured and efficient SQL queries on large data sets Experience designing AB/multivariate tests and drawing actionable conclusions Ability to visualize and communicate insights to stakeholders Bonus: Experience with data pipelines: transforming raw production and external data into user-friendly tables. Americas timezones About ClassDojo ClassDojo's mission is to bring communities together, and help them create an education experience their children love. Founded in 2011 (ImagineK12 / Y Combinator) and based in San Francisco, California, ClassDojo started as a communication app: a simple way for teachers, families, and children to share the magic of the school day through photos, videos, and messages. It creates a close-knit classroom community, and exciting, inspiring and creative classrooms and homes for kids. We're one of the fastest growing education companies of all time, used and loved by tens of millions of teachers, families and children in 90% of K-8 schools in the US, and 180 other countries. You can read more about our vision to change education from the ground up here: https://medium.com/@samchaudhary/https-medium-com-samchaudhary-how-to-change-education-from-the-ground-up-f82b8f3e4b95. The Team We believe focused, talented, non-hierarchical teams can achieve a surprising amount: https://blog.ycombinator.com/its-surprising-how-much-small-teams-can-get-done-sam-chaudhary-of-classdojo/. Our team is made up of engineers, designers, and educators from around the world, with deep backgrounds in education, as well as from leading consumer internet organizations like Instagram, Netflix, Dropbox, Uber, Y Combinator and more. We're building a company that will transform education, and one that is the kind of place we've all always wanted to work. We believe you'll do the best work of your life here. Diversity ClassDojo's vision is to give every child on Earth an education they love. We strongly feel the best way to do this is to work with people from diverse backgrounds that truly reflect the world. We are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital status, disability, gender identity or Veteran status. In accordance with the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records. We are happy to accommodate any disabilities or special needs. We hire both locally in San Francisco, and distributed teammates around the world. If you're excited about having an impact in education at massive scale, we'd love to hear from you.",4.3,"ClassDojo
4.3",California,-1,1 to 50 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
148,Data Analyst,$42k-$75k (Glassdoor Est.),"Top Requirements: *
1) Power BI -- > building dashboards and reports*
2) SQL Server -- > SQL queries and stored procedures*
3) Analysis -- > gathering and documenting technical requirements*
4) Financial/Investments background*
Summary:

The main function of a Data Analyst is to coordinate changes to computer databases, test, and implement the database applying knowledge of database management systems.

Job Responsibilities:

· Work with senior management, technical and client teams to determine data requirements, business data implementation approaches, best practices for advanced data manipulation, storage and analysis strategies

· Write and code logical and physical database descriptions and specify identifiers of database to management system or direct others in coding descriptions

· Design, implement, automate and maintain large scale enterprise data ETL processes

· Modify existing databases and database management systems and/or direct programmers and analysts to make changes

· Test programs or databases, correct errors and make necessary modifications

Qualifications:

· Bachelor's degree in a technical field such as computer science, computer engineering, or related field required

· 8-10 years applicable experience required

· Experience with database technologies

· Knowledge of the ETL process

· Knowledge of at least one scripting language

· Strong written and oral communication skills

· Strong troubleshooting and problem-solving skills

· Demonstrated history of success

· Desire to be working with data and help, businesses make better data-driven decisions

Project: This person will be responsible for supporting the Front Office Database. It’s a collection of multiple systems/databases. This resource will be working with upstream data providers and will be performing lots of data reconciliation to make sure the data looks good for various business partners. This resource needs to understand data flows and processes and working with multiple business partners.

Job Type: Contract

Pay: Up to $58.00 per year

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Experience:
SQL Server -- > SQL queries and stored procedures: 8 years (Required)
Power BI -- > building dashboards and reports: 8 years (Required)
Analysis, gathering and documenting technical requirements: 8 years (Required)
Financial/Investments background: 8 years (Required)
Contract Renewal:
Possible
Work Location:
One location
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.5,"Vision
3.5","Baltimore, MD",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
149,Data Analyst,$28k-$49k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Analyst

General Description
Work with performance measurements, incentives plans, statistics, and business intelligence tools with the objective of transforming data into meaningful information that will support business decisions and goals, as well as Division’s strategies.
Essential Duties and Responsabilities
Performance Measurements and Incentives – Manage data to support incentive programs focused on encouraging greater effort from the staff through positive reinforcement and rewards. Transform data to successfully execute incentive programs. The position is responsible for deliver the updated information on time accordingly with established expectations.
Lead and collaborate with the teams and management for obtain data needed to make informed business decisions in order to sustain or improve strategies and business goals. Uses the data warehouse to mine for important facts and statistics that help understand the business and employee performance. Develop processes and design reports to boost the business intelligence of the Division.
Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintain databases/data systems.
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets.
Filter and “clean” data by reviewing computer reports, and performance indicators to locate and correct areas of opportunity.
Work with management to prioritize business and information needs.
Design, develop and implement reports and dashboards using databases and business intelligence tools to measure and monitor processes, productivity and financial information for the Division. 30
Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing reports.
Minimum Education
Bachelor's Degree in Stadistics, Business Administration, Engineer or related field, with special interest on information technology.
Experience
At least three years of related experience.
Other Qualifications
Must be fully bilingual
Excellent communication skills verbal and written in English and Spanish.
Excellent leadership skills.
Ability to work with cross-functional teams.
Ability to work under pressure and meet established deadlines
Process improvements mindset
Technical expertise regarding data models, database design development, and data mining.
Proficient in the use of MS Office: Excel (macros), Power BI, Word, PowerPoint, and Outlook.
Ability to reason analytically and logically to develop adequate solutions or action plans.
Fast learner, good initiative and self-taught person.
Capable of dealing with innovation, rapid change and working under pressure.
Problem-solving skills, inquiry and critical thinking is crucial. Develop creative ways to solve a problem.
Active Learning -- Understanding the implications of new information for both current and future problem-solving and decision-making.
Fast learner, good initiative and self-taught person.

Job Segment:
Data Analyst, Data",3.4,"Popular Bank
3.4","San Juan, PR",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1991,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
150,Data Analyst,$41k-$72k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Type: Officer of Administration
Regular/Temporary: Regular
Hours Per Week: 35
Position Summary

The Department of Pediatrics is seeking a Data Analyst to fill a Full Time position in the Division of Cardiology. Columbia University Medical Centers Department of Pediatrics is a world leader in providing care for children. Our mission areas include Healthcare, Education and Research. We offer care for our patients in over 25 specialty areas as well as individualized care for complex cases. Our Residency, Fellowship and Graduate programs are among the best in the Nation. Our Clinical, Translational and Basic Science research features collaborations across specialties and stretches from the bench to bedside. We also have several active Clinical trials available to our patients. The position is responsible for collaborating with Principal Investigator (PI) and other team members to link and analyze large registry and claims data. For this Full Time position, we seek a person with strong data analytic and communication skills to join our team in the assessment of national claims data, clinical registry data, and electronic health records (EHR), to evaluate drivers of outcomes, value, and health inequities for children with congenital heart disease.

Responsibilities
Working directly with the PI and team to design and implement new projects and to make sure analyses are useful, accurate, and clearly communicated.
Merging, cleaning, documenting, and managing administrative and clinical registry-based datasets.
Analyzing data quality and integrity; identifying and solving data quality problems;
Coding and creating new variables; preparing analysis files; producing statistical summaries, charts and tables; and communicating results.
Participate in developing research designs, analytic plans, and communicating results
Develop programs, methodologies, and files for analyzing and presenting data
Import and clean raw datasets and evaluate data quality
Perform statistical analyses according to the study design (e.g., hierarchical modeling, survival analyses, weighted analyses, difference-in-difference, simulation, etc.)
Accurately and appropriately interpret and communicate results
Detect and address issues in data and analytic results
Clearly communicate processes used and results achieved, and suggest new and alternative approaches
Assist in writing and editing manuscripts for publication
Cultivate deep familiarity with methodological approaches and data
Participate in designing applied research and conducting related analyses
Any other related duties as assigned.
Minimum Qualifications
Bachelors degree or equivalent in education and experience required, plus 2 years of related experience.
Preferred Qualifications
Masters degree in statistics, economic, statistics, public health, data science, or a related quantitative area preferred.
We are looking for a person with experience and graduate training related to health care delivery, public health, and/or the financing of the United States health system.
The ideal candidate will have had some experience working with health administrating/insurance claims data and/or electronic health records.
Prior experience with the Department of Health or other training with large data will be viewed favorably.
While the position requires technical skills, we are particularly looking for a person passionate about making the health system work more efficiently and effectively for children and in growing as a member of our team.
Desire to learn and to join a team aimed at improving quality and value of care for children with complex chronic conditions is a must
Other Requirements
Strong verbal and written communication and interpersonal skills and a desire to grow as a member of the team
Attention to detail
Ability to manage complex research and analyses
Strong analytic, organizational, and time management skills
Proficiency in STATA, SAS, R, or other statistical programs
Must be able to effectively communicate with all levels of the organization.
Equal Opportunity Employer / Disability / Veteran

Columbia University is committed to the hiring of qualified local residents.",3.6,"Columbia University Medical Center
3.6","New York, NY",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,-1,Hospital,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
151,Jr. Data Analyst,$33k-$61k (Glassdoor Est.),"eNGINE builds Technical Teams. We are a Solutions and Placement firm shaped by decades of interaction with Technical professionals. Our inspiration is continuous learning and engagement with the markets we serve, the talent we represent, and the teams we build. Our Consulting Workforce is encouraged to enjoy career fulfillment in the form of challenging projects, schedule flexibility, and paid training/certifications. Successful outcomes start and finish with eNGINE.

eNGINE is hiring multiple Data Analysts to work with our client, a start-up located east of town. This person should have at least 6+ months of experience working with SQL and MySQL, along with data development. Experience in the healthcare industry is preferred, but not required. Must be able to provide samples of SQL queries in an interview. Candidates must be local to the greater Pittsburgh area, and be able to go onsite as needed.

Local candidates will be given preference for this position.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $36,000.00 - $60,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
SQL: 1 year (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
No",3.1,"eNGINE
3.1","Monroeville, PA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
152,Data Analyst,$65k-$129k (Glassdoor Est.),"We are hiring Data Analyst for our client in Redwood City, CA.

Job Title: Data Analyst

Duration: 12 Months
Job Location: Redwood City, CA

* Candidates must have 9+ years of experience.

* Candidates preferable USC, GC & H1B.

Job Description:

The ideal candidate will have worked in depth in data analysis, including experience extracting and manipulating data using SQL and Python. The candidate will have the opportunity to redefine the CRM Analytics for Auto Industry which will include data from multiple sources like telematics, campaigns, web, Service OLTP. The candidate will have the full opportunity for showing their creativity by owning the analysis, design and QA of data exploration and ETL. This is a hands-on individual contributor role. The candidate will be part of the Data Engineering team and work very closely with various product and engineering team members including the Product owners, Architect, DBA, and Application developers. To be successful, the candidate will have to be self-driven and a very strong team player.

Principle Responsibilities:
5+ years experience in SQL and manipulating large data sets in a database
2+ years of expertise of data analysis using Python, Spark in AWS Cluster.
2+ year of expertise analyzing and developing ETL data map for Oracle DB as source and target.
5+ year of QA expertise in ensuring quality of data in Data Warehouse loaded from various data sources.
Preferred expertise in building key data pipelines using AWS analytical services like S3, EC2, EMR, Glue, Athena.
2+ year of experience in working with DBA team to fix query performance issues in Oracle Data Warehouse.
2+ year of experience in providing production support for any data quality issues in Data Warehouse.
Expert level knowledge of both OLTP and Dimensional schema.
Excited to learn new technologies and analytical methodologies relating to business intelligence and data analysis.
Bonus Skills:
Knowledge of AWS cloud configuration.
Knowledge of full and incremental ETL using Informatica Power Center.
Knowledge of multi-tenant data warehouse for SaaS.
Application Requirements:
Interested candidates should submit resume/CV in both plaintext and PDF format, including desired salary range.
BS in Engineering and 10+ years development experience.
Position is on-site in the Redwood City/Redwood Shores area of California.
Thanks & Regards,

Raghu Singh",5.0,"TechNet Inc.
5.0","San Jose, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
153,Junior Data Analyst,$32k-$60k (Glassdoor Est.),"We are looking to place a junior-level Data Analyst to provide on-site support at Joint Base San Antonio (JBSA) Lackland, TX.
RESPONSIBILITIES: *
Function as an integral part of the JBSA Civil Engineering team.
Assist installation-level and other users with navigating and populating newly deployed web-based NexGen data systems.
Facilitate meeting support and other activities related to Operations and Engineering support.
Provide training and guidance to NexGen users.
JOB REQUIREMENTS*:
Bachelor’s Degree in Engineering, Technology, Business, or a relevant area.
Minimum of two (2) years of experience in related, preferred with the Department of Defense (DoD) or Air Force (AF).
Experience in developing and delivering training.
Experience with navigating, populating, and supporting NexGen (TRIRIGA) and SharePoint.
Knowledge of and experience with working with government systems and supporting Air Force Operations and Engineering programs.
Experience with tracking and workflow management.
Strong computer skills. Proficiency in Microsoft Office, including Outlook, Word, Excel, and PowerPoint
Strong written and oral communication skills.
An adjudicated National Agency Check with Inquiries (NACI), Common Access Card (CAC) preferred, within the last two (2) years.
Why AGEISS Inc: *
AGEISS Inc. is a 32-year successful woman-owned Federal consulting firm offering a full range of comprehensive employee benefits.
About AGEISS Inc: *
AGEISS provides engineering, environmental, and advisory and assistance services to Federal agencies nationwide and overseas. Building on our 32 years of success, AGEISS continues to expand its professional services while earning exceptional levels of customer satisfaction. AGEISS’ headquarters is in Colorado and additional locations in more than 36 states. AGEISS is a woman-owned and operated business, and a successful graduate of the 8(a) program.

Please submit resume, references, and salary requirements to our *online application *and resume to *jobs @ageiss-inc.com.*
We are an Equal Opportunity Employer, Female/Minority/Veterans/Disabled/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity.*
Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
NexGen: 2 years (Required)
Air Force: 2 years (Required)
TRIRIGA: 2 years (Required)
Department of Defense: 2 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work Remotely:
No",4.6,"AGEISS Inc.
4.6","Lackland AFB, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1988,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
154,Data Analyst,$54k-$96k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description:Fleet Common Operating Environment (FCOE) Overview:

The Fleet Common Operating Environment (FCOE) is a collaborative effort between Lockheed Martin and NAVAIR focused on the establishment and operation of a fleet analytics center to support the CH-53 E and K aircraft fleets. The FCOE applies Sikorsky-developed technology, analytical processes and OEM expertise to Marine Corps. CH-53 aircraft data in order to identify opportunities to increase aircraft readiness, reduce operational cost and facilitate a strategic business shift to condition-based maintenance. Data generated from the aircrafts health usage and monitoring system (HUMS), aircraft operations, and aircraft maintenance is collected, conditioned and analyzed to proactively develop recommendations for such improvements.

Responsible for collecting, processing, and analyzing data to develop immersive stories that answer business questions. Using proven and sound statistical methods, the analyst draws insights from data, and translates those insights into action that drive business results. Data Analysts are extremely resourceful and able to find novel new data sources to enrich their analysis. They apply mathematical and statistical methods to business and risk management problems.Mine, process, and summarize data; Manage the quality assurance of data scraping, query databases for stakeholder requests, and triage data issues for timely resolutions; Analyze large datasets, draw valid inferences and prepare insights in narrative or visual forms, including dashboards; Set up and maintain data processes and new analytics capabilities; Produce and track key performance indicators; Ability to formulate functional and technical requirements from business problems; Program management of key tasks and resources to achieve cost and schedule
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelors degree from an accredited college in a related discipline, or equivalent experience/combined education, with 2 years+ of professional experience;

Spreadsheet tools, e.g., MS Excel
Communication and data visualization proficiency
Descriptive statistics and exploratory data analysis
Statistical programming and data processing skills
Knowledge of the data, tables, fields, and sources
Ability to define technical solutions against business opportunities
Languages: Python, SQL
BASIC QUALIFICATIONS:
job.Qualifications

Lockheed Martin is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.
Join us at Lockheed Martin, where your mission is ours. Our customers tackle the hardest missions. Those that demand extraordinary amounts of courage, resilience and precision. Theyre dangerous. Critical. Sometimes they even provide an opportunity to change the world and save lives. Those are the missions we care about.

As a leading technology innovation company, Lockheed Martins vast team works with partners around the world to bring proven performance to our customers toughest challenges. Lockheed Martin has employees based in many states throughout the U.S., and Internationally, with business locations in many nations and territories.
EXPERIENCE LEVEL:
Experienced Professional",3.9,"Lockheed Martin
3.9","Lexington Park, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,1995,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
155,Data Analyst,-1,"Performs data collection, analysis, validation and reporting.
Designs, tests, and documents processes, SQL queries, and stored procedures.
Extracts and analyzes data from various sources, including databases, manual files, and external websites.
Responds to data inquiries from various groups within an organization.
Creates and publishes regularly scheduled and ad hoc reports.
Documents reporting requirements and processes and validates data components as required.
Requires experience with relational databases and knowledge of query tools and/or statistical software.
Strong analytical and organizational skills also essential. 5- 10 years of experience.",4.2,"IntePros
4.2","Charlotte, NC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1997,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
156,Data Analyst,-1,"Data Analyst
Portland, OR

Join AZAD Technology Partners as a Data Analyst and be an impactful contributor and draft Extract, Transformation and Loading (ETL) procedures for implementing data integration and data migration tasks in support of Data Warehousing and other data integration enterprise level projects.

The ideal candidate must possess the following qualifications and experience:
Bachelor’s Degree in Information/Computer Technology or a closely-related field is preferred. With an applicable Bachelor’s Degree, 5 years of experience in Computer Technology or closely-related field is required. Without a degree, 9 years of experience in Computer Technology or a closely-related field is required.
Possess 5 years of experience in Data Integration Techniques.
Demonstrated experience using an ETL tool such as Informatica Suite (including Power Center and Power Exchange) or an equivalent tool.
Experience with Oracle 11g, 12g, 18c or 19c.
Experience writing DDL and creating database objects.
Experience partitioning database tables.
Experience creating Oracle procedures, functions and views.
AZAD Technology Partners is looking for bright, talented, flexible, and customer centric problem solvers who enjoy the challenges associated with solving the most complex problems by utilizing the most sophisticated technologies and strong people skills.

Founded and managed by technologists and engineers, AZAD is a leading provider of Technology Consulting and Engineering Solutions to Fortune 500 and innovative high-tech firms since 1992. AZAD works closely with its clients to solve their most complex technological challenges. Join AZAD's professional team and enhance your career by being engaged with some of the most innovative projects in the Pacific Northwest.

Our collaborative approach to support our clients, projects and our passion about technology is key to our success. If you enjoy working in such an environment, we encourage you to apply.

EXCELLENT EMPLOYEE BENEFITS including Co-paid Medical, Dental and Vision Insurance, Cafeteria Plan, Paid Sick Leave, 401K Plan, Credit Union Membership, and Referral Bonus.
U.S. Citizens only for Federal Clearance Requirement

AZAD Technology Partners is an equal opportunity employer that considers and employs qualified individuals based upon job related qualifications regardless of race, color, sex, religion, creed, physical or mental disability, veteran’s status, sexual orientation, national origin, age or any other status protected under applicable local, state or federal law. AZAD Technology Partners takes affirmative action to employ and advance in employment qualified employees and applicants who are disabled, disabled veterans, recently separated veterans, Armed Forces services medal veterans, and other protected veterans.",3.9,"AZAD Technology Partners
3.9","Portland, OR",-1,Unknown,1992,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
157,Sr. Data Mining Analyst,$50k-$85k (Glassdoor Est.),"Under the supervision of the Manager of Data Mining, the Sr. Data Mining Analyst is responsible for taking the needs of the business and delivering products that meet those needs. This position requires the ability to take the lead on projects or be a contributing member to a project team. This position will interact will all facets of the organization and must be able to communicate between all divisions of the organization.

About Us

The Rawlings Group provides payment integrity services and claims data analysis for health insurance carriers and their members. We work behind the scenes to make sure that members are receiving the full value of their coverage by ensuring that claims are appropriately paid. Providing payment integrity and recovery services to the industry creates a more equitable distribution of healthcare dollars so members can receive the care they need when they need it most.

We offer opportunities for growth and development, continuing education, internal mobility and promotions, and unrivaled income earning potential. We are looking for individuals that have the drive and commitment to make a difference in the industry. We invite you to apply to become a part of The Rawlings Group team.

Our Culture is focused on:

The guiding principle of doing the right thing
Caring for our employees and taking pride in the work they do
Providing recognition and financially rewarding employees for their success

Our Values are:

Integrity and Trust
Customer Service Excellence
Innovation
Diversity and Inclusion
Honoring our Veterans and their service
Responsibilities
Meet regularly with Data Mining Group leadership for new project assignments and updates on outstanding projects.
Work independently with low to moderate levels of supervision and deliver results within defined time requirements.
Capable of understanding stakeholder’s requirements and providing guidance to ensure project aligns with needs.
Responsible for the proper communication and reporting regarding all aspects of each project.
Expected to understand all the characteristics of a project from End to End, and capable of presenting results to all levels of the organization including Senior and Executive leadership.
Act as a mentor to other members on staff.
Understanding business needs and objectives
Developing strategies for effective data analysis and reporting
Selecting, configuring and implementing analytics solutions
Defining metrics and identifying relevant data sources
Extract reports from multiple sources
Perform other duties as assigned
Bachelor’s degree in mathematics, statistics, business, computer science or similar degree required. Master's degree preferred.
5 or more years of SQL, Python, or R Programming
Experience with data analysis and reporting, and knowledge of data visualization software packages
Experience building SSIS packages
Ability to leverage Machine Learning where applicable
Aptitude to learn a business that is unique to The Rawlings Group
Understanding of accounting concepts and reporting skills
Strong analytical mindset and communication skills
Proactive, inquisitive and creative in approach to work
Ability to write SQL code, extract data and generate queries/reports without guidance, integrating data when necessary between different data sources
Experience with building reports, analyzing results, and communicating findings
Understanding of data structure/integration and relational database structures
Ability to collaborate with partners and drive analytic projects end-to-end
Strong attention to detail and data accuracy
Proven team player with strong analytical and interpersonal skills
Exhibits creative thinking skills.
Database knowledge
Machine Learning and Data Mining Analysis
Statistical and Quantitative Analysis
SQL
Data Visualization
Creativity and problem solving
Critical thinking skills
Physical Requirements
Frequently remains in sitting position for long periods of time to perform duties
Frequently concentrates for long periods of time, paying close attention to detail
Frequently uses and views the computer using fingers, hands, and vision
Frequently works in a well-lit, tempered environment
Occasionally walks through office to communicate with other employees
Equal Employment Opportunity. It is our policy to recruit, hire, train, and promote people without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, disability, or veteran status, except where age, sex, or physical status is a bona fide occupational qualification.
The Rawlings Group is an employment at will employer.
#LI-JS23",3.0,"The Rawlings Group
3.0","Lagrange, KY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1977,Company - Private,Insurance Agencies & Brokerages,Insurance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
158,Data Analyst,$39k-$70k (Glassdoor Est.),"Are you ready to take the next step in your career? Do you want to do meaningful work that improves quality of life? At Tetra Tech, you will work with high-performing teams who are passionate about using their expertise to find solutions to complex problems in water, environment, infrastructure, resource management, energy, and international development.

Tetra Tech Inc. is currently seeking a Data Analyst for its Disaster Response Division. The successful candidate will have extraordinary attention to minute detail and be responsible for executing and overseeing daily administrative, data entry, and reconciliation assigned to them, and those performed by other staff under the supervision of the Program Manager.

Responsibilities:

• QA/QC reconciliation, and data entry of timesheets records, invoice records, and material use records for grant-funded programs
• Coordinate, review, analyze, and summarize financial data for grant-funded programs
• Audit and reconciliation of force account documentation.
• Assist in evaluating the fiscal administration of grant programs
• Perform QA/QC review of financial documentation.
• Reconcile federal and state grants, cost estimates, audits, and other initiatives that support disaster recovery efforts

Qualifications:

The ideal candidate will have 2+ years of experience in finance, accounting, data entry and/or business administration and must be able to or have:

• Bachelor’s degree in business, accounting, or in public administration required. Four years additional industry experience may be substituted in lieu of degree.
• Prior experience with post-disaster federal grant funding
• Finance, Accounting, Business Administrative background preferred
• Office suite proficiency (Excel, Outlook, SharePoint and Word experience required)
• Must have proficient verbal and written communications skills with the ability to receive and execute instructions
• Ability to multi-task and work under pressure to meet strict deadlines
• Work attentively with minimal supervision
• Work days in excess of 8 hours and/or weekend attendance may be required (Open to consider flexible schedule for the right candidate)
• Have extraordinary attention to minute detail
• Adaptable to work on many different deliverables and maintain composure and professionalism
• Proficient verbal and written communications skills with the ability to receive and execute instructions
• Exceptional client service and communication skills to maintain outstanding Client relationship
• Ability to multi-task and work under pressure to meet strict deadlines (this is duplicated)
• Must be available for short-term travel to support on-site client needs and extended deployment (e.g., 90+ days) to address client response and long-term recovery needs following emergencies and major disasters

About Tetra Tech:

Tetra Tech is a leading provider of high-end consulting and engineering services for projects worldwide. We combine the resources of a global, multibillion dollar company with local, client-focused delivery in more than 400 locations around the world. We are Leading with Science® to provide sustainable and resilient solutions for our clients.

At Tetra Tech, we provide a collaborative environment that supports individual performance, innovation, and creativity. We are proud to offer competitive compensation and benefits. Learn more by visiting http://www.tetratech.com/en/benefits.

For more information on our company, please visit our website at www.tetratech.com. To apply, please submit your resume and cover letter on the Careers portion of our website at www.tetratech.com/careers.

We thank all applicants for their interest; however only those selected for an interview will be contacted. Tetra Tech is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. We invite resumes from all interested parties including women, minorities, veterans and persons with disabilities.

Tetra Tech is a VEVRAA federal contractor and we request priority referral of veterans for available positions.

EOE AA M/F/Vet/Disability - No calls or agencies",3.7,"Tetra Tech
3.7","Maitland, FL",-1,10000+ Employees,1966,Company - Public,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
159,Data Analyst,$53k-$97k (Glassdoor Est.),"The New York City Department of Investigation (DOI) is one of the oldest law enforcement agencies in the country with a mission of combating municipal corruption. It serves the people of New York City by acting as an independent and nonpartisan watchdog for New York City government, City agencies, and City employees, vendors with City contracts, individuals and entities that receive City funds.

DOI seeks a Data Analyst who will support the criminal and policy-driven investigations of the Inspectors General. The Data Analyst will assist DOI investigators with building and enhancing complex investigations through large scale data collection and analysis.
The Data Analyst is expected to:
• Develop and enhance practices for identifying patterns and trends related to fraudulent financial activity.
• Ensure the collection, management, and analysis of quality data from external sources.
• Conduct quality assurance of data.
• Maintain, summarize, and report on outcomes of data searches.
• Work collaboratively with DOI investigators to generate investigative leads, create reports, and interpret data.
• Present findings in a cogent manner through detailed and accessible reports to key decision-makers.

If selected, the candidate will be fingerprinted and undergo a background investigation. In addition, for positions that have a law enforcement and/or investigative function, the candidate's consumer credit history will be reviewed during the background investigation, and as otherwise permitted by NYC Administrative Code § 8-107(24)(b)(2)(A).

Minimum Qual Requirements
A four-year high school diploma or its educational equivalent approved by a State's Department of Education or a recognized accrediting organization and four years of satisfactory full-time experience in an industrial or governmental agency in the field of investigation, auditing, law enforcement, security, inspections, or in a major operational area of the agency in which the appointment is to be made; or
A baccalaureate degree from an accredited college or university; or
Education and/or experience equivalent to ""1"" or ""2"" above.
Preferred Skills

• Experience working with data analytics.
• Bachelor's degree in Finance, Accounting, or Information Technology, Computer Science, or Information Systems.
• Advance knowledge in MS Excel: VBA, Data Models, and ability to create Pivot Tables and complex nested formulas.
• Strong written and verbal communication skills.
• Knowledge in SQL and experience with any RDBMS: MS SQL Server (T-SQL), Oracle (PL/SQL), MySQL (SQL/PSM), and PostgreSQL (PL/pgSQL).
• Knowledge in Python, R, C++ ,and/or Java.
• Knowledge in analytics software (i2 Analyst Notebook, Palantir, Cognos, etc.).
• Database related certifications from Oracle or Microsoft.
• Demonstrated interest in law enforcement, criminal justice, or social service.

To Apply

All current City Employees may apply by going to Employee Self Service (ESS) http://cityshare/ess then click on Recruiting Activities/Careers and Search for the specific Job ID# 435571.

All other applicants please go to www.nyc.gov/career/search and search for the specific Job ID# 435571.

Please do not email, mail or fax your resume to DOI directly. Submissions of resumes does not guarantee an interview. Due to the high volume of resumes DOI receives for positions, only selected candidates will be contacted.

Appointments are subject to Office of Management & Budget approval for budgeted headcount.

The City of New York is an equal opportunity employer and is strongly committed to a policy of non-discrimination. We are committed to recruiting a diverse and inclusive talent pool.

Residency Requirement

New York City residency is generally required within 90 days of appointment. However, City Employees in certain titles who have worked for the City for 2 continuous years may also be eligible to reside in Nassau, Suffolk, Putnam, Westchester, Rockland, or Orange County. To determine if the residency requirement applies to you, please discuss with the agency representative at the time of interview.",3.9,"New York City DEPARTMENT OF INVESTIGATION
3.9","New York, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Government,Federal Agencies,Government,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
160,Data Analyst,$42k-$80k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Details

Recruitment/Posting Title Data Analyst
Job Category Staff & Executive - Research (Laboratory/Non-Laboratory)
Department SPH-Biostatistics
Overview

New Jersey’s academic health center, Rutgers Biomedical and Health Sciences (RBHS) takes an integrated approach to educating students, providing clinical care, and conducting research, all with the goal of improving human health. Aligned with Rutgers University–New Brunswick and collaborating university wide, RBHS includes eight schools, a behavioral health network, and six centers and institutes that focus on cancer treatment and research, neuroscience, clinical and translational research, advanced biotechnology and medicine, environmental and occupational health, and health care policy and aging research.

Our faculty are teachers, clinicians, and scientists with unparalleled experience who advance medical innovation and provide patient care informed by the latest research findings. We offer an outstanding education in medicine, dentistry, pharmacy, public health, nursing, biomedical research, and the full spectrum of allied health careers.

Our clinical and academic facilities are located throughout the state including New Brunswick, Piscataway, Newark, Scotch Plains, Somerset, Blackwood, and other locations. Clinical partners include Robert Wood Johnson University Hospital in New Brunswick, University Hospital in Newark, and other affiliates.

Through this community of healers, scientists, and scholars, Rutgers is equipped as never before to transform lives.

Posting Summary

Rutgers University Biostatistics & Epidemiology Services (RUBIES) at the School of Public Health is seeking a motivated Data Analyst with strong quantitative skills to support research studies in terms of data management, data analysis, and general statistical consulting.

Among the key duties of this position are the following:

Consults with clients on study design for both experimental and observational studies.
Assists clients with statistical aspects of IRB applications.
Prepares datasets and provides supporting documentation for statistical analysis.
Develops appropriate statistical models to analyze research data, while managing and maintaining datasets.
Interacts with senior and junior investigators to analyze study data for technical reports, journal articles, and conference presentations. This may include writing and contributing to publications.
Contributes towards manuscripts for publication in scientific journals, including writing clear and concise statistical methodology sections and summarizing results in text, tables, and figures.
Assists the RUBIES manager in tracking requests and estimating hours required to complete analyses for clients.

Position Status Full Time
Hours Per Week
Daily Work Shift Day
FLSA Exempt
Grade 26S
Position Salary PS26S
Annual Minimum Salary 65994.000
Annual Mid Range Salary 79294.000
Annual Maximum Salary 94218.000
Standard Hours 37.50
Union Description HPAE, Local 5094
Payroll Designation PeopleSoft
Benefits

Information about the benefits provided to Rutgers employees can be found at: http://uhr.rutgers.edu/benefits/benefits-overview

Seniority Unit
Terms of Appointment Staff - 12 month
Position Pension Eligibility ABP
Minimum Education and Experience
Master’s Degree in Biostatistics, Statistics, Epidemiology or related field.
One (1) year of experience in academia, government, or industry in the area of design and analysis of projects.
Experience with basic MS Office software, data analysis software including SAS, SPSS, R, etc.

Required Knowledge, Skills, and Abilities
Strong quantitative skills. Excellent written and interpersonal communication is essential. Motivated self-starter.
Experience with REDCap, GIS spatial analysis, and large databases is a plus.
Ability to work independently and as a member of a team. Ability to multi-task in a fast-paced environment with completing demands from multiple investigators.
Outstanding human relations skills, and the ability to function in a team environment are required.

Preferred Qualifications
Knowledge of how to accomplish superior performance in a unionized environment is preferred.

Equipment Utilized
Physical Demands and Work Environment
Must be able to lift or exert force up to 25 pounds.

Special Conditions
May require some travel between campuses to meet with investigators and coordinate activities.
Posting Number 20ST0982
Posting Open Date
Special Instructions to Applicants
Regional Campus Rutgers Biomedical and Health Sciences (RBHS)
Home Location Campus Piscataway (RBHS)
Location Details
Supplemental Questions

Required fields are indicated with an asterisk (*).
Do you have a minimum of a Master’s Degree in Biostatistics, Statistics, Epidemiology or related field?
Yes
No
Do you have one (1) year of experience in academia, government, or industry in the area of design and analysis of projects?
Yes
No
Do you have experience with basic MS Office software, data analysis software including SAS, SPSS, R?
Yes
No
Applicant Documents
Required Documents
Resume/CV
Optional Documents
Cover Letter/Letter of Application",4.1,"Rutgers University
4.1","Piscataway, NJ",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1766,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
161,Data Analyst,-1,"*Data Analyst*
*12 month Contract to Hire*
*St. Louis, MO* (Remote due to COVID until further notice)

Our Fortune 13 Health Insurance/Pharmacy Benefit Management company is in need of a Data Analyst. This team is responsible for enabling the business analytics community by developing and maintaining of the Pharmacy business operation's data foundation; inclusive of pharmacy member claims data, prescription data, operations productivity data, member communications and speech data. Responsible for ETL's to support intra-day as well as near-real time

*MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS*
*Must Have*

* Experience handling large datasets
* In-depth skills with SQL, R and database query tools
* In-depth ability to analyze, interpret, and present data
* Tableau
* Comfortable balancing independent ownership and working with support teams
*Nice to have*

* Hadoop or experience working with big data platforms
* Python
* Project Management
* Manage priorities and delivery across many workstreams
* Bachelor's degree+ in Computer Science, Computer Information Systems, Engineering, Mathematics or Statistics
*RESPONSIBILITIES: *
You will work to develop and maintain the Pharmacy business operation's data foundation; inclusive of pharmacy member claims data, prescription data, operations productivity data, member communications and speech data. Responsible for ETL's to support intra-day as well as near-real time

*WHAT’S IN IT FOR YOU …?*
You will have the opportunity to join a technically strong data team that interacts closely with business and product units. You’ll have exposure to the entire product lifecycle, as well as extensive enterprise data sets with cutting edge data-science methodologies utilized.

*BENEFITS OF WORKING WITH BROOKSOURCE: *

* Previous experience working with this client and placing both permanent employees and contractors.
* Direct communication with the hiring manager, which allows us to have a clear understanding of the timeline and move candidates through the interview process faster.
* Dedication to keep an open line of communication and provide full transparency.
*HOW TO APPLY: *

* Email your resume to aschutzbach@brooksource.com or apply!

Job Type: Full-time",4.4,"Brooksource
4.4","Berkeley, MO",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2000,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
162,Data Analyst,$45k-$79k (Glassdoor Est.),"MedStar Georgetown University Hospital is a not-for-profit, acute-care teaching and research hospital with 609 beds located in Northwest Washington, D.C. Founded in the Jesuit principle of cura personalis—caring for the whole person—MedStar Georgetown is committed to offering a variety of innovative diagnostic and treatment options within a trusting and compassionate environment.

MedStar Georgetown’s centers of excellence include neurosciences, transplant, cancer and gastroenterology. Along with Magnet® nurses, internationally recognized physicians, advanced research and cutting-edge technologies, MedStar Georgetown’s healthcare professionals have a reputation for medical excellence and leadership.

General Summary of Position:

Performs information management duties for the department, including data collection, management, analysis and interpretation. The incumbent also performs routine administrative functions in support of the department. These functions are performed in accordance with all applicable laws and regulations and Georgetown University Hospital’s philosophy, policies, procedures and standards.

Qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree in health-related field. Master’s degree preferred.
At least three years of experience with data collection, management, analysis and interpretation, particularly in health-related field.
Experience with database development and maintenance.
Preference for Tableau Desktop experience.
Must be proficient with computer software, such as Microsoft Office; SQL; STATA, SPSS or SAS; Business Intelligence application, such as Tableau.
Must have knowledge of medical terminology and quality assurance systems.
Must have excellent interpersonal, verbal and written communication skills.",3.6,"Medstar Georgetown University Hospital
3.6","Washington, DC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2000,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
163,Junior Data Analyst,$46k-$74k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description
MDW is searching for a Junior Data Analyst to support a government customer on site in Arlington, VA. The primary responsibilities for the position are retrieving data, manipulating data, and responding to requests for specific data pertaining to the status of RDT&E funding.

The nature of the work requires that the candidate demonstrate initiative, organization, responsibility, customer service skills, and the ability to be flexible and adaptive to a fast-paced, fluid business environment. The candidate must be able to communicate effectively and decisively with all levels of the organization and be able to solve practical problems as well as exercise sound judgement with regards to sensitive and confidential information.

Great growth opportunity if you have a strong Excel (see below) background.

General Duties
Proficient in utilizing Excel to perform the following:
Creating PivotTables and utilizing dynamic ranges
Using a master pivot table to drive other pivot tables (via a VBA macro)
Measuring your data: COUNT(), COUNTA(), COUNTIF(), SUBTOTAL()
Formatting data and reformatting datatypes in Excel using formulas
Utilizing COUNTIFS, SUMIFS, VLOOKUP, IFERROR, and combinations of these formulas
Manipulation of large datasets in Excel (100,000+ rows)
Ability to learn and understand a business model and fully comprehend operational concepts, relationships between those concepts and data being utilized
Great critical thinking abilities, willingness to learn, and eagerness to do research
Support all analytical and statistical reporting requirements for program activities;
Develop, analyze and produce standardized statistical reports AND ad hoc reports for internal and external customers, including Congress, Agency leadership and various stakeholders;
Track tasking's assigned to the program
Qualifications
SECRET Clearance required
1 year of experience in research, organizational, and business analyses and forecasts
BA/BS degree in business or related field of study

Additional Information
We offer a competitive and comprehensive benefits and compensation package for our employees, including but not limited to:
Health
Dental
Vision
Group Life Insurance/Long Term Disability/Short Term Disability
Retirement/401(k)
Tuition Reimbursement
Flexible Leave
All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.

MDW Associates, LLC (""MDW"") is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate in hiring or employment on the basis of race, religion, color, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, marital status, covered veteran status, mental or physical disability, pregnancy or any other unlawful basis unrelated to the ability to do the job. MDW seeks to employ talented, ethical and entrepreneurial-minded persons. Our applicants and employees are protected from discrimination as required by Federal law.",5.0,"MDW Associates
5.0","Arlington, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2012,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
164,Data Privacy Analyst,-1,"Data Privacy Analyst
Waltham MA
Full-Time

(Please note this role is not a Data Analyst role).

The Alexander Technology Group is searching for a Data Privacy Analyst for a client located in the Waltham MA area. Please reach out to Chris McMillan at cmcmillan@alexandertg.com with an updated resume if you are interested.

Data Privacy Analyst

Our client is seeking a Data Privacy Analyst with 1+ years of experience in Privacy, Audit, or Compliance, and ideally 3+ years of business experience, to join this busy and growing company. Client is seeking someone with experience using OneTrust, with a certification in CIPP/US/C/E, CIPT, CIPM, or another industry related privacy certification.

The ideal candidate will be responsible for the understanding, maintenance, and continuous learning of the OneTrust tool and platform. This person will be responsible for supporting processes, and documenting both existing and new processes as the team and company grow. Client is open to different backgrounds focused on Data Privacy. (Please note this role is not a Data Analyst role).

ATG456
#LI-CM1
MONATG*",4.6,"Alexander Technology Group
4.6","Needham, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
165,Data Center Analyst,$35k-$70k (Glassdoor Est.),"BASIC PERFORMANCE EXPECTATIONS: *
The IT Data Center Analyst is responsible for the delivery of IT services. The position is primarily responsible for the following:
Administration and maintenance of systems to ensure proper operation and availability.
Operation of data center processes and procedures, ensuring that all services and systems meet their operational targets.
Administration and control of all aspects of the scheduling, monitoring and control of operational workloads.
Administration and control of storage media, backup and recovery schedules, testing, storage planning, allocation, monitoring and decommissioning.
Secondary responsibilities include receiving, documenting, resolving, escalating, and monitoring the progress of issues and support requests reported to the IT Service Desk.

This position requires working in an IT support role with shift assignments and the ability to work under pressure to meet tight deadlines and performance goals.

Extensive work with end user and IT staff members is required to understand, improve, and enhance the usage of Information Technology in enterprise business processes.
ASSIGNED DUTIES: *
System Administration:

· Administer system hardware and software configurations

· Control production system hardware and software configurations

· Monitor systems and applications for proper operation and performance

· Apply vendor provided maintenance to systems and applications

· Detect, diagnose, isolate and correct system operational failures

· Support incident and problem management activities with system expertise and troubleshooting

Operations:

· Operate and implement all data center processes and procedures

· Investigate, diagnose, and take prescribed actions on all operational events, alarms and incidents

· Monitor all operations and services to ensure service quality is being delivered on a daily basis
Maintain daily operational logs and journals on all events, warnings, alerts and alarms, recording and classifying all messages; maintain all operational data collection procedures, mechanisms and tools
· Maintain all operational documentation, processes, management and diagnostic tools

· Ensure that all routine maintenance tasks are completed on all operational systems

· Ensure that all IT data center equipment is maintained according to policies and recommendations and perform regular checks on data center environmental equipment and conditions

· Develop and maintain system scripts that will enhance operational processes and procedures

· Participate in incident, problem, and change management activities

Scheduling:

· Prepare and maintain day-to-day workload schedules, including production changes, in line with scheduling guidelines

· Ensure that operational workloads are run according to their defined schedules

· Process ad hoc workload requests when requested and approved

· Develop and Administer automated scheduling tools and infrastructure

· Develop and maintain all necessary operational scheduling documentation

· Produce workload scheduling reports that report results of schedules and job runs in a timely fashion

Storage Management:

· Interface with other IT teams to ensure that all requirements are met by current backup and recovery policies

· Administer backup and recovery packages and tools

· Manage and maintain media and vaulting mechanisms

· Monitor backup jobs and schedules to ensure these take place without error

Service Desk:

· Promptly process all requests and problems that come into the service desk for the Information Technology Support Services and Facilities Services departments via phone, fax, e-mail, etc.

· Make the first attempt at incident resolution to minimize impact to business

· Provide service request routing and monitoring

· Follow prescribed support methodology and established escalation procedures

· Keep end users informed on the status and progress of requests and incidents

· Follow-up with end users to verify problem resolution

· Document the resolution of all problems personally resolved

· Record information into service desk software for tracking, analyzing and reporting functions

· Document problem solutions into the knowledge base and work with other support personnel in maintaining the knowledge database of support issues

Train team members on all of the above items.

Achieve and maintain a current level of knowledge and understanding of technology and related subjects by reading trade journals, attending user group meetings, specials seminars, trade shows, peer training sessions, and training classes and demonstrate this level of knowledge by achieving and maintaining current professional certifications as designated by management.

Proactively participate in the improvement of IT services by collecting and analyzing metrics and making recommendations for improvements in the processes, operations, technology and procedures used by ITSS to support enterprise goals.

Establish and maintain successful relationships with business users and and/or external clients/vendors.

Perform other job-related duties as assigned.
MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS: *
One of the following:
An associate degree in an information technology related field, three years of recent technical systems administrator and application support experience, and two varied applicable professional IT certifications, such as data center administration, system administration, or backup administration.
OR
Graduation from a standard high school or vocational school, five years of recent technical systems administrator and application support experience, and three varied applicable professional IT certifications, such as data center administration, system administration, or backup administration.
Ability and flexibility to work various assigned shifts;

Demonstrated ability to work independently;

Ability to communicate tactfully, courteously, and effectively; and

Ability to maintain a positive attitude and respond to changing priorities and processes.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $20.73 - $33.72 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Flexible Schedule
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Professional Development Assistance
Retirement Plan
Tuition Reimbursement
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
8 Hour Shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
systems administrator: 5 years (Required)
Education:
High school or equivalent (Required)
License:
applicable professional IT (Required)
Work Location:
One location
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused
Company's website:
www.messa.org
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.0,"MESSA
4.0","East Lansing, MI",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1960,Nonprofit Organization,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
166,Data Analyst,-1,"Our client, a video game company, is seeking a Data Analyst to join their team.

You will be responsible to:

Create reports and dashboards that will support people across the team in making effective decisions and that help us better understand our operational and team health
Help team members dig into data related questions and support them on emergent issues
Visualize and develop dashboards and reports to help support effective decision making throughout Player Support
Work with stakeholders and the Product Owner of Player Support Insights to ensure that you have a strong understanding of data needs and reporting requirements
Partner with team members across Player Support as questions arise to answer their data-related questions and ensure they have the information to make effective decisions

Musts:

Bachelor’s degree in Economics, Computer Science, Applied Mathematics, Management Information Systems or a related discipline
Minimum 2 years of professional work experience in finance or consulting, developing dashboards and reporting, analyzing large data sets, visualizing information, cost modeling, and informing company strategy OR a Master’s degree in Economics, Computer Science, Applied Mathematics, Management Information Systems or a related discipline
Strong business insight
Ability to collaborate with cross-disciplinary teammates
Knowledgeable in SQL or other relational database approaches
Advanced in Excel (can perform complex functions), PowerPoint, and/or Tableau
Excellent communication and organizational skills
Experience with analysis related to support teams or operational teams is a plus
Ideal candidate will find success through their expertise, a collaborative spirit, and decision-making that prioritizes

Employer Details:
Onward Search is an equal opportunity employer, dedicated to a policy of non-discrimination in an employment with regard to race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, national origin, age, disability, genetic information, veteran status or any other classification protected by federal, state and local laws and ordinances. Candidates must be at least 18 years old to be considered for employment. EOE/M/F/D/V/SO.
In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire.
The client is unable to support 1099 / Corp-to-Corp or Independent Contractor arrangements at this time. All freelancers will be paid as W2 employees.
Onward Search is a drug-free workplace.",3.4,"Onward Search
3.4","Los Angeles, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
167,Data Analyst,$38k-$69k (Glassdoor Est.),"We are pioneers. We were the first to break the sound barrier and to design the first functional jetpack. We were aboard NASA’s first lunar mission and brought advanced tiltrotor systems to market. Today, we are defining the future of on-demand mobility. At Bell, we are proud to work for an iconic company with superb talent, rapidly creating novel and coveted vertical lift experiences.

Bell in Fort Worth, TX has openings for Data Analysts for the Supply Chain to support advanced analytics.

We are looking for critical thinkers, problem solvers, and motivated individuals who are enthusiastic about data and believe that answers to hard questions lie in the yet-to-be-told story of diverse, complicated data sets. As a Data Analyst you will help define the next generation of Data & Analytics solutions to be used byBells employees, partners and customers. You should be comfortable collaborating in a fast-paced environment, contributing to innovative solutions, while demonstrating a strong technical competence and the ability to work within a team.

As a Data Analyst, you will be tasked with using business analytics for 1) Descriptive Analytics, 2) Predictive Analytics and 3) Prescriptive Analytics for Bell’s supply chain needs.

On any given day you will be challenged on three types of work – Supply Chain Innovation, Supply Chain Business Intelligence and Supply Chain Data Management:
SCM Innovation
Build well-managed data solutions, tools, and capabilities to enable self-service frameworks for data consumers
Demonstrate ability to explore and quickly grasp new technologies to progress varied initiatives
SCM Business Intelligence
Partner with the business to provide consultancy and translate the business needs to design and develop tools, analytics, metrics, and dashboards for insights and data visualization
Document requirements using process flow diagrams and related specification documents, write user stories and acceptance criteria and review test cases and design documents
Data Management
Drive an understanding and adherence to the principles of data quality management
Work collaboratively with appropriate Tech teams to manage security mechanisms and data access governance
Build and execute tools to monitor and report on data quality
Education Requirements:
Bachelor's Degree in Supply Chain, Computer Science, Information Systems - or similar discipline
Position Requirements:
Understand Supply Chain principles, including Bell’s (defense industry - government compliance) and supplier contractual obligations.
Collaborates with the Information Owners, Data Stewards and Business Analysts to roll out new capabilities and support data governance initiatives
Adheres to the various project management guidelines and drives toward achieving required project milestones
At least 2 years of experience in creating both tactical and strategic complex mathematical business models using multiple data sources
At least 2 years of experience in at least one scripting language; SQL, Python, R, C#, etc.
At least 2 year of experience in querying and analyzing and working with data languages and platforms
At least 1 year of experience working with Agile development methodologies
Must have work experience in Power BI including Power Queries
The successful person in the role will also have:
Strong communications skills to both technical and non-technical audiences.
Quickly grasps new concepts when faced with unfamiliar tasks.
Good organizational, multi-tasking, and time management skills.
Ability to work independently and as a collaborative team member.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.
Preferred Skills, Certifications and Work Experience:
SQL Server, QlikView and Microsoft Visio
C.P.M. / C.P.I.M., ITIL and/or Agile/Scrum certifications
Advanced Data Analytics / Data Science certifications
* This position requires use of information which is subject to the International Traffic in Arms Regulations (ITAR) and/or the Export Administration Regulations (EAR)., Non-U.S. persons selected must meet eligibility requirements for access to export-restricted information. The ITAR/EAR defines a U.S. person as a U.S. Citizen, U.S. Permanent Resident (i.e. 'Green Card Holder'), Political Asylee, or Refugee.

Don’t miss the chance to join a diverse, inclusive environment where you feel a sense of belonging. As a member of our global workforce, you will collaborate with dedicated, enthusiastic teams where unique experiences, backgrounds and ideas combined with a strong passion for our products take us above and beyond flight.

Textron Domestic Relocation Assistance policy is in effect / applies for this position for candidates who qualify.",3.3,"Textron
3.3","Fort Worth, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,1923,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
168,Data Analyst,$57k-$84k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Us:

Cedent is a rapidly growing, young and team-oriented organization. Our mission is to provide expertise and counsel rather than resources. We encourage the formation of joint teams with client staff to take a project from inception to implementation. Through this philosophy we provide identifiable business benefits in the most economical manner.Cedent enables business results by being a 'Value Added partner'. It offers integrated portfolio of services to its clients in the areas of Consulting, System Integration for key-industry verticals. Our resources bring their unique perspectives and insight based on their individual experiences, which leads to breakthrough outcomes for our clients. Our people make the difference by consistently delivering outstanding value to our customers.

Job Description:
1) Experience in SQL/ Scope scripting
2) Knowledge of Big Data pipelines/Data Engineering
3) Working Knowledge on MSBI stack on Azure
4) Hands-on in Visualization like PowerBI
5) Knowledge in Marketing Domain and Audience targeting, Segmentation specifics, Campaign Operations
6) Knowledgeable in Marketing Automation, Identify repetitive labor intensive tasks and automate/RPA/Chatbots
7) Data Discovery and Analysis
8) Excellent Communication, Status reporting, Analysis Skills on Campaign Operations

Responsibilities:

1) Campaign Operations and Automation using proprietary tools
2) Campaign Data Analysis and reporting
3) Audience Sizing and Writing Segmentation Queries for Campaigns
4) Create/Maintain and Enhance Big Data Pipeline
5) Requirement Analysis, collaboration with Content team, translation of Req to Scripts and operations
6) Daily status reporting, interacting with other vertical/pod

You Will Enjoy:
An opportunity to be a part of a great culture, an awesome team, a challenging work environment, and some fun along the way!
Apply today to learn more and be part of the Growth story.
All applications will be kept strictly confidential and once shortlisted , our team will be in touch with you for further discussions.

Department: Preferred Vendors
This is a non-management position
This is a full time position",3.3,"Cedent Consulting
3.3","Redmond, WA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
169,Data Analyst,-1,"ABOUT QUADPAY

At QuadPay, we’re here to simplify, streamline and automate how you pay and save every day by offering fast, fair and seamless payment solutions online and in-store. As a business, we strive to be unlike others in the industry as we continue to help businesses grow by offering a best in class product, driven by the most innovative teams in the industry.

Recent global changes and advancements have meant relentless product innovation, in the goal to be the next generation of payments.

We’re people, just like you who think purchasing shouldn’t be so inflexible!

We are currently in hyper-growth phase and as such are looking to grow teams in almost every department in the company - come change the industry with us, and love coming to work every day.

We’ve built an amazing culture at QuadPay and in a short space of time (since 2017), our teams are proud to work hard to provide innovative solutions to our valued customers and partners. Our values are in everything we do, and are as diverse and as inclusive as our global workforce. These include but are not limited to: Customer First, Own It, Raise the Bar, Stronger Together and Change the Game!

QuadPay is part of Zip Co (ASX:Z1P).

What You Will Do:

We’re looking for data fanatics to join the A Team of engineers and analysts that are responsible for building Quadpay’s data platforms. We need people who understand data at a granular level – they don’t rely on any one tool but rather understand them all, and each of their pros and cons. This is a unique opportunity to build the data strategy and architecture at a data driven startup that’s changing the world of finance, shoulder to shoulder, with a tight team that has your back.

What You Should Have:

You’re a culture fit: You believe in and want to participate in a blameless culture which focuses on process and technology .You don’t sleep well at night when you leave work with a question unanswered. You feel accountable for everything you do, and it has been driving you your entire life. You like to have a good time while getting things done. When we say a “team player” we mean it - you have a crisp high-five and funny stories to tell. You have your team’s back, and the team has yours.

You love learning new things: You know that there’s always more to learn, and it bothers you that there isn’t enough time in the day to learn about the next topic. You’re up-to-date on new trends in data – you know who’s using what to solve various problems and are excited for the next release of your favorite tool. If you can handle being thrown in the deep end of the pool, this team’s for you.

You enjoy solving big picture problems: Proactively identify reports, dashboards, and analysis needed by the business. Partner with Product & Engineering teams to strategize and drive user growth.

You thrive in uncertainty: You’re comfortable in the weeds pulling, cleaning, analyzing, and transforming raw data into insightful, viz-ual findings. You conduct the necessary research when presented with open ended questions.

You seek answers in data: You are comfortable analyzing millions of transactional data points. You use data to drive decision making and make recommendations on how to best grow and optimize the business. Work closely with leadership to identify, measure, and grow major KPI’s across business lines.

You dream about analytics: You excitedly seek opportunities to leverage Power BI/Tableau. Advanced SQL is in your toolkit to solve complex business problems. You know modeling techniques and love to partner with Data Engineers.

Nice To Have:

- Sense of humor is hugely preferred

- Finance industry /Credit / Risk experience is helpful

- An interesting life story / a cool hobby / a diverse background has proven to bring more to the table in terms of perspective, what's yours?

It's tough to get into our team, we believe culture eats strategy for breakfast and we're working hard to find our next family member. If you've been looking for us, now's the time to reach out.
Technology is changing the way people interact with the world and we’re bringing that revolution to the way people shop and transact. We allow shoppers to buy anywhere, at anytime - and pay in 4 interest-free, automatic installments over 6 weeks. You get the product right away and QuadPay will pay the merchant upfront.

We're looking for someone who can join our high-functioning team of passionate support professionals and we value a range of diverse backgrounds, experiences, and ideas. We pride ourselves on diversity and creating an inclusive workplace that provides equal opportunities to all persons regardless of age, race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, national origin, disability, military and/or veteran status, or any other protected classes.

We're growing very quickly and always looking for talented people to join our team and help transform the way consumers shop and pay!",4.6,"Quadpay
4.6","New York, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2018,Company - Private,Financial Transaction Processing,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
170,Data Visualization Analyst,$55k-$100k (Glassdoor Est.),"Meet our professionals


CGI: An employer of choice

Position Description


CGI Federal is looking for a Data Visualization Analyst (DVA) for one of our exciting Health IT projects in Fairfax, VA. The ideal candidate will have experience with data visualization and interpretation techniques across the full system development lifecycle and possess a systems/database/programmatic mindset.

Your future duties and responsibilities


In this position, you will be responsible for all functional aspects of building a suite of tools to help the customer gain insight into an existing dataset, through data visualizations, analytics, and incorporation of related complementary datasets. You will work with business and system subject matter experts (SMEs) to identify customer challenges and propose data visualization/analytical solutions, then refine customer requirements for aesthetics, business rules, and source data translations. The DVA would translate these requirements into designs for technical team members to implement, then carry out verification/validation of the resulting product.

Required qualifications to be successful in this role


- Experience developing data visualization requirements and designs to facilitate interpretation and data insights
Experience working on project teams leveraging data visualization tools (e.g., Tableau [preferred], Bokeh, D3, etc)
Data manipulation expertise involving data extractions, data matching between multiple systems, transformations, cleansing, and loading
Excellent analytical and problem solving skills
SQL knowledge
Excellent oral and written communication skills, especially in a client interaction context
Comfortable understanding and discussing architectural concepts and algorithms, and assessing trade-offs with team members
Experience communicating data insights and presenting concepts to technical and non-technical audiences
Ability to work independently and within a team with excellent time management and reporting skills
Proficient with Microsoft Office Suite (PowerPoint, Excel and Word)
#CGIFederalJob

What you can expect from us


Build your career with us.

It is an extraordinary time to be in business. As digital transformation continues to accelerate, CGI is at the center of this changesupporting our clients' digital journeys and offering our professionals exciting career opportunities.

At CGI, our success comes from the talent and commitment of our professionals. As one team, we share the challenges and rewards that come from growing our company, which reinforces our culture of ownership. All of our professionals benefit from the value we collectively create.

Be part of building one of the largest independent technology and business services firms in the world.

Learn more about CGI atwww.cgi.com.

No unsolicited agency referrals please.

CGI is an equal opportunity employer.

Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their race, ethnicity, ancestry, color, sex, religion, creed, age, national origin, citizenship status, disability, medical condition, military and veteran status, marital status, sexual orientation or perceived sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, and gender expression, familial status, political affiliation, genetic information, or any other legally protected status or characteristics.

CGI provides reasonable accommodations to qualified individuals with disabilities. If you need an accommodation to apply for a job in the U.S., please email the CGI U.S. Employment Compliance mailbox atUS_Employment_Compliance@cgi.com. You will need to reference the requisition number of the position in which you are interested. Your message will be routed to the appropriate recruiter who will assist you.Please note, this email address is only to be used for those individuals who need an accommodation to apply for a job. Emails for any other reason or those that do not include a requisition number will not be returned.

We make it easy to translate military experience and skills! Clickhere to be directed to our site that is dedicated to veterans and transitioning service members.

All CGI offers of employment in the U.S. are contingent upon the ability to successfully complete a background investigation. Background investigation components can vary dependent upon specific assignment and/or level of US government security clearance held.

CGI will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with CGI's legal duty to furnish information.",3.6,"CGI
3.6","Fairfax, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1976,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,$10+ billion (USD),-1
171,Data Analyst,$41k-$74k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who we want

Teammates. Partners who listen to ideas, share thoughts and work together to move the business forward.

Strategic thinkers. People who enjoy analyzing data or trends for the purposes of planning, forecasting, advising, budgeting, reporting, or sales opportunities.

Data translators. Highly effective communicators who can transform data findings into recommendations to compose reports and executive level presentations.

Detail-oriented process improvers. Critical thinkers who naturally see opportunities to develop.

Collaborative partners. People who build and leverage cross-functional relationships to bring together ideas, information, use cases, and industry analyses to inform business strategy and decisions.

Analytical problem solvers. People who go beyond just fixing to identify root causes, evaluate optimal solutions, and recommend comprehensive upgrades to prevent future issues.

Data managers. People who enjoy compiling, organizing and consolidating large volumes of data and reports.

Business-oriented evaluators. People who effectively interpret information to demonstrate the effects of business initiatives, regulation and industry trends for sales, management and leadership teams.

What you will do

As a Data Analyst you will focus on contracts, pricing, and customer intelligence to maximize revenue and margin through contract and pricing strategy by leveraging analytic tools such as Power BI, excel, etc. You will elevate Stryker's approach to customer data by providing business intelligence solutions that supply our business leaders and sales teams with information to support and inform business strategy, identify opportunity, and inform negotiations and decisions. In addition, you will gain a deep understanding of the businesses you support and development, maintain, deploy, and scale data models and internal solutions that support the business needs. You will build strong relationships with internal customers and sales teams and provide exceptional customer service. Lastly, you'll have the opportunity to build relationships and collaborate with a robust team, deliver business focused analytics and recommendations, and enable key initiatives for HCS and our business partners.

What you need
Bachelor's degree in Computer Information Systems, Business Analytics, Data Science, Business, Accounting, Finance, or related discipline with up to one year of data analysis and reporting experience OR Master's degree in Computer Information Systems, Business Analytics, Data Science, Business, Accounting, Finance, or related discipline.
Experience with excel and other reporting and visualization tools such as Power BI or Tableau. Basic data modeling and fundamental core database concepts.
Effective presentation, written, verbal communication skills, including the ability to explain data and findings.",4.3,"Stryker
4.3","Portage, MI",-1,10000+ Employees,1941,Company - Public,Health Care Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1
172,Data Analyst,$41k-$75k (Glassdoor Est.),"Search by Keyword
More Options

Clear

Loading...

Title

All

Country/Region

All

×

Send me alerts every days
alert frequency in every certain days
Create Alert

form.emailsubscribe-form {
display: none;
}
×

Send me alerts every days
alert frequency in every certain days

Apply now »



Data Analyst

Date:

Oct 8, 2020

Country/Region:

US

City:

Findlay OH

OH

Job Requisition:

31769

Cooper Tire offers an entirely unique work experience because no matter what your title is, you’ll play a part in contributing to the development, manufacturing and marketing of some of the most innovative tire products in the world. Cooper is a fun and exciting place to work. We are constantly on the lookout for motivated individuals who lead by example and inspire others to greatness. The opportunities are endless and the rewards rich for those who believe that job satisfaction and career success begin with a satisfied customer. Careers are a Journey…Come Ride with Us!

The IT Data Analyst is charged with effectively managing Cooper Tire & Rubber Company’s master data within its ERP/SAP systems. This position will be focused in the Global Operations space supporting the Manufacturing Plants, Corporate Purchasing and Corporate Quality globally but will have opportunities to cross-train in Customer, Material, and other master data functions.

Job Responsibilities:
Maintain data integrity to ensure that standards are being followed and data is consistently maintained and enhanced where possible to meet business needs.Define data standards where required coordinating with appropriate stakeholders.
Facilitate master data workflow processes by working directly with customers to ensure timely completion and process adherence.
Understanding of Technical business and strategy to execute and support the development and utilization of effective and insightful reports and visualizations.
Initiate and participate in projects or actions to improve the overall performance and quality of master data handling, including workflow development, data profiling, data score-carding and creation and maintenance of data dictionaries.
Provide on-demand/ad-hoc data manipulation/analysis as requested by Technical business.
Design of Technical Data Strategy based on Global strategy (IT and Global Operations).
Review requests for new or modified master data to ensure they are in line with business rules.
Respond to or appropriately redirect all Technical data requests.
Collaborate with other data analysts within IT and the businessareas globally to standardize data and set strategy to support all business analytics.
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor degree in Computer Science, Information Technology, Marketing, or Business related field
2+ years of experience in Data Management, Business Administration, Product development, Marketing/Customer Service
Strong communication skills and the ability to work with all levels of the business, employees, consultants, and contractors
Team oriented with the ability to promote the successful advancement of the group
High quality analytical skills, the ability to pay attention to details
Self-motivated and the capability to work with limited direction
Ability to identify priorities, deadlines, and expectations and execute assignments accordingly
Preferred Qualifications:
Green Belt Certification
Experience working with SAP Master Data & data structures
Experience with Winshuttle Foundation and Studio
Working knowledge of Service Now tools
Cooper Tire is an Equal Employment Opportunity employer. We strive to recruit, develop and retain top candidates by providing an engaging culture and opportunities to grow and develop. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, age, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status, status as an individual with a disability or any other characteristic protected by applicable law.

Nearest Major Market: Lima
Nearest Secondary Market: Findlay
Job Segment:
Database, Data Analyst, Product Development, ERP, Computer Science, Technology, Data, Research

Apply now »

Find similar jobs:
Information Technology

Apply now »



Data Analyst

Date:

Oct 8, 2020

Country/Region:

US

City:

Findlay OH

OH

Job Requisition:

31769

Cooper Tire offers an entirely unique work experience because no matter what your title is, you’ll play a part in contributing to the development, manufacturing and marketing of some of the most innovative tire products in the world. Cooper is a fun and exciting place to work. We are constantly on the lookout for motivated individuals who lead by example and inspire others to greatness. The opportunities are endless and the rewards rich for those who believe that job satisfaction and career success begin with a satisfied customer. Careers are a Journey…Come Ride with Us!

The IT Data Analyst is charged with effectively managing Cooper Tire & Rubber Company’s master data within its ERP/SAP systems. This position will be focused in the Global Operations space supporting the Manufacturing Plants, Corporate Purchasing and Corporate Quality globally but will have opportunities to cross-train in Customer, Material, and other master data functions.

Job Responsibilities:
Maintain data integrity to ensure that standards are being followed and data is consistently maintained and enhanced where possible to meet business needs.Define data standards where required coordinating with appropriate stakeholders.
Facilitate master data workflow processes by working directly with customers to ensure timely completion and process adherence.
Understanding of Technical business and strategy to execute and support the development and utilization of effective and insightful reports and visualizations.
Initiate and participate in projects or actions to improve the overall performance and quality of master data handling, including workflow development, data profiling, data score-carding and creation and maintenance of data dictionaries.
Provide on-demand/ad-hoc data manipulation/analysis as requested by Technical business.
Design of Technical Data Strategy based on Global strategy (IT and Global Operations).
Review requests for new or modified master data to ensure they are in line with business rules.
Respond to or appropriately redirect all Technical data requests.
Collaborate with other data analysts within IT and the businessareas globally to standardize data and set strategy to support all business analytics.
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor degree in Computer Science, Information Technology, Marketing, or Business related field
2+ years of experience in Data Management, Business Administration, Product development, Marketing/Customer Service
Strong communication skills and the ability to work with all levels of the business, employees, consultants, and contractors
Team oriented with the ability to promote the successful advancement of the group
High quality analytical skills, the ability to pay attention to details
Self-motivated and the capability to work with limited direction
Ability to identify priorities, deadlines, and expectations and execute assignments accordingly
Preferred Qualifications:
Green Belt Certification
Experience working with SAP Master Data & data structures
Experience with Winshuttle Foundation and Studio
Working knowledge of Service Now tools
Cooper Tire is an Equal Employment Opportunity employer. We strive to recruit, develop and retain top candidates by providing an engaging culture and opportunities to grow and develop. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, age, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status, status as an individual with a disability or any other characteristic protected by applicable law.

Nearest Major Market: Lima
Nearest Secondary Market: Findlay
Job Segment:
Database, Data Analyst, Product Development, ERP, Computer Science, Technology, Data, Research

Apply now »",3.3,"Cooper Tire & Rubber
3.3","Findlay, OH",-1,10000+ Employees,1914,Company - Public,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
173,Data Analyst,-1,"Unique Employment Opportunity *
Job Title: * Data Analyst
Opportunity: * Direct interaction with leadership team, building skills in a dynamic business
Environment: * Entrepreneurial, fast-paced, professional & fun
Hours: * 40 hours per week
Work Location: * Williamsville, NY
Compensation: * Depending on Experience
Upload Resume at: *https://alignrxconsulting.com/careers/
Position Functions and Responsibilities *
Support senior leadership team and external clients through preparation of routine and ad-hoc reports. Creating, editing and preparing these reports will require skills in data cleansing, data transformation, and data warehousing. Reports furnished will be financial, clinical, and operational in nature, with an end goal of providing each client with a better understanding of their member population and its needs. Important to note, in addition to providing reports on as needed basis, the ideal candidate will also work to identify opportunities for improvement on an ongoing basis and make business suggestions as they see fit.

We are seeking an outcome based and detailed oriented analyst. This individual will engage in regular communication with external clients and internal colleagues via email and telephone in order to better understand business needs and establish project and analysis timelines. If you consider yourself a problem solver and possess a natural curiosity towards the field of data analytics, you may be a good fit for this role.

The individual selected for this role will have exposure to many different areas of the business, including, but not limited to:

• Senior leadership reporting

• Database development and maintenance

• Client reporting: ad-hoc and routine

• Contract development/revision, analysis and auditing

• Underwriting

• Implementation and configuration

• Client messaging, support and analytics
Minimum Education, Qualifications, Skills, Competencies and Experience *
Requires strong expertise in MS Excel and relational database such as MS Access and other database management (MS

SQL) and reporting tools. Ability to develop databases and queries to support an evolving and fast paced business.

Database management with managed care background preferred, but not necessary.

Previous healthcare or pharmaceutical analytical and/or consulting experience is preferred, but not necessary.

Bachelor’s degree in business administration, finance or healthcare preferred

Demonstrated written and verbal communication skills with the ability to establish rapport with clients, colleagues, and the AlignRx team.

Demonstrated ability to multi-task and maintain organization in a fast paced and changing environment.

Solid organizational and time management skills, an ability to follow through and attention to detail are imperative in this role.
AlignRx- Aligned for Better Outcomes *
AlignRx is a true partner looking out for our client’s best interests. The current market is filled with coalitions and consultants that are looking to push their own agenda. AlignRx is different. Our interests are truly aligned with yours and the results are services that drive exponential value for you.

We don’t have standard protocol that we follow for every engagement. Because we’re not satisfied with marginal improvements and small steps forward. We intentionally built a company that produces innovative solutions and is constantly evolving to stay ahead of the market. Whether it is a custom formulary for a student population or an innovative medical rebate strategy, we consistently exceed client expectations.

With AlignRx you get multi-dimensional thinking and problem solving. We have brought together a diverse team of clinicians, financial experts, and industry leaders that is unmatched in the market. This diverse team allows us to provide a full suite of services to our clients. This has led to an industry leading, 100% client retention.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Disability Insurance
Flexible Schedule
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Retirement Plan
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus Pay
Experience:
Data Analysis: 1 year (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Fully Remote
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
alignrxconsulting.com
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.linkedin.com/company/alignrxconsulting/?viewAsMember=true
Work Remotely:
Yes",-1,AlignRx,"Williamsville, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2016,Unknown,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
174,Data Analyst,$41k-$75k (Glassdoor Est.),"Greetings from Conch Technologies

Hope you are doing well,

Please go through the below JD and Apply/Revert with your updated resume if you are interested.

Â

Job Title:ÂData Analyst

Location: Baltimore, MD

Duration: Long-Term

Â

Skills Required:
Data Analysis
SQL
Medicaid claims Experience
Â

Pavan Kumar | Sr IT Recruiter
E:Âpavan@conchtech.comÂ| T: (571) 398 5867
Conch Technologies, Inc |Âwww.conchtech.com",4.6,"Conch Technologies, Inc
4.6","Baltimore, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
175,Data Analyst,$32k-$59k (Glassdoor Est.),"SUMMARY: The Data Analyst is responsible for data management, business intelligence management, and reporting process improvement. This position will focus on management of reporting data and evaluating, developing and implementing impactful reporting process solutions.

ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES: The items listed below detail some of the assigned duties and responsibilities for this position. This is not meant to be an all-inclusive list and management reserves the right to change these duties at any time.

Assist with problem solving efforts related to day-to-day processes of the reporting & analytics team and long-term strategic initiatives of the company.
Recognize opportunities and weaknesses within reporting processes and lead implementation of their effective solutions.
Design, develop and refine proprietary software to support reporting & analytics team’s needs.
Assist in development of data warehouse & data marts for the reporting & analytics team.
Build reporting processes to assist internal and external clients.
Generate accurate and timely reports to internal and external clients using technology.
Apply “out-of-the-box” solutions to business issues and long-term initiatives.
Construct data exports and/or provide expert support for external vendor initiatives.
Construct ad-hoc data imports and/or provide expert support for various initiatives.

SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIES: None

QUALIFICATIONS: The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

EDUCATION AND EXPERIENCE
Bachelor’s Degree in Business, Engineering, Math, Computer Science or MIS recommended.
Minimum two years’ professional experience in an analytical, data-driven role.
Strong SQL writing skills with knowledge of data-warehousing, and master Excel and/or Access skills.
Experience with healthcare claims data, healthcare terminology and healthcare operations preferred.
Experience with Power BI, SSIS, SSRS, SSAS, Microsoft Access Form Development, VBA, or Crystal Reports a plus.

COMMUNICATION SKILLS
Strong verbal and written communication skills.
Comfortable communicating directly with vendors and clients.
Can appropriately handle confidential and sensitive information.

OTHER SKILLS
Strong attention to detail
Comfortable using many sources data to generate solutions for internal and external clients
Strong ability to translate business needs directly into solutions using data and technology
Ability to work independently and proactively
Must be solution-oriented
Ability to work both autonomously and collaboratively as a member of a team
Must be self-motivated with the ability to assess problems/issues and offer workable solutions
Strong time and project management skills

PHYSICAL DEMANDS: The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to sit and use a computer and phone. The employee is regularly required to talk and hear, as well as use hands to finger, handle and feel. The employee is occasionally required to stand and walk and must occasionally lift and/or move up to 10 pounds.

WORK ENVIRONMENT: The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Normal office Environment",4.6,"WebTPA
4.6","Irving, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1993,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
176,Data Analyst,$62k-$117k (Glassdoor Est.),"About the department

Cloudflare is looking to build and grow our data analytics/business intelligence team that will be responsible for building a large-scale enterprise modern data lake and EDW that combines massive petabyte scale traffic logs with data from various business systems supporting product, marketing, customer support, sales, finance etc. and enabling easier consumption of that data using tools to drive standard reporting, adhoc/exploratory analytics and advanced insights using data science models.

About the role

As part of this initiative, we are looking for a strong data analyst to come join Cloudflare and help us drive analytic insights and best practices at scale from the ground up. Success in this role comes from marrying a strong data background with acute product and business acumen to deliver highly strategic and compelling insights that accelerate our business growth and influence our product decisions within Cloudflare.

What we look for: Data analysis, Business Analysis, Storytelling, Strong Business & Product Acumen, Cross-functional Collaboration, Creative Problem Solving, Agile

What you'll do
Fundamental understanding of the data landscape i.e tooling, tech stack, source systems etc. and work closely with the Data Engineering team to improve the data collection and quality.
Understand business/product strategy and high-level roadmap and align analysis efforts to enable them with data insights and help achieve their strategic goals.
Audience focused presentation and storytelling skills focused on key takeaways and recommendations in a crisp and concise manner.
Ability to define and spot macro and micro levels trends with statistical significance on a regular basis and understand key drivers driving those trends.

Examples of desirable skills, knowledge and experience

Bachelor's or Master's Degree in Computer Science or Engineering or related experience required.
2+ years of data analyst experience with 1+ years of proven industry experience in a large scale environment (PBs scale, globally distributed teams).
Proven results oriented analysis that helped support positive change in the business strategy.
Strong experience in Python, R, SQL, Tableau, Google Analytics, Hive and BigQuery (or any other Big data/Cloud equivalent) etc.
Capable of working closely with business including but not limited to, Engineering, Sales, Marketing, and Product teams to ensure data initiatives are aligned with business needs and is of high quality.
Experience with a fast-growing SaaS business based company is preferred.",4.2,"Cloudflare
4.2","Austin, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2010,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
177,Data Analyst,$45k-$83k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Us:

Cityblock Health is the first tech-driven provider for communities with complex needsbringing better care to where it's needed most, block by block. Founded in 2017 on the premise that ""health is local"" and based in Brooklyn, we are backed by Alphabet's Sidewalk Labs along with some of the top healthcare investors in the country.

Our mission is to improve the health of underserved communities. Importantly, our solutions are designed specifically for Medicaid and lower-income Medicare beneficiaries, and we meet our members where they are, bringing care into the home and neighborhoods through our community-based care teams and Virtual Care offerings.

In close collaboration with community-based organizations, local providers, and leading health plans, we are reorganizing the health system to focus on what matters to our members. Equipped with world-class, custom care delivery technology, we deliver personalized primary care, behavioral health, and social services to deliver a radically better experience of care for every member and community we serve.

Over the next year, we'll grow quickly to bring better care to many more members and their communities. To do this, we need people who, like us, believe that everyone should have good care for what matters to them, in their community.

Our work is grounded in a belief in the power of a diverse community. To close gaps in care and advance equity in the communities we serve, we have to start with making our own team diverse and inclusive. Our ways of working are characterized by creativity, collaboration, and mutual learning that comes from bringing together a community from diverse backgrounds and perspectives. We strive to ensure that every person on the Cityblock team, and every Cityblock member, feels supported and included as a part of our community.

Our Values:
Aim for Understanding
Be All In
Bring Your Whole Self
Lean Into Discomfort
Put Members First
About the Role:

We are seeking a healthcare data analyst to design and build analytic solutions that will inform clinical decisions, drive improvement in total cost of care and health outcomes for our member populations, measure our performance and demonstrate our value as a company. You will proactively build and maintain rules-based algorithms that drive improvement in total cost of care, clinical model efficiency and health outcomes.

Healthcare data is complicated, so you must be excited about digging deep into complex data, and coming up with interesting, actionable insights to communicate to the team. Behind every data element is a real person, with real problems that Cityblock is working hard to address, and the Data team is responsible for delivering accurate and timely information to steer these efforts.

If you like hard problems, have experience pulling insight out of complex structured and unstructured data sources, and are an amazing teammate, we want to hear from you!

Requirements for the Role:
You have 3+ years of experience in a highly operational data analysis role with at least 2 of these being healthcare related.
You have experience with healthcare data (eg claims, EHR, HIE feeds, Pharmacy Benefits, etc) and standard clinical metrics and taxonomies (DRGs, total cost of care, HCC, etc)
You are a strong SQL programmer, with experience navigating and cleaning messy data at scale. Experience with DBT is a bonus.
Experience building data products using Looker/LookML (or equivalent like Tableau)
You can story-tell using data
How We Define Success:
You can identify specific cost, outcome and engagement drivers, patterns and/or trends; and then partner with market clinical and operational leaders who will implement changes to systematically impact these drivers either through process improvement or through decision-support within our platforms (Commons & EMRs).
Ability to perform complex descriptive analyses over production-scale datasets to drive business decisions. Critically interrogate and interpret data to spot patterns, explain data and ensure that insights are actionable within the markets.
Support the evaluation strategy of the clinical model by partnering with the data science and market teams to evaluate the impact of clinical interventions providing insights that drive improvement. Support analysis of key care model customization between markets and evaluate how these differences impact outcomes.
Partner with Medical Economics and Data Science to improve our population risk stratification, member archetypes and identification approaches, driving at identifying the most impacted members for each type of risk contract arrangement.
Develop analytic methods and outputs that support the implementation of a high value network strategy for markets where we are the primary provider
Partner with the Clinical Leads to design and deliver real-time Looker dashboards and other management tools that yield important leading indicators and display the most effective data for driving change.
Partner with actuary on the rollout and integration of benchmark data to support the insights
Nice to Have, But Not Required:
Experience in a high growth technology company.
Experience in a healthcare entity that takes captivated risk
Comfort across a range of data analysis tools such as Python or R
What We'd Like From You:
A resume and/or LinkedIn profile
A short cover letter and link to any public portfolio or previous data analyses and visualization work.
Cityblock values diversity as a core tenet of the work we do and the populations we serve. We are an equal opportunity employer, indiscriminate of race, religion, ethnicity, national origin, citizenship, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, veteran status, disability, genetic information, or any other protected characteristic.

-

We do not accept unsolicited resumes from outside recruiters/placement agencies. Cityblock will not pay fees associated with resumes presented through unsolicited means.",3.7,"Cityblock Health
3.7","New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2017,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
178,Data Analyst,-1,"MW Partners is currently seeking a Data Analyst to work for our client who is a global information services organization.

Responsibilities and duties:
Detailed analysis of consumer data and categorization results
Refine requirements for Data pre and post processing
Develop expertise in operation and understanding of categorization System
Execute ad-hoc/daily/weekly Tasks required for operating and training categorization system
Support Taxonomy requirements in partnership with product team
Provide support for data science and analytics across enterprise user base
Support development and operation of data standardization processes
Monitor Operational KPIs and suggest necessary actions to address identified issues
Review categorization corrections, updates and optimizations
Support and contribute to documentation and standardization efforts
Support assessment of immediate and long-term value of new data sources, including identification of missing consumer data/information elements
Collaborate with business stakeholders and Artemis Engineering teams

Requirements:
Advanced degree in economics, statistics, physics, math, or another quantitative field
Experience or understanding of Text Analytics and NLP (natural language processing) techniques and sparse data
Familiarity with probability, statistical inference, optimization algorithms, linear algebra, and calculus.
Familiarity with available and prevalent Machine Learning algorithms
Ability to write code in Python, as well as proficiency with SQL
Demonstrable analytical and problem-solving abilities, coupled with an enquiring mind and the ability to learn quickly
Familiarity building supervised and unsupervised models using statistical or machine learning approaches
Ability to creatively problem-solve, and to thrive in a highly collaborative, multidisciplinary environment
Holistic and end to end approach to data, including querying, aggregation, deep analysis, visualization and models; communicate and present findings/actionable insights to audiences at varying levels of technical sophistication
Flexible and adaptable to learn and understand new technologies
Strong business acumen with ability to clearly articulate research goals and results to technical and business audiences
Efficiently manage his/her own project queue and develop streamlined workflows

Bonus Points For
Prior professional experience in the financial industry
Ph.D. in economics, statistics, physics, math, or another quantitative field
Ability to initiate and drive projects from ideation to implementation
Prior professional experience building deep-learning models and familiarity with the popular frameworks (Tensorflow or PyTorch is a huge bonus)
Experience with deep learning and other advanced modeling approaches to extract and automate insights from data
Understanding of current trends in machine learning interpretability and transparency

For a confidential discussion or to find out more, contact Gaurav Arora on 323-230-4181 or apply now.",3.7,"MW Partners
3.7","Costa Mesa, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
179,Data Analyst,$49k-$90k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Analyst
Job Description
DATA ANALYST – IRVINE, CA OVERVIEW CoStar Group is the world’s leading provider of information and marketing solutions for the Commercial Real Estate industry. We are a NASDAQ listed company with a market cap of over US$30B and sit alongside other notable names such as Amazon, Facebook, Google and Apple. As a technology company, we are the trusted partner for all commercial real estate professionals empowering many of the most well-respected landlords, development companies, brokerage firms, banks, lenders, investors and government agencies. We do this by actively researching the commercial real estate markets and providing data, analytics, innovative tools and powerful marketing platforms in the U.S. and Internationally to help our clients transact with one another. CoStar continues to win multiple awards including one of Forbes most innovative companies (2017) and Fortune’s fastest growing companies (2018). As Data Analyst, you will be responsible for gathering and interpreting data to identify opportunities for improvement in the data quality, coverage, and consistency. This individual will need to have the ability to query data sources and databases to isolate data anomalies and provide recommendations for how those anomalies should be handled partnering with management. To be successful in the role, multitasking and managing multiple systems individually or as part of a team will be required. This work includes leveraging various manual performance reporting monitors to determine if an issue exists and its severity, timely reporting of events and performance statistics. RESPONSIBILITIES Communicate issue statuses and challenges to management Regularly review site for data defects and identify ways to remediate the defects before data is in production Ensure that required Service Level Agreements (SLAs) are met Notify internal team of performance issues and trends Understand applications and their interdependencies Root Cause Analyst (RCA) and follow up both internal and external Provides end user education for the interpretation of business data Generate datasets and identify business metrics Manages the Power BI environment, Enhancements and support of Power BI applications Manage user security and authorization to the Power BI environment Documentation of business and IT solutions, business process functional and nonfunctional requirements and problems Maintain consistent and standardized use of metrics across all reports and dashboards Utilizes a user group forum to share best practices around analytical findings based on the analysis conducted Other assigned tasks and projects to support the success and achievement of objectives of the Feed Operations team BASIC QUALIFICATIONS Bachelor Degree required Experience in Business Analyst role Proficient in MS Office tools required Experience with XML and XSD Strong understanding of SQL including Tables, View, Stored Procedures, Functions PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS AND SKILLS Excellent communications and interpersonal skills Excellent problem-solving skills, with a technical aptitude Ability to work independently Must be detail-oriented and possess strong organizational, written and verbal skills Proven capacity to effectively interface with dynamic development teams Ability to prioritize, multi-task and be proactive. Prior experience and passion for leveraging data to drive significant business impact Possess the intellectual curiosity to work through ambiguity Ability to work independently with minimal instructions Ability to prioritize and organize effectively and manage multiple projects/assignments Data quality automation experience Proven ability to perform effectively in a fast-paced environment Understands data elements in the data warehouse at a very detailed level to support any form of user needs from research to adhoc queries to managing large information projects. WHY COSTAR? The industry leader with an energetic and fast paced dynamic culture Innovative technology and a reputation for outstanding products 95% customer renewal rate Consistent 20%+ average of year over year growth Outstanding sales and product training programs Excellent career growth opportunities High compensation with uncapped commissions and an outstanding annual Presidents Club trip Exceptional benefit plan including an employee discounted stock purchase plan Be part of a team of sales professionals enjoying the opportunity to learn, do, and grow in a rewarding atmosphere. But don't just take our word for it - see why our team chose to work at and stay at CoStar Group:",3.1,"CoStar Group
3.1","Irvine, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1987,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
180,Data Analyst,$36k-$65k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Analyst - Portsmouth

Job Details
Level
Experienced
Job Location
US-Portsmouth3003 - Portsmouth, NH
Position Type
Full Time
Education Level
Master's Degree
Job Shift
Day
Job Category
Banking
Description
Are you interested in applying your analytical and mathematical concepts expertise to further your career? Do you enjoy working in a collaborative, fun environment where success is rewarded?

Join us as Data Analyst where you will be responsible for leading analytics initiatives, provide expertise on mathematical concepts, and collaborate with other departments to identify and prioritize actionable insights. This role will perform analysis and provide reporting through Excel and dashboards within the credit union to support recommendations made to Senior Management. Qualified applicants will have to be able to communicate complex ideas to nontechnical stakeholders in a way they can easily understand. This position will also assist in implementing a data driven culture, single source of truth, and effective data governance.

Pay: Salaried position. Based on experience.

Hours: Full time, Monday – Friday, 8:30 – 5:00

Primary work location: Portsmouth, NH

The Day to Day:
Design, develop, maintain and evaluate statistical and predictive models to identify historical trends and forecast future performance.
Coordinate with different functional teams to implement models and monitor outcomes (CECL, members behavior, charge-offs, share of wallet, members lifetime value, etc.).
Develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze model performance.
Proactively develop/evaluate ROI analysis on every promotional campaigns as well as credit union products and services.
Assess the effectiveness and accuracy of all data sources and data gathering techniques for various type of analyses.
We Can Offer You:
Training to support your career goals.The chance to make a difference in your community, through day-to-day interactions and volunteerism.
Career growth opportunities.
Paid vacation and holidays.
Comprehensive medical/dental/life benefits.
401(k) plan.
Tuition assistance.
Experience and Qualifications:
Master’s degree in Math, Statistics, Management Information Systems, Computer Science, or Business is required.
Minimum 3 years’ previous experience in a complex analyst role working with large data sets and/or other practical analysis skills.
Strong working knowledge of and experience with business intelligence tools (Spotfire, Tableau, Power BI, etc.) and databases (SQL, etc.).
Knowledge of statistics techniques (regressions, tree-based, etc.) and advanced experience using statistical packages for analyzing datasets (Excel, Access, Python, R, etc.).
Understanding of data infrastructure and ETL frameworks.
Adept knowledge of financial statements and supporting schedule components.
Ability to organize and manipulate large data sets to extrapolate conclusions.
Physical Requirements:
Ability to stand for up to 2 hours.
Ability to lift boxes up to 20 pounds.
Ability to use computers for up to 8 hours.
Ability to travel to other work locations as required, if needed.
If you are looking for an exciting career, Service Credit Union is the place! Join us today!

Equal Opportunity Employer",3.5,"Service Credit Union
3.5","Portsmouth, NH",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1957,Nonprofit Organization,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
181,Business Data Analyst,-1,"As BI Analyst, you'll be responsible for making sense of large data sets with statistical models, data visualization and more. You will need the insight that 10x's our business in some aspect that the rest of us simply aren't equipped to see. You will work on the data team with a Sr. Analyst and with virtually every functional organization at Atom, including product, engineering, marketing, business development, and operations which means you'll have access to a slew of very different challenges and data sets to conquer.

Design, develop, and utilize Business Intelligence (BI) solutions to extract, analyze, and discern patterns and trends in data to inform the company’s business and marketing strategies. Consult with senior management and internal customers to gather BI requirements based on analytical and reporting needs. Work with the BI team to develop and maintain a comprehensive dashboard to track and measure Key Performance Indicators (KPI’s) and provide actionable insights to drive business growth. Develop data models to forecast and predict customer behavior using machine learning techniques. Execute complex queries of structured and non-structured data sets at scale using Redshift, PostgreSQL, and mySQL. Analyze large data sets and track advertisement and marketing metrics for various platforms using statistical modeling, regression analysis, and data visualization techniques. Prepare reports for management on client demographics and preferences, ticket sales, and other proprietary indicators on a weekly and monthly basis. Make recommendations on the company’s user experience, targeted advertising techniques, and business strategies based on data analysis. Perform ad-hoc analyses as directed by management. Stay abreast of the latest technological advances and industry trends in information technology, data analytics, and Business Intelligence.

Requirements
Bachelor's degree in Business Analytics, Information Technology, or a related field, and 2+ years of experience in the job offered or a related BI position
The position requires skills and knowledge in data modeling, data analysis, SQL (Redshift, PostgreSQL, and mySQL), Tableau, Looker (or any other BI tools).
Experience in visualizing large and complex datasets in a commercial/business environment.
Experience in forecasting; helping marketing with modeling/forecasting ROI & customer LTV.
Ability to assisting product management on extracting user behavior patterns
Experience providing leadership with regular ""health of business"" reviews
Great communication skills both verbally and written
Experience with statistical packages/programming environments such as R, Matlab, SPSS, or those included with popular Python libraries like ggplotlib/Rcpp/dplyr/NumPy/SciPy/etc.
Experience querying structured and non-structured data sets at scale using SQL/HQL/Redshift or frameworks such as Pig, Scalding, Shark/Spark, Impala, etc.
Advanced expertise with MS Excel
This role does not include any sponsorship and that authorization to work in the US is a pre-condition to employment.

About Atom Tickets:
Atom is a mobile first, social ticketing platform that has re-imagined the movie experience from the ground up. We’ve simplified everything from when you decide you want to see a movie to when the lights go down and the previews start. We’re a team of bright, driven, and experienced developers, product designers, and movie lovers and we use data to improve the way our products work and theaters operate. We’re backed by influential movie studios including Disney, Fox, and Lionsgate, and we’re bringing innovative industry-first features to market such as dynamic pricing and pre-ordering concessions. Sound like fun? Come join our team!

Atom Tickets is an equal opportunity employer. All aspects of employment, including hiring decisions, will be based on merit, competence, performance, and business needs. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, marital status, age, national origin, ancestry, physical or mental disability, medical condition, pregnancy, genetic information, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran status, or any other status protected under federal, state or local law - not only because it is the law, but also because we believe an inclusive and diverse workplace drives innovation.",4.6,"Atom Tickets
4.6","Santa Monica, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Ticket Sales,"Arts, Entertainment & Recreation",Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
182,Data Analyst,-1,"What Is The Job?

As a Private Equity Data Analyst on our team, you will be working with our Advanced Analytics team that includes a data scientist and data engineer to find and execute actionable insights to improve the business of our portfolio companies.

You will need excellent communication skills because you will be communicating with the CEO and other C-level executives, as well as their technology teams, to transfer reports to actionable insights. You will design, develop and implement reports to fulfill business requirements and lead the development of business and functional requirements to ensure effective working relationships with the business department

This role is located in New York City, but for the time-being we are all working remote, but we hope to return to our office in the near future.

Who Are We?

We are a family investment office located in Downtown New York City. We make long-term majority ownership investments in middle-market businesses and work hands-on with our companies to help support long-term growth and success. We pride ourselves on an excellent work culture and make sure to uphold those expectations across all platforms of the company.

What Skills Do You Need?
Excellent communications Skills
Snowflake
Tableau
SQL
PowerBI is a plus
Outgoing and energetic personality
Compensation?
$140,000 - $160,000
15% Targe Bonus
Full Medical, Dental and Vision Benefits
Very lucrative matching 401k
What’s in it for you?

This is an opportunity to join a company and have an immediate impact. We offer a great culture and stability. As an analyst if you are looking to make a pivot in the near future and get into Data Engineering or Machine Learning Engineering, this opportunity gives you a clear path to move into that position.",5.0,"Averity
5.0","New York, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
183,Data Analyst,$28k-$52k (Glassdoor Est.),"Fust Charles Chambers LLP, a premier accounting, tax and advisory services Firm in Central New York is seeking a Data Analyst that is looking to apply their data analysis skills and experience in delivering services to the Firm’s clients and learn and grow within the Firm.

Responsibilities
Various data analysis projects associated with performance audits and other special projects
Develop, implement and update testing methodologies and audit programs to determine compliance with various regulations, laws, policies and procedures
Gather and analyze financial and other data/information related to the engagement
Interpret data and analyze outcomes to ensure accurate testing results
Document test work performed in clear and concise workpapers providing audit trail of work performed
Research legislation, interpret regulations and apply to data analysis to determine compliance
Apply audit skepticism throughout data analysis and test work
Provide on-going updates and reports
Identify and escalate audit or data issues and concerns
Requirements
MS in Accounting or MBA, or BS in Information Management, or Information Technology
Proven working experience analyzing data
Proven project management skills and strong organizational skills
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
Intermediate Excel skills required, advanced Excel skills and knowledge of IDEA data analysis software preferred
Ability to understand and resolve complex problems and ability to manipulate data points
Adept at data queries, report writing and presenting findings
Audit experience and healthcare experience preferred
Strong oral and written communication skills as well as strong interpersonal skills
1-3 years’ experience in a public accounting or private company environment, preferably with some data analysis experience
Limited travel, 10% or less
Our culture places great emphasis on integrity, teamwork and quality of life. We offer an excellent compensation/benefits package including a competitive salary, health insurance, retirement savings plan and the opportunity to grow with an industry leader.

Please submit your resume with letter of interest to Tricia Sherwood (tsherwood@fcc-cpa.com) or apply online.

Fust Charles Chambers LLP is an Equal Opportunity Employer

*By submitting your resume, transcript and other pertinent information, you authorize Fust Charles Chambers LLP to share said information with firm personnel involved in recruiting and, specifically, those who participate in your interview, should one take place.*",4.4,"Fust Charles Chambers
4.4","Syracuse, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1986,Company - Private,Accounting,Accounting & Legal,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
184,Data Analyst,$48k-$65k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Analyst, HARN1730, Atlanta GA
Job Description:
We are currently seeking a Data Analyst to plan, analyze, design and construct information systems on an enterprise-wide basis or across a major sector of the enterprise applying an enterprise-wide set of disciplines.
Qualifications
Key Responsibilities:
Provides high-level expertise in information modeling, requirement analysis and facilitation using methodologies such as Integrated DEFinition (IDEF) or related techniques.
Performs analysis to develop fully attributed logical and physical information (data) and business process models following IDEF methodologies.
Gathers requirements using facilitation techniques in order to collect and define data.
Processes requirements necessary to support complex large scale and/or decision support systems.
Uses modeling tools and repositories to effectively and efficiently define and manage the gathering/dissemination of data and business process requirements.
Uses information gathered to develop database specifications.
Designs relational database schemas to support large-scale, mid-tier clients/server, or web-based applications.
Provides technical guidance in software engineering techniques and automated support tools.
Provide expert level knowledge of:
Microsoft SQL Server
ERWin Data Modeller, Microsoft Visio
Orion Rhapsody
Extract, Transform and Load (ETL) processes
SAS
IDEF or equivalent data modeling notations
Jira

Basic Qualifications:
Must have a Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or related field
Must have a minimum 10+ years' experience as a mid to senior-level data modeler

Professional Skills:
Excellent verbal, interpersonal and written communication skills
Strong analytical, problem-solving and decision making capabilities
Team player with the ability to work in a fast-paced environment
Ability to multi-task in a fast-paced environment
Demonstrated outstanding level of professionalism in providing administrative support, including ability to exercise good judgment, discretion, tact, and diplomacy
Sound business ethics, including the protection of proprietary and confidential information
Ability to apply detailed knowledge of organizational procedures to make independent decisions and serve as a credible resource for a senior management team
Ability to work with all levels of internal staff, as well as outside clients and vendors
Excellent problem solving skills with ability to analyze situations, identify existing or potential problems and recommend solutions
Strong oral and written communication skills
Superior interpersonal skills including courtesy, professionalism, and a cooperative attitude
Ability to be flexible to handle multiple priorities and to work limited overtime as necessary
Eligible candidates please email your resume to Priscilla.Edwards@HarnessSolutions.com or call 484.514.1861 Extension 1022",4.0,"Harness Solution
4.0","Atlanta, GA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
185,Data Analyst,-1,"DESCRIPTION

HappiLabs is a small business with locations in San Francisco and Chicago that provides a service to scientists called the Virtual Lab Manager. We support scientists in various ways, virtually, and act as an outsourced purchasing department for biotech companies and scientific research labs.

Our mission: to improve the happiness of scientists and the quality of their research.

HappiLabs is looking for a Data Analyst to manage and maintain our day-to-day data collection, as well as identify trends in order to help increase company revenue and efficiency. Strong analytical skills and attention to detail are critical for this position, as well as the ability to communicate and present data clearly and accurately. The ideal candidate for this position is detail-oriented and able to consistently meet deadlines.

MAIN RESPONSIBILITIES

Maintaining existing software systems related to business intelligence, reporting and data analysis
Identify improvements to existing business intelligence, reporting and data analysis
Communicate findings to company through standard and ad hoc reports
Use data to identify business patterns and trends
Day-to-day quality control of data collection and management
Automate other business processes by searching for existing apps or building simple, custom solutions

QUALIFICATIONS

Bachelor’s Degree in Data Science or related field
Strong attention to detail
Adaptability and creative problem solving
Strong analytical skills
Experience manipulating data and presenting via Domo and G Suite
Ability to prioritize and multitask
Mac/Apple user
SQL knowledge is a plus, but not required

BENEFITS

Salary $40k-45k, depending on experience
Medical and dental insurance for you and your family
In-office snacks drinks

$40,000-$45,000",-1,HappiLabs,"Chicago, IL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
186,Data Analyst,$39k-$70k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview:

Manages the research data of a multi-year randomized controlled trial, designed to alter developmental origins of disease via reduction of prenatal stress exposure. This position interacts closely with multiple stakeholders within and outside of the study, including the scientific leads, operational sponsors, study participants, and other academic and clinical partners. The ideal candidate will have a demonstrated history of working independently with initiative and a strong sense of personal responsibility while maintaining a high standard managing complex data. Responsibilities include: Monitoring multiple systems to assure protocol adherence and data quality. Maintaining research data and preparing reports, preparing data files for analysis, and performing some independent statistical analysis of clinical research data for evaluation / process improvement purposes.

Responsibilities:
Manages data capture, archival, curation and documentation for a complex clinical research study.
Develops and maintains systems for assuring adherence to study protocols and compliance with internal and external policies, standards, rules and regulations.
Identifies need for and coordinates participant follow up at each stage of the project.
Continuously ensures data quality and integrity by monitoring and validating study data as it is collected, and by maintaining reliable systems for data governance.
Maintains active surveillance of study operations to anticipate and proactively avoid fault points and barriers to study progress.
Performs foundational statistical analysis of clinical research data and works with study statistician to implement more complex statistical analyses as needed.
Works collaboratively as part of a multi-disciplinary team at Lurie Children's and Northwestern University with academic and clinical partners as well as study participants.
Responds to support requests and general questions from study participants regarding data collection equipment, study protocols, research consents, etc.
Monitors recruitment and documentation of study participants in accordance with study protocols, often working in close collaboration with clinicians and other staff.
Promotes clinical research activities within the hospital and the community.
Qualifications:
Bachelors degre in social or behavioral sciences, physical science, education, nursing or related health field is required. Master's degree preferred.
1-2 years of experience working in a research setting preferred.
Strong analytical, computational and organizational skills with consistent attention to detail. Strong customer service skills.
Strong verbal and written communication skills in order to address diverse/large audiences.
Demonstrated working knowledge of regulatory practices required.
Proficient in Microsoft Word and PowerPoint, with advanced skills in Excel (or similar) for data curation, analysis and basic visualization.
Knolwedge of / experience with collecting and manipulating data in REDCap and/or orther data capture software.
Experience with database or statistical tools such as SQL, R, SASS or SPSS preferred.",4.1,"Ann & Robert H. Lurie Children's Hospital of Chicago
4.1","Chicago, IL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2012,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
187,Data Analyst,$37k-$66k (Glassdoor Est.),"Department

MEDICAL & MOLECULAR GENETICS (IN-MMGE-IUINA)

Job Summary

Analyze research and specimen data for multiple genetic studies and biorepositories. Transform data from different sources to a common format needed for existing database systems for data migrations. Create queries or design other methods to ensure data validity, both internal and external to the database system. Design and program scripts, perform tests, and prepare documentation of study databases. Perform analysis and programming tasks in a data processing environment. Build project dashboards and web applications to meet specific project requirements.

Required Qualifications

Bachelor's degree in computer science or a related field and three years of scientific/bioinformatics related experience.

Combinations of education and related experience may be considered.

SQL (SQL Server or Oracle) experience and basic knowledge of relational databases. Strong organizational and documentation skills. Time management skills, including ability to maintain calm and composed in light of a multitude of tasks and deadlines. Ability to effectively communicate and exchange information with a wide diversity of individuals and groups.

Preferred Qualifications

Knowledge in NoSQL databases like MongoDB. Experience in R and Python.

Working Conditions / Demands

Must complete essential job duties with or without an accommodation.

Work Location

IUPUI

Indianapolis, Indiana

Job Classification

Salary Plan: PAE

Salary Grade: 3IT

FLSA: Exempt

Job Function: Information Technology

Posting Disclaimer

Due to the COVID-19 pandemic, there may be differences in the working conditions as advertised in our standard job postings (e.g., the ability to travel from one campus to another, etc.). If you are invited for an interview, please discuss your questions or concerns regarding the working conditions at that time.

This posting is scheduled to close at 11:59 pm EST on the advertised Close Date. This posting may be closed at any time at the discretion of the University, but will remain open for a minimum of 5 business days. To guarantee full consideration, please submit your application within 5 business days of the Posted Date.

If you wish to include a cover letter, you may include it with your resume when uploading attachments.

Equal Employment Opportunity

Indiana University is an equal employment and affirmative action employer and a provider of ADA services. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, ethnicity, color, race, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, national origin, disability status or protected veteran status. Indiana University does not discriminate on the basis of sex in its educational programs and activities, including employment and admission, as required by Title IX. Questions or complaints regarding Title IX may be referred to the U.S. Department of Education Office for Civil Rights or the university Title IX Coordinator. See Indiana University’s Notice of Non-Discrimination here which includes contact information.

Campus Safety and Security

The Annual Security and Fire Safety Report, containing policy statements, crime and fire statistics for all Indiana University campuses, is available online. You may also request a physical copy by emailing IU Public Safety at iups@iu.edu or by visiting IUPD.

Contact Us

Request Support
Telephone: 812-856-1234",4.2,"Indiana University
4.2","Indianapolis, IN",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1820,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
188,Data Analyst,$46k-$89k (Glassdoor Est.),"TeeChip, a Scalable Press brand, is a fast-growing global e-commerce platform that lets sellers create and sell print-on-demand items without having to worry about manufacturing, warehousing, payments, fulfillment, or customer support. Sellers create stores on the TeeChip platform, design products by uploading their own artwork and designs, and market products via paid and organic posts on a variety of platforms including Facebook, Google, and Pinterest.

As a part of our global expansion TeeChip is building a team of world class Engineers in Coppell Texas. We are currently looking for a Data Analyst who will solve challenging problems while helping develop our highly regarded products. You will communicate directly with our engineering teams in San Francisco and Guadalajara and Taipei on diverse complex technical challenges.

Please send an ENGLISH version of your resume

Requirements:


2+ year Looker experience
5+ year experience with data analysis tools BI Tools
Strong SQL skills. Experience navigating large data sets to distill unique, actionable insights
Excellent written communication skills
Strong project management skills
Responsibilities:


Day-to-day data and business analytics supporting Product team
Directly communicated with stakeholders to identify and deliver their data needs
Collaborate with data-engineering team to upgrade ETL pipelines to address gaps
Develop analytical models to evaluate performance and contribute to forecasting analyses
Drive automation and improvement in forecast data quality utilizing reporting tools and dashboards
Establish frameworks to report demand trends and to evaluate key product, sales and finance initiatives
Project manage requests based on impact vs investment
Prepare and present analyses, findings, and executive reports including strategic reviews with senior executives and key stakeholders
Create monthly, quarterly, yearly and ad hoc reports as required
Special projects as assigned
Fun Facts:


Scalable Press has never raised funding - our company is bootstrapped and profitable.
We have over 300 employees.
Our facilities include over 350,000 square feet of production space.
We print and ship millions of products each year.",3.5,"Scalable Press
3.5","Coppell, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
189,Sr. Data Analyst/Modeler,$39k-$69k (Glassdoor Est.),"ORGANIZATION*
The Center for Autism and Related Disorders, LLC (CARD) is the world’s largest and most experienced organizations effectively treating individuals of all ages who are diagnosed with autism spectrum disorder. CARD strives to meet the growing need for services by continuously opening new offices throughout the country to provide top-quality ABA therapy across all populations.

CARD was founded in 1990 by leading autism expert and clinical psychologist Doreen Granpeesheh, PhD, BCBA-D. CARD treats individuals with ASD using the principles of applied behavior analysis (ABA), which is empirically proven to be the most effective method for treating individuals with ASD and recommended by the American Academy of Pediatrics and the US Surgeon General. With locations throughout US and internationally, CARD’s mission is to provide access to top-quality treatment all over the world. Through its network of trained technicians, behavior analysts, and researchers, CARD develops and implements quality, comprehensive, and individualized treatment programs that lead to success.
DESCRIPTION*
The Sr. Data Analyst is responsible for supporting the business users through the analysis of quantitative & qualitative data by designing database models both logical and physical. The position will perform in-depth data analysis; develop database models, database processes and functional analysis across various lines database methodologies specific to Business Intelligence. This role will provide oversight and on database design decisions, data models, best practices, and processes. The Data Analyst, will serve as a key liaison with business clients to support their reporting and analytic needs. You will require hands-on experience working in large scale business intelligence and data platforms. You will be working with business clients to gather requirements, prototype, architect, test, and deliver high quality Business Intelligence solutions.
DUTIES & RESPONSIBILITIES*
Experience with database and analytics tools on large, complex data sets, including use of SQL Queries (T-SQL), BI Cubes (SSRS/SSAS) Excel, PowerBI and relevant data mining tools.
Conducts data validations and analysis to assess the completeness and accuracy of data.
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets
Assist with data extraction, manipulation, and transformation based on requirements from stakeholders.
Assist with the maintenance of data sources, accounts, and datasets as it pertains to our data platforms
Analysis will include cleansing, transforming, validating or modeling data for improving data quality, design and presentation.
Work closely with internal Research teams, Analytics, and Technology teams as well as external vendors to ensure that data requirements can be met and executed
Summarize, document, and present analysis findings
Implement and represent CARD policy enthusiastically
Locate and define new process improvement opportunities
Represent CARD professionally and ethically to internal and external stakeholders
EXPERIENCE & QUALIFICATIONS*
BS in math, statistics, economics or related field preferred
Minimum of 5 years of experience as a Data Analyst
Minimum of 5 years of experience in advanced SQL queries and analysis.
Prior hands-on experience in using MS-SQL, ETL tools, Business Objects or other related BI tools
Excellent analytical skills
Able to communicate clearly and professionally with all levels of an organization.
Strong interpersonal, written and verbal communication skills with demonstrated ability to work in a team environment.
Ability to express complex technical concepts in business terms.
Proficient in designing database models (both logical and physical)
Familiarity with BI tools like Dundas BI or Power BI, etc.
JIRA required
Experience with Redshift
IND2

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
data analyst: 5 years (Required)
JIRA: 3 years (Required)
SQL: 5 years (Required)",2.9,"The Center for Autism and Related Disorders, LLC.
2.9","Plano, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1990,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
190,Data Analyst,$103k-$155k (Glassdoor Est.),"Zipongo sits at the forefront of how we eat, made exponentially more important during the ongoing pandemic -- we all need help with eating well, getting groceries or restaurant meals delivered, cooking with family, or supporting elderly family members' eating. Zipongo serves the broader community closely partnered with leading health plans and Fortune 100 companies, and we take a data-based approach and strategy to everything we do. We are constantly evolving our strategy, platform, and how we support our clients with data, and we are looking for a Strategic Data Lead that can help us scale our efforts.
capacity to use technical tools/language and systems to systematically clean data
capacity to create clean ontologies of data and update as needed
capacity to create self-sustaining/updating data feeds
capacity to ask intelligent questions of the data and identify data opportunities
capacity to understand business/customer needs and evolve data ontology and data processes (with help of devs) to reinforce needs
capacity to create dynamic reports via lookr or other tools that serve baseline and higher level info/insights purposes",4.0,"Zipongo
4.0","San Jose, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
191,Data Analyst,$48k-$83k (Glassdoor Est.),"Posting Details

Working Title Data Analyst
Position Location Fort Collins, CO
Research Professional Position No
Posting Number 202000698AP
Position Type Admin Professional/ Research Professional
Classification Title Prof/Indiv Contrib I
Number of Vacancies 1
Work Hours/Week 40
Proposed Annual Salary Range $50,000-$60,000
Desired Start Date 11/03/2020
Position End Date (if temporary)
To ensure full consideration, applications must be received by 11:59pm (MT) on 10/08/2020
Description of Work Unit

CSU Online, Division of Continuing Education, is a self-supporting unit that develops and delivers quality programs and educational opportunities in support of the University’s land grant mission. CSU Online provides affordable access to a quality education from wherever students call home around the nation and the world, on a schedule that fits their lives. CSU Online offers more than 40 degrees, online and at a distance, as well as credit and noncredit courses, certificate programs, and digital badges.
Position Summary

This position is responsible for supporting the advancement of CSU Online goals and daily operations through the collection, interpretation and communication of critical data including, but not limited to learning, financial, marketing and business data. This position will work with staff both within and outside CSU Online to facilitate data driven business decisions.

This position relies on both technical capability in the form of data mining and querying through a variety of analytics tools, as well as organizational capabilities in the form of report and dashboard design and creation. The ability to present data in an easily consumable manner is essential to this role.

The right candidate will contribute to a dynamic environment and work closely with other members of the Institutional Research & Analytics team, to develop cutting-edge solutions for database applications, business intelligence, learning analytics, data visualization, and digital reporting tools.

Some after-hours and weekend work are required. This position reports to the IT Manager for CSU Online.
Required Job Qualifications

• Bachelor’s degree from an accredited college or university in field, such as computer science, economics, mathematics, statistics, psychology, sociology, natural science or related degree.
• Evidence of effective written, oral, and visual communication skills.
• Evidence of personal initiative and ability to independently pursue solutions.
• At least three years professional experience in a combination of the following:
o Compiling, merging, and cleaning data from multiple sources and systems.
o Extracting data from relational databases using SQL.
o Analyzing and interpreting quantitative and qualitative data.
o Use of languages functionally required for data analytics. (e.g. R, Python, etc.)
o Development of reports and dashboards used for data analytics purposes.
o Provide insight and direction in the selection and configuration of analytics applications. (e.g. Tableau, PowerBI)
o Communication of analysis and results to non-technical individuals.
• The successful candidate must be legally authorized to work in the United States by the proposed start date; Continuing Education/CSU Online will not provide visa sponsorship for this position.
Preferred Job Qualifications

• Advanced degree or certifications directly related to data analytics.
• Experience working with data in a Higher Education environment.
• Demonstrated ability to perform accurate and thorough statistical analyses including both descriptive and inferential statistics (e.g., linear and logistic regression, t-tests, etc.).
• Experience developing, administering, and analyzing survey questionnaires as well as familiarity with survey tools such as Qualtrics.
• Experience conducting focus groups and interviews.
• Demonstrated ability to design effective data visualizations.
• Ability to manage multiple requests and deadlines, as well as communicate task and project progress to organization staff.
• Capable of working independently on assignments, collaborating with others, as well as the ability to maintain effective working relationships.
Diversity Statement

Reflecting departmental and institutional values, candidates are expected to have the ability to advance the Department’s commitment to diversity and inclusion.

Essential Duties

Job Duty Category Data Analysis & Reporting
Duty/Responsibility

• Collect assessment and research data (e.g., perform data mining in digital learning tools and transactional systems, administer surveys, host focus groups, conduct interviews).
• Extract, clean, process, and validate data using industry standard tools (e.g. SQL, Python, R) for analysis.
• Perform qualitative and quantitative data analysis using industry standard tools. (R, SQL, SPSS, and/or Excel)
• Develop automated reports using industry standard tools (e.g. SQL, R, Python, Tableau, Einstein, PowerBI, etc.) to provide feedback and analysis results to key stakeholders (e.g., instructors, instructional designers, university officials, and administrators) to inform decision-making and strategic planning.
• Write assessment, research, and program evaluation reports.
• Design and deliver presentations based on assessment and research to university officials, administrators, instructors, and advisors, as well as at research and industry conferences.
• Develop data documentation and assist in the design of data models.
• Stay up-to-date on methods in analytics (e.g., data mining, research modeling, and statistical methods) and educational research.
• Explore and test analytics tools and data-visualization software.
Percentage Of Time 70%

Job Duty Category Assessment Project Design and Support
Duty/Responsibility

• Confer with stakeholders to gather and understand requirements for data requests, project design, and reporting needs based on business objectives.
• Work with faculty and administrators at CSU Online and across the University to plan, design, and consult on educational research projects.
• Design assessment tools (survey, focus group, interview questions) for gathering feedback and data on CSU programs and processes.
Percentage Of Time 20%

Job Duty Category Project Management
Duty/Responsibility

• Manage small projects and prioritize tasks associated with those projects.
• Coordinate departmental teams (e.g. Marketing, Programs, etc.) and external parties on analytics projects.
• Supervise undergraduate and graduate student employees.
Percentage Of Time 10%

Special Instructions to Applicants

Applications will be accepted until the position is filled. Interested applicants must submit a cover letter which addresses how professional experiences align with identified required and preferred qualifications of the position and a current resume. Reference checks will be conducted through an online system called SkillSurvey. If you advance to the reference check stage, you will be asked to provide contact information for your references. References will not be contacted without prior notification of candidates.
Conditions of Employment Pre-employment Criminal Background Check (required for new hires)
Search Contact Erin Thompson, erin.thompson@colostate.edu
EEO Statement

Colorado State University is committed to providing an environment that is free from discrimination and harassment based on race, age, creed, color, religion, national origin or ancestry, sex, gender, disability, veteran status, genetic information, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or pregnancy and will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. Colorado State University is an equal opportunity/equal access/affirmative action employer fully committed to achieving a diverse workforce and complies with all Federal and Colorado State laws, regulations, and executive orders regarding non-discrimination and affirmative action. The Office of Equal Opportunity is located in 101 Student Services.

The Title IX Coordinator is the Vice President for Equity, Equal Opportunity, and Title IX, 123 Student Services Building, Fort Collins, CO. 80523, (970) 491-1715.

The Section 504 and ADA Coordinator is the Vice President for Equity, Equal Opportunity, and Title IX, 101 Student Services Building, Fort Collins, CO 80523-0160, (970) 491-5836.
Background Check Policy Statement

Colorado State University strives to provide a safe study, work, and living environment for its faculty, staff, volunteers and students. To support this environment and comply with applicable laws and regulations, CSU conducts background checks. The type of background check conducted varies by position and can include, but is not limited to, criminal history, sex offender registry, motor vehicle history, financial history, and/or education verification. Background checks will also be conducted when required by law or contract and when, in the discretion of the University, it is reasonable and prudent to do so.

References Requested

Minimum Requested
Maximum Requested

Supplemental Questions

Required fields are indicated with an asterisk (*).
*
Do you have a bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university in field, such as computer science, economics, mathematics, statistics, psychology, sociology, natural science or related degree?
Yes
No
*
Please list how many years of experience you have in each of the following:
Compiling, merging, and cleaning data from ,multiple sources and systems.
Extracting data from relational databases using SQL.
Analyzing and interpreting quantitative and qualitative data
Use of languages functionally required for data analytics (e.g. R, Python, etc)
Development of reports and dashboards used for data analytics purposes
Provide insight and direction in the selection and configuration of analytics applications (e.g. Tableau, PowerBi)
Communication of analysis and results to non-technical individuals.

(Open Ended Question)
*
CSU Online will not provide sponsorship- Understanding this, will you be legally authorized to work by the desired start date?
Yes
No

Applicant Documents

Required Documents
Cover Letter
Resume
Optional Documents",4.2,"Colorado State University
4.2","Fort Collins, CO",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1877,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
192,Data Analyst,-1,"Opening: Data Analyst


Monterey, CA - Full Time - Posted October 20, 2020

Summary


The Naval Postgraduate School Center for Homeland Defense and Security (CHDS) has been the nation’s premier provider of Homeland Security education since 2002. Housed within CHDS, the Strategic Communications team conducts all the marketing, outreach, and public affairs in support of the Center’s programs and resources.
CHDS is seeking a Data Analyst, which is an integral member of the Strategic Communications team. This position leads the collection and analysis of data used in marketing initiatives as well as annual reports and outcome performance reports for program sponsors and partners. This position will also create reports for internal teams and/or external clients, collect and analyze data, use graphs, infographics, and other methods to visualize data and structure large data sets to tell the CHDS story and the significant impact its programs have on the security of our country. The position also works with strategic communications and other associates to process information and create presentations and reports based on statistical recommendations and findings.

Qualifications


• Bachelor’s degree or similar experience in mathematics, statistics, economics, finance, or computer science
• Analytical and problem-solving skills
• Experience with statistical software (e.g., Stata, SPSS)
• Knowledge of data gathering, cleaning, and transforming techniques
• Reporting and data visualization skills using software like Tableau
• Ability to use graphical applications to accompany reports (Adobe Indesign, Acrobat, Illustrator, etc.)
• Understanding of data warehousing and ETL techniques
• Proficiency in Microsoft Excel, Word, and PowerPoint
• Ability to maintain or update website content using a basic CMS software like WordPress
• Experience with SQL and Google Analytics
• Ability to set and meet deadlines while juggling multiple concurrent projects
• Creative thinker who can communicate openly, address client feedback in a professional manner, meet project and messaging goals, and respect deadlines
• Comfortable working on projects independently and in a group situation
• Interest in or experience with government, military, security, defense, academic programs, or writing is a plus.
• Applicant must be a U.S. citizen with the ability to pass a background check and obtain a Security Clearance
• Ability to read, write, speak, and understand English proficiently

Education


Bachelor’s degree or similar experience in mathematics, statistics, economics, finance, or computer science

Skills and Abilities


The ideal candidate will be a creative, self-motivated, goal-oriented team player who has excellent data analysis, collection, and problem-solving skills.

Salary Range


Competitive salary

Apply to this Job",4.0,"Creek Technologies
4.0","Monterey, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
193,Data Analyst,$45k-$81k (Glassdoor Est.),"U.S. News & World Report is a digital first media company dedicated to helping consumers and business professionals make important decisions. We publish independent reporting, rankings, data journalism and advice that has earned the trust of our readers and users for more than 85 years.

As a trusted authority providing empowerment and guidance that improves the quality of life for consumers and communities, U.S. News ultimately leads to better life decisions.

Your role in helping us shape the future:

As a member of the U.S. News Money team, you will be involved in supporting the Money product team to help drive the future of our business; you will be a key member of a fast-growing organization that is goal-oriented and re-shaping our future.

The primary responsibilities of the Data Analyst will be to ensure rankings data quality in a timely manner.

Are you up to the challenge?

Collect and analyze data for Money rankings, including fielding surveys

Develop expertise in ranking methodologies and data sources

Develop quality assurance procedures for data collected internally and from third party sources; ensuring accuracy of rankings computations and information displayed on usnews.com

Coordinate closely with U.S. News technical team on the development efforts related to rankings launches; providing detailed written specs, assisting in troubleshooting bugs, and testing the accuracy of data loads

Analysis tasks may include computing scores on ranking factors, modeling impact of potential methodology changes, performing multiple regression analyses, testing for statistical outliers and producing data visualizations

Meet specific project deadlines and timelines set by the product management and tech teams

Provide editorial and PR team with data used in articles, short lists, and slideshows as well as assist in the review process prior to publication

Recommend new methodologies and product features based upon data analysis

On-going data and product QA, with detailed-oriented eye for errors/ bugs

You should definitely have:

Bachelor’s degree in data science or a related field or equivalent experience

3+ years relevant work experience

High level proficiency working in MS Office Suite, specifically in Excel

Knowledge of database structures and experience writing SQL select statements to query databases

Strong oral and written communication skills

Excelled in college-level quantitative coursework (economics, math, statistics or computer science)

Attention to detail, excellent organizational skills and strong time management skills

It would be nice if you had:

Experience in JIRA

Up-to-date knowledge on Internet publishing and metrics, with an acute understanding of SEO, is a plus

What it’s like to work with us:

Talent is our best asset!

We invest in people with passion and potential who understand U.S. News’ dedication to our consumers.

Entrepreneurial, mission-driven culture with core values of quality and integrity

Focus on fostering personal and professional growth

Competitive benefits including paid vacation time, medical, tuition reimbursement, and training

Collaborative Work Environment ~ Fun, diverse, inclusive and ambitious co-workers

Other Job Info:

These statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by employees assigned to this job. This is not intended to be an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of employees assigned to this job.

Please note that we will not offer visa sponsorship for this position.",3.6,"US News & World Report ,L.P.
3.6","Washington, DC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1933,Company - Private,Publishing,Media,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
194,Business Data Analyst,-1,"Newark, Delaware
Skills : Data Analyst,Junior Business Analyst,Entry Level,MS Excel,Powerpoint,MS Word,data entry,Advanced MS Excel skills
Description :
Position Description:
To be responsible for the day to day entry level activities ensuring consistency with company strategy, commitments and goals.

Responsibilities include:
reconciling impact assessment evaluation and obtain any missing evaluations by comparing required list to the actual list
supporting UCRA approvals throgh data entry of names and securing missing approvals
compiling and publish reporting in MS Excel and MS Word to support deadline adhearance
conducting small forums by conference call to reconcile inventory and owners of various lists
Required Skills:
Strong ability to communicate (written and verbal) across all levels of associates and the enterprise
Excellent and proven detail orientation and accuracy
Proficient with MS Office (Excel, PowerPoint and Word)
Proven problem solving skills
The ideal candidate will have the following qualifications:
Advanced MS Excel skills
Data Analyst,Junior Business Analyst,Entry Level,MS Excel,Powerpoint,MS Word,data entry,Advanced MS Excel skills",4.1,"Collabera
4.1","Newark, DE",-1,10000+ Employees,1991,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
195,Junior Data Analyst,$65k-$73k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Abnormal Security:
Abnormal Security is defining the next generation of email security defense. Our platform uses machine learning and artificial intelligence to baseline communication content, user identity, and behavioral signals in real-time and at-scale in order to detect the abnormalities of email attacks.

Customers love us because we consistently detect and stop what everyone else in the market can't -- advanced attacks that have never been seen before -- and we do so with beautiful user interfaces and best-in-industry customer support.

Our veteran team has built some of the most enduring machine learning platforms at leading companies including Google, Twitter, Pinterest, Amazon, Microsoft, and Expanse. We are located in San Francisco,CA, New York, NY and Lehi, UT.

Position Summary:


We are a fast-growing cybersecurity startup that is bringing Machine Learning at scale to fraud prevention. We are looking for a Junior Data Analyst to join our Security Analytics team. You will be responsible for analyzing potential email fraud and sharing your findings with the rest of the team.

What You'll Do:

Be part of the front lines of the cybersecurity defense - identifying, catching, and preventing email fraud.
Exercise incident handling processes across Windows & Mac platforms.
Perform basic email fraud analysis.
Stay ahead of the pack with the latest attack strategies and patterns in email fraud, and adapt our detection procedures and processes accordingly.
Communicate and coordinate additional fraud analysis investigations within the team.
Requirements:


Pride and ability to apply attention to detail and judgment in accurately identifying email fraud - even as attackers are actively attempting to hide their actions.
Capable of completing technical tasks without supervision.
Ability to foster a positive work environment and attitude.
Are comfortable in a fast-paced environment working with a small, close-knit team
Why Abnormal Security:


Competitive pay
Full medical, dental, and vision health insurance benefits
Daily catered lunches and snacks
Generous PTO
Strong growth opportunities and high ownership expectations
Team-wide commitment to excellence, velocity, and customer-focus
Everyone says they're hyper-growth, we're achieving it! Join a high-growth Silicon Valley startup, and experience what building a company, team, and product from the ground up looks like.
One of the most proven machine learning teams in Silicon Valley
Best-in-class customer traction and growth",4.1,"Abnormal Security
4.1","Lehi, UT",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2018,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
196,Data Analyst,-1,"Summary:

As we are strengthening our operations within Belgium, we want to
extend
our service in the Data Domain to align with customers business
& reporting
vision and thereby scale up towards being a strategic partner
with a
consultative mindset.

Key Responsibilities of the job

To strengthen our
footprint in Benelux, we are looking for a Data Analyst at Senior
Associate level
with vast Benelux Insurance knowledge.

As the Data Analyst you
are responsible for translating the business needs in an
exhaustive business
requirements document. The role requires:

·
Sound understanding
on Data Management, Data Warehousing & Data Architecture

·
Focus on
understanding the needs of the business as a whole by identifying
initiatives
that will allow the business to meet the objective

·
Use different
techniques for collecting requirements from stakeholders in a
project such as
brainstorming, workshops, document analysis, surveys & interviews
etc.

·
Play the role of
liaison between IT and the business, communicating and
translating between
different perspectives or views about requirement using different
vocabulary to
match those views.

·
Knowledge of ETL tools
i.e Informatica, SAS, SSIS etc.

·
Give Input &
Review Test Scenarios (on demand)

·
Knowledge of the Insurance
business processes

Skills and Experience

·
7-10
years working experience as a Business Analyst

·
Functional
knowledge of Insurance Business related data processing

·
Knowledge
on Belgian Insurance & legal requirements like Sigedis, Mifid
etc. will be
added advantage.

·
Bachelor
or Master Engineer (commercial engineer, civil engineer) or
mathematics or
Business Economics or Finance

·
Strong
business acumen

Soft skill competences

·
Excellent
analytical & problem solving skills

·
Solution
oriented

·
Flexible
and oriented towards change

·
Good
communication skills (orally and written)

·
Structured
and organized; Attention to details

·
Able
to meet deadlines

·
Able
to work in a multi-cultural team

Qualifications and Certifications
Fluent English and French is a must have
Comfortable with Benelux Insurance
Delivery experience managed at least 2-3
projects with large teams
Dutch is preferred
European passport
Consultative skills
Minimal Bachelor degree",-1,Sparagus,United States,-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
197,Data Analyst,-1,"About Facet

Facet is disrupting the wealth management industry. Our innovative technology and unique planner model allow us to deliver high quality financial planning services to the 33 million mass affluent households in the US. As a company, our goals are to:
Help millions of Americans achieve their financial goals through high quality financial advice previously unavailable to them
Build the next generation of financial planning and financial life management tools that redefine how wealth management services are delivered
Create a company culture that is as fun as it is stimulating
Our Promise to You
A-players: Life is too short to work with people who arent rockstars
Data Wins: We are objective to a fault
Integrity: Helping people with their money requires incredible trust. We do not take this lightly.
Everyone Has a Voice: Great ideas can come from anywhere. We will always listen
Continuous Improvement: we commit to always asking how we can be better, in everything that we do (including the hiring process!)
What we Believe
Were here to deliver amazing client experiences. No matter the role at Facet, we are all 100% committed to excellence in service of our clients.
Every single member of our team needs to be an active participant in helping to improve and evolve our business. We take great pride in being the stakeholders and builders of our destiny
Perfection is the enemy of progress. We rapidly iterate to learn as quickly as possible.
Change is not only something we tolerate, but something we embrace. Transformative change is critical to our growth and success and we all thrive off of it.
We take our mission seriously, but also remember to have fun!
Everyone belongs: bringing your authentic self to table is what makes you unique and thus Facet unique. We encourage you to be authentically yourself, every single day.
The Job: What You Will Do

The Analytics team works directly with Business, Operations, Product and Engineering teams, with the responsibility of maintaining Facets enterprise data architecture, data definitions and quality, reports, dashboards, and in-depth analyses. As a data-first, data-enabled company, we seek to empower each business unit at Facet to make data-driven decisions in near real-time. As such, we need to continuously build and iterate on our data infrastructure, while supporting business asks and needs. Our data analysts need to know our data inside and out (advanced SQL proficiency is a must), be experts with visualization tools (Tableau/Looker experience strongly preferred), and help business experts to ask the right questions to lead them to actionable quantitative answers (statistics and problem solving prowess necessary).

Why This Job is Awesome

Chances are, Facet is a place that will be unlike anywhere youve ever worked (and if its not, we want to hear about it to learn how we can be better). When you sign up to join the Facet team, youre implicitly acknowledging that there is a problem with access to high quality financial planning, and you are committing to be a part of the company that is going to fix it. If that mission fires you up, then youre in the right place.

Were not perfect. Startups are messy: sometimes theres a bug in our tech, sometimes we overschedule ourselves, and sometimes we really whiff on helping a client. But what we are is a team completely committed to getting better every day, and supporting each other in the process. It is not uncommon for a software developer to shadow a planner for a day and then write code to make their job (and everyone else on the team) easier that night.

Not only will you be a part of a vision thats bigger than any of us, but youll also be in a position to grow your own skills and experience exponentially. This isnt for everyone, but for those who think the same way that we do, it will be the most rewarding job of your life.

Your Responsibilities
Help to maintain good data quality in the synthesis of data from a variety of processes and software
Collaborate on continued Enterprise Data Warehouse (EDW) development / maintenance of ETL processes primarily with SQL enforcement of business rules
Work closely with business owners and analysts to define actionable analyses
Shape analyses from business questions through SQL queries to visualization and communication of results
Author operations reporting and dashboards in Tableau to support teams day to day
Create visualizations in Tableau to communicate results of analysis
About You
You have a minimum 2 years experience in analytics and business intelligence
You have a bachelors degree (Masters a plus)
You have experience building and maintaining enterprise-level dashboards in BI tools such as Tableau, Looker, Power BI, Business Objects and/or others
You have advanced proficiency in SQL ad hoc querying including familiarity with complex joins and partitioning functions
You have a strong quantitative ability including problem solving skills and experience in statistics
You have a proven ability to prioritize and execute multiple tasks and projects in a dynamic environment
You are self-motivated with excellent communication skills
You have an exceptional attention to detail, good interpersonal skills, and an orientation towards the achievement of team goals
You have outstanding skills in organization, time management, multi-tasking, prioritization, problem solving, and self-motivation
Perks
Competitive salary and equity: we pay up for great talent
Unlimited vacation: we trust you
All the benefits: medical, dental, and vision insurance, 401(k) with employer match, short and long term disability coverage (paid by Facet), life insurance options and paid maternity and paternity leave
Certification reimbursement program (side note: We want our team members to have a constant desire to improve personally and professionally!).
Work from anywhere: our founders are big fans of distributed work
Work with a passionate and dedicated team: see our A-player credo above
Take a shot at helping millions of people live better financial lives
Powered by JazzHR",3.9,"Facet Wealth
3.9",United States,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
198,Data Analyst,-1,"We are looking for a high-performing Data Analyst to join our analytics practice. As an analyst, you will play an integral part of the team and work directly with our clients to provide best-in-class analytics solutions and data-driven insights. This role requires analytical curiosity and strong SQL skills, but is not a DBA or ETL developer role.

Key Responsibilities:

Create meaningful business insights out of customer, transactional, and other behavioral data.
Conduct both short- and long-term custom analytics projects, design analysis plans, and prepare client deliverables.
Query large databases and other data sources using SQL programming languages.
Support BI reporting development and CRM targeting efforts.
Identify meaningful business insights out of queried data and prepare summary findings for both internal and external stakeholders.
Build relationships and communicate regularly with external clients.

Experience & Skills:

Excellent data analytic skills. Your analytical thinking is far more important than technical skills
Curiosity when analyzing data. Documented history of thinking outside the box and creating novel solutions.
Analytic agility. Ability to change analysis direction based on interim findings.
Evidence of experience working with multiple, large datasets/warehouses, and ability to integrate and extract from such datasets using relevant programs and coding.
Experience using SQL to analyze customer level data, such as POS/transactional or weblog clickstream data.
Aptitude for refining informal analytic, reporting or query requirements to help move beyond the simple ask and surface the underlying “why”.
Strong Excel skills. Experience and familiarity with a wide variety of Excel functions and features (well beyond pivot tables).

Desired Qualifications:


Excellent communication skills. Experience explaining technical findings to non-technical audiences.
Experience using programming languages such as R or Python to extract, manipulate, and analyze customer data is a strong plus.
Statistical analysis experience is a plus: regression modeling, decision trees, clustering, etc.
BS or MS in Statistics, Computer Science, Mathematics, Applied Economics, Biostatistics or a field involving experimental design, probabilities and quantitative analysis.
1-3 years of relevant experience.
Must be authorized to legally work in the United States without restrictions or need for a work visa.

Why Work at Centriam?

Small analytics company focused on delivering excellence and value to our clients by providing high quality analytical and data-driven solutions.
Fun & collaborative culture; you will wear many hats and play an integral part in projects.
Exposure to a wide variety of data analytics, cloud, and open source technologies.
“Take what you need” vacation policy.
401k with generous match, vested immediately.
Free drinks, coffee, beer, and snacks.
Downtown Minneapolis office, connected to skyway.",5.0,"Centriam
5.0","Minneapolis, MN",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
199,Data Analyst,-1,"• Work with executives and other business leaders to identify opportunities for improvement

• Create reports for internal teams and/or external clients

• Collaborate with team members to collect and analyze data

• Use graphs, infographics and other methods to visualize data

• Establish KPIs to measure the effectiveness of business decisions

• Structure large data sets to find usable information

• Work with a team of analysts and other associates to process information

• Create presentations and reports based on recommendations and findings

Required Skills

• Bachelor’s degree in an analytical field

• Experience with statistical software

• Coding skills in languages such as Oracle and Python

• Analytical and problem-solving skills

• Ability to set and meet deadlines

• Ability to work in high-pressure situations

• Technical writing skills

• Reporting and data visualization skills

• Excellent attention to detail",3.7,"Construct A I Inc
3.7","Closter, NJ",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1961,Company - Private,Wholesale,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
200,Data Analyst,$61k-$113k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Overview

Fanatics is the global leader in licensed sports merchandise and changing the way fans purchase their favorite team apparel and jerseys. Through an innovative, tech-infused approach to making and selling fan gear in today's on-demand culture, Fanatics operates more than 300 online and offline stores, including the e-commerce business for all major professional sports leagues (NFL, MLB, NBA, NHL, NASCAR, MLS, PGA), major media brands (NBC Sports, CBS Sports, FOX Sports) and more than 200 collegiate and professional team properties, which include several of the biggest global soccer clubs (Manchester United, Real Madrid, Chelsea, Manchester City). Fanatics offers the largest collection of timeless and timely merchandise whether shopping online, on your phone, in stores, in stadiums or on-site at the world's biggest sporting events.

About the Team

Fanatics is first and foremost a technology company. We are powered by cutting-edge tech created by our small agile teams using the latest tools and technologies under our highly analytical, forward thinking, and open-minded leadership. As the global leader in licensed sports merchandise, we challenge ourselves by improving our new fully responsive NodeJS cloud commerce platform, Elasticsearch engine, and deep data science capabilities while building the best-in-class retail manufacturing and supply chain technologies. Our tech teams work together to revolutionize data science and engineering initiatives, provide highly scalable real-time and streaming platforms, and create secure e-commerce and in-stadium fan experience products. Our own e-commerce platform transacts in over 190 countries, 17 languages, and 14 currencies. Our motto is “#GSD”—get stuff done—and we do just that. If you want to be at the nexus of sports, commerce, and technology, come be a part of our industry-leading team here at Fanatics Tech.
GENERAL DUTIES & RESPONSIBILITIES

Primary focus is to understand, measure and explain how any new changes such as product features added to the ecommerce websites are impacting customer engagements, conversions and sales.

Collaborate across multiple teams including experimentation, products, business, marketing and analytics teams and answer deep business questions by collecting, analyze, interpreting data and share with stakeholders

Identify product needs, gathering business requirements for data analysis and reports, and create data extractions process to monitor key metrics for experiments and product changes

Lead and participate in website’s data specific projects & initiatives, innovate and implement large-scale quality improvements to processes and systems by conducting data analysis and making recommendations, troubleshooting technical issues, and refining processes around clickstreams, engagement and transaction data


QUALIFICATION OF SKILL & EXPERIENCES

Must have expert level SQL coding skills in one of the big-data SQL frameworks - HiveSQL, PrestoSQL, Spark-SQL. Should be able to build complex logic step by step using SQL. Ability to use SQL to perform complex data analysis.

Deep analytical skills and experience collecting, organizing, analyzing, and disseminating significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy

Ability to answer hard data and insight questions and ability to communicate complex quantitative analysis, analytic approaches and findings in a clear, precise, and actionable manner.

Designing and evaluating A|B experiments and monitoring key product metrics, understanding root causes of changes in metrics. A background and experience in statistical computing is a huge plus

Working knowledge of big data processing technologies such as Hadoop, Hive, Spark and experience in at least one scripting language (Python/Pandas, R, Julia etc.)

Experience working on ETL/ELT or building data pipelines

EDUCATIONAL REQUIREMENTS

Bachelor's degree in Math, Physics, Engineering, Economics, Statistics, Finance, Social Science, Psychology, or another field that uses quantitative analysis or equivalent practical experience

This is NOT an entry level position, prior experience is required

Tryouts are open at Fanatics! Our team is passionate, talented, unified, and charged with creating the fan experience of tomorrow. The ball is in your court now.



NOTICE TO CALIFORNIA RESIDENTS/APPLICANTS: In connection with your application, we collect information that identifies, reasonably relates to or describes you (“Personal Information”). The categories of Personal Information that we collect include your name, government issued identification number(s), email address, mailing address, other contact information, emergency contact information, employment history, educational history, criminal record, and demographic information. We collect and use those categories of Personal Information about you for human resources and other business management purposes, including identifying and evaluating you as a candidate for potential or future employment or future contract positions, recordkeeping in relation to recruiting and hiring, conducting criminal background checks as permitted by law, conducting analytics, and ensuring compliance with applicable legal requirements and Company policies.",3.4,"Fanatics
3.4","San Mateo, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1996,Company - Private,Sporting Goods Stores,Retail,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
201,Data Analyst,$25k-$47k (Glassdoor Est.),"Finicity seeks a skilled Data Analyst to join the team! The successful candidate will enjoy combining analytical skills with business acumen to provide Finicity with the data and insights that will drive our continued success. The Data Analyst works with key decision-makers on a daily basis as a data-driven adviser and partner. The candidate should enjoy both working with people and performing technical analyses.

More specifically, you will:
Create reports using Tableau
Help craft and participate in A/B testing
Perform ad hoc data research and analysis
Analyze data and communicate key findings and recommendations
What We're Looking For:
Minimum 3 years professional experience as a Data Analyst, BI Developer/Analyst or related role
Minimum 1 years experience working with Tableau
Data analysis using large complex data sets
Proficiency with SQL
Strong statistical understanding
Bachelors degree with quantitative focus such as Economics, Finance, Information Systems or related discipline
About Finicity:

Finicity (part of MasterCard) is a well-established pioneer in the fintech space and our growth has accelerated significantly in the last few years with the development and market rollout of our next generation credit decisioning services which harness consumer-permissioned data as part of the loan underwriting process. We partner with major financial institutions and lending powerhouses to transform the ways in which consumers access credit and how financial institutions make lending decisions.

Finicity provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment and prohibits discrimination and harassment of any type without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, disability status, genetics, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local laws.

Powered by JazzHR",4.5,"Finicity
4.5","Murray, UT",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2000,Company - Private,Financial Analytics & Research,Finance,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
202,Data Analyst,-1,"Position: Data Analyst

Location: Glen Allen, VA

Type: Contract

Rate: $Open

Responsibilities:

· Develops, tests and maintains code using software development methodology and appropriate technologies for the system being used.

· Works closely with Business Analysts to develop detail systems design and written test plans for online and report application programs.

· Performs analysis on projects and provides a project plan that shows the tasks needing to be completed and a time estimate for each task.

· Participates in design walkthroughs with appropriate focus groups and related users to verify accuracy of design in meeting business needs.

· Prepares installation instructions and coordinates installation procedures.

· Supports and troubleshoots application code problems.

· Provides status reports that give a detailed description of the current projects progress and indicates time devoted to each task of the project.

· Coordinates, guides and mentors programming efforts performed by in-house programmers or outside consultants to ensure that all programming is completed according to the project plan.

Requirements

Required Skills (At least 3 from the list) :
Informatica Power Center (10.1)
Oracle
PL/SQL
Unix/Linux shell scripting
Perl
Java Full stack
Preferred, but not required:
SnapLogic
Cloud architectures
AWS

Python

Benefits

Note: If interested please send your updated resume to ganesan.raju@two95intl.com and include your salary requirement along with your contact details with a suitable time when we can reach you. If you know of anyone in your sphere of contacts, who would be a perfect match for this job then, we would appreciate if you can forward this posting to them with a copy to us.",4.0,"Two95 International Inc.
4.0","Glen Allen, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
203,Data Analyst,-1,"Job details

Title Data Analyst 1017
Company Yeti Technologies
Salary 0
Company type Information Technology
Published on 2017-10-24
Apply before 2017-10-24
Job Details
PRIMARY FUNCTION:

The Data Analyst is an entry level position and is responsible for processing the data obtained from experiments performed according to protocol, facility SOP and the appropriate regulations. The analyst will gain familiarity with advanced analytics tools and techniques and will be accountable for evaluating and communicating impacts of business decisions

ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS OF THE JOB:
Analyze data and use analytical tools and techniques
Monitor and evaluate patterns and trends
Generate standard reports for consistency in data analysis
Develop insight into member and provider performance and the variables affecting performance
Write and modify basic SQL programs for data extraction.
Provide user specific ad hoc reporting as requested.
Proactively seeks training and builds knowledge/experience of analytic tools, languages, and data sources
Produce spreadsheets, documents and presentations that are well-documented and easy to follow (i.e. Excel & PowerPoint)
PERFORMANCE REQUIREMENTS:
Experience in writing SQL
Proficient with Microsoft Excel
Performs other duties as assigned
Ability to work independently and in a strong team environment
Ability to project a positive attitude and high degree of self-confidence
Ability to effectively manage time
Strong analytical, research, and problem solving skills
Strong verbal and written communication skills
Programming knowledge (Python, C# or R) a plus
EDUCATION: Bachelor’s degree or higher. Relevant major’s preferred (Finance, Economics, Computer Science, Mathematics or Information Technology.)",-1,Yeti Technologies,"Irving, TX",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
204,Programmatic Data Analyst,$70k-$128k (Glassdoor Est.),"About this Role


We are seeking a Programmatic Data Analyst to join the Fandom Revenue Operations team. The ideal candidate will have a passion for generating quantitative analysis and insights that will drive global programmatic revenue. This role reports to the Director of Revenue Strategy which oversees cross channel yield at Fandom. The role will be focused on improving measurement and refinement of collected data and analysis and make a significant contribution to how Fandom's programmatic inventory is measured, analyzed, and monetized.

You Will...
Own and deliver daily, weekly, monthly programmatic business reporting supporting Sales, Finance, and Executive management
Build, maintain, and monitor key revenue and monetization metrics dashboards
Assist with the development of existing and new reporting tools and resources
Streamline the current reporting process to drive improved yield management insights
Consistently analyze partner performance, optimize as necessary, assist Programmatic Sales with partner insights and deals.
Provide regional inventory and revenue analysis to direct tactical execution of monetization strategies across North America, EMEA and APAC
Contribute to the overall development and implementation of our evolving revenue strategy
You Have...
BA/BS degree in a quantitative/problem-solving discipline (or equivalent training and experience)
2+ years experience in programmatic advertising or programmatic ad tech.
A desire to work on advertising challenges that require flexibility in approach -- everything from on-the-fly analytics to statistics, big data, machine learning, and mathematical algorithms
High level of proficiency in Microsoft Excel (e.g. pivot tables, advanced formulas and lookups); Google Sheets proficiency
Strong interpersonal and communication skills and an ability to collaborate cross functionally with multiple stakeholders across different time zones
Strong organizational skills and a very high degree of attention to detail
Ability to work independently and drive projects to completion in a fast-paced environment
Bonus Points if You Have...
BI and query tools experience, including SQL, Amazon Athena, Tableau, Mode
Experience with log-level data analysis of programmatic media
Experience working with Data engineering teams and/or experience with ETL processes
Benefits & Perks
Stock options
Training based on business needs
Flexible working hours
Open, energetic and fan-focused, international work environment
Miscellaneous perks such as wellness programs, swag, etc.
About Fandom


Fandom is a global entertainment media brand powered by fan passion. The fan-trusted source in entertainment, Fandom provides a home to explore, contribute to, and celebrate the world of pop culture. Whether looking for in-depth information on favorite fandoms or what's buzzing in entertainment, Fandom has your pop culture curiosities covered through fan-expert knowledge and carefully curated and fun, original multi-platform content.

Fandom has a global audience of almost 300 million monthly unique users and encompasses over 400,000 fan communities. We currently feature more than 55 million pages of content, inclusive of video. Our Fandom values are:
We serve a global community.
Connection with our fans, creators, and partners is at our core, and it's grounded by our active efforts of inclusion.
We build experiences.
We imagine, improve, and deliver solutions.
We bring joy.
We celebrate our fandoms, our teammates, and the work we do.
Fandom is an Equal Opportunity Employer

San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance Police Code, Article 49",2.4,"Fandom
2.4","San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2006,Company - Private,News Outlet,Media,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
205,DATA ANALYST,-1,"FOR IMMEDIATE DETAILS ABOUT THIS POSITION, contact ANY of us direct, referencing the JOB# below:

Kindest Regards:
KIANA AREVALO: (469) 325-3712
JOANNE SMITH: (469) 298-9115
SHERRIE KRAUS: (469) 996-9697
JUSTIN MATLIN: (469) 209-5915
SUMIT KUMAR: (949) 860-4718
E M A I L: Recruiter.key3@calance.com

=======================================
=======================================
* We CAN'T accept any C2C/INC/1099 consultants, W2 ONLY**
=======================================

Position: DATA ANALYST
JOB REF#: 894155
Duration: 4+ Months (On-going Contract)
Location: Plano, TX 75024
Rate: Open/Market Rate (W2 ONLY)

Data Analyst is responsible for, but not limited to: monitoring the COVID-19 related data in Workday HR system and a custom PowerBI application for missing / inaccurate data, performing data audits, troubleshooting and investigating data anomalies and issues, and working with the business and IT to resolve data issues (proactively and reactively). The role will be working across multiple business units (i.e. IT, local HR, third party nurses, etc.) and locations virtually to help guarantee the quality of the data. The position will require flexibility, adaptability, and advanced experience utilizing Workday and Excel. The desired candidate should be deadline driven, work well under pressure, possess a strong customer service mindset, have excellent communication skills, and can build and maintain relationships across the organization.

REQUIRED EXPERIENCE:
• 1+ years’ experience as a Data Analyst working with large data sets
• Experience performing data audits, troubleshooting and investigating data anomalies and issues
• Must have WORKDAY HR functional expertise required (including EIBs and advanced reporting)
• Advanced skills and significant experience using Microsoft Excel.
• Must be proficient in MS Project, Visio, Word, and PowerPoint.
• EXCELLENT oral communication and written skills
• Experience working in a deadline driven, work well under pressure, and possess a strong customer service mindset
• Education: BS or BA degree in computer science, business administration, or related technical field

Calance Consultant Benefits Offerings:
EPO/PPO Medical Plan (Cigna)
HMO/PPO Dental programs (Cigna)
Vision - VSP (Vision Plan Summary)
Voluntary Life, Short (STD)/Long Term (LTD) Disability and Voluntary plans
401K VOYA Retirement vesting program
Paid Bi-Weekly/Direct Deposit",2.9,"Calance US
2.9","Plano, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2004,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
206,Data Analyst,-1,"Requires BS Degree and will involve Strong python coding skills for data munging, data management, and data analysis, data scraping, summarizing and manipulation.
The Climate Corporation is looking for a Data Prospector to join our Crop Management Science Team. We are seeking a highly motivated candidate with a strong background in data munging, cleaning, management and analysis. In this position, you will work to acquire, curate, and analyze complex agronomic data. If you are a self-motivated, collaborative researcher eager to work on projects with direct implications for farmers, The Climate Corporation would love to talk to you!

Required Skills / Experience:
• Bachelor's degree
• Strong python coding skills for data munging, data management, and data analysis including experience with standard packages for those tasks (pandas, numpy, matplotlib).
• Ability learn fast a number of processes with consistency and attention to detail
• Commitment to ensuring data quality and accuracy
• Self starter and be able to work as part of a team
Strong organizational skills
• Good interpersonal and communication skills

Desired Skills / Experience:
• Agronomic knowledge
• Experience with agronomic data

Why is this position open? Growth on the team, turn over, skills gap?
Skills gap
Location of this role (CC, North Campus, Chesterfield, etc)? -
St Louis (city place 4), Chicago, Seattle, San Francisco
What is a day like in this role? What 3-5 responsibilities will occupy their time?
Data scraping, cleaning, summarization, manipulation, literature review, paired programming, team meetings, code reviews and pull requests
Who will this person work with on a daily basis? –
Data scientists and subject matter experts
Tell me about the team dynamic/culture.
Collaborative, Fast paced, Outcome driven
What are the ‘must haves’ to be successful in this role?
Python coding skills, data manipulation, detail oriented, organized
What will make this opportunity stand out for potential candidates? -Purpose driven data science, mission is to help agriculture farmers grow more while balancing resources.
Is this more maintenance or new development work? –
New Development work
What kind of soft skills are you looking for?
Critical thinking, collaboration, communication, organization, attention to detail
What is the minimum number of years of experience required for this position? None
Any certifications required for this role? Bachelors
Is there a possibility for an extension of this assignment? Yes but no guarantee, depends on business needs
Will this position convert to a FTE Role? It’s possible but not guaranteed
What is the interview process, will you schedule a phone screen, video conference or in person interviews?
video conference",4.3,"The Syllogisteks Company
4.3","Creve Coeur, MO",-1,Unknown,1992,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
207,Data Analyst,-1,"At Hiya, we are on a mission to modernize the voice call with trust, identity and intelligence. We are trusted by global enterprises, carriers and consumers to provide secure, engaging connections and stop unwanted calls. Built on the world's leading Voice Performance Platform, Hiya protects people from spam and fraud calls, connects businesses with their customers, and helps carriers secure their networks for all. Our SaaS applications, Hiya Connect and Hiya Protect, serve more than 140M users worldwide, power services like AT&T Call Protect and Samsung Smart Call, and deliver voice performance insights that move businesses forward. We're passionate about creating a culture where employees love to work, feel supported and energized, and are empowered to create, innovate and challenge the status quo.

We are looking for a Sales Analyst to support our sales efforts for Sponsored Caller Profiles. As the Sales Analyst you will work closely across the Sales team to build metrics and key insights in order to demonstrate the value of our product to potential customers. Our pre-sales efforts require us to be top-shelf in our analysis of both customer data and the intersection with our own Hiya data.

In this role, you will:

Create custom reports and dashboards, audit performance on an on-going basis, and build automated reports where relevant
Develop internal tools and applications that bring data and actionable insights much closer to our account executives so that scaling and automation demands can be met
Develop and distribute repeatable reports and performance metrics/insights on client marketing campaigns
Collect, maintain, manage, interpret and analyze data received from internal and external data sources
Report requirements collection/analysis, writing SQL, extracting structured and unstructured data sets, building reports
Perform ad hoc analysis and data investigation/discovery to identify and/or explain business and marketing trends or anomalies
Analyze marketing channel and website performance data for assigned projects and develop recommendations on ways to further optimize for performance
Support the Hiya Account Executives in sharing data insights with both prospects and customers and deliver high-quality, persuasive data 'testimonies' in a highly competitive market
Deliver a work product that is both consistent and accurate: strive to maintain the highest levels of service for internal and external clients
Identify new ways of analyzing and extracting actionable insights from call center and telephony event data that will deliver value to Hiya Connect customers

You don't have to check all the boxes, but we believe these are important requirements for this role:

3-5 years experience working with consumer databases and support of market-facing data analytics output
Proficiency in Python
ETL and data warehousing
A/B Testing
Advanced skills with Excel and PowerPoint (or Google-equivalent Applications)
Expert-level Proficiency with SQL, R and other analytics languages
Must have experience working with unstructured and raw data
A knack for accuracy and consistency: refusing to compromise and produce a half-baked product
Desired: AI and/or ML experience and demonstrated success deploying AI/ML solutions in a corporate environment
Bachelor's degree

What you should expect from us:

Work at a supportive and fast-growing startup with a fantastic team
Make an impact in the lives of tens of millions of consumers
Many office perks and great company benefits
Collaborate and learn from other great team members
Support in developing your skills and accelerating your career

Hiya is a fast-growing startup that offers a team of dynamic and experienced executives at the helm, and a hardworking team of international colleagues at your side. We value getting things done for our customers and consistently improving ourselves and products along the way.

Hiya is an equal opportunity employer. We value and embrace diversity. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, color, national origin, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, marital status, age or disability status.

This role is based in Seattle.",5.0,"Hiya
5.0","Seattle, WA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
208,Healthcare Data Analyst,-1,"ITAC Solutions is seeking a Healthcare Data Analyst for an established company in Nashville, TN.

What you’ll be doing (duties of this position):

Assist Clinical Directors or Managers in organizing, documenting, and testing requirements for cost analytics tools
Generate client reports and analysis, including running models, assessing market-level variation in provider performance, assess client-specific healthcare spend
Develop, create and utilize new tools / dashboards for spend and utilization analytics
Work to continuously improve dashboards and other customer-facing tools for tracking opportunities and value delivery
Assist in the data integration process, including preparing and training data, creating and running reports, and maintaining documentation
Perform aspects of the analytic and business intelligence (BI) lifecycle from requirements to data analysis, report analysis, understanding of business processes, and definitions of success
Initiates interactions with business leadership and analysts to deeply understand the business needs related to reporting and visualization efforts
Assist in the development of strategic roadmaps for corporate leadership
Perform ad hoc savings analysis for potential and current customers

What you’ll need to be considered (requirements):

Bachelor’s degree preferred
2+ years data/process/analysis experience in healthcare industry
Strong programming skills in SQL, R, and Excel; additional programming skills in Python, SAS, and BI reporting development in Power BI and complex data a plus
Exceptional analytical and problem-solving skills; demonstrated ability to anticipate and creatively solve problems and resolve issues with practical and reasonable solutions; with attention to detail and data quality assurance.
Ability to analyze data to produce accurate and unbiased results and tell the story of those results in data visualizations, dashboards, and reports.",4.0,"ITAC Solutions
4.0","Brentwood, TN",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2000,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
209,Data Analyst,-1,"Job description :-
Need a strong data Analyst who has experience in insurance life/actuarial background who understands Business Processes and can prepare business Requirement Documentation.
Experience in Data Modeling, Data Warehousing, PL/SQL, or ETL processing.
Familiarity with all phases of the software development life cycle and Experience documenting requirements for large and complex data processing and analysis projects.
Strong attention to detail in both work performed and presentation of work products with experience communicating and interacting with all levels of management in the process of gathering requirements.
Understand the monthly manual tasks/activities for the Actuarial processes.
Perform data analysis on the policy admin systems, databases, excel sheets, and other sources of data required for the various processes.
Experience with GGY AXIS and/or other valuation systems is a plus.
Actuarial and SQL
Powered by JazzHR",4.0,"Evolvinc
4.0","Houston, TX",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2005,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
210,Data Analyst,-1,"Location: 11921 Freedom Drive, Suite #570, Reston, VA, 20190

Duties:

Develop, implement, and maintain leading-edge analytic systems, taking complicated problems and building simple frameworks.
Preemptively recognize and resolve technical issues utilizing knowledge of policies and processes.
Create best-practice reports based on data mining, analysis, and visualization.
Solves critical issues and shares knowledge such as trends, aggregate, quantity volume regarding specific data sources.
Collaborates with technology and platform management partners.
Determines appropriateness of data for storage and optimum storage organization.
Determines how tables relate to each other and how fields interact within the tables to develop relational models.
Optimize data sourcing and processing rules to ensure appropriate data quality.

Position Requirements: Three years of work experience in any position/title providing experience with the skills listed in the special requirements.

Special Requirements:

Qualifying experience must include experience with JIRA.

Position requires travel/relocation to various unanticipated client locations throughout the U.S with expenses paid by the employer.

CONTACT: If interested please mail resume and Job ID to Attn: President, HarproTech Inc, 11921 Freedom Drive, Suite #570, Reston, VA, 20190",-1,Harpro Tech INC,"Reston, VA",-1,Unknown,-1,Unknown,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
211,Data Analyst,$29k-$51k (Glassdoor Est.),"Day Shift

The Data Analyst is responsible for data analysis, which entails interpreting complex data requests, retrieving the data utilizing SQL, Cerner’s CCL and Crystal Report and visualizing the data in a way that makes sense for each request, and helping the stakeholders utilize the data. The incumbent performs a combination of business and data analytics that envision, design and prototype solutions for a variety of functional business areas

Begin

Collaborates with the other analysts in establishing business rules and monitoring adherence
Provides expertise regarding the appropriate use of data elements and cooperates with reporting personnel from other areas to establish and maintain these common business rules and adherence to standards
Translates data trends into strategic recommendations for program development and action plans
Tracks and prioritizes projects through coordination and negotiation with internal and external clients to improve the efficiency of information/project plan generation.
Evaluates and triages potential projects and studies based on the value, cost benefit analysis and the urgency of the request.
Performs strategic data analysis (data mining) and research as appropriate to support business needs (e.g., disease management, provider profiling, etc.).
Develops detailed understanding of relevant business processes, goals and strategy in order to provide analysis and interpretation.
Develops and communicates action plans to address areas for improvement identified through data analysis and business expertise.
Assists in planning initiatives to address areas for improvement.
Collaborates with business user to define media, frequency and audience for distribution of information.
Develop ad-hoc reports as requested
Participate in “Change Control” process
Adhere to Information Technology and organizational standards
May perform other duties as assigned or requested. Performs other duties as assigned

Become

Bachelor's Degree required
Minimum of 1 year of working experience in SQL
Minimum of 3 years of working in an analytical role
Preferred previous experience working in healthcare
Strong analytical skills - ability to structure problems, generate hypothesis, decide which data to collect in order to drive a recommendation
Strong communication skills - both oral and written
Data Visualization tools such as SQL Server Reporting Services, Tableau, and PowerBI
Strong analytical skills, especially with financial data
A strong attention to detail, as well as the ability to step back and see the big picture
Works well collaborating with others
Comfortable navigating complex data structures in SQL Server to retrieve data",3.5,"SoutheastHEALTH
3.5","Cape Girardeau, MO",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1928,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
212,Data Analyst,$51k-$88k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description
The New York City Department of Investigation (DOI) is one of the oldest law enforcement agencies in the country with a mission of combating municipal corruption. It serves the people of New York City by acting as an independent and nonpartisan watchdog for New York City government, City agencies, and City employees, vendors with City contracts, individuals and entities that receive City funds.

DOI seeks a Data Analyst who will support the criminal and policy-driven investigations of the Inspectors General. The Data Analyst will assist DOI investigators with building and enhancing complex investigations through large scale data collection and analysis.
The Data Analyst is expected to:
• Develop and enhance practices for identifying patterns and trends related to fraudulent financial activity.
• Ensure the collection, management, and analysis of quality data from external sources.
• Conduct quality assurance of data.
• Maintain, summarize, and report on outcomes of data searches.
• Work collaboratively with DOI investigators to generate investigative leads, create reports, and interpret data.
• Present findings in a cogent manner through detailed and accessible reports to key decision-makers.

If selected, the candidate will be fingerprinted and undergo a background investigation. In addition, for positions that have a law enforcement and/or investigative function, the candidate's consumer credit history will be reviewed during the background investigation, and as otherwise permitted by NYC Administrative Code § 8-107(24)(b)(2)(A).
Minimum Qual Requirements
1. A four-year high school diploma or its educational equivalent approved by a State's Department of Education or a recognized accrediting organization and four years of satisfactory full-time experience in an industrial or governmental agency in the field of investigation, auditing, law enforcement, security, inspections, or in a major operational area of the agency in which the appointment is to be made; or
A baccalaureate degree from an accredited college or university; or
Education and/or experience equivalent to ""1"" or ""2"" above.
Preferred Skills
• Experience working with data analytics.
• Bachelor's degree in Finance, Accounting, or Information Technology, Computer Science, or Information Systems.
• Advance knowledge in MS Excel: VBA, Data Models, and ability to create Pivot Tables and complex nested formulas.
• Strong written and verbal communication skills.
• Knowledge in SQL and experience with any RDBMS: MS SQL Server (T-SQL), Oracle (PL/SQL), MySQL (SQL/PSM), and PostgreSQL (PL/pgSQL).
• Knowledge in Python, R, C++ ,and/or Java.
• Knowledge in analytics software (i2 Analyst Notebook, Palantir, Cognos, etc.).
• Database related certifications from Oracle or Microsoft.
• Demonstrated interest in law enforcement, criminal justice, or social service.
To Apply
All current City Employees may apply by going to Employee Self Service (ESS) http://cityshare/ess then click on Recruiting Activities/Careers and Search for the specific Job ID# 435571.

All other applicants please go to www.nyc.gov/career/search and search for the specific Job ID# 435571.

Please do not email, mail or fax your resume to DOI directly. Submissions of resumes does not guarantee an interview. Due to the high volume of resumes DOI receives for positions, only selected candidates will be contacted.

Appointments are subject to Office of Management & Budget approval for budgeted headcount.

The City of New York is an equal opportunity employer and is strongly committed to a policy of non-discrimination. We are committed to recruiting a diverse and inclusive talent pool.
Residency Requirement
New York City residency is generally required within 90 days of appointment. However, City Employees in certain titles who have worked for the City for 2 continuous years may also be eligible to reside in Nassau, Suffolk, Putnam, Westchester, Rockland, or Orange County. To determine if the residency requirement applies to you, please discuss with the agency representative at the time of interview.",3.7,"City of New York
3.7","New York, NY",-1,10000+ Employees,1625,Government,Municipal Governments,Government,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
213,Data Analyst,-1,"Job Description

Data Analyst
Our client is looking for a Data Analyst to join their Technology team! In this role you will provide solutions and support for many of their programs. Working closely with teams and personnel across the organization, you will collect requirements, describe data modeling decisions, and data engineering strategy. The work you perform will have a direct impact in addressing and answering key questions for the business.

If you love solving complex challenges and providing insights using the latest technologies, we want to talk with you!

Key responsibilities:
Analyze data in a growing Data Lake and work with large datasets
Work closely with data engineers to build data environments
Work with teams on advanced analytics algorithms that utilize datasets for statistical analysis, prediction, clustering and machine learning
Analyze problems and determine root causes
Present findings and analysis for use in decision making
Improve ongoing reporting and analysis processes, and build new algorithms and model training
What Gets You the Job?
3+ years’ experience in data engineering, business intelligence, data science, or related field
Proven track record of manipulating, processing, and extracting value from large datasets
Proficient with one or more programming languages: Java, C++, Python, R, etc.
Expert-level skill in data visualization tools such as Tableau, Power BI, Quicksight, etc.
Demonstrated expertise in statistical modeling/data mining
Understanding of machine learning concepts
Excellent problem-solving skills and ability to determine root causes
Proven track record of conducting statistical analyses for strategy development and decision making
Excellent communication skills (written, verbal, and presentation) in working with users, technical teams, and senior management
Send us your resume today!

We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.
Next Job ►
For immediate consideration please click Apply or email resumes to:

Barbara Meadows

Barbara Meadows
Apply With Linkedin
Back to Job Listings",4.2,"Technical Connections
4.2","Costa Mesa, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,1984,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
214,Data Analyst,$36k-$65k (Glassdoor Est.),"We are seeking a Data Analyst to support our Central Labs in Indianapolis. Duties will include the following:
- Ensure a seamless communication and follow up with internal clients.
- Analyze client data discrepancies. Update database accordingly to the client’s needs and in compliance with the GCP rules when appropriate.
- Lead the communication with the other departments in relation to the discrepancy solving until resolution.
- Provide direct answers to our internal clients and provide advice when the request is not directly feasible.
- Negotiate internal timelines when needed.
- Involve internal clients in decision making to ensure client’s needs are being considered.
- Act as primary strategic representative between Covance departments in the scope of the data reconciliation.
- Review the study Statement of Work to ensure compliance of the request with the protocol when appropriate.
- Perform quality checks on data revisions and answers provided to clients.
- Generate and review Covance database reports and resolve issues as needed.
- Lead escalation of issues that may impact resolution of the discrepancies on time. Manage workload and priorities to ensure all client deadlines are respected.
- Work in a team-oriented, global environment with the focus on customer service.
- Assist and support management in the implementation of global processes and procedures ensuring seamless integration.
- Responsible for effective and timely adherence to management communications, meeting and procedures.
- Support a culture of continuous improvement, quality and productivity.
- Assist management team with audits, reportable issues, CAIRs, and other quality issues as needed.
- Responsible for providing expert technical and administrative support to CLS data processing systems and act as a lead in resolving process and or application issues as necessary.
- Documents all service failures and investigate as needed.

- Minimum Required:
- High school diploma, or equivalent
- Microsoft Office proficient (Word, Excel, Outlook)
- Minimum of 2 year related experience

- Preferred:
- BS in Science related field or
- Covance experience or scientific background or
- Previous healthcare, medical or laboratory experience
- Excellent verbal and written communication skills
- Excellent negotiation skills
- Ability to make decisions independently and proactively
- Excellent organizational, planning skills
- Ability to handle multiple tasks in a timely and professional manner under demanding conditions
- Proven excellent analysis skills
- High level of attention to detail
- Ability to work in a team oriented, pluri-cultural, global environment
- Knowledge of medical terminology",3.7,"Covance
3.7","Indianapolis, IN",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
215,Data Analyst,$36k-$65k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Data Analyst has a vital role within the organization and will be responsible for working with all areas within manufacturing site to analyze, guide & support digital competencies.

Additional duties include developing, qualifying and implementing new products, processes and materials for manufacturing. This role will also lead, coordinate, and organize all defined lean activities toward the end of creating and fostering a Digital Continuous Improvement culture.

Coordinate Digital Initiatives

Ensure coordination with the Digital Transformation strategy and Digital roadmap
Support and boost initiatives for automatic data collection and data mining
Deploy common tools & guidelines for digital transformation
Train people to involve them in a digital culture

Data Integrity & Consolidation: BI reporting

Validate the data sources and adequacy
Create and enforce policies for effective data management
Formulate and share data collection techniques and procedures for data management
Establish routes and controls to gather the data

Development of Master Data Analytics

Develop people competencies and Data analytics skills
Create IWAY Digital Assessment for digital maturity
Implement tools and best practices identified in the manufacturing sites
Participate in the vision & strategy definition for data analytics

Software Design and Programming (DevOps)

Support Internal and External development for Manufacturing
Identify, document and Share best practices and internal tools
Support ERP request & needs from manufacturing site as key user

Coordination with IT Sec, GSC and Operational Performance Team

Lead digital transformation strategy in the manufacturing site
Ensure compliance to IT Sec. guidelines and GSC targets
Coordinate best practices sharing with Continuous Improvement network

Required Skills

Required:

Bachelor’s Degree in Engineering/Mathematics/Computer Science/Statistics or equivalent
Proven experience as data or business data analyst
2-5 years experience in a manuf. environment
Strong knowledge and experience in reporting, databases & data management (SQL, Python, R, Gretl.)
Experience with DataViz tools. Ideally Tableau, Power BI & Elastic (Logstash, Elastic Search, Kibana)
Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical packages for analysis
Strong analytical skills to collect, organize, analyze and disseminate data & information

Preferred Skills:

Knowledge and experience in statistical and data mining techniques: GLM/Regression, Random Forest, Boosting, Trees, text mining, social network analysis, etc.
Familiar with Agile and pragmatic approach
Data Scientist Expertise or Specialization
Experience solving complex, ambiguous, and analytically challenging problems
Strong knowledge of digital strategic planning, execution and portfolio management
Strong organizational skills and good judgment; must be a team player, positive, flexible, and creative
Excellent process management and planning skills
Demonstrated ability to develop, implement, and manage data-driven and results-oriented programs that achieve targeted goals
Comfortable operating in a fast paced and dynamic test and learn environment

Required Experience",3.0,"IDEMIA
3.0","Exton, PA",-1,10000+ Employees,2017,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
216,Data Analyst,-1,"Description:
The Data Analyst will be responsible for discovering analytics and system integrations requirements,
identifying data sources and criteria needed, documenting specs for developers, testing the output, and
ensuring user acceptance. This position will work directly with internal customers, business process
owners, leadership, Business Analysts, and BI, ETL, and Webservices Developers.

Roles:
• Propose and implement analytics solutions to support business needs and data-driven decisions
• Support new system implementation projects, including data feeds, data design, and mapping
• Work with stakeholders and Business Analysts to understand business processes preferably HR) and detailed
• requirements for reports and data feeds
• Identify and document data sources, criteria, and data mapping
• Use SQL to identify, extract, and analyze data
• Assess data quality and implement solutions to ensure accurate reporting
• Propose solutions to collect new data points to support metrics and identify trends
• Design reports/dashboard layouts to present data in a clean, consumable, and insightful format
• Write report and data feed specifications for BI, ETL, and Webservices Developers
• Receive and prioritize requests for reports
• Assist customers with ad-hoc reporting needs
• Audit existing reports and propose improvements for findability of data
• Serve as a resource to Business Analysts and Developers for data-related needs
• Support development of other team members' data analysis skills though knowledge share
**Only US Citizens will be considered for this position.
Required / Desired Skills
Experience performing data analysis (Required 3 Years)

Experience as a business analyst (working with stakeholders on requirements and business process) (Required 3 Years)

Experience writing complex SQL queries; • Expert level SQL skills; experience writing complex queries with multiple table joins (Required 3 Years)

Strong analytical and conceptual thinking; resourceful problem-solver (Required 2 Years)

Basic knowledge of database design principles, deep understanding of relational databases (Required 2 Years)

Familiarity with data warehouse, data mart, ETL, and webservices concepts (Required 2 Years)

Exposure to reporting tools and some hands-on experience building reports (Required 2 Years)

Advanced Excel skills (formulas, charts, pivot tables) (Required 2 Years)",5.0,"Professional Technology Integration, Inc.
5.0","Atlanta, GA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
217,Data Analyst,-1,"Apex Digital Solutions is one of the premier Microsoft Gold Partners in Michigan. We focus on using Microsoft Cloud Technologies to empower our customers to be more secure, productive, and engaged. We accomplish this by delivering high-value services such as briefing, immersion, and architecture sessions, fixed fee engagements, managed services, and adoption/change management engagements.

As one of Crain’s 100 Cool Places to Work in Michigan in 2019 and a 5x Microsoft Partner of the Year we are looking for Apex Warriors to join our team to empower people to make a positive difference in the lives of others. If you are looking for your next opportunity to join a team that is passionate about culture, growth, customer experience, and making an impact we'd love to hear from you!

Job Description:

The purpose of the Data Analyst is to support, maintain, and execute processes as part of the Apex Power Platform Team. The person in the role of the Data Analyst should be familiar with caching strategies and analytic data streaming technologies. They should also be passionate about solving problems through data analytics and possess strong problem-solving skills, with the ability to tackle problems using data.

Basic Functions:

Query data sources using tools like Excel (PowerPivot, Power Query, Power Map), Power BI, and other reporting tools such as Tableau, SAS, and Teradata.
Manage the quality of data, data profiling, and service offering ideation.
Manage expectations by regularly communicating with customers and team members on project status and steps.
Oversee getting the decision support reports and data to executives for their periodic review.
Provide leadership on the project team from a data perspective, facilitating the resolution of requirements, scope, and project issues.
Attend weekly Service Delivery huddles to remain in line with company and departmental objectives.

Knowledge, Skills and/or Abilities Required:

Deep understanding of manipulating and analyzing complex, high volume, high-dimensionality data from varying sources using a variety of tools and data analysis techniques.
Strong ability to define, track, are report key metrics to assess overall business health, delivering in-depth analysis on business performance (trends, funnels, etc.) and drivers, as well as forecasts and targets.
Deep understanding of how to build and design dashboards to enable ongoing monitoring of business health, as well as operationalizing dashboards and ingesting new data sources.
Able to provide actionable insights on how to improve business services.
Strong understanding of scripting languages including R, Python, Scala, and SQL.
Extensive experience with data interface tools, Power BI, and programming concepts.
Information Technology industry experience is preferred.
Experience working with large datasets and reporting or visualization tools with the ability to tell a story using data.
Problem-solving mentality leveraging internal and/or external resources.
Proven track record of driving decisions collaboratively, resolving conflicts, and ensuring follow-through
Presentation skills with a high degree of comfort with both large and small audiences.
Exceptional verbal and written communication.
Ability to collaborate with other team members to provide data analytics support for their initiatives.
Strong project management skills with a strong attention to detail.

Education Recommendations:

5+ years of experience in data analytics and data mining with proven quantitative orientation
3+ years of working on complex reporting requirements, large, complex data sets, and various reporting tools, such as Power BI
3+ years of demonstrated ability to deliver high-quality reporting metrics to customers and executives
5+ years of proven ability to judge data results as valid and accurate
Technologies: Access, business objects, Cognos, Microsoft Excel, Hadoop, Apache Hive, Oracle, Power BI, Power Map, Power Pivot, Power Query, SAS, SharePoint, Apache Spark, SQL Server, SSRS, Tableau, Teradata, Visio
Programming/Scripting Languages: Apache Hive, Java, JavaScript, mdx, Python, R, SQL, T-SQL
Platforms: Windows, Linux
Preferred Certifications: MCSE Data Management and Analytics, MCSE Building Intelligence, MCSA Data Engineering in Azure, MapR Certified Data Analyst (MCDA), Cloudera Certified Associate – Data Analyst (CCA), Certified Business Intelligence Professional (CBIP)

Benefits:

Competitive salary based on experience and qualifications.
Health, vision, and dental benefits.
Life Insurance and short/long term disability.
Quarterly based Performance incentives.
Unlimited PTO.
Paid Volunteer Days.
Full on-the-job training & support.
Award-winning work environment and culture
Great opportunity for advancement.

Powered by JazzHR

8CYNvDswwe",3.9,"Apex Digital Solutions
3.9","Southfield, MI",-1,1 to 50 Employees,1999,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
218,Data Analyst,$55k-$95k (Glassdoor Est.),"Title:

Data Analyst

Job Summary: Analyze large quantities of data to identify opportunities and respond to specific business questions that support U.S. Air Force leadership and Congressional inquiries in the area of military readiness.

Required Qualifications:

Active SECRET Clearance.

Bachelor’s Degree in Statistics, Analytics, Business Administration, Business Information Systems, or equivalent related field of study.

Five (5) years of experience in data analysis using required tools with vast quantities of disparate data.

Interprets data results using a variety of techniques, ranging from simple data aggregation via statistical analysis to complex data mining. Works directly with internal and external clients and project and business leaders to identify analytical requirements.

Creates both ongoing and ad hoc reports and presentations based on team needs.

Must be able to translate information into creative and engaging presentations.

Must be able to work independently in home office or corporate office locations as well as on Government site, primarily the Pentagon.

Desired Qualifications:

Master’s Degree in Statistics, Analytics, Business Administration, Business Information Systems, or equivalent related field of study.

Tableau experience.

COGNOS 10+ experience.

Scheduled Weekly Hours:

40

KBR is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, disability, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, national origin, veteran status, genetic information, union status and/or beliefs, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, or local law.",3.7,"KBR
3.7","Fairfax, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1901,Company - Public,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
219,Data Analyst,-1,"Our growing sales organization is looking for someone with an analytical mindset and looking to apply that to assist in our continued growth.

Job Responsibilities:
Responsible for the integrity of the data stored within each database; checking for duplicates, errors, etc.
Communicate with vendors to request and maintain the most up to date information
Upload client and vendor accounts, ensuring correct formatting as required by the housing database
Pull data from internal database systems to analyze and build comprehensive reports for Management and Sales Team
Prepare monthly sales reports for Vendors
Monitor database environment to ensure updates are occurring as required/needed
Perform system updates and enhancements as needed
Assume additional responsibilities as requested
Qualifications and Skills:
Bachelor’s Degree
3+ years of relevant work experience
Strong analytical skills with working knowledge of SQL, Tableau, and Power BI
Ability to pull data from multiple databases and compile into simple, easy to understand visualizations
Ability to write SQL Script
Expertise with Microsoft Office, especially in Excel and Advanced Excel Skills
Highly organized
Strong attention to detail, demonstrates accuracy and thoroughness; monitors own work to ensure quality
Adapts to changes in the work environment; manages competing demands; changes approach or method to best fit the situation; able to deal with frequent change, delays or unexpected events.
Excellent written and oral communication skills
Professionalism: Reacts well under pressure; accepts responsibility for their own actions; follows through on commitments
Dependability: Follows instructions; responds to management direction; completes tasks on time or notifies appropriate person with alternate plan
Demonstrates accuracy and thoroughness; monitors own work to ensure quality
Ability to work effectively and independently is a MUST.
The Harper Group is a sales organization dedicated to individualized customer service founded and built upon courtesy, integrity, and knowledge of our customer’s needs. We represent multiple high demand manufacturers in the gift, tabletop, and home décor industries.",2.9,"Harper Group
2.9","New York, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
220,Data Analyst,$40k-$71k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description

Data Analyst

Location US-WA-Remote

Job ID 15202

Overview of Job Function:

The Data Analyst is assigned to the Intelligent Virtual Assistant (IVA) division, within the Verint Intelligent Self-Service department. The data analyst may be assigned new IVA implementations, IVA continuous improvement projects, sales support, product development, and/or internal projects. The role analyzes natural language and prioritize analysis results using an evidence-based approach. They also work with other analysts, project managers, engineering teams, and customer subject matter experts to shape business objectives based on their analysis.

The analyst possesses innate problem-solving skills with a drive to align business objectives with data analysis findings. The data analyst untangles ambiguous problems to find insights and tell a story for improvement. This role uses both established and creative techniques when analyzing data, and in preparing presentation materials. The role compiles analysis findings and presents recommendations at many different levels of detail and to various audiences in a professional and engaging manner. The data analyst utilizes multiple data sources, such as chat transcripts, website analytics, and scope documents to come up with strategies to meet and exceed our client’s business objectives. Analysis is performed using the Verint suite of analysis tools as well as other application suites, such as Microsoft Office, with a focus on Excel.

Principal Duties and Essential Responsibilities:

•Conduct quality analysis of IVA implementations, build data models and libraries, interpret insights, and help drive business decisions with customers.

•Research and understand the client’s domain and critical business needs to define and improve performance of the IVA within the scope of the project.

•Analyze user behaviors and needs in order to recommend improvements to user experience.

•Present actionable recommendations for the design and/or improvement of the IVA and the overall user experience.

•Obtain client approval of recommendations to continue development and improvement of the IVA.

•Serve as a consultant to client employees working in a subject matter expert and/or analyst capacity.

•Lead analysis review sessions with internal project team(s) prior to client sessions.

•Serve as a point of contact for project team during development.

•Provide feedback and guidance to the product development team to improve the analyst tool suite relating to data analysis.

Minimum Requirements:

•Bachelor’s degree in analytics, linguistics or a related field or equivalent work experience

•Minimum of 3-5 years’ experience in analysis

•Strong written and verbal communication skills

•Ability to work on a team, with great interpersonal relations

•Ability to manage tasks according to set priorities, multi-task, and meet deadlines

•Ability to communicate status of work to manager and project managers for proper planning

•Ability to present recommendations in a compelling and professional manner to clients

•Proficiency in Windows OS and Microsoft Office with a focus on Excel

•Successful completion of a background screening process including, but not limited to, employment verifications, criminal search, OFAC, SS Verification, as well as credit and drug screening, where applicable and in accordance with federal and local regulations

Preferred Requirements:

•Fluent in a second language

•Experience with Agile/Scrum development methodologies

•Experience working at an enterprise and/or healthcare software company

•Up to date with the latest UI and UX trends, techniques, and technologies

•Familiar with current multi-platform technology such as desktop, mobile, and voice-controlled devices

•Experience with generating mind-maps, conversational flows, or similar visual designs

To view full details and how to apply, please login or create a Job Seeker account.",3.4,"Verint Systems, Inc.
3.4","Springfield, IL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1994,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
221,Data Analyst,-1,"Data Analyst

Posted on September 10 2019
Zozimus is looking for a mid-level Data Analyst to be a key member of our Performance Marketing team reporting directly to the VP of Digital Performance and Analytics.

Essential Job Functions:
Derive, track, report on key performance indicators across a number of client accounts
Identify why accounts are, or are not hitting their goals to further optimize accounts
Own the data feeds across multiple accounts and platforms
Implement and test tracking prior to project delivery, including tracking tag generation from website analytics systems (e.g., GA 360/Adobe Analytics) and/or ad serving systems (e.g., DV 360, Conversant, Sizmek)
Aggregation of data from various sources (including but not limited to: site analytics, third party ad servers, social listening platforms, call center data, CRM, etc.) into integrated report templates or dashboards
Quality assurance of data throughput throughout the life of a campaign, including ongoing tracking, maintenance, and issue resolution with regard to measurement framework while programs are in market
Data review and analysis, as well as presentation of findings to internal teams and/or clients
Serving as the subject matter expert for reporting/visualization platforms from both data aggregation and data visualization standpoints
Supporting the overall Analytics vision for the agency, including ongoing refinement of processes, tools, and templates
Coach junior analytics team members

Preferred Requirements, Experience, and Skills
Hands-on experience with Google Data Studio, Power BI, Tableau, Datorama, Supermetrics, etc.
Experience with web site analytics (Google, Adobe), online ad platforms (Google Ads, Facebook, etc.)
Python, R, SQL
Proficient in Excel, Google Sheets (including custom scripting)
Interest in applied analytics – Your work will help our clients realize their marketing goals!
Detail-oriented and well organized
Strong qualitative and quantitative skills
Strong communication skills (written & verbal)
Ability to manage timelines and multitask across a variety of projects
Ability to work independently as well as part of a team

To apply send your cover letter and resume with the subject “Data Analyst"" to Vmariscal@zozimus.com",3.3,"Zozimus
3.3","Boston, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2004,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
222,Data Analyst,-1,"Podium is a suite of messaging tools for local business. Using our platform, businesses of all sizes can connect with customers via text to do things like request payments, collect reviews, and sell products, in a modern, convenient way. Our work streamlining this process for local businesses has awarded us recognition on top industry lists, such as Forbes’ Next Billion Dollar Startups, Forbes’ Cloud 100, the Inc. 5000 (#13), and Fast Company’s World’s Most Innovative Companies — in the last year alone. For more about our product.

Podium has a positive, diverse, and supportive culture and was recently named one of Inc. Magazine’s Best Workplaces for 2019. We look for people who are curious, creative and work to be a little better every day. In our work together we embody our values: Be a founder, Murder drama, and Enjoy the ride.

As a data analyst at Podium, you will be a critical part of illustrating ROI to clients, and keeping those clients loyal to Podium. You will work with clients and analyze and recommend strategic, data-driven decisions to clients and build reports based on the strategy. You will be on email threads and phone calls with clients, talking through their reporting needs and proposing solutions. You will also help train these clients on the custom reports that you build.

If you are someone who is passionate about building a business, turns curiosity into valuable deliverables, can creatively solve problems using quantitative metrics, and thrives in a fast-paced, open environment, then this is the right role for you!

What you will be doing:

Build reporting dashboards for Podium’s clients, providing insights into their messaging behaviors, public online reviews, and private internal feedback.
Present reporting dashboards to clients, and train them on all aspects of the reporting.
Create new ways to visualize data for our clients, and build those new reports in a scalable manner
Become an expert on all data infrastructure and Podium’s products, and know how to quickly answer any question that crosses your plate
Partner and collaborate with all other teams at Podium (sales, engineering, product, marketing, etc.) to design and build internal dashboards
Foster relationships with our Strategic account managers, and make recommendations on how to best handle their accounts (identify at-risk clients, provide ad-hoc charts for slide deck presentations, etc.)

What you should have:

2+ years professional experience with SQL and relational databases
The ability to clearly and effectively communicate the results of complex analyses
Scripting language experience (R preferred)
An understanding of common statistical applications and methods (correlation, summary statistics, regression)
Experience managing multiple, simultaneous projects, and do so with minimal guidance
A passion for identifying and understanding stories in data, and an innate curiosity to find more stories
Experience with Domo/Tableau/PowerBI preferred

BENEFITS

Transparent culture
Flexibility to work in this building in Lehi, UT
Great opportunities for career growth
401k with a competitive matching contribution plan
Unlimited Vacation (yes, we want you to have a work-life balance)
Great medical, dental, vision benefits
If in Utah, a stellar onsite gym with local professional coaches, morning and night classes offered
Life insurance, long and short-term disability coverage
Paid maternity and paternity leave
Swag

Podium is an equal opportunity employer. Podium provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, disability, genetic information, marital status or veteran status.",-1,Podium Infotech,"Lehi, UT",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
223,Data Analyst,-1,"Data Analysts Needed!

Are you looking for a job opportunity where you can use your database and presentation skills? This is it!!

What Will You Be Doing?

Working Access database conducting queries, analyzing data and putting data into the database. You will create/design reports and forms. You will modify the databases-as needed.

What Do You Need to Be Successful?

You will possess strong knowledge of database software (i.e., Microsoft Access) and possibly other software (i.e., word processing, presentation graphics, etc.). Ideally, possess strong project management, communication and organization skills.
* Work from home is currently in place. You will need to have your own PC for access.

Volt is an equal opportunity employer.",3.4,"Volt
3.4","Chicago, IL",-1,10000+ Employees,1950,Company - Public,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
224,Senior Data Analyst,$51k-$94k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Senior Data Analyst is a key position within the Data Mining Group, relied upon to identify the needs of the business and drive product development to meet them. In this role, you will lead new initiatives and mentor other analysts within the Data Mining Group. You will maintain regular communication with all levels of the organization while managing several high impact projects.

About Us

The Rawlings Group provides payment integrity services and claims data analysis for health insurance carriers and their members. We work behind the scenes to make sure that members are receiving the full value of their coverage by ensuring that claims are appropriately paid. Providing payment integrity and recovery services to the industry creates a more equitable distribution of healthcare dollars so members can receive the care they need when they need it most.

We offer opportunities for growth and development, continuing education, internal mobility and promotions, and unrivaled income earning potential. We are looking for individuals that have the drive and commitment to make a difference in the industry. We invite you to apply to become a part of The Rawlings Group team.

Our Culture is focused on:

The guiding principle of doing the right thing
Caring for our employees and taking pride in the work they do
Providing recognition and financially rewarding employees for their success

Our Values are:

Integrity and Trust
Customer Service Excellence
Innovation
Diversity and Inclusion
Honoring our Veterans and their service
Responsibilities
Meet regularly with all levels of the organization to understand core business concepts or challenges, form requirements, provide updates and deliver results
Operate with reduced levels of supervision while meeting deadlines
Work independently or collaboratively as required by the project
Mentor and educate data analysts in support of a positive team culture
Use strong written and verbal skills to provide analysis to an executive audience
Create custom reports and visualizations to support operations
Maintain, execute, and create SQL queries to support critical business needs
Perform data engineering related tasks
Originate targeted mining processes to create inventory and report results
Research new tools and techniques to improve mining and enrichment processes
Performs other duties as assigned
Bachelor’s degree in a business, computer, data, mathematics, or science related field is required.
4 or more years of professional experience
4 or more years of SQL experience and Python (or similar general-purpose language)
2 or more years of data visualization (Tableau preferred)
Experience building SSIS packages
Experience processing, cleaning, and warehousing unstructured data
Fundamental understanding of statistics
Familiarity with basic machine learning algorithms
Ability to present major initiatives and results to Leadership
Strong analytical mindset and eagerness to learn a complex business
High attention to detail and data accuracy
Proactive, inquisitive and creative in approach to work
Ability to handle multiple projects effectively
Capability to work in a small team setting with frequent outreach
Physical Requirements
Frequently remains in sitting position for long periods of time to perform duties
Frequently concentrates for long periods of time, paying close attention to detail
Frequently uses and views the computer using fingers, hands, and vision
Frequently works in a well-lit, tempered environment
Occasionally walks through office to communicate with other employees
Equal Employment Opportunity. It is our policy to recruit, hire, train, and promote people without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, disability, or veteran status, except where age, sex, or physical status is a bona fide occupational qualification.
The Rawlings Group is an employment at will employer.
#LI-JS23",3.0,"The Rawlings Group
3.0","Lagrange, KY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1977,Company - Private,Insurance Agencies & Brokerages,Insurance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
225,Business Data Analyst,-1,"Comsat Architects is seeking a motivated individual to support our company’s business data analytics projects. The responsibilities of this position include:

· Research and perform data mining functions;

· Create and collate data sets and maintain databases and data systems;

· Analyze data to produce graphs and perform statistical analysis as required;

· Advise on best practices for data management and production.
Basic Qualifications: *
· Minimum Bachelor’s degree

· Research skills using multiple sources including Internet

· Ability to organize and analyze data

· Proficiency in using Microsoft Excel to gather and clean data

· Ability to draw connections among various data sets

· Excellent oral and written communication skills

· Ability to work independently and with a team

· Must be a US citizen or US permanent resident
Preferred Skills and Experience: *
· Bachelor’s degree in Data Science, database administration, Mathematics, Computer Science, Statistics or a related field is encouraged.

· Experience working with data fields a plus

· Expert knowledge in data collection and analysis best practices

· Skill using data visualization tools
About the Company: *
Located in Rocky River, Ohio, Comsat Architects provides services in space communication system design, network modeling and simulation, and analysis for our clients in the civil, defense, and commercial space sectors. Through our work with NASA, and other agencies, our fundamental goal is to enhance communications which drive exploration from Earth to the Moon and beyond. We place a high value on finding and keeping loyal, smart, dedicated, and passionate employees, allowing us to provide superb quality of service to all our clients. To learn more about Comsat Architects visit www.comsat-architects.com.

Job Types: Full-time, Part-time

Benefits:
401(k) matching
Health insurance
Paid time off
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Rocky River, OH 44116 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
www.comat-architects.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",5.0,"Comsat Architects
5.0","Rocky River, OH",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
226,Data Analyst,-1,"Metrics LLC is looking for a Data Analyst to support and successfully plan, execute, coordinate and manage a rigorous data mining, analysis, and data synthesizing. The Data Analyst will provide weekly scorecards, trend analysis, and ad-hoc program and management reports.

Job Description
Maintain and enhance consolidated financial dashboard with total program spending and performance data
Identify data trends to anticipate risks
Respond to data requests from VA leadership, OIG, Congress, OMB, and GAO
Respond to ad hoc data requests
Provide data mining, research and analytics using the Veteran Enterprise Management System (VEMS) database repository to support all program reporting requirements
Synthesize data to support all ad hoc data reporting requirements
Develop, edit and maintain various program status, progress, and performance assessment reports (e.g. weekly scorecard and trend analysis wrap-up, productivity assessments, cost-per-application assessment, process performance metrics etc.)
Develop customized data queries and management reports across multiple management information systems
Required

POSITION SKILLS AND EXPERIENCE:
Bachelor’s Degree
8+ Years of Experience with Data Analysis
Proficient in Microsoft Access and the Microsoft Office Suite of Applications
Organizational Skills
Attention to Detail
Desired
Experience directly supporting federal agencies
Experience building matrices and reports using MS Tools or comparable
Key Personality Attributes Required
Sense of ownership.
Loyalty & long work tenure with prior organizations.
Sense of urgency.
Sense of pride in work product.
Strong attention to detail.
Enthusiastic.
High degree of personal motivation for success.
Positive attitude - demonstrating an ultimate desire to fulfill organizational objectives through complete customer satisfaction.
Providing quality government consulting in today's resource constrained environment, Metrics LLC balances proven best practices with innovative approaches. Our result: Highly effective outcomes and highly competitive solutions.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $19.00 - $22.00 per hour

Schedule:
Monday to Friday",5.0,"Metrics LLC
5.0","Chantilly, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
227,Data Analyst,-1,"Advana, a private equity-backed marketing technology startup, is expanding our team to take our customer's success to the next level. With our suite of products, we empower brands & retailers understand their marketplace take clear actions to drive their growth across our growing network of thousands of locations across 3 continents.

We are looking for a *Data Analyst* to produce dashboards and manage our proprietary & customer-defined data standards. This vital role will monitor the performance of our data-driven marketing campaigns and ensure their performance is optimized throughout their duration. Additionally, you will ensure data consistency & standardization across our partner network encompassing over 700 individual data sources.

You will also bring exceptional interpersonal and communication skills, a highly collaborative mindset, an ability to work independently, and a willingness to learn in a fast-paced, rapidly changing atmosphere. This position will also provide a unique opportunity for development and advancement within an organization defining the future of multi-channel marketing for fast moving consumer goods.
What You’ll Do and Be Responsible For *
Campaign Dashboarding & Optimization
Produce weekly dashboards for marketing campaigns and make recommendations for optimization
Understand performance variables and their causation to inform future campaigns
Collaborate with data engineering to ensure data is readily accessible
Bring scientific rigor and statistical methods to meet our customer’s high standards for performance
Data Standardization
Ensure standardization of our proprietary & customer-defined data standards are consistent across our platform.
Evaluate & Improve data sets and pipelines that power our marketing & intelligence products.
Integrate new sources into existing data sets and perform new calculations, including production code to maintain, improve and optimize analysis at scale.
What it Takes to Join Our Team*
1-3 years of business/data analysis experience; digital advertising or business intelligence preferred.
Early stage startup experience with the ability to excel in a fluid ambiguous environment.
Highly data-driven and leverages analytics and quantitative methods to inform & influence decision making
Evidence of extraordinary ability with a track record & portfolio showcasing extraordinary achievement
Highly proficient in Microsoft Excel, Google Sheets, SQL, Python, ETL, etc.
Ability to build, interpret, and execute complex SQL queries across platforms.
What Will Set You Apart from the Rest*
Progressive experience in data analysis, with proven ability to influence results.
Hands-on experience in data retrieval, mining, or machine learning.
Bachelor’s degree preferred with strong understanding of the latest data science techniques
What We Offer*
Collaborative remote start-up culture focused on enabling you to be your best
Competitive compensation package commensurate with experience, ability, and potential
Your choice of technology that enables your peak performance
Medical, Dental, and Vision benefits & 401k
Flexible schedules, 3 weeks of vacation plus holidays & election days
Travel 10%-20% to meet customers (post-pandemic) and champion Advana
Our Interview Process*
Step 1: Phone Screen with one of our Talent Partners
Step 2: Remote Interview with the Hiring Team
Step 3: Remote Functional Test/Case Presentation to Hiring Team
Step 4: Offer & Onboarding
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $55,000.00 - $70,000.00 per year

Experience:
start up: 1 year (Required)
Data Analysis: 1 year (Required)
Work Location:
Fully Remote",-1,Advana,"Atlanta, GA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2012,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
228,Data Analyst,-1,"About Camelot Illinois:

Camelot Illinois has been awarded the contract as the new private manager of the Illinois Lottery. In partnership with the state, Camelot will operate a modern lottery that truly benefits the people of Illinois.

Camelot's innovative approach places consumers and social responsibility at its core, providing funding for schools, capital projects and special causes. Camelot is committed to building an organization with the strength and experience to grow the lottery and reinforce its rightful position as a force for good.

Camelot Illinois is a subsidiary of Camelot Global, a leading technology and professional services provider to lotteries around the world. Camelot Global’s portfolio of work includes the Irish National Lottery, Loterie Romande (Switzerland), the California State Lottery, the Kentucky Lottery and the Arkansas Scholarship Lottery, among others.

Our sister company, Camelot UK, has operated the UK National Lottery since 1994. Camelot UK has an unrivaled track record for success, helping the UK National Lottery deliver over $80 billion to winners and $46 billion to good causes to date.

About the Team:

The Strategy team is responsible for driving data-led decision making across the organization through research, data analysis and modeling, planning and stakeholder engagement. The team works closely with a vendor and partner network to identify opportunities for growth using internal and external data and insights.

Position Overview:

Within Camelot Illinois, the Data Analyst is responsible for providing comprehensive analysis and reporting of channel and product performance to support the Strategy team and our internal stakeholders, including executive leadership.

Responsibilities:
Provide category and brand sales analysis for both Draw Based Games and Instants categories, highlighting key risks and opportunities within the retail and digital channels.
Develop and implement a suite of self-service reports for various teams ensuring they are able to make decisions founded on data.
Continually optimize the reporting suite, driving an efficient self-serve culture.
Continuously seek and develop new analysis, dashboard and data visualization techniques and capabilities to drive insights.
Partner with other team members to deliver holistic insights through the lenses of industry, consumer, market, competitor and international trends to drive the brand strategy.
Analyze and interpret data in an efficient way to drive insight and knowledge across brands, categories and customers.
Take information from multiple sources (sales, consumer and macro trends) to formulate insight and provide recommendations and options.
Requirements

Required:
Strong technical expertise in SQL, Excel and other dashboard and analytical tools (eg. Qlik, Tableau etc.).
2 plus years of data analyst experience.
Experience developing business reporting and KPI dashboards for a full picture of channel, customer and consumer performance.
Ability to handle multiple projects in a deadline-driven environment.
Experience working within the Microsoft Suites and/or Google Suite technologies.
Preferred:
Bachelor’s Degree or higher in mathematics, statistics or engineering.
Experience in a CPG or Retail environment.
Project management skills and proven experience in managing analysis projects from brief to insight delivery.
Strong communication skills, with a proven ability to translate analysis to insights for various stakeholder groups.
Strong commercial awareness and proven experience of incorporating financial awareness and business implications into the recommendations derived from holistic insights.
Benefits

Working For Camelot Illinois

We’re a creative group of people at Camelot Illinois, passionate about our work. We are not interested in formality or too much hierarchy. We like to bring the best ideas forward as quickly as possible. We’re proud that we provide a lively and challenging environment for our teams to try new ideas and achieve their potential. If this sounds like a company you would thrive in, get in touch!

Career Growth

We want people who thrive in a relaxed, autonomous, results-driven environment to join our company. We believe the way to attract and retain the best talent is to offer a fulfilling career in an organization committed to growing its own future leaders. Career Development is a top priority and we will partner with employees to grow and progress their professional skill sets.

Benefits and Employee Policies

We bring our experience of working with European lotteries to Illinois. We also bring a European influence to paid time off, family leave and so on. We have created a strong ethical culture that is translated to each of our employees and business dealings globally. We offer a package of benefits and policies that competes with any private sector employer in the state. We ensure that every employee is engaged and has the necessary support to understand and implement the responsible gaming principles at work.

Moreover, we pledge to have the highest standards of respect, diversity and inclusion at our company and support and encourage our partners to do the same.

Camelot Illinois is an equal opportunity employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other legally protected characteristics.",2.7,"Camelot Illinois
2.7","Chicago, IL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2017,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Gambling,"Arts, Entertainment & Recreation",Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
229,Data Analyst,$69k-$118k (Glassdoor Est.),"Two Sigma is a different kind of investment manager. Since 2001, we have used data science and technology to derive insights that forecast the future and discover value in markets worldwide. Our team of scientists, technologists and academics looks beyond traditional finance to understand the bigger picture and develop creative solutions to some of the world’s most difficult economic problems. Our work spans markets and industries, from insurance and securities to private investments and new ventures.

We are seeking a talented data specialist to join our highly motivated and innovative Data Engineering team. You'll be part of a close knit, dynamic team of passionate individuals critical to the success of Two Sigma's business.

You will take on the following responsibilities:
Analyze and curate massive amounts of data for thousands of different tradable instruments, including stocks, bonds, futures, contracts, commodities, and more;
Create systematic, automated processes and tools that allow the team to scale and rapidly onboard new datasets;
Collaborate with business partners, software engineers, and other data analysts to understand business needs and then design and develop reliable data pipelines that produce high quality datasets;
Support the day to day operations of Two Sigma by applying problem solving, pattern detection, and root cause analysis to a wide range of data issues in a fast paced environment;
Help drive continuous improvements to the team’s data quality procedures and a consistent approach to how data quality is measured, monitored and reported;
You should possess the following qualifications:

3+ years professional experience in an environment that prioritizes data quality
A bachelor’s degree with a strong academic record, which includes university coursework in programming and computing systems
Exposure to hands-on Python and SQL coding in the context of data pipelining in a professional environment. Prior experience with Jira, Bash, GIT desired.
While financial industry experience is a plus, we are open-minded in our search for critical thinkers who are passionate about technology and data.
You will enjoy the following benefits:

Core Benefits: Fully paid medical and dental insurance premiums for employees and dependents, competitive 401k match, employer-paid life & disability insurance
Perks: Onsite gyms with laundry service, wellness activities, casual dress, snacks, game rooms
Learning: Tuition reimbursement, conference and training sponsorship
Time Off: Generous vacation and unlimited sick days, competitive paid caregiver leaves
We are proud to be an equal opportunity workplace. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity/expression, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or any other applicable legally protected characteristics.",4.4,"Two Sigma Investments, LLC.
4.4","Houston, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
230,Data Analyst,$35k-$63k (Glassdoor Est.),"Cadaret Grant is looking for a Data Analyst to join our Data Solutions team. At Cadaret Grant, we offer our employees the opportunity to grow personally and professionally, to contribute to the success of a dynamic organization, and to serve others in a manner that exceeds their expectations.

This position is responsible for various functions within Data Solutions Department, including assisting with research and support for processes, development and maintenance of reporting functionality, creation of regulatory and management reporting, and analyzing data discrepancies. The Data Analyst responsibilities will include research and support for the raw data received from various sources, along with testing and documenting production changes.

Develop and manage reports for use by various internal departments.
Creation of detailed reports as requested by both management and regulatory reporting requests.
Provide research, support and resolution for all in-bound & out-bound files.
Provide testing support for all in-bound and out-bound files.
Review and resolution of account table discrepancies.
Conduct research and supply comprehensive support for operational questions, including assistance related to processing and reporting.
Initiation, follow up, testing and resolution of production tickets.
Test and document changes thoroughly for appropriate auditing records.
Quality review and documentation of payout testing to advisors on a cycle basis.
Other duties assigned by management.

EDUCATION, SKILLS, AND EXPERIENCE:

Bachelor’s degree in business, business analytics, finance, or related field required.
Demonstrated professional work history in business analytics, preferably in the financial services industry.
Strong analytical abilities and attention to detail.
Proficient in Microsoft Office products, including Excel.
Strong oral and written communication skills.
Self-motivated, demonstrated high level of initiative.
Must be able to perform a variety of analytical techniques to solve all types of problems in a timely manner.
Ability to get to the root of the problem and fix the problem as a whole and not just on the surface.
Provide suggestions on how to improve the processing and streamline functions within the department.

Cadaret Grant, a FINRA member and independent broker-dealer headquartered in Syracuse, New York, is a wholly-owned subsidiary of Atria Wealth Solutions. Founded in 1985, Cadaret Grant serves nearly 750 financial advisors in over 450 branch offices with next-generation technology and support for their independent businesses. Cadaret Grant & Co. seeks employee candidates who are ambitious, dedicated, and spirited. Our collaborative culture offers community through shared goals and strong work ethics. To learn more about Cadaret Grant, please visit www.cadaretgrant.com.

Atria Wealth Solutions, Inc. (Atria) is a wealth management solutions holding company focused on delivering a clear path to the future of financial advice for financial professionals, financial institutions and their clients. Headquartered in New York City, Atria’s broker-dealer subsidiaries empower financial institutions and independent financial professionals with a sophisticated set of tools, services and capabilities that drive growth. Atria’s broker-dealer subsidiaries include CUSO Financial Services, LP, Sorrento Pacific Financial, LLC, Cadaret Grant & Co., Inc., NEXT Financial Group, Inc. and Western International Securities, Inc. Atria’s subsidiaries together support nearly 2,500 financial professionals with more than $75 billion of assets under administration. For more information, please visit www.atriawealth.com.

EOE",3.8,"Cadaret, Grant & Co., Inc.
3.8","Syracuse, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1985,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
231,Data Analyst,$44k-$83k (Glassdoor Est.),"Chipton-Ross is seeking a Data Analyst for an opening in Rochester, NY.

SUMMARY:
Under the direction of the Supervisor Data Analytics & the SAP Master Data Specialist will be responsible for supporting the Engineering master data and the touch points within SAP. The Data Analyst I will follow all work instructions of the Business Process Support Team (BPS). The Qualified Candidate will be responsible for supporting the requirements related to Engineering master data changes and the touch points within SAP for a specific project.

RESPONSIBILITIES:
Evaluate and make required changes in SAP for existing materials, product BOM’s, and routings per the direction of the Engineering Team. Create work centers, changing and creating BOM’s, Routings. Change Material Masters (Production Versions. Responsible for the ECM’s to document their work. Document and maintain ECM(Create, Obtain approvals, and submit to the Business Process Support Team).

REQUIREMENTS:
Proficient in SAP Master data as it relates to BOM’s and routings. Advance experience with Excel. Possess high levels of data accuracy and attention to detail. Strong analytical skills, combined with practical business knowledge. Strong verbal and written communication skills.

EDUCATION:
Accredited High School Diploma/GED

WORK HOURS:
Full-Time
1st Shift

Employment will be contingent on clearing a drug screen and background check. Both must clear prior to start date.

Contact
Billy James
bjames@chiptonross.com
CHIPTON-ROSS, INC.
420 Culver Boulevard
Playa Del Rey, CA 90293

Phone: (310) 414-7800 x340 or (800) 927-9318 x340",3.2,"Chipton-Ross
3.2","New York, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1983,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
232,Data Analyst,$59k-$110k (Glassdoor Est.),"ABOUT HOPPER

At Hopper, were on a mission to make booking travel faster, easier, and more transparent. We are leveraging the power that comes from combining massive amounts of data and machine learning to build the worlds fastest-growing travel app -- one that enables our customers to save money and travel more. With over $235M CAD in funding from leading investors in both Canada and the US, Hopper is primed to continue its path toward becoming the go-to way to book travel as the world continues its shift to mobile.

Recognized as the fastest-growing travel app by Forbes and one of the worlds most innovative companies by Fast Company two years in a row, Hopper has been downloaded over 40 million times and has helped travelers plan over 100 million trips and counting. The app has received high praise in the form of mobile accolades such as the Webby Award for Best Travel App of 2019, the Google Play Award for Standout Startup of 2016 and Apples App Store Best of 2015.

Take off with us!

THE ROLE
Hopper was built on the premise that the combination of big data and machine learning could make a difference. At Hopper, every dataset tells a story. Do you have what it takes to decipher the clues? bit.ly/2q6U8dq

Were looking for a data-savvy individual to join our User Acquisition team as a Data Analyst. Youll lead our marketing analytics projects around attribution, LTV modelling, ROI analysis, and help uncover insights in our ads and user behavior that allow us to efficiently deploy millions of dollars in ad spend per month. As the first analyst on a rapidly growing team, itll be a great opportunity to have a big impact and lots of ownership.

You might be a fit if youre excited about using your data science skills to help us acquire millions of new users across flights, hotels, and car rentals and help Hopper scale to at least 4X its current user base in 2021.
IN THIS ROLE YOU WILL:
Lead analytical projects to support our User Acquisition team. Deliver quantitative results, business understanding and strategic insights to help deploy millions of dollars in ad spend
Help create robust tracking of our campaigns, by combining data from ad networks, internal databases and analytics tools to build LTV and cohort analysis reports
Design and implement ad hoc and automated analysis scripts, develop and deliver your tables, charts and interactive tools to present your results
Work with a cross-functional team of marketers, designers and engineers
Find effective ways to simplify and communicate analyses to a non-technical audience
A PERFECT CANDIDATE HAS:

Strong analytical and creative problem-solving skills
Strong background in relational databases and SQL
Experience with marketing analytics concepts like LTV modelling, payback analysis, ROI analysis etc.
Experience working with growth teams, or running growth projects
Exposure to scripting with Pandas, R, SAS or other data preparation and analysis tools
Proven ability to communicate complex technical work to a non-technical audience
Enthusiasm and curiosity for conducting research and answering hard questions with data
The ability to work with minimal guidance, be proactive and to handle ambiguity and the challenge of quickly evolving goals
NICE TO HAVE:

Experience in mobile user acquisition or in the travel industry
Knowledge of MMPs (AppsFlyer), Amplitude, Tableau
Experience using Google BigQuery
BENEFITS

• Well-funded and proven startup with large ambitions, competitive salary and stock options
• Dynamic and entrepreneurial team where pushing limits is everyday business
• 100% employer paid medical, dental, vision, disability and life insurance plans
• Access to a 401k (US) or Retirement Savings Plan (Canada)",3.4,"Hopper
3.4","Boston, MA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Travel Agencies,Travel & Tourism,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
233,Data Analyst,$54k-$96k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description:

Are you looking for a new and exciting career opportunity?

Join our award-winning organization and work with some of the most talented minds within our Enterprise Technology and Innovation teams. As a Salient CRGT employee, you get to be part of a best performing team supporting our nation’s most critical missions.

Why Salient CRGT?

We’re passionate about the inspirational missions of our customers and we entrust our employees and teams to deliver exceptional performance to enable the safety, security, health and well-being of our nation. We provide the tools and resources to help you be successful, and our culture fosters an environment in which idea sharing and collaboration is essential. Are you ready to make a difference?

The ideal candidate will be responsible for:

-Work closely with the customer to gather and document project requirements

-Perform data manipulation and advanced data analysis including financial modeling, data mining, and machine learning techniques

-Perform risk analysis which may include a broad range of financial risk measures, such as Value at Risk (VaR), stress testing, and margin evaluations

-Assist business usersd, economists,statisticians, and other staff as required to support different analytical needs

-Create date reports and/ or visualizations to present the data in ways that are meaningful, actionable, and understandable to the customer(s)

-Coordinate the with internall and external organizations providing data to understand and resolve improper data formatting and other integration issues

-Participate in facilitated meetings between stakeholders at CFTC

-Create comprehensive project documentation according to CFTC Standards

Required Qualifications:

Mandatory Qualifications
-Bachelor's degree
-Minimum of 3 years of industrial analytics experience using statistical programming languages such as SAS,R, and Python. Experience with SQL,
-Minimum of 5 years of relevant experience in the data analysis field
-Ability to pass a Special Agrement Check (SAC) and a National Agency Check and Inquiries (NACI) Background Investigation-Public Trust

#TKReq

Desired Qualifications:

Salient CRGT is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran status, disability, genetic information, or any other factor prohibited by applicable anti-discrimination laws.",3.5,"Salient CRGT, Inc
3.5","Washington, DC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
234,Data Analyst,$39k-$71k (Glassdoor Est.),"Role
Understand the AMI Meter Functionalities and the applications involved in successfully running it
Track, monitor and analyze data from various AMI ad legacy systems for system reporting and performance issues
Analyze data, involve in triaging and meeting with various teams to resolve the issue.
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets
Work towards issue resolution and data synchronization between various applications
Perform transaction investigation and do correction through User Interface/ File correction as issues are identified and corrected
Create and refine reports for developed management metrics for project status communications
Troubleshoot System synchronization with data management between multiple systems
Work closely with management to prioritize business and information needs
Locate and define new process improvement opportunities
Required Skills:

Bachelor’s degree in Information Technology, Computer Science, or a combination of education and experience equating to the U.S. equivalent of a Bachelor’s degree in one of the aforementioned subjects.

Travel required:
Yes (These positions will involve working in unanticipated locations.)

Telecommute: No

Contact Information: Send resumes to Neo Prism Solutions 8000 Corporate Center Dr, Suite 201, Charlotte, NC 28226 or hr@neoprisminc.com",3.2,"Neo Prism Solutions
3.2","Charlotte, NC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Accounting,Accounting & Legal,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
235,Data Analyst,$38k-$71k (Glassdoor Est.),"CTDI is a large scale Engineering, Repair, and Logistics company that services the country’s largest wireless telecommunications providers, as well as the largest High-speed Internet & Cable providers. CTDI has over 7,000 FT US Employees in over 58 world class US Operations. CTDI also has a global footprint with more than 16,500 employees worldwide.

We are looking for a passionate Data Analyst to turn data into information, information into insight and insight into business decisions. You will conduct full life cycle activities to include requirements analysis and design, develop analysis and reporting capabilities, and continuously monitor performance and quality control plans to identify improvements. Day-to-day responsibilities will include:

Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing reports
Develop and implement data collection systems and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and data quality
Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintain databases/data systems
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets
Filter and “clean” data, and review computer reports, printouts, and performance indicators to locate and correct code problems
Work closely with management to prioritize business and information needs
Locate and define new process improvement opportunities

Required Skills

Technical expertise regarding data models, database design development, data mining and segmentation techniques
Strong knowledge of and experience with reporting packages (databases, programming, etc.)
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
Adept at queries, report writing and presenting findings

Required Experience

3+ years of experience as a data analyst
Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical packages for analyzing large data sets (Excel, SPSS, SAS etc.)
BS in Mathematics, Economics, Computer Science, Information Management or Statistics

Apply today to join our dynamic team! CTDI offers an excellent compensation and benefits package and has been a growing leader in the telecommunications field for over 40 years. Come put our successful history behind your career! EOE, Gender/Minority/Veterans/Disabled

CTDI does not accept unsolicited employment agency / recruiter resumes. Please do not forward unsolicited resumes to our website, to our HR Department or to any CTDI employee. CTDI will not pay fees to any third party agency or firm without a signed fee agreement or to any firm who was not issued a search assignment from CTDI's HR Department. CTDI will not be responsible for any agency fees associated with unsolicited resumes. Unsolicited resumes received will be considered.",2.6,"CTDI
2.6","Coatesville, PA",-1,10000+ Employees,1975,Company - Private,Telecommunications Services,Telecommunications,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
236,Senior Business Data Analyst,$79k-$139k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview


Intuit's Customer Success team is transforming the industry with a suite of high-touch professional services powered by data-driven, technology-led operations and a distributed professional workforce.

As a Business Data Analyst, you will be the change agent to progressing Intuits journey from creator of best in class tax and accounting software to acknowledged leader in solving financial problems for customers and powering their prosperity by connecting people to virtual experts. This is a multi billion dollar opportunity to bring humanized experiences directly to people who seek professional service through an innovative AI platform.

As a Business Data Analyst within Intuit Customer Success unit you will have a key focus on quickly adapting to changing business environment, being agile in managing the change, and driving cross functional alignment on the plans while leveraging machine learning and data science principles to build efficient end to end Expert Planning Process processes and governance model that improves process efficiency to develop optimal plans.
What you'll bring
Bachelors degree in industrial engineering, statistics, supply chain management or related technical discipline.
3+ plus years in related sales and operations planning with strong data and analytics skills; Dynamic workforce management (service planning) experience an advantage
APICS or related certifications desired.
Experience in developing and deploying global S&OP
Strong communication (verbal and written) and interpersonal skills.
Ability to influence and manage in a matrix environment
Broad end to end supply chain and operations process knowledge
Persistence and focus to drive results and continuous improvement

How you will lead
Facilitate the execution of the monthly alignment of expert availability and demand (capacity planning/ S&OP processes).
Collaborate with stakeholders to improve the baseline forecast
Using data and analytics to lead monthly forecast reviews with business partners to incorporate business insights into the baseline forecast.
Lead weekly meeting with leadership to present the overall demand/supply plan (and gaps to the plan), highlight assumptions, risks and mitigation plans incorporated in the plan and provide recommendations to organizational leaders
Collaborate with partners to identify any additional risk and opportunities and bake that into the plan to optimize for customer experience and cost.
Actively participate in the transformation initiatives and help cross functional teams to prioritize on key system and business capabilities needed in the organization",4.3,"Intuit - Data
4.3","Woodland Hills, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1983,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
237,Data Analyst,$52k-$92k (Glassdoor Est.),"Title
Data Analyst

16-Jun-2020

Job Description
Open to the following locations for this role: Princeton, NJ; Amelia, OH; Hartford, CT; Philadelphia, PA; NYC; Chicago, IL.

Access to increasing volumes of data, computing power, and data analytics capabilities is transforming the insurance industry and has an impact on all parts of the insurance value chain. Data is an important asset to Munich Re and there is an increasing need for data to develop and strengthen our business. The Data Hunting addresses these needs across the Munich Re Group. It is a global team within Reinsurance Development (RID) tasked with acquiring and preparing data and supporting its use to develop new solutions.

The North American Data Hunting team supports both P&C and life businesses by providing relevant, high quality data to improve traditional business and develop new solutions and services. The team collects data from internal and external sources, ensures quality standards of the collected data, and actively markets successful data-driven use cases. The team closely liaises and jointly drives projects with the business units, underwriting, claims, and analytics teams.

We are seeking a Data Analyst to join our team. This position will be responsible for executing on projects which provide relevant data to the business units to successfully demonstrate use cases and ensure that data is of sufficient quality and easily available to relevant stakeholders throughout the MR Group. Through this work you will develop an understanding of the business models of a range of Munich Re companies and how data is being used to enable new underwriting, product development, and claims solutions. As the scope is broad and the business environment is dynamic, we are seeking someone with the creativity, drive, and dedication to initiate and execute new solutions.

Key Responsibilities of this position include:
Execute on projects to provide relevant data to the business units in support of promising use cases
Cooperate closely with the data analytics teams to pilot modeling solutions
Research methods / tools to acquire and ensure quality of data for business applications
Collect, clean, and link data from disparate data sources to test quality / usefulness of data
Develop working knowledge of data infrastructure within Munich Re
Requisition Number
3932BR

Qualifications
Qualifications / Job Requirements:
Passion for data combined with strong business acumen
Understanding of reinsurance and/or primary insurance operations (underwriting, claims) with at least 3 year of hands-on experience
3+ years of experience in leveraging internal and/ or external data sets to deliver business results
Drive and dedication, as well as creativity and hands-on attitude to initiate and execute use cases
Curiosity in searching for new solutions outside of traditional approaches
Demonstrated ability to learn new technologies including databases and data visualization tools
Tech savviness and a willingness to experiment with and learn new technologies and keep abreast of new and emerging technologies
Proficiency in MS Excel, Power BI, SQL and other data management/analytics tools
Willingness to manually collect, clean, and link data where needed to demonstrate potential value of a larger scale solution
Excellent analytical, problem solving and organizational skills.
At Munich Re, we see Diversity and Inclusion as a solution to the challenges and opportunities all around us. Our goal is to foster an inclusive culture and build a workforce that reflects the communities in which we live and work. We strive to provide a workplace where all of our colleagues feel respected, valued and empowered to achieve their very best every day. We recruit and develop talent with a focus on providing our customers the most innovative products and services.

We are an equal opportunity employer. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

State
New Jersey

Employment Type
Full Time

City
Princeton

Company Name
Munich Re America Services

Country
United States of America",4.0,"HSB Group
4.0","Princeton, NJ",-1,Unknown,2000,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
238,Data Analyst,-1,"DURAMTECH LLC, a woman-owned small business, is a special company offering professional consulting services focusing in financial management solutions and data analytics/visualization. As a leading innovator in financial management systems and accounting solutions in the new era of e-business and e-government, DURAMTECH LLC offers a full complement of financial, accounting, and IT professionals, delivering services and software that support and enhance the business processes of financial and accounting practices for some of the largest federal government agencies and corporate entities.. We have a current opening for a Data Analyst to support a large government contract in Washington DC.

Job Responsibilities Include:

The candidate will be responsible for performing deep level analysis of data across many systems through a structured process of inspecting, cleaning, transforming and modeling data with the goal of discovering required information, suggesting conclusions and supporting decision making for ensuring complete and accurate data required for regulatory reporting.
Should be familiar enough with ETL to develop single-use maps to prepopulate data as required. UI work is related to working with business users in designing new screens to access their data.
Strong skills in Databases are required, especially advanced SQL, data modeling and data Similarly strong understanding of the Finance domain is required, with deep knowledge of all asset classes and key concepts related to allocating and aggregating transactions and positions as well as entity and account structures.

The candidate needs to be willing to work in a fast paced environment dealing with high data volumes, aggressive regulatory SLAs and follow an agile development methodology.

Qualifications:

Minimum 5 years of Data analysis experience
Exceptional Analytical skills
Strong Database knowledge
Hands-on SQL experience (5 years minimum)
Hands-on Data Mining/business analysis experience
Experience in Relational Data modeling
Initiative/Ownership – The candidate must be self-motivated, with the ability to find creative solutions
Communication – Possess strong verbal and written communication skills
Proficient knowledge of Excel (Data Analysis)",-1,DURAMTECH,"Arlington, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
239,Data Analyst,-1,"Data Analyst

Not Specified - United States | Posted - 10/01/20

Apply
Easy Apply

Overview

Position: Data Analyst

Duration: Long Term

Location: Remote

Job Requirements:
6+ years of overall professional experience
3+ years of experience in data management and analysis including profiling, data cleansing & standardization driving quantitative and qualitative data management planning.
Experience in pharmaceutical/biotechnology industry with data related initiatives
Bachelor's Degree
Hands-on experience with MDM products like Reltio, SQL Experience is a must.
Experience on tools like Jira, Adonis etc would be an added advantage
Experience working across the software development life cycle in an integrated platform
Experience in converting business requirements into data specifications and deliverables in alignment with MDM standards and guardrails.",3.6,"Apptad
3.6",United States,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2013,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
240,Data Analyst,-1,"Data Analyst

Austin, Texas, United States
Job Ref ID: 484241000026460092

Job Type: Contract
Number of Positions: (1)

Work Experience: 5+ years

Apply Now

Job Description

?

1. Experienced Automation Engineer

2. Hands on in Java programming

3. Hands on in RESTful services

4. Strong in Data

5. Has expertise on propagating code and test in cloud environment (Kubernetes preferable)
?

Apply Now

Share This Job

Share

Tweet

Share

Share

Pin

Email",4.0,"ASB Resources
4.0","Austin, TX",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2004,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
241,Data Analyst,-1,"About Us:

ActivTrak is a workforce productivity and analytics platform that helps organizations understand how people work, whether in-office or remote. Our cloud-based user activity monitoring platform collects and analyzes data and provides insights that help mid-market enterprises be more productive and compliant. We have more than 7,500 customers and over 100,000 users of our free version.

The Position & Responsibilities:

As a Productivity Lab Data Analyst, you will be directly involved in the analysis, validation and curation of workforce productivity data, turning data into insights that will help ActivTrak’s customers gain better understanding of their people and enable them to make data driven decisions across their organization.

The Data Analyst will also contribute to the development of best practices around the implementation and use of the ActivTrak platform, whether defining a strategy to combine ActivTrak data with other data sources or using ActivTrak as a stand alone solution, as a Productivity Lab Data Analyst you will play a key role helping organizations to understand how to better capture, measure and interpret workforce productivity metrics. In addition to that, this position will play a key role influencing the development of the ActivTrak platform and further the understanding of workforce productivity inside the organization.

Skills & Experience:

3+ years of experience writing, maintaining, and troubleshooting queries and data visualizations in Tableau, PowerBI, Data Studio, etc.

Deep understanding of queries and subquery mechanisms including indexes, table-valued functions and analytical functions.

Working knowledge of BigQuery and Google Data Studio.

Experience writing optimized SQL queries.

knowledge of programming languages like Python.

Curiosity and passion for problem solving (conceptually and analytically). A strong understanding of statistical analysis (simple & multiple regression) and experimental design.

Growth mindset, humility, and a burning desire to own your domain and your work.

Excellent communication skills with both technical and non-technical audiences.

Ability to deal with ambiguity and collaborate with different teams towards mutual goals.

Excellent attention to detail

Experience in Workforce Analytics will be considered a plus.

Why Should You Apply?

Learn from a dedicated team of peers and leadership. We value our team of diverse and talented individuals who come from different backgrounds and cultures

We promote employee development and growth opportunities. We care where you will be in 3, 5, and 10 years and we're invested in helping you get there

Competitive compensation packages including company stock options, bonus plan, health and dental plans, and company-sponsored 401k plan

Annual rideshare allowance

Employee referral bonuses to encourage the addition of great new people to the team

Flexible time off and vacation

Be a foundational member of the Productivity Lab

Work Environment:

Position located in Austin or Dallas, TX (remote during COVID-19) Also offered as a remote position Limited travel Limited physical demands Moderate noise level

ActivTrak is an equal opportunity employer. We celebrate diversity and are committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees. ActivTrak does not discriminate in employment on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, national origin, political affiliation, sexual orientation, marital status, disability, or age.",4.8,"ActivTrak
4.8","Dallas, OR",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
242,Data Analyst,$68k-$116k (Glassdoor Est.),"Come work at a place where innovation and teamwork come together to support the most exciting missions in the world!

This is an amazing time at F5. For over 20 years, we have been the industry leader in application delivery. Now, we’re also helping our customers thrive on any architecture and across any multi-cloud environment. F5 is the only company on the planet that powers applications from development through their entire lifecycle so our customers—enterprise businesses, service providers, governments, and consumer brands—can deliver differentiated, high-performing, and secure digital experiences that are changing the world.

But our success isn’t driven solely by what we do. We also care deeply about how we do it. Our culture is how we live, every single day, and it’s producing exceptional results—not only for our customers, but also for our employees. We understand that your life is about more than just work, so we’re committed to a culture that supports your whole life.

POSITION SUMMARY:

Are you passionate about using data to deliver insights that drive action and provide those insights in a coherent story using visualization tools? The Data Analyst working in the Data Strategy and Insights team is responsible for understanding how our customers interact, and want to interact with F5 across their journey, and for translating that information into irrefutable business insights. The Data Analyst will partner closely with other analytic teams across the organization including marketing, sales, service and product teams to develop a comprehensive data understanding of our customers and share data insights with business partners. You will work within the team to develop standard reports and dashboards.

This position will:

Design, develop and deliver data solutions including ad hoc analysis and data visualizations
Using an iterative and practical approach, create operational dashboards that provide bold insights into client behavior and KPIs for business outcomes
Propose and implement business metrics for senior management reviews and work with analysts and IT to design and develop data solutions to support business growth
Be comfortable working with incomplete data while creating high confidence-level recommendations
Collaborates with business partners in acting on complex, multi-source data to explore, generate and test business assumptions
Apply your expertise in quantitative analysis, data mining, and the presentation of data with a focus on actionable analytics

PRIMARY RESPONSIBILITIES:

Partner with Business stakeholders and Executives with the goal of providing the clarity to make decisions and gain insights through data analysis and visualization
Own creation and delivery Dashboards.
Interpret data and set appropriate measurement strategy
Support ad hoc analytic requests from raw data through presentation quickly, efficiently and accurately
Recommend scalable reporting solutions to have consistent data at an enterprise level
Gather requirements, run through iterations of work with the customers to understand their needs, and how to best visualize their data, followed by design, deployment and on-going enhancements
Work closely with IT, Marketing, Sales Finance, to align metrics and reporting
Manage relationship with the F5 BI team including managing and prioritizing tickets, providing requirements and feedback and UAT
Maintain courteous and professional working relationships with employees at all levels of the organization

Required Skills Experience and Qualifications:

Expert SQL skills with experience in data manipulation using R or Python
Proficiency in Tableau or other visualization tool.
Familiar with statistical analysis, along with working knowledge of any programming language.
Working knowledge of Salesforce.com and familiarity working with data in Snowflake environment a plus
Basic understanding of ETL and Data Warehousing fundamentals
Strong analytical skills and experience with reporting and data analysis
Strong interpersonal and presentation skills, with ability to articulate data analysis simply
Ability to work independently in a multifaceted fast paced environment, with minimal supervision

PHYSICAL DEMANDS AND WORK ENVIRONMENT:

Duties are performed in a normal office environment while sitting at a desk or computer table
Duties require the ability to utilize a computer, communicate over the telephone, and read printed material
Duties may require being on call periodically and working outside normal working hours (evenings and weekends)
Duties may require some travel to F5 and industry events

#LI-150184311_TM1

The Job Description is intended to be a general representation of the responsibilities and requirements of the job. However, the description may not be all-inclusive, and responsibilities and requirements are subject to change.

Please note that F5 only contacts candidates through F5 email address (ending with @f5.com) or auto email notification from Yello/Workday (ending with f5.com or @myworkday.com ) .

Equal Employment Opportunity

It is the policy of F5 to provide equal employment opportunities to all employees and employment applicants without regard to unlawful considerations of race, religion, color, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, sensory, physical, or mental disability, marital status, veteran or military status, genetic information, or any other classification protected by applicable local, state, or federal laws. This policy applies to all aspects of employment, including, but not limited to, hiring, job assignment, compensation, promotion, benefits, training, discipline, and termination. Reasonable accommodation is available for qualified individuals with disabilities, upon request.",3.9,"f5
3.9","Seattle, WA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1996,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
243,Business Data Analyst,$46k-$87k (Glassdoor Est.),"Skills Required:
System Analysis
Data Profiling
Data Analysis
Understanding of Data Anomalies
Data Modeling",4.1,"Sysmind LLC
4.1","San Antonio, TX",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1999,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
244,Data Analyst,$51k-$87k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview

Mortenson’s success is not a matter of luck; it’s a result of our ingenuity, expertise, and exceptional people coupled with our unparalleled focus on customer service.

Our foundation and culture are based upon our values of trust, safety, teamwork, responsibility, service and stewardship. We are inspired by a compelling purpose to build structures and facilities for the advancement of modern society and a mission to create an exceptional customer experience. Mortenson has built a reputation for being a leader in our industry and in the communities in which we live and work.

It all starts with our extraordinary people and collaborative teams. Mortenson has been voted a ""best place to work"" over 40 times since 2002…

…What are you waiting for?

PRIMARY OBJECTIVE(S) OF POSITION

Responsible for analyzing internal enterprise data and identifying patterns and trends in available information sources to assist management with operational decision making, policy formulation, and other managerial functions.

SUMMARY OF EXPECTED OUTCOME(S)

High quality, professional work performed with initiative, productivity, a positive attitude and behavior. Performance should meet or exceed the established standards, goals, and accountabilities of the position.

Mortenson by the numbers
$5.05B
2019 revenues

~6,500+
employees across 11 offices + field

1954
year founded

Responsibilities
KEY RESULT AREAS (ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS)
Understand the assigned business challenge and develop a plan to identify, obtain, and analyze the necessary data to drive improved business performance
Analyze internal enterprise data, coupling statistical methods and data science to translate Mortenson’s core data into actionable business insights and predictive models from a variety of data sources
Ability to analyze business issues using a variety of tools and approaches, and effectively explain findings to diverse audiences
Develop, analyze, and model operational, economic, management, and other organizational data
Quantify the competitive performance of business segments
Evaluate potential operational changes
Design new approaches and methodologies
Review program data consistently to provide corrective action when necessary based on information collected and current trends to maximize business performance
Take complex statistical output and translate it to actionable insights for business leaders
Driven by professional values that exemplify Mortenson’s values of teamwork, responsibility, safety, service and stewardship
All other duties as assigned

KEY SKILL REQUIREMENTS

Strong ability to concisely present and explain complex information and findings
Highly analytical, displaying an innate curiosity to understand and communicate the context for what we do and why we do it
Shown ability to comprehend business and industry concepts
Strong, self-motivated work ethic, willing to roll their sleeves up to show and tell, as needed
Excellent written and verbal communication and interpersonal skills
Experience and shown ability using statistical analysis software/tools such as SAS, Python, or R, and an advanced competency in Microsoft Excel
Humble worker, quietly confident in their experience & intellect but open to new, diverse ideas & perspectives

KEY SKILL PREFERENCES

Open to change based on diverse input and feedback
Effectively work with those of diverse backgrounds and organizational levels
Adaptive, effective communication and active listening skills
Strong cross-cultural relationship building and influencing at all organizational levels

Our approach to leadership and culture

Our founder Mort Mortenson believed that we were all born to be leaders; that leadership wasn't something that just happened to us but was something within us.

EXPLORE THE CULTURE HE BUILT

Qualifications
EDUCATION AND EXPERIENCE REQUIREMENTS
Bachelor’s degree in Data Science, Economics, Mathematics, Statistics, Analytics, or related field or equivalent experience
Minimum three years of related experience
Knowledge and experience with standard programming language such as SQL Server, Python, or R
Experience with analytics and visualization tools, including those noted earlier plus Microsoft PowerPoint, SharePoint and Power BI

ORGANIZATIONAL RESPONSIBILITY

All team members are expected to be in alignment with and contribute to the Mortenson Construction values and ethical standards as stated in the Mortenson Code of Ethics and Business Conduct.
All team members are responsible to understand and abide by the procedures and practices outlined in the Mortenson Operations Manual.
All team members are responsible for supporting an inclusive work environment and all affirmative action and employment related goals and requirements.
All team members are expected to demonstrate the following characteristics:
Cooperate with others when in a team environment
Accept direction from supervisors
Follow work rules and procedures
Punctual and consistent attendance
Accept constructive feedback

ESSENTIAL PHYSICAL AND TRAVEL REQUIREMENTS

This position requires the following with or without an accommodation; sitting, seeing, hearing, and utilization of a computer and office equipment.

The working environment consists of indoor and climate-controlled settings.

Mortenson is an EOE/Affirmative Action/M/F/Veteran/Disabled employer.

#LI-NC1",4.1,"M. A. Mortenson Company
4.1","Minneapolis, MN",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1954,Company - Private,Construction,"Construction, Repair & Maintenance",$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
245,Data Analyst,-1,"Kiddom helps educators bring open curriculum to life, to meet the needs of every learner. We connect open curriculum to instruction and assessments for the first time, to help schools and districts move into the future of digital, personalized learning.

Kiddom is looking for an experienced Data Analyst to join a small but agile team. As an analyst on the product team, you will play a significant part in this mission-critical work. You’ll be an analytical thought partner to all members of the product team, shaping the way product growth is measured, defining what questions are asked, and connecting data to demonstrable business outcomes on both new and existing projects.
You Will:
Build performance reports and dashboards for product KPIs that present the results, including the health of our product and other key performance metrics, to the team
Produce insights rapidly & periodically so teams can act on it with minimal lag
Produce custom deep-dive analysis outside the periodic insights process
Collaboratively establish causal impact and incremental value of campaigns and report the total value generated across multiple cuts of data
Produce insights rapidly & periodically so teams can act on it with minimal lag
Produce custom deep-dive analysis outside the periodic insights process

You Have:

Expert SQL skills and the ability to wrangle potentially unruly data
Experience using Periscope
Bachelor’s degree, or higher, in engineering, math, statistics, data analytics, operations research or related field or equivalent data analytics experience
Fluency in data analysis and communication around data, including time series analysis, experimentation, data visualization, and defining product growth adoption strategy
Python, R or other similar statistical tools

Bonus Points:

2+ years of domain experience in product growth or growth marketing, in the consumer internet space or in a high-velocity, high-growth product/business environment
Experience using the A/B testing framework and its implementation",3.3,"Kiddom
3.3","San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2013,Company - Private,K-12 Education,Education,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
246,Strategic Data Analyst,$46k-$86k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview:

Title: Strategic Operations Data Analyst

Location: Remote( Must work West Coast hours)

Term: 5 month contract (Potential for extension)

Pay: $24.36 hr (Weekly pay)

Full-time M-F

Benefits: Medical/Dental/Vision

US Citizenship- Sponsorship no offered
*Please only apply if you have experience in Data Analyst role- in heavy data analysis, data manipulation and visualization. Must have experienced in presenting finding to executives.**
Our client is a thriving educational tech company that envisions a world where anyone, anywhere can transform their life by accessing the world’s best learning experience. Their mission and vision unite their team; above all, they share a common passion for ambitious goals. They are also a strong, fun-loving community that shares meals, music, volunteering, sports, and more! They are looking for an experienced Strategic Operations Analyst to join their team! Their Enterprise Solutions team serves global organizations, including leading companies, governments, and nonprofits, who seek to upskill or retrain their workforce with the world’s best education. This team is made up of three sub-teams: Sales, Customer Success, and Revenue Strategy & Operations. The teams operate globally and have members based out of our offices in Mountain View, New York, London, Gurgaon, and Abu Dhabi.

Your responsibilities:

Be a data-driven, objective advisor to senior sales, marketing and customer success leadership team in North America and Latin America regions
Perform high-impact quantitative and qualitative analyses to drive companies growth and improve our effectiveness and leverage across functions
Lead strategic cross-functional projects to accomplish ambitious growth goals for their Business and Government business lines
Develop go-to-market strategies, territory plans, financial plans and metrics dashboards that empower our team with data and recommendations
Come up with creative solutions to operational or strategic challenges by developing deep expertise on our processes, tools, and business strategy

Basic Qualifications:

1-4 years of experience in a Data Analyst role
Must have experience in heavy data analysis, data manipulation and visualization
Experienced in presenting finds to executives
Ability to summarize and deliver findings
Excellent Microsoft Excel and Power-point
Bonus: SQL, Tableau and coding skills
Education in statics or data science helpful but not required
Demonstrated ability to solve ambiguous problems through structured thinking
Concise, clear communicator with interpersonal skills
Proactive, positive and open-minded attitude
Resourceful and accountable team player
Analytical problem solver

Please send your resume. Thank you!

#1",4.7,"TargetCW
4.7","Mountain View, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
247,Data Analyst,-1,"This key supporting role on the Performance Marketing Analytics team will build reports and monitor the performance of the largest marketing spend budgets for Backcountry, Competitive Cyclist and Steep and Cheap. This position will work directly within the Marketing Analytics team, and will own reporting for channel performance across multiple websites and coordinate with the Marketing Analytics team to drive short and long-term revenue and profitability. Using Looker, Excel or SQL, this person will work to surface results, insights and help communicate them to various business stakeholders. In addition, this person will interpret data, and analyze results using statistical techniques and provide and improve ongoing reports. The ideal candidate has extensive experience manipulating and analyzing large data sets and possesses excellent interpersonal, communication, and problem solving skills.

ESSENTIAL DUTIES & RESPONSIBILITIES:
Own reporting on a daily, weekly and monthly basis
Build forecasting models for month, quarter and year across different websites
Work closely with the Finance Team and Merchandising Team to align on business goals and clearly communicate with the Performance Marketing Team on recent changes
Assist in the preparation of board presentations on a quarterly basis
Create dashboards by pulling data from different sources and present them to management team
Answer ad-hoc analytic questions
Ensure data collection is optimized to provide crystal-clear visibility into the past, present, and future behaviors of our customers
Pursue data quality, troubleshoot data validation, and see issues to resolution
QUALIFICATIONS, SKILLS & ABILITIES:
1+ years of analytical work experience, preference in E-Commerce
Excel super user
Technically proficient in SQL and/or LookML, R or Python is a plus
High attention to detail
Strong organizational skills with an obsession to detail and quality
Exceptional work ethic and proven ability to overcome obstacles to deliver results
Excellent communication and presentation skills
Bachelor's degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, Engineering, Economics, Information Systems, or Marketing (with an analytic focus) from a top educational institution or other quantitative fields with relevant business experience also considered.
Passion for the outdoors a plus",2.6,"Backcountry
2.6",Utah,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1996,Company - Private,"Department, Clothing, & Shoe Stores",Retail,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
248,Data Analyst,-1,"The Data Analyst will be responsible for discovering analytics and system integrations requirements,
identifying data sources and criteria needed, documenting specs for developers, testing the output, and
ensuring user acceptance. This position will work directly with internal customers, business process
owners, leadership, Business Analysts, and BI, ETL, and Webservices Developers.

• Propose and implement analytics solutions to support business needs and data-driven decisions
• Support new system implementation projects, including data feeds, data design, and mapping
• Work with stakeholders and Business Analysts to understand business processes preferably HR) and detailed
requirements for reports and data feeds
• Identify and document data sources, criteria, and data mapping
• Use SQL to identify, extract, and analyze data
• Assess data quality and implement solutions to ensure accurate reporting
• Propose solutions to collect new data points to support metrics and identify trends
• Design reports/dashboard layouts to present data in a clean, consumable, and insightful format
• Write report and data feed specifications for BI, ETL, and Webservices Developers
• Receive and prioritize requests for reports
• Assist customers with ad-hoc reporting needs
• Audit existing reports and propose improvements for findability of data
• Serve as a resource to Business Analysts and Developers for data-related needs
• Support development of other team members' data analysis skills though knowledge share",5.0,"Dillon Digitals
5.0","Atlanta, GA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Municipal Governments,Government,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
249,Data Analyst,$59k-$80k (Glassdoor Est.),"CompQsoft Inc. Established in 1997, headquarters in Houston, TX and office in Leesburg, VA. CompQsoft offers a range of comprehensive Cyber Security, Infrastructure, Cloud solutions, ERP implementation, Business Intelligence, Application development, Ecommerce applications and Management consulting services. CompQsoft is Certified CMMI Level 3 practitioner for Development and Services, ISO 9001:2008, ISO 20000:2005, ISO 27001:2013 Certified, and has DCAA approved accounting system. CompQsoft is a fast growing company with a strategy and methodology that is strongly focused on the success of our clients, predominantly the Federal government.

We are seeking qualified professionals for one of our clients.

Job Title: Data Analyst

Location: Huntsville, AL

Duration: Long Term

Clearance: None

Client: LOGSA

Job Details:
Examines tables and databases to provide actionable insights.
The job might consist of tasks like pulling data out of SQL databases, becoming an Excel or Tableau master, and producing basic data visualizations and reporting dashboards.
Required Skills:
3 years' experience in data analytics
SQL server
Access
Oracle data warehousing
Preferred Skills:
Prior involvement in Predictive Analytics
IBM Data Analytic Badges
Please forward your updated resume to

CompQsoft is an Equal Opportunity / Affirmative Action Employer. M/F/D/V

Visit www.compqsoft.com to learn more about our culture, benefits.",3.5,"CompQsoft
3.5","Huntsville, AL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1997,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
250,Data Analyst,-1,"The future of energy is digitised, decarbonised and localised. At Smartest Energy, we need revolutionary thinkers to help our customers make the most of this new landscape, thinking differently to find smart solutions to complex problems. Join us and help power the revolution.

Formed in 2001, we’re an agile business driven by entrepreneurial thinking. As a subsidiary of the Marubeni Corporation, we also have strong investment and infrastructure behind us. As well as our US office, we have three offices in the UK, and another in Australia. Further expansion will follow shortly which means big global career opportunities for you, with plenty of potential to explore new markets.

Overview

You will lead on the design, development and control of SmartestEnergy US’s data. You will develop knowledge of the underlying data and data products involved in the end to end business and operational processes and be responsible for engaging with business representatives and working closely with internal and external IT partners and vendors to assist in the translation of business requirements into application technical solutions and for their delivery across the portfolio of change initiatives and business processes.

In this position, you will be involved in the following:

Participate in analysis, validation and verification to determine what data is required to support business needs, where it is created, read, updated and deleted and the quality criteria associated with it;
Works with staff, vendors and customers to understand the business requirements to design the data architecture, solutions and processes;
Support wider team problem solving and analysis while balancing data, technology, business and operational issues to identify and deliver viable solutions;
Delivery of customised reports and recommendations to support on-going business decisions and customer reporting requirements;
Analysing large energy market data sets from multiple sources to enable business insights and data driven decision making;
Lead on the development of the critical data artefacts including data models (conceptual, logical and physical);
Ensure alignment of data artefacts through close working relationships with the business and operational stakeholders;
Develops specific metrics for quality and consistency reviews of data.

You are likely to have the following skills/experience:

Graduate in a relevant discipline or area;
Ability to rapidly comprehend the functions and capabilities of new technologies;
Can balance the long-term (""big picture"") and short-term implications of individual decisions;
Ability to translate business and customer needs into data requirements;
The ability to communicate complex ideas in a clear, concise manner (verbal and written) across functional and technical departments
Work on multiple tasks at any one time, handling conflicting demands, prioritise workload and effectively delegate while maintaining high quality standards;
Sound judgement, attention to detail, accuracy, and follow-through on actions including the flexibility to perform in an ever-changing work environment;
High emotional resilience and good interpersonal and relationship building skills.

Check out all our current open positions: https://www.smartestenergycareers.com

Our Privacy Policy is here: https://smartestenergy.com/privacy",-1,Smartest Energy,"Syracuse, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
251,Data Analyst,-1,"Role Overview

Security, energy management, asset protection, and automation efficiencies...these are a few of our favorite things.

STRATIS IoT is actively seeking an experienced and passionate Data Analyst to join its engineering teams who are creating & molding the next generation of smart building technology. Our diverse family is made-up of adventurous, multifaceted individuals who bring what they've learned through various walks of life to improve our products.

As a Data Analyst, you should have at least two years of experience in the field, addressing real-world challenges. You will utilize your experience to assist in gaining user experience insights, product successes, key data opportunities, and overall scaling of the STRATIS platform.

Key Responsibilities
Love what you do & be an integral part of our family that is forging a new path in IoT technology;
Work with internal and external stakeholders to understand how they are using our product's data, align on useful metrics, and produce data representations an interpretable way;
Use creative analysis to surface opportunities across multiple databases;
Work relentlessly to ensure data findings are accessible to users at all levels through dashboards, visualizations, and reports;
Drive sales awareness, marketing efforts, program highlights when key data-points are discovered;
Actively interact with clients & partners during pilot projects to gain user insights;
Utilize data to understand user experiences in the field, as they are controlling & managing devices such as locks, thermostats, lights, shades, water metering, energy metering, & leak detection;
Innovate constantly on existing and cutting-edge technology to build new solutions;
Assist in the company's machine learning and AI goals in order to fully capitalize on our automation capabilities;
Take ownership of the company's data reporting capabilities, but work collaboratively with engineering teams to ensure you are armed with what you need;
Represent the company well as a continually client-facing team member;
This role reports directly to the Chief Innovation & Product Officer (CIPO).
Qualifications
2+ years of experience working with software engineering teams in an Agile environment as a data-oriented team-member;
Extraordinary initiative, drive, organization, and task-management skills;
Familiarity with Looker (LookML);
Ability to positively influence decision-making at all levels within an engineering organization with data insights;
Quick to learn new, complex systems and technologies;
Understanding of engineering principles, scrum practices, etc;
Excited to impact real people every day through your work.
Interview Process

PHASE 1: A member of our team will contact you to arrange a call to discuss your professional accomplishments & ambitions. You may be asked to participate in a second phone call to gauge technical capabilities as well.

PHASE 2: You will be invited to interview with the teams. This interview will include a review by multiple members of our various teams. Throughout this phase of the interview process, you will get the chance to interact with our teams in a casual, free-flowing environment.

PHASE 3: Final interview to assess our mutual culture-add, your relevant skillsets, and to answer any additional questions that may have come up throughout the process. Prior to this phase, you may be requested to contribute to a challenge of some type.

About STRATIS

Located in the former East Falls community theatre in the East Falls neighborhood of Philadelphia, STRATIS is widely considered one of the best-kept secrets in emerging technology. Since 2014, we have been the leader in smart apartments for multifamily. We were named one of Entrepreneur Magazine's ""Best Companies in America"" two years in a row, #740 on Inc. Magazine's list of 5000 ""fastest-growing companies"" in 2019, and our CEO, Felicite Moorman, was Ernst & Young's 2017 local and regional Entrepreneur of the Year.

As the only system of its kind built for the complexities of multifamily building management, we are leading the global movement for smart cities in the urban and residential sectors. To date, STRATIS has been installed in over 30,000 units in Japan and Europe, and in over 350,000 units across 46 states in the U.S.

Key Benefits
Competitive salary
401K retirement plan (matching)
Medical, dental, and vision plan
Life Insurance plan
SEPTA Transportation discounts
Dog-friendly office for people-friendly dogs
Ability to see your contributions impact lives every day
Flexible schedules and vacation/work from home policy (including maternity/paternity leave)
Sponsorship for conferences and educational events
Supportive, casual, and professional work environment for a team that focuses on creating linchpins, mentors, and experts in their field.",4.8,"STRATIS IoT Inc
4.8","Philadelphia, PA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
252,COVID 19 Data Analyst (Temporary),$36k-$66k (Glassdoor Est.),"Works with a team of data analysts and data entry operators to analyze various COVID 19 data in an effort to accurately characterize the spread and epidemiology of COVID 19. Uses software to provide routine and special analysis of COVID 19 case data.

Conduct daily data analysis by a daily deadline. Assure results of analysis are entered into spreadsheets for daily update of website by daily deadline.
Assist lead data analyst in determining special data analysis needed to investigate trends in data.
Assist lead data analyst in designing special data analysis protocols.
Prepare data analysis/epidemiological reports on COVID 19 data analysis.
Work as part of a team to assure consistency in COVID 19 data analysis and to identify opportunities for quality improvement in data analysis.Maintains strict confidentiality, adheres to all HIPAA guidelines/regulations.
Maintain daily communication with supervisor on activities and tasks.
Presents a courteous and helpful demeanor.
Pending City Manager’s Approval.

Minimum Qualifications

A Bachelor’s Degree from an accredited four-year college or university with an emphasis in health statistics, biostatistics, or epidemiology. Master’s Degree preferred.A track record of excellent communication, customer service, computer, and attention to detail skills is required, including the ability to interact professionally and with culturally diverse individuals.
Skilled in using analytical software such as Excel and SPSS.
Ability to relate to diverse populations.
While performing the duties of this job, the employee is frequently required to sit, talk, hear and use hands to perform office work.
Occasional need to stand, walk, stoop, bend, kneel or crouch.
Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision and color vision.",2.8,"City of Columbia, MO
2.8","Columbia, MO",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1820,Government,Municipal Governments,Government,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
253,Data Analyst,-1,"Data Analyst CONTRACT available - healthcare industry!! TEMP REMOTE

The contractor will have the following skills along with technical knowledge in Oracle 11g to 19c, Cognos and EMR/IknowMed
Managing master data, including creation, updates, and deletion.
Managing users and user roles.
Provide quality assurance of imported data, working with quality assurance analyst if necessary.
Commissioning and decommissioning of data sets.
Processing confidential data and information according to guidelines.
Helping develop reports and analysis.
Managing and designing the reporting environment, including data sources, security, and metadata.
Supporting the data warehouse in identifying and revising reporting requirements.
Supporting initiatives for data integrity and normalization.
Assessing tests and implementing new or upgraded software and assisting with strategic decisions on new systems.
Generating reports from single or multiple systems.
Troubleshooting the reporting database environment and reports.
Evaluating changes and updates to source production systems.
Providing technical expertise on data storage structures, data mining, and data cleansing.",3.0,"DSN
3.0","Houston, TX",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
254,Data Analyst,-1,"Desired Skills and Experience \**
Strong experience and expertise in working with Healthcare data (such as claims, pharmacy, eligibility, provider, etc.) to generate and create analytic insights and reporting solutions
3-5 years of experience as a data analyst
Experience scripting with SAS, SQL or Python to pull data out of data warehouses to understand gap analysis
Experience navigating through databases like Teradata, Hadoop, DB2 or Oracle
An employee is seeking a data analyst to sit in Bloomfield, CT. This is open because the business unit is growing therefore there is more data to be built. This group supports the data analytics for the pharmacy unit of a large insurance company. Responsibilities in this role will be to analyze various databases, extract data from applications, produce reports and then present to stakeholders. Day to day this candidate will be capturing key technical documentations, identify gaps or similarities and construct/develop data analysis and executing business test cases through tools like SAS, Python and Tableau through the main frame work of Teradata, Hadoop, DB2 or Oracle.

Job Type: Contract

Pay: $44.00 - $45.00 per hour

Experience:
business analysis: 3 years (Preferred)
sql: 4 years (Preferred)
Contract Length:
More than 1 year
Contract Renewal:
Possible
Work Location:
One location
Benefits:
Other
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.9,"Insight Global
3.9","Bloomfield, CT",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
255,Data Analyst,$31k-$56k (Glassdoor Est.),"Coordinates, reviews, and compiles specialized research genomics data in a national consortium database. Facilitates analysis and data reporting requirements, preparing database for public access. Much of this part-time work can be performed by distance computing, making use of the Internet, email, and the telephone, with occasional meeting with supervisor and other members of database team.

Responsibilities
Reviews and analyzes data according to database or experimental protocols. May be involved in identifying and/or acquiring data through collaboration with researchers within a national consortium.
Designs and compiles special reports in response to internal and external requests in order to provide accessible data for reliable analysis, management review, research purposes and/or reporting requirements.
Acquires and stores accurate data in a computer data base for subsequent retrieval to provide dependable analysis and reporting.
Plans, compiles, analyzes, and produces data reports to facilitate reporting requirements and decisions necessitating analytical input.
Participates in the planning and design of data reporting forms and formats to establish data record systems and documents.
May be responsible for computer data entry of target data for storage and accurate and timely retrieval.
This job description is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities and qualifications required of employees assigned to the job.

Work Environment and Level of Frequency typically required

Nearly Continuously: Office environment.

Physical Requirements and Level of Frequency that may be required

Nearly Continuously: Sitting, hearing, listening, talking.

Often: Repetitive hand motion (such as typing), walking.

Seldom: Bending, reaching overhead.

Minimum Qualifications

Two years experience in data analysis or related research experience, or equivalency required. Experience in computer based data systems management, plus the ability to express statistical and demographic concepts in clear terms, both orally and in writing is preferred.

Applicants must demonstrate the potential ability to perform the essential functions of the job as outlined in the position description.

Preferences

Familiarity with genetics, genomics and experimental molecular biology terminology is highly advantageous.

Special Instructions Summary",4.2,"University of Utah
4.2","Salt Lake City, UT",-1,10000+ Employees,1850,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
256,Data Analyst,$42k-$74k (Glassdoor Est.),"JOB SUMMARY

The Data Analyst is responsible for all aspects of EDI data quality analysis. They will collaborate with internal and external data providers to ensure the quality of incoming claim data, as well as resolve data issues while strategically trying to drive continuous improvement efforts to eliminate root causes. This position collaborates with assigned business units and provides accurate data to allow for making the best business decisions possible. The Data Analyst reviews and produces reports assessing the information and providing information on key variables needed to produce predictive analysis.

ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS:

At Safety National, we live by the following five core values: Relationships, Integrity, Teamwork, Balance and Stability. Our Core Values serve as the fundamental foundation of our corporate culture and drive our interactions, both internally and externally. An essential function of all Safety National positions is to fully embrace and represent these core values in our daily work life and relationships.

Accountable for delivering accurate data to downstream data consumers.
Ensure integrity of data in database and warehouse for reporting and analytical purposes including
Analyze and validate data completeness, consistency, accuracy, and compliance to data standards and Principles.
Investigation and identification of data quality issues. Addresses the root cause of data problems and develop a recommendation on how to resolve issues. Collaborate with data source stakeholders to implement resolution.
Work collaboratively with TPA’s, business users, and vendors to improve service levels on existing and new data feeds.
Completes data profiling activities to ensure completeness and accuracy relative to the quality specifications for the data.
Perform analysis of data sources with an emphasis on identifying critical data elements and developing data metrics and quality checks.
Identifies and distributes key performance indicators (KPI) to primary stakeholders in collaboration with the Data Scientists and Actuaries,

ADDITIONAL RESPONSIBILITIES:

Perform data quality audits around inconsistent, incorrect and incomplete data on a monthly
Investigate, evaluate, and analyze the effectiveness and efficiency of current data requirements and processes and develop strategies for improving these processes.
Implement data quality monitoring reports, alerts, and processes.
Benchmark and improve data quality from all data sources.

Qualifications
Education

Preferred

Bachelors or better.

Experience

Preferred

Bachelor’s degree, preferably in Computer Science, Actuarial, or Information Systems

At least 4 years of experience in Information Services industry, preferably in a Business Intelligence or Data Warehouse environment. Insurance or Actuarial experience a plus

Ability to query relational databases using standard SQL, and to extract, analyze, and reconcile large sums of data a plus

Demonstrated ability to perform root-cause analysis and develop action plans based on that analysis

Hands-on approach to data quality while supporting data quality initiatives

Strong analytical, technical, and problem-solving skills

Strong communication and interpersonal skills

Ability to exercise independent judgment.

Self-starter who can work with minimal direct supervision, and take ownership of projects.

Ability to work effectively with a diverse group of business and technical personnel.",3.4,"Safety National
3.4","Saint Louis, MO",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1942,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
257,Affordability Analyst/Data Scientist,$100k-$160k (Glassdoor Est.),"Affordability Analyst/Data Scientist-24350
Position Description


Are you seeking an opportunity to integrate affordability into the design of systems? Do you enjoy the challenge of interpreting and organizing data into a structured analytic framework? If so, we’re looking for someone like you to join our team at APL.

We are seeking a data scientist to help us develop robust cost estimates and perform timely affordability analysis in support of DoD / US Govt. Sponsors. Significant tasks will include the collection, normalization and relation of cost and parametric data in order to generate credible and defendable cost estimates. You’ll be joining a hardworking team of analysts who incorporate affordability and cost considerations into the critical solutions to the critical challenges our nation faces. As a member of our team, you will contribute to important trade space studies (Analysis of Alternatives, Business Case Analyses), Cost and Schedule Risk Assessments, and affordability studies (Life Cycle Cost Estimates, Total Ownership Costs).

As an Affordability Analyst/Data Scientist...
Your primary responsibility will be aggregating cost and parametric data of government projects through both structured (DAMIR, CADE, VAMOSC, USASpending.gov) and unstructured (open source web searches, domain expert interviews) research in order to improve upon existing or generate new and innovative cost estimating relationships.
You will contribute to studies that quantify best value assessments through affordability analysis, decision frameworks, data visualization, feasibility analysis, and sensitivity analysis.
You will learn to build cost estimates integrating statistical analysis, modeling and simulation, cost databases, and expert opinion in Excel, ACEIT, Price Trueplanning, etc.
You will collaborate with APL staff from all sectors and departments on technical studies across land, sea, air, space, and cyberspace domains.

Qualifications
:

You meet our minimum qualifications for the job if you...
Possess a bachelor’s degree or equivalent years of professional level experience
Proven experience organizing data into flexible, scalable, and reusable structures and performing comprehensive data analysis.
Have knowledge of at least one statistical analysis package (R, Stata, SAS, JMP, Python, MATLAB, CO$TAT, @RISK, etc.)
Are able to obtain an Interim Secret level security clearance by your start date and can ultimately obtain a Secret level clearance. If selected, you will be subject to a government security clearance investigation and must meet the requirements for access to classified information. Eligibility requirements include U.S. citizenship.

You’ll go above and beyond our minimum requirements if you…
Have domain expertise in creating data analysis dashboards through Shiny, Python, JavaScript, CSS, Visual Basic, Tableau, etc.
Have a master’s degree or higher in operations research, statistics, mathematics, computer science, engineering, data science, business analytics, cost estimating or economics or have a certification related to cost analysis (DAWIA or CCEA)

Why work at APL?

The Johns Hopkins University Applied Physics Laboratory (APL) brings world-class expertise to our nation’s most critical defense, security, space and science challenges. While we are dedicated to solving complex challenges and pioneering new technologies, what makes us truly outstanding is our culture. We offer a vibrant, welcoming atmosphere where you can bring your authentic self to work, continue to grow, and build strong connections with inspiring teammates.

At APL, we celebrate our differences and encourage creativity and bold, new ideas. Our employees enjoy generous benefits, including a robust education assistance program, unparalleled retirement contributions, and a healthy work/life balance. APL’s campus is located in the Baltimore-Washington metro area. Learn more about our career opportunities at www.jhuapl.edu/careers.
Primary Location
*United States-*Maryland-*Laurel
-",4.6,"Johns Hopkins University Applied Physics Laboratory
4.6","Laurel, MD",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1942,Nonprofit Organization,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
258,Data Analyst,$32k-$56k (Glassdoor Est.),"Posting Type:
Open to All Applicants

Category: Computer and Mathematical FLSA Exempt/
Non-Exempt: Exempt
Agency: Health & Human Services Comm Department: Quality Assurance\Improvement
Job Title: Data Analyst Posting Number: 460936
Full Time/Part Time : Full Time Regular/Temporary: Regular
Job Location: 902 AIRPORT RD City: CORPUS CHRISTI
Contact: AccessHR Service Center Telephone: 888-894-4747
Salary Range: $3,293.41 - $5,370.75 Salary Group: B18
Shift: Days (First) Travel: 5%
Closing Date: 01/29/2021
Job Description:
Systems Analyst II - HHSC is seeking a Data Analyst to join an interdisciplinary team of professionals who support the 13 State Supported Living Centers (SSLC) across Texas. As a Data Analyst, you will work with a dynamic group of staff who are dedicated to providing supports and services for individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities. This is a team environment where staff members collaborate to provide comprehensive care and services in a fast-paced environment, and rely upon data to ensure optimal results. To learn more about the SSLCs, see https://hhs.texas.gov/services/disability/intellectual-or-developmental-disabilities-idd-long-term-care. The State of Texas offers many benefits to employees, including competitive salaries, career advancement, health and dental insurance, and paid vacation and sick leave.

The data analyst is responsible for providing oversight and guidance to program staff in the collection, review, and validation of electronic health data required for tracking and trending quality of care. This includes the development and maintenance of management tools and reports associated with an electronic health record and the data required for advancing the state’s quality improvement efforts and service monitoring. The position requires the use of relational database management systems, including the development of queries, and report development software to gather, review, and analyze data. The position also involves working with program staff to ensure data integrity. Work involves conducting complex and detailed analysis of and extensive research on data and reporting results. Other duties include responding to ad hoc data requests. The data analyst also serves as the liaison with state office data analysts. The ability to collaborate effectively and work as part of a team is essential. The position works under limited direction with significant latitude and independent judgment in work activities.

Essential Job Functions:
Attends work on a regular basis and may be required to work a specific shift schedule or, at times, even a rotating schedule, extended shift, and/or overtime in accordance with agency leave policy and performs other duties as assigned.

Designs and maintains administrative reports using data from an electronic health record and internal monitoring tools and databases.

Writes queries to access data for analysis and reporting.

Maintains a relational database system and spreadsheets to track and trend quality of care data.

Develops and implements tools to track the accuracy and integrity of data reporting.

Establishes processes for analyzing and validating data used to calculate outcome measures.

Works with interdisciplinary teams to research and correct data issues.

Acts as a liaison with state office data analysts and HHSC IT.

Assists in identifying and interpreting data patterns and trends.

Responds to ad hoc data requests and/or submissions to State Office.

Conducts frequent audits using reports to verify information entered into the electronic health record is accurate.

Other duties as assigned include, but are not limited to, actively participating and/or serving in a supporting role to meet the agency’s obligations for disaster response and/or recovery or Continuity of Operations (COOP) activation. Such participation may require an alternate shift pattern assignment and/or location.

Knowledge Skills Abilities:
Skill managing data in a relational database management system, including the development of queries, and report development software.
Skill in the use of computers and applicable software in conducting data searches and data cleaning.
Skill in the proficient use of MS Excel including formulas.
Skill in critical thinking.
Ability to gather, review, and analyze data.
Ability to maintain accuracy and attention to detail.
Ability to prioritize work and meet deadlines.
Ability to communicate effectively both orally and in writing.
Ability and willingness to learn new systems.
Ability and willingness to be a team player and work well with a variety of stakeholders.
Knowledge, or ability to gain knowledge, of agency programs, policies, and service delivery processes.
Registration or Licensure Requirements:
None Required

Initial Selection Criteria:
Some college/university level coursework in data science, business analytics, computer science, computer information systems, management information systems, accounting, finance, mathematics, statistics, economics, or a related field is generally preferred.
Experience in data analysis, research, and report design.
Experience in designing, developing, and maintaining queries and reports.
Experience working with electronic health records is strongly preferred.
Additional Information:
The salary offered will follow HHS starting salary guidelines which are typically made at or near the minimum of the salary range.

Applicants must pass a fingerprint criminal background check, pre-employment drug screen, and registry checks including the Client Abuse/Neglect Reporting System (CANRS), Nurse Aide, Medication Aide and Employee Misconduct and HHS OIG List of Excluded Individuals/Entities. Males between the ages of 18 – 25 must be registered with the Selective Service.

All State Supported Living Center employees are subject to random drug testing.

Flexibility in work hours may be required for this position. The position may be required to work overtime and/or extended hours.

All applicants must be at least 18 years of age to be considered for employment at a state-operated facility.

MOS Code:
Military occupation(s) that relate to the initial selection criteria and registration or licensure requirements for this position may include: 68C, 66N/P/W, 290X, 46FX, 46NX, 46SX. All active duty military, reservists, guardsmen, and veterans are encouraged to apply if qualified to fill this position. For more information see the Texas State Auditor’s Military Crosswalk at http://www.hr.sao.state.tx.us/Compensation/JobDescriptions.aspx

HHS agencies use E-Verify. You must bring your I-9 documentation with you on your first day of work.

I-9 Form - Click here to download the I-9 form.

In compliance with the Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA), HHS agencies will provide reasonable accommodation during the hiring and selection process for qualified individuals with a disability. If you need assistance completing the on-line application, contact the HHS Employee Service Center at 1-888-894-4747. If you are contacted for an interview and need accommodation to participate in the interview process, please notify the person scheduling the interview.

View similar jobs",3.0,"Texas Health and Human Services Commission
3.0","Corpus Christi, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,1912,Government,State & Regional Agencies,Government,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
259,Market Data Analyst Team Lead,$39k-$72k (Glassdoor Est.),"[Job purpose]

KT&G USA is headquartered in Plano, Texas. We currently ship our products to 45+ States through 550+ distributor partners and are ranked as the 5th largest tobacco manufacturer in the U.S.A. We stand behind our products, value our people and strive to offer all our customers and business partners, best in class service.

[Duties and responsibilities]

The Lead of Market Data Analysis Team will work within the Marketing department at KT&G USA headquarters in Plano, TX. Reporting directly to the Marketing director. The position will focus on managing all sorts of sales and marketing-related data and generate reports in a timely manner from a variety of data sources such as MSAi, GW-MIS, Salesforce, Maps & Track and so on.

We are currently seeking a talented Market Data Analysis Team Lead to support our organization with data analyzing function.

The function includes business intelligence and operational reporting and analytics solutions that drive achievement of business goals, process improvement and control initiatives. The candidate must have a strategic thought process in leading development of business intelligence and data solutions to solve complex business problems. An ideal candidate would also have progressive advancement in leadership and proven track record of data-related projects that have resulted in improved performance, controls, and profitability.

This position will serve as a primary contact for the various lines of business for the workflow management and document retention system managed by Information Technology.

Analyze complex business problems and issues using data from internal and external sources to provide insight to analysts and decision makers.
Identify and interpret trends and patterns in datasets to locate influences
Create specifications for reports and analysis based on business needs and required or available data elements
Conduct evaluations, designs systems and procedures, conduct work simplifications and measurement studies, and prepare operations and procedures manuals to assist management in operating more efficiently and effectively
Participate in consultation to users and in cross functional teams to address business issue
Prototype solutions for displaying information based on business needs
Utilize an intermediate understanding of multiple data structures and sources to lead the development and implementation of business intelligence solutions, which may include data visualization, data transformation, or data collection.
Apply data visualization best practices - often selecting the right data tool for the job - to identify and interpret trends or patterns while following standard Enterprise branding
Understand what data says to be able to draw conclusions from it will be reporting on statistics and metrics
Maintain and change business processes and understands the business processes of assigned partners and how they relate to our functional areas
Develop and recommend changes to business processes.
Build, develop, and maintain data models, reporting systems, data automation systems, dashboards and performance metrics support that support key business decisions.
Ensure accuracy of data and deliverables of reporting employees with comprehensive policies and processes.
Lead cross-functional projects using advanced data modeling and analysis techniques to discover insights that will guide strategic decisions and uncover optimization opportunities.
Work with executives and other business leaders to identify opportunities for improvement.
Create reports for internal team and other departments and/or external requests.
Use graphs, tables, and other methods to visualize data and/or information.
Structure large data sets to find usable information.
Create presentations and reports based on facts, recommendations, and findings.
Prepare for training or explanation materials for employees, users of data, executives or related persons.
Collect business data and sales information from various internal sources, analyze them regularly or occasionally at the request of the management or related departments in a timely manner.
Oversee the design and delivery of reports and insights that analyze business functions and key operations and performance metrics.
Manage and optimize processes for data intake, validation, mining, and engineering as well as modeling, visualization, and communication deliverables.
Oversee the data/report requests process: tracking requests submitted, prioritization, approval, etc.
Keep safely all the business data, information, reports, and files in accordance with internal policies or instructions.
Manage confidentiality of all the data and control security access to data by setting up data access level according to internal hierarchy.
Develop and implements quality controls and departmental standards to ensure quality standards, organizational expectations, and regulatory requirements.
Be responsible for team projects, leads the team, support subordinates, evaluates team staff’s performance.
Anticipate future demands of initiatives related to people, technology, budget and business within your department and design/implement solutions to meet these needs.
Examine, interpret, and report results of analytical initiatives to stakeholders in leadership, technology, sales, marketing, and related teams.
Organize and drive successful completion of data insight initiatives through effective management of analyst and data employees and effective collaboration with stakeholders.
Recruit, train, develop, and supervise analyst-level employees.
Establish KPIs to measure the effectiveness of business decisions.
Collaborate with team and other colleagues of other departments, works with other staff to process information.
Design and build technical processes to address business issues.
Communicate results and business impacts of insight initiatives to stakeholders within and outside of the company.
Communicate clearly with user of data in the company.
Other Duties as assigned

[Sales Strategy & Planning management]

Sales goal setting (annual, semi-annual, quarterly, monthly) and monitor progress
Monitor wholesaler's PSI trend, suggest appropriate strategy/promotion idea
Forecast competitor price increase
Merge internal and external data (MIS, MSAi, ArcGIS) find opportunity and risk
Market Intelligence & Data Project management
Implement and manage all sorts of data projects (T.I.S.R. etc.)
Analyze industry trends, market segments and total available market
Evaluate market opportunity and penetration
Monitor the competition (marketing share/price/channel coverage etc.)
Create potential wholesaler list through market sources (Nielson, Retail, existing W/S, regional union etc.)
Wholesaler inventory status analysis
Retail List update/distributing
Monitor Periodic Price Increase factors (tax increase/international currency/distribution margin etc.) & utilize local resource (Legal Firm, Consulting Firm) if necessary
Collect competitor's promotion & activity (Competitor status analysis)
Establish price research plan

[Sales Analysis]

Develop and maintain daily, weekly, monthly, and ad hoc reporting tools.
New Wholesalers update and oversee repeat order
Analysis promotion effectiveness and seasonality
Demand planning based on sales forecast

[Qualifications]

Highly detail oriented
Able to interpret the data generated and present the findings in a concise manner.
Expert in MS Office, particularly must be proficient in Excel, VBA/macros, Power Point
Prior experience using Sales Force or other CRM platforms
Previous experience in a marketing-related role or job position
Experience developing business deliverables that leverage business intelligence platforms, data management platforms, or SQL-based languages
Demonstrated ability to embed intuitive story telling within business intelligence solutions.
Demonstrated advanced communication skills with the ability to deliver presentations to all levels of management.
Needs to be able to show critical thinking
Fast learning capacity and ability to work in a fast-paced development environment
Experience identifying and implementing innovative approaches to address business problems and solutions.
Well understood for KT&G USA sales strategy, especially marketing promotion system
Self-motivated with ability to work with minimal direction to prioritize and execute tasks.
Ability to sit for extended periods of time in front of a computer screen
Salesforce Admin experience preferred.

Education

Bachelor’s degree (preferred) or equivalent experience

Benefits

Enjoy a competitive salary commensurate with the experience and responsibility requirements. Excellent employee environment with a competitive benefits package including:

Annual Merit Increase
Health insurance
Dental insurance
Vision insurance
Paid Time Off",2.5,"KT&G USA Corporation
2.5","Plano, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1
260,Data Analyst,-1,"Overview

Our rapidly scaling medical education technology company is seeking an experienced Data Analyst to join our growing Data & Analytics team. In this role, you will identify and model relevant data to enable analysis, creatively provide insights from results and communicate recommendations to key stakeholders in order to support decision making.

This position is ideal for a self-motivated and data-informed person who can work autonomously and has a willingness to learn, enjoys problem solving and wants to build a career at an early stage, high growth start-up.

This is a hands-on position in a unique, distributed start-up environment, so we are looking for a candidate who is not afraid to roll up their sleeves and to work with team members across the organization.

About Osmosis

Our mission is to ""Empower the world's clinicians & caregivers with the best learning experience possible."" To this end, we have an audience of millions of current & future clinicians as well as patients and family members. Members of the Osmosis learning platform and video library use the product to learn efficiently and excel in classes, board exams, and in the clinic.

We are a distributed team of creative, approachable, and motivated entrepreneurs, researchers, and clinicians who are passionate about improving healthcare and education. At Osmosis, we value highly-motivated problem solvers who manage their time efficiently, communicate earnestly, work effectively, and prioritize life-work balance. We do everything we can to make sure our teammates are successful personally and professionally.

About the Role

As a Data Analyst, you will turn data into information, information into insight and insight into business decisions. You'll develop analysis and reporting capabilities as well as monitor performance and quality control plans to identify improvements. Your primary responsibility will be to work with stakeholders across business functions including marketing, growth and product to build analytics products that enable data-informed decision making. You will guide analytics projects from discovery to solution and help us raise the bar for how we should apply our data to business decisions.

Key Responsibilities

The responsibilities for this role include, but are not limited to:
Partner with teams across the organization to understand the context of their initiatives and turn their business requirements into analytical specifications.
Own and maintain dashboards & visualizations to help teams make critical decisions and understand the overall health of the platform and the impact of their initiatives.
Serve as the digital analytics subject matter expert focusing on experimentation, channel performance analytics, customer segmentation and attribution modeling.
Drive solutions to improve data quality issues and design data architecture by collaborating with internal stakeholders and the engineering team.
Oversee and drive tagging processes and data governance to improve data collection and optimization.
Proactively help build, manage and maintain our data models.
Be an evangelist and mentor to various team members in order to encourage and support more self service use of data analytics for decision making.
This position is full time, remote, and contract-to-hire.

Qualifications
3+ years of experience in an analytics role.
Extensive experience with SQL, Google Analytics, and data visualization tools.
Ability to work independently and handle details accurately and in a timely manner; able to prioritize time effectively and manage competing projects.
Strong interpersonal skills and ability to collaborate with analytical and non-analytical team members and stakeholders.
Adaptable. You are flexible and versatile with projects, goals, and strategies. You move quickly with change and stay open-minded.
Proactive. You seek out new ways to help and problem-solve with your team members. You don't wait for someone else to pick up the slack.
Entrepreneurial. You are a proven executor and work diligently to produce excellent results with limited time and resources.
Lifelong learner. You consume content (podcasts, blogs, books, etc) that is relevant to your craft, our company, and our customers and you apply these learnings in your work to make sure you are as effective as possible.
Mission and Value Aligned. You embody our organizational mission and values.
Preferred attributes
Experience with SaaS or subscriber-based platform metrics.
Experience with dbt and managing SQL based data models
Experience with BigQuery, or other cloud based data warehouses.
Technology stack
BigQuery is our data warehouse
Dbt for modelling and cleaning data
Mode Analytics as our BI tool
Must be authorized to work in the US or Canada.

Osmosis is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender identity, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, protected veteran status or other status protected by law.

One of our values is to ""Open Your Arms"". In line with this, if you have any specific needs that may require a different method for application submission, please reach out to us at careers@osmosis.org.",4.2,"Osmosis
4.2",Remote,-1,1 to 50 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Colleges & Universities,Education,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
261,Data Analyst,$43k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),"Tracking Code

HR9736

Job Description

Radiance Technologies is an employee-owned company with benefits that are unmatched by most companies. Employee ownership, generous 401K and profit sharing, health/dental/life/vision insurance benefits, interesting assignments, educational reimbursement, competitive salaries, and a pleasant work environment combine to make Radiance Technologies a great place to work and succeed.

The Data Analyst will advance the capabilities of the Naval Oceanographic Office (NAVOCEANO) by providing digitizing, databasing, and archival support. The Data Analyst will be responsible for following government workflows for the digitization and archival of historic environmental data products. In general, the Data Analyst works directly with the government to digitize all of their data archives. NAVOCEANO is located at NASA’s Stennis Space Center and the work would be performed in NAVOCEANO’s facilities.

Job Duties
Digitize and database years of analog environmental data products
Cleanup and Organize data drives
Maintain database archives
Support other administrative tasks and action items, as required
Required Skills

Strong communication skills
Active TS Clearance with SCI eligibility
Required Experience

Proficient in computing environment and Microsoft Office suite especially Excel and Word
Experience with databasing and archiving
Desired Qualifications
Competency with database applications
Experience with remotely sensed oceanographic data including acoustic profiles
Job Location

Stennis Space Center, Mississippi, United States

Position Type

Full-Time/Regular",4.0,"Radiance Technologies
4.0","Stennis Space Center, MS",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1998,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
262,Data Analyst,$37k-$66k (Glassdoor Est.),"Designing, development and administration of transactional and analytical data constructs and structures. Including data access and delivery technologies.
Utilizing SAS to extract data from Teradata and other relational databases for analysis.
Creating SAS scripts and writing SQL queries based on input from analytics and development team.
Creating SAS data sets by extracting data from Teradata database, SQL Server management studio, and flat files using Proc SQL, Proc Import, SAS Data Step, cleaned, validated, and manipulated data by SAS and SQL.
Involved in dashboarding, visualization, analysis and Tableau reporting.
Moving data between production systems and across multiple platforms. Working with major querying tools. Involved in data quality, data organization, metadata, and data profiling.
Providing technical support on data warehouse teams. Actively supporting the development of systems that provides monthly and daily activity based costing reports and Profitability information to departments throughout the company using SAS, Teradata SQL, and troubleshoots the failure jobs.

This Data Analyst position requires a theoretical and practical application of highly specialized knowledge. The usual minimum requirement for performance of the job duties is bachelors(TM) degree in a discipline, which requires logical reasoning, problem solving, and analytical skills. This aptitude could be developed only at the completion of baccalaureate degree or equivalent in one of the following: computer science/applications, engineering, computer/management information systems, electrical/electronics or a related field.

Must be willing to travel/relocate to unanticipated locations throughout the US on short notice for extended periods.

AkkenCloud is a place where you will learn and grow. This job is a rare opportunity to join and help define a team in a SaaS startup with great early customer traction.

AkkenCloud embraces diversity and equal opportunity in a severe way. We are committed to establishing a team that represents a variety of backgrounds, perspectives, and skills. The more versatile we are, the better our work will be.",3.9,"Akken Inc
3.9","Nashua, NH",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
263,Data Analyst,$58k-$101k (Glassdoor Est.),"As a Data Analyst on our property team, you’ll be expected to handle complex problems independently and demonstrate analytical thinking. You’ll work with multi-functional project teams and create organizational solutions involving analysis, ETL, and business intelligence. Your project work will include a variety of data analysis, ETL, data modeling, and data manipulation. You’ll also be exposed to many areas of the organization, including higher levels of leadership.

Must have Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree or higher in a quantitative field of study and a minimum of 1 year analytical work experience.
In lieu of a quantitative degree, a bachelor's degree or higher and a minimum of 3 years of analytical work experience.
In lieu of a degree, a minimum of 4 years of analytical work experience.
This position requires online pre-employment testing for external candidates.
Preferred Skills:
Familiarity with Big Data concepts, practices and terminology
Intermediate skills in Excel with the ability to create, manipulate and formulate spreadsheets, including VLOOKUP, pivot tables, charts and graphing
Proven aptitude for learning and using data analysis reporting tools
Intermediate SAS and SQL programming skills, including the ability to create basic programs
Ability to prepare reports and conduct presentations
Benefits:
Gainshare bonus up to 16% of your eligible earnings; Progressive rewards each of us with an annual bonus based on company performance
401(k) with dollar-for-dollar company match up to 6%
Diverse, inclusive and welcoming culture with Employee Resource Groups
Career development and tuition assistance
Onsite gym and healthcare at large locations
Wellness programs to help you maintain a better quality of life
Medical, dental and vision, including free preventive care
Sponsorship for work authorization for foreign national candidates is not available for this position.

Equal Opportunity Employer",3.8,"Progressive Insurance
3.8","St Petersburg Beach, FL",-1,10000+ Employees,1937,Company - Public,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
264,Data Analyst,-1,"The Data Analyst for our PeopleReady JobStack initiative will work in close collaboration with finance and business operations leaders to provide analysis and reporting on customer, associate and employee usage and financial results related to JobStack. This position is based in Tacoma, WA or Chicago, IL, reports to the Senior Director of PeopleReady FP&A and works closely the Operational Leaders.

Key responsibilities for the position are:

JobStack Analytical Support – Assist finance and operations leaders in analysis of JobStack usage and associated financial results. Includes, but not limited to, analyzing:

User trends, profiles, usage types, industries, and identifying opportunities to increase associate and client usage, and drive additional revenue.

Fill rates (digital and branch) and identifying opportunities to increase revenue.

Prepare & Analyze reporting packages – Develop and publish regular JobStack reporting packages to senior PeopleReady leaders:

Prepare reports and analysis for earnings calls, board meetings, and executive leaders, and assist in analysis of results to identify trends and areas of opportunity.

Provide financial modeling to help predict outcomes.

Forecast and Budget Support – Provide support to leadership during quarterly forecasting and annual budget processes related to operating and capital expense as well as revenue projections.

Requirements:

The successful candidate will have strong analytical skills, the ability to manage large quantities of data, proficient business acumen and a customer service mindset. He or she is self-motivated and always seeking new, data driven insights related to the JobStack initiative. A successful candidate will have a strong work ethic with the ability to manage multiple priorities and meet deadlines in a fast paced, dynamic work environment. In addition, the successful candidate should have the following:

Bachelor’s Degree in an analytic discipline (e.g. mathematics, statistics, economics, finance) with 3-5 years related experience or 5+ years of related experience.
Strong analytical, modeling, and reporting skills with the ability to multitask, stay organized, and prioritize deadlines in a continually evolving environment.
Experience with multi-source data collection and preparation.
Ability to handle significant quantities of data with high levels of accuracy.
Ability to communicate with and influence senior leaders.
Ability to prepare and present data analysis to “non-data” audience.
Advanced Microsoft Excel Skills; knowledge of SQL and Tableau a plus.
#PIQJAB
Jbergman@PeopleReady.com

Internal ID: 104253",3.4,"PeopleReady
3.4","Tacoma, WA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1989,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
265,Data Analyst,$53k-$96k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Everlane, we want the right choice to be as easy as putting on a great T-shirt. That's why we partner with ethical factories around the world. Work with high quality and more sustainably sourced materials. And share the true cost of every product we make. But there's a lot more work to be done, and we're excited to be growing a team of motivated humans that are up for the challenge.

Everlane is seeking a Data Analyst to join our Data and Analytics team, where you'll use data to optimize our core operations, understand the levers behind company growth, and identify areas of opportunity for our products.

As a team, we lean on a full-stack set of methodologies and tools to solve these problems, taking a data science problem from an initial open ended question to the eventual business implementation of a model. This role will be focused on some of Everlane's most critical optimization areas such as margin, supply chain, and retail.

Your day-to-day:
Work with business stakeholders to design robust metrics and self service reporting around key questions
Explore, vet, and productionize brand new datasets
Provide timely insights to support decision making up to the senior leadership level
Research and identify new levers driving operational efficiency in our supply chain
Prototype predictive models around areas such as transportation cost and retail allocation
We'd love to hear from you if you have:
BA/BS in a quantitative or computing focused degree
3+ years of work experience, with at least two years industry experience wrangling and analyzing large datasets to solve open ended problems
Proficiency in R or Python, with an emphasis on data manipulation and visualization
Proficiency in SQL, especially in translating business or scientific questions into queries
Strong fundamentals in statistics and probability
Adept communicator, especially when distilling complex concepts for a general audience
Exposure to the fields of logistics, demand planning, operations, or finance",3.5,"Everlane
3.5","San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Other Retail Stores,Retail,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
266,Data Analyst,$48k-$91k (Glassdoor Est.),"Steampunk is searching for a Data Analyst to support a government customer on site in Washington, DC. The primary responsibilities for the position are retrieving data, manipulating data, and responding to requests for specific data pertaining to subjects removed from the United States. The nature of the work requires that the candidate demonstrate initiative, organization, responsibility, customer service skills, and the ability to be flexible and adaptive to a fast-paced, fluid business environment. The candidate must be able to communicate effectively and decisively with all levels of the organization and be able to solve practical problems as well as exercise sound judgement with regards to sensitive and confidential information.
Contributions
Familiar in the usage of ACCESS, Hyperion, and or JavaScript and able to perform the following would be helpful:
Query building
Enterprise database management
Proficient in utilizing Excel to perform the following:
Creating PivotTables and utilizing dynamic ranges
Using a master pivot table to drive other pivot tables (via a VBA macro)
Measuring your data: COUNT(), COUNTA(), COUNTIF(), SUBTOTAL()
Formatting data and reformatting datatypes in Excel using formulas
Utilizing COUNTIFS, SUMIFS, VLOOKUP, IFERROR, and combinations of these formulas
Manipulation of large datasets in Excel (100,000+ rows)
Ability to learn and understand a business model and fully comprehend operational concepts, relationships between those concepts and data being utilized
Great critical thinking abilities, willingness to learn, and eagerness to do research
Support all analytical and statistical reporting requirements for program activities;
Analyze the efficiency of the enforcement lifecycle;
Develop, analyze and produce standardized statistical reports AND ad hoc reports for internal and external customers, including Congress, Agency leadership and various stakeholders;
Track tasking’s assigned to the program
Qualifications
Must be US Citizen
Two (2) years relevant experience in research, organizational and business analyses and forecasts
Bachelor’s degree



Steampunk is a Change Agent in the Federal contracting industry, bringing new thinking to clients in the Homeland, Federal Civilian, Health and DoD sectors. Through our Human-Centered delivery methodology, we are fundamentally changing the expectations our Federal clients have for true shared accountability in solving their toughest mission challenges. As an employee owned company, we focus on investing in our employees to enable them to do the greatest work of their careers – and rewarding them for outstanding contributions to our growth. If you want to learn more about our story, visit http://www.steampunk.com.
We are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Steampunk participates in the E-Verify program.",4.6,"steampunk
4.6","McLean, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2003,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
267,Data Science & Tagging Analyst,$72k-$126k (Glassdoor Est.),"Xator seeks enthusiastic, positive, and proactive self-starters to join our team. Our leadership aims to attract and retain the best and brightest employees, maintain an environment built on trust and pride, and encourage individual and team achievements. We uphold ourselves to an exceptional professional standard of conduct, setting ourselves apart from our competition.

Xator is dedicated to creating and maintaining a lifelong learning environment. We encourage forward-thinking, innovation, and out-of-the-box ideas in an inclusive environment. Our training and continuing education programs allows us to constantly improve services and deliver innovation to our customers. We invest in our employees and they, in turn, advance our clients' mission.

Clearance Requirement: Active or Current TS w/ a current SCI and Polygraph.

POSITION OVERVIEW

We are seeking Data Science & Tagging Analysts at various skill levels to support our customer in Bethesda, MD to provide Data Science & Tagging support. The ideal candidate will have experience working with the ODNI, a strong background in data science and tagging, and exceptional communication skills (verbal and written).

DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES (ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS)

The Contractor shall assist the Government to mine and analyze data from various databases to drive optimization and improvement of strategy and policy development. The Contractor shall develop custom data models and algorithms to apply to data sets. The Contractor shall recommend, develop and support implementation of best practices for standardizing data across its lifecycle through engineering, development and governance.

The Contractor shall advise on a range of Enterprise and IC data management matters through their application of substantive, analytical, operational, program management, and/or IC expertise.

JOB REQUIREMENTS AND QUALIFICATIONS

Education

Degree MUST be in one of the following fields - Computer Information Systems, Computer Science, Database Administration, Data Science, Engineering, IT Management, Mathematics, or Statistics (or another quantitative field).

Experience

Minimum five (5) years of experience manipulating data sets and building statistical models, and familiarity with:
Coding knowledge and experience with several languages (C, C++, Java, JavaScript, etc.);
Statistical and data mining techniques (Regression, Random Forest, Boosting, Trees, text mining, social network analysis, etc.);
Querying databases and using statistical computer languages (R, Python, etc.);
Using web services (Redshift, Spark, DigitalOcean, etc.); and
Creating and using advanced machine learning algorithms and statistics (regression, simulation, scenario analysis, modeling, clustering, decision trees, neural networks, etc.).
Strong problem solving skills with an emphasis on product development.
Proven ability to drive business results with data-based insights.
Demonstrated expertise with developing and implementing data management strategies, processes, and technical solutions.
Demonstrated expertise with one of the key data management knowledge areas: data management, data quality, metadata management, data governance, data modeling and design, data storage and operations, data integration and operability, document and content management, reference and master data.
Outstanding oral and written communication skills with the ability to conduct independent research, filter and synthesize data, and produce clear, logical, and concise recommendations to policy and decision-making data management and governance professionals.
Outstanding interpersonal skills, including the ability to work independently and in a team or collaborative environment, to work with all levels of employees from support staff to senior leadership, and to be proactive and responsive in communicating with all stakeholders.
Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage, etc.) and experience with applications.

Expert

Doctorate (PhD) in approved field AND a minimum of eight (8) years of experience in associated field; OR
Master’s degree in approved field AND a minimum of ten (10) years of experience in associated field; OR
Bachelor’s degree in approved field AND a minimum of twelve (12) years of experience in associated field; OR
Associate’s degree in approved field AND a minimum of fourteen (14) years of experience in associated field.
High School/GED AND a minimum of sixteen (16) years of experience in associated field.
No Degree AND 20 years of experience in intelligence analysis/counterintelligence.

Senior

Doctorate (PhD) in approved field AND a minimum of six (6) years of experience in associated field; OR
Master’s degree in approved field AND a minimum of eight (8) years of experience in associated field; OR
Bachelor’s degree in approved field AND a minimum of ten (10) years of experience in associated field; OR
Associate’s degree in approved field AND a minimum of twelve (12) years of experience in associated field.
High School/GED AND a minimum of fourteen (14) years of experience associated field.
No Degree AND sixteen (16) years of experience in associated field.

Specialized Knowledge/Skills Requirements

Experience analyzing data from 3rd party providers (Google Analytics, Site Catalyst, Coremetrics, Adwords, Crimson Hexagon, Facebook Insights, etc.).
Experience visualizing/presenting data for stakeholders using (Periscope, Business Objects, etc.).
Demonstrated expertise managing competing priorities while maintaining a high level of attention to detail; demonstrated ability to work effectively with senior leaders in a high profile and demanding office.
Outstanding analytical and critical thinking skills, including the demonstrated ability to think strategically, identify needs and requirements, and develop recommendations and solutions.
Outstanding leadership and managerial capabilities, including the ability to effectively direct tasking, and assess and manage performance.
Knowledge of the IC, ODNI, DoD, and the overall national security apparatus

IND123

Equal Opportunity Statement
Xator Corporation, and its Subsidiaries, provides equal opportunity to all applicants for employment as required by and/or consistent with applicable country law and company policy. Consistent with the foregoing, Xator Corporation provides qualified applicants consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, veterans’ status, citizenship, sexual orientation, gender identity or any other status(s) protected by law. In the United States, Xator Corporation ensures nondiscrimination in all programs and activities in accordance with Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964.

Powered by JazzHR

hYZwCqcZzN",3.0,"Xator Corporation
3.0","Bethesda, MD",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,-1,Contract,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
268,Data Analyst,$39k-$71k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job no: 495633 Work type: Regular Full-Time Location: Bethesda, MD Capability Area: Business Ventures and Innovation

JOB DESCRIPTION:

NORC at the University of Chicago is seeking a Data Analyst on our BEAD team. At NORC, Data Analysts work with our Data Scientists, and play a strategic role in supporting our research teams to produce valuable insights for our clients. They work collaboratively and help break down silos and barriers across the company to help drive innovative work. Under the leadership of Data Scientists, the Data Analysts contribute to the design and implementation of algorithms, models, and work flows to discover valuable information in large volumes of data from various sources; organizes, harmonizes, and analyzes data sets; uses various technologies to enable data visualization; and creates applications of general value to the company’s business.

Due to current COVID-19 safety measures, employees who can work from home, are required to do so. Once it is safe to resume standard practices of commuter travel and social interaction per government guidelines, we expect employees to maintain an office presence as required by projects needs and department leadership. This position in particular will be on-site at a Federal client several days a week once it is safe.

DEPARTMENT:

The Behavioral and Economic Analysis and Decision-Making (BEAD) team at NORC provides clients with actionable insights on critical policy and business issues. Applying rigorous, state-of-the-art methods from the fields of consumer behavior, judgment and decision-making, behavioral finance, household economics, cognitive science, experimental methods, and statistical analysis, BEAD obtains fact-based empirical evidence and distills the results into comprehensive, understandable, and usable reports and recommendations.

RESPONSIBILITIES:
Gathering results using a variety of techniques, ranging from simple data aggregation via statistical analysis to moderate to complex data mining.
Support the presentation of data by developing charts, graphs and tables.
Under close supervision, maintains databases/data systems, data dictionaries, etc.
Perform other duties as assigned.

REQUIRED SKILLS:
Bachelor's Degree in Math, Statistics, or Economics.
0 - 2 years experience in positions working with large datasets and conducting statistical and quantitative modeling, melding analytics with basic programming, data mining, clustering and segmentation. Domain expertise preferred.
Strong written and verbal communication including technical writing skills.
Basic data programming skills in statistical packages and database tools. Proficiency in R required.

WHAT WE DO:

NORC at the University of Chicago is an objective, non-partisan research institution that delivers reliable data and rigorous analysis to guide critical programmatic, business, and policy decisions. Since 1941, our teams have conducted groundbreaking studies, created and applied innovative methods and tools, and advanced principles of scientific integrity and collaboration. Today, government, corporate, and nonprofit clients around the world partner with us to transform increasingly complex information into useful knowledge.

WHO WE ARE:

For over 75 years, NORC has evolved in many ways, moving the needle with research methods, technical applications and groundbreaking research findings. But our tradition of excellence, passion for innovation, and commitment to collegiality have remained constant components of who we are as a brand, and who each of us is as a member of the NORC team. With world-class benefits, a business casual environment, and an emphasis on continuous learning, NORC is a place where people join for the stellar research and analysis work for which we’re known, and stay for the relationships they form with their colleagues who take pride in the impact their work is making on a global scale.

EEO STATEMENT:

NORC is an affirmative action, equal opportunity employer that values and actively seeks diversity in the workforce. NORC evaluates qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity, and other legally- protected characteristics.

Advertised: May 18, 2020 Eastern Daylight Time Applications close:",3.1,"NORC at the University of Chicago
3.1","Bethesda, MD",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1941,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
269,Data Analyst,-1,"Job Description:

The Data Analyst will provide up to date research data with an emphasis on analysis of Big Data and visualization of industry trends.

Responsibilities:

Support company leadership in all program areas regarding new or ongoing projects that require the provision of data and the analysis of key indicators.

Create effective databases that will support future grant making.

Map state, county, and regional data and create data visualizations that illustrate patterns and impacts.

Write subject matter reports with visuals for internal and external audiences.

Requirements:

Bachelor’s degree in Economics, Mathematics, or related field with emphasis on quantitative and/or analytical skills.

2+ years’ experience

Excellent verbal and written communication skills; ability to prepare written briefings.

Ability to apply analytical skills in the areas of economics, community indicators, and statistics to support research.

Quantitative research skills using economic and community data.

Ability to work collaboratively with other applied research centers to share and customize data sets.

The ability to identify and quickly develop the competencies to utilize appropriate software packages.",5.0,"LaBine and Associates
5.0","Pittsburgh, PA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
270,Data Analyst,$39k-$66k (Glassdoor Est.),"Salary

$18.05 - $31.40 Hourly

$37,538 - $65,316 Annually

This position is a Pay Band 70

Purpose of Position
The purpose of this position is to provide necessary data support, and to collect, interpret and report on the outcomes for all of our Behavioral Health Services programs including identifying patterns and trends in data sets. Track and report on Legislative Finance Committee performance measures, analyze data for policy and program recommendations, train end users, provide technical expertise on data builds, generate reports from single or multiple systems, provide analysis reports to leadership, provide strong knowledge of SQL, Oracle and Python programming. Assist in expanding the data unit establishing program data needs, developing and maintaining data bases and data collection mechanisms of various sorts, manage the integration of various data sets/data bases. Utilize COVID 19 data base test tracking and analysis tools, respond to and report upon the COVID 19 pandemic data needs including testing tracking, data analysis to include positivity rates, and reporting testing data to the Governor's office, CYFD leadership, and program managers. This position will assist behavioral health programs that are directly responding to COVID-19 impacting high-risk children, youth and families.

THIS POSTING WILL BE USED TO CONDUCT ONGOING RECRUITMENT AND WILL REMAIN OPEN UNTIL POSITION HAS BEEN FILLED.
Who are the customers?
New Mexico State Governors Office; Children Youth and Families Department Office of the Secretary; Behavioral Health Services (BHS) Leadership; BHS Program Management; BHS Program Staff; BHS Financial Staff; external customers such as New Mexico State Government Health and Education Agencies; various BHS Health provider entities; Federal Government partners; and New Mexico families.
Ideal Candidate
Preferred Experience and proficiency in:
utilization of Microsoft Excel in maintaining spreadsheets utilizing excel functions to include formulas and pivot tables;
developing, utilizing, and maintaining various types of databases and data collection systems;
utilizing and using programming languages such as SQL, Oracle and Python;
generating data reports (query) and performing data analysis;
use graphs, info-graphics and other methods to visualize and present data;
adept at queries; and
analyzing/presenting data findings and trends for leadership
Minimum Qualification
Bachelor's degree and two (2) years of experience including research, statistics, computer science, data analysis, accounting, auditing, finance, economics, business, public administration, budgeting, management and/or systems analysis. Substitutions Apply. See Substitution Table below.
Substitution Table

These combinations of education and experience qualify you for the position:

Education Experience
1 High School Diploma or Equivalent AND 6 years of experience
2 Associate's degree AND 4 years of experience
3 Bachelor's degree AND 2 years of experience
4 Master's degree or higher AND 0 years of experience

• Education and years of experience must be related to the purpose of the position.

• If Minimum Qualification requires a specific number of ""semester hours"" in a field (e.g. 6 semester hours in Accounting), applicants MUST have those semester hours in order to meet the minimum qualifications. No substitutions apply for semester hours.

Employment Requirements
Must possess and maintain a valid Driver's License. Pre-employment criminal background check is required and conditional pending results. Pre-employment background investigation is required and is conditional pending results. Must possess and maintain a current Defensive Driving Course Certificate from the State of New Mexico or must pass and receive Defensive Driving Course Certification within six (6) months of date of hire as a condition of continued employment.
Working Conditions
Work is performed in an office setting with exposure to Visual/Video Display Terminal (VDT). Extended period of sitting with ongoing usage of personal computer and telephone and/or video conferencing is involved in daily responsibilities. Some physical activity to include walking, bending and lifting. Must be able to lift 25 pounds. Occasional travel is involved.
Supplemental Information

Benefits:

Do you know what Total Compensation is? Click here

Agency Contact Information: Michelle Padilla, 505-699-5138 Email

For information on Statutory Requirements for this position, click the Classification Description link on the job advertisement.

Bargaining Unit Position
This position is not covered by a collective bargaining agreement.",3.6,"State of New Mexico
3.6","Santa Fe, NM",-1,10000+ Employees,-1,Government,State & Regional Agencies,Government,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
271,Data Analyst,-1,"This individual is responsible for analyzing and gleaning insights from massive data pipelines as we process, ingest and cleanse over a billion data points each week. You will be working closely with ownership and account management teams to deliver high quality insights for our customers. This is a very hands-on analytical role, where a large part of your time is spent performing mathematical deep-dives across our diverse array of datasets.

Conduct end-to-end analysis on datasets across our business
Partner with cross-functional teams to identify new opportunities requiring the use of modern analytical techniques
Utilize analytical techniques to design algorithms for outlier detection
Use existing insights and develop new strategies to drive the product strategy",-1,Lunge Marketing,"Redmond, WA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
272,Business Analyst - Digital Data and Analytics,-1,"RESPONSIBILITIES:
Kforce has a client in search of a Business Analyst - Digital Data Analytics in Benton Harbor, MI.

Overview:
You are able to lead technical digital data projects autonomously and unlock the value of data. You have a proven track record of establishing Data Engineering processes at previous companies and care deeply about using data to solve business problems.

Duties:
Conceive, lead, and execute projects to manage an exceptional data access solution, supporting user requests from various stakeholder groups
Work with a wide range of business partners, particularly in GIS and product management, to develop innovative analytics solutions that address top outcomes, including feature development/enhancement, system health monitoring, testing, and troubleshooting
Building strong relationships with stakeholders and mentoring junior team members
REQUIREMENTS:
Bachelor's degree required
2 years of experience required
Experience working with web analytics and digital media performance data
Experience with or exposed to Google Analytics, Adobe DTM, Adobe Launch, data warehouse, data-lake or data virtualization solutions
Knowledgeable about data analysis/visualization tools such as Tableau
Knowledge and understanding of data governance challenges and best practices for website analytics tagging, metadata, data quality, and data stewardship
Know about data profiling or defining data quality rules - especially digital data collected digitally using Adobe Analytics, Google Analytics, Google Ads, etc.
Experience writing/editing internal communications or training-related materials in a corporate environment
Skilled in interpreting business measurement/reporting needs; Coordinate multiple stakeholder requests and project activities at any one time to ensure accurate, timely, and efficient reporting and analysis deliverables
Business analyst - able to synthesize data and draw insights; Able to present insights directly to business stakeholders
Understanding of digital data - like website analytics data and media analytics data
Preferred:
Experience working with multiple data sources - web data, SAP/HANA, CRM, etc.
Has experience combining different data sources into one report - either directly or leveraging a data team
Kforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",4.1,"Kforce
4.1","Benton Harbor, MI",-1,10000+ Employees,1966,Company - Public,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
273,Data Analyst,$33k-$60k (Glassdoor Est.),"Turn 5 is one of the largest and fastest growing e-commerce retailers in the Greater Philadelphia area experiencing 15+ years of double digit growth driven by our customer and data-first approach. Best known for our award-winning e-commerce platforms, AmericanMuscle.com, ExtremeTerrain.com and AmericanTrucks.com, we’ve been engaging car enthusiasts with exceptional products, services, and experiences since 2004.
Our purpose, however, extends beyond selling car parts. We have a commitment to creating meaningful customer experiences at every step of their journey. Whether it’s supplying a unique product that customizes the look and feel of their ride, providing thousands of educational videos for the DIYer or leveraging user generated content to inspire even the most experienced owner, we are obsessed with ensuring we reach as many like-minded gearheads across the globe.
To continue our growth path, we need a Data Analyst who thrives working with large data sets to create & analyze reports & prove out multiple scenarios that support business decisions across all areas of the business. This is a highly impactful role as you’ll work across every step of the analytics process from problem identification, data gathering, and data cleansing, to developing thoughtful analysis and making presentation of findings.
The Turn5 business is built on using data – not opinions – to guide the path forward. Turn5 boasts industry leading business strategies. Those strategies come from smart people armed with the right data and analysts to challenge their thinking, provide insights & pounce on opportunities.
You will be challenged to work collaboratively across all departments to spread the use of data and knowledge to make better decisions throughout the company. One minute you might be using custom SQL code to build reports that help analyze a new data set, the next minute collaborating with our department leads to analyze KPI reports, and the next minute partnering with your peers to gather, cleanse and move data to maintain integrity. Regardless of the task, it’s critical you have strong situational awareness and EQ as you’ll work with diverse stakeholders across the organization.
If you're passionate about data & analysis and want to work with people who believe in the power of analysis, join us!

Year 1 is going to be about:
Discovering opportunities for improvement and provide recommendations for improvement within Turn5's strategy to drive incremental operational success
Working with team of Data Engineers to ensure performance reliability of dashboards and visualizations available via Tableau Server
Using custom SQL to improve data structure, optimize/automate data flow, and build custom reports
Collaborating with representatives from across Turn5's departments to contribute to analytics and data integration projects
Performing ad-hoc reporting analysis for all Turn5 business functions
Performing ad-hoc analysis to help predict performance or to assist future decisions
Managing our analytics project and ticketing system, ensuring the highest impact projects are prioritized and ensuring quality scoping of projects
Being presented with business problems and doing any required aspects (data identification, data cleansing, data movement, analysis, etc.) to figure out the cause and how to improve performance

We can’t skip over some of the specific skills and experience we know are a “must” to be successful. So, we need you to have:
BA/BS in IT, marketing, e-commerce, economics, mathematics, or other related degrees & at minimum 1-2 years of experience working in a similar capacity
BA/BS degree requirement can be substituted for 3+ years of related work experience
Excellent analytical skills: including being able to quality-assure, clean, and analyze large data sets to draw conclusions and propose recommendations
6 months - 2 years of experience with MS SQL Server 2012+
Comfortable with implementing basic statements for DDL (SELECT, INSERT, DELETE & MERGE).
6 months - 2 years of experience working in/moving data from Tableau, Google Analytics, or any other analytics platforms
Data centric experience working with various applications (OMS, WMS, etc.) implemented within an eCommerce setting would be a plus
Proficiency in Excel",2.7,"Turn5
2.7","Paoli, PA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2003,Company - Private,Automotive Parts & Accessories Stores,Retail,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
274,Clinical Data Analyst,$52k-$89k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview


How have you impacted someone’s life today? At Hackensack Meridian Health our healthcare teams are focused on changing the lives of our patients by providing the highest level of care each and every day. From our hospitals, rehab centers and occupational health teams to our long-term care centers and at-home care capabilities, our complete spectrum of services will allow you to apply your skills in multiple settings while building your career all within New Jersey’s premier healthcare system.

Fostering a culture of excellence within a collaborative environment, Hackensack Meridian Health is seeking talented professionals to implement and support innovative solutions & technologies. Our Information Technology team enables HMH to meet the changing demands of the healthcare marketplace by providing creative, high quality, efficient and effective solutions. Come join the HMH team as we recently rolled out Epic throughout our network and are looking for top talent to support this implementation.

HMH IT department has received many accolades from recognized organizations; including Most Wired and Fortune. Come join our winning IT team that was ranked as #1 “Best Hospital IT Department” for the past two years by Health IT News.

Responsibilities


A day in the life of a Clinical Data Analyst at Hackensack Meridian Health includes:
Assisting and resolving coding and billing edits that are holding patient claims from final billing.
Maintain the integrity of Charge Description Masters (CDM) and Revenue Integrity Systems Programs.
Maintain the integrity of all Ancillary Department systems related to billing and revenue.
Position will serve as liaison between Administration, and Ancillary Department Directors regarding revenue and compliance issues.
Position will coordinate all retrospective, concurrent, internal billing audits.
Provide monthly audit results.
Develop and coordinate educational in-services to the Business Office staff and Ancillary staff related to charging and billing issues.
Review denial trends for documentation or charging issue opportunities.
Review high charge stays/procedures for charging accuracy.
Ensures web tool (unbilled) items are addressed properly and timely.
Qualifications


Education, Knowledge, Skills and Abilities Required:
High School Diploma or Equivalent.
PC Literate.
Education, Knowledge, Skills and Abilities Preferred:
Healthcare experience and Clinical experience.
If you feel that the above description speaks directly to your strengths and capabilities, then please apply today!",3.3,"Hackensack Meridian Health
3.3","Lakewood, NJ",-1,10000+ Employees,-1,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
275,Data Analyst,-1,"FlowWest is a startup consulting firm focused on developing new kinds of solutions for challenging environmental and water management problems. We are searching for a data analyst interested in water resources, ecological restoration, and other environmental issues. The ideal candidate will be excited to work with autonomy within a small cross-functional team of data scientists, software engineers, environmental engineers, and environmental planners to deliver solutions for the greatest water and natural resources challenges. This position will provide opportunities to contribute to Open Science efforts. We welcome good collaborators and communicators. Learn more about our values here https://www.flowwest.com/core-values.
We are looking for a candidate with experience and training in at least one of the following: Statistics, Data Science, Information Systems, or other quantitative fields.
Job is remote (US work authorization required), possible to transition to an in-person role at our Sacramento, CA or Oakland, CA offices post-COVID-19 if desired. Up to 10% travel to meet with team and clients post-COVID-19.

Salary $60,000 - $90,000 based on experience
Responsibilities
Transform messy data into unified, machine-actionable formats
Assist researchers in metadata document creation according to international standards
Perform ad-hoc data analysis and reporting
Design data models and schemas for databases
Manage uploads to data repository through collaboration with fisheries researchers
Develop QA/QC procedures to ensure quality data collection
Write fantastic technical documentation
Consulting with project managers on project status and timelines
Qualifications
Experience with a scripting language for data analysis and visualization - R (tidyverse, shiny) or python
Experience supporting and working with cross-functional teams in a dynamic environment
Great communication skills - distill complex information to technical and non-technical groups
Knowledge of data management best practices and metadata standards
Coursework in statistics and probability
Bonus Points*
Experience with GIT source control and asynchronous workflows with Github
Design skills
GIS experience
Background in biologic, environmental, or earth sciences
Job Type: Full-time
Pay: $60,000.00 - $90,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Work Location:
Multiple locations
Work Remotely:
Yes",-1,FlowWest,"Oakland, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
276,Data Analyst,$44k-$78k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Analyst

University Overview

The University of Pennsylvania, the largest private employer in Philadelphia, is a world-renowned leader in education, research, and innovation. This historic, Ivy League school consistently ranks among the top 10 universities in the annual U.S. News & World Report survey. Penn has 12 highly-regarded schools that provide opportunities for undergraduate, graduate and continuing education, all influenced by Penn's distinctive interdisciplinary approach to scholarship and learning.

Penn offers a unique working environment within the city of Philadelphia. The University is situated on a beautiful urban campus, with easy access to a range of educational, cultural, and recreational activities. With its historical significance and landmarks, lively cultural offerings, and wide variety of atmospheres, Philadelphia is the perfect place to call home for work and play.

The University offers a competitive benefits package that includes excellent healthcare and tuition benefits for employees and their families, generous retirement benefits, a wide variety of professional development opportunities, supportive work and family benefits, a wealth of health and wellness programs and resources, and much more.

Posted Job Title
Data Analyst

Job Profile Title
Data Analyst D

Job Description Summary
Data Analyst D
The data analyst will partner with the Faculty of the Penn Dermatology Oncology Center (PennDOC) and the Skin Biology and Disease Resource Based Center (SBDRC) to design, conduct, and publish research that improves the lives of patients with skin cancer and skin diseases. The data analyst will enjoy a collegial relationship with a dynamic group of surgeons, clinicians, and basic scientists dedicated to conducting practical research about skin cancer and skin diseases. The data analyst will also collaborate with clinical research coordinators in the Department of Dermatology and work with collaborating investigators from other specialties and outside institutions to ensure compliance with regulatory research requirements.
Applicants must have a strong background in creating and analyzing databases; knowledge in basic statistics; basic knowledge in regulatory requirements of the Institutional Review Board; excellent oral and written communication skills to work with a team and to draft research proposals and manuscripts; and organizational skills to prepare agendas and material for regular research team meetings.
The data analyst will receive mentorship from and report to the Director of Research Operations for the Department of Dermatology. The data analyst will have regular guidance from Faculty mentors, including Principle Investigators and Subject Matter Experts.

Job Description

With general direction, performs data analysis and assists with design of complex data models based upon business or research requirements. Often as part of a team, identifies and resolves required information flows and content issues, and transforms requirements into data designs and models. May perform analyses, development and evaluation on large databases and large complex installations. May provide reporting and decision support systems consultation. May provide data analysis expertise to one or more project or support teams. May work with vendor delivered solutions

Position contingent on funding.

Responsibilities
Develops and analyzes databases as indicated for research projects including clinical trials, observational, retrospective, and prospective studies. Maintains and enhances the existing database for Mohs micrographic surgery at Penn. Collects and organizes data from patient charts and existing databases (e.g. SEER, Optum). Develop and implement quality control plans to ensure data integrity and compliance.
Performs descriptive and inferential statistics, including regression analyses, and sample size calculations. Analyses may also include simple data descriptions (e.g., prevalence and incidence of outcomes), correlations, regression modeling (e.g., linear, logistic, cox proportional hazard models, mixed effects models, latent class analysis). Uses statistical programming language, such as SAS, STATA, R, or other programing language for analysis and collaborates with biostatistical experts when appropriate. Ability to use data visualization techniques in Tableau, Power BI, Excel, or with a programming language (e.g., R or Python. The analyst may need to learn additional statistical or bioinformatics (e.g., multi-omic data analysis) techniques for existing and/or future projects.
Drafting and submission of research grant proposals and manuscripts:
Partners with Faculty to complete research grant proposals and manuscripts. Common contributions from the data analyst include: preparing tables to summarize data and figures to illustrate statistics; drafting relevant portions of research proposals and manuscripts; submitting manuscripts and proposals; and managing correspondence with authors, journal editors, and reviewers.
Mentoring pre-doctoral research fellows and organizing research meetings:
Mentors pre-doctoral student researchers in study design and basic statistical analysis. Works with faculty mentors and Principle Investigators, including Director of PennDOC and PI/co-PI of the SBDRC to organize the agenda and materials for research group meetings.
Perform additional duties as assigned
Duties

The data analyst will partner with the Faculty of the Penn Dermatology Oncology Center and the Skin Biology and Disease Resource Based Center to design, conduct, and publish research that improves the lives of patients with skin cancer and skin diseases. The data analyst will enjoy a collegial relationship with a dynamic group of surgeons, clinicians, and researchers dedicated to practical research about skin cancer and skin diseases. The data analyst will also collaborate with clinical research coordinators in the Department of Dermatology and interface with collaborating investigators and biostatisticians from other specialties and outside institutions.

The data analyst will create and analyze databases; apply basic statistics to data; design data tables and figures; assist with manuscript and grant proposal drafting; ensure compliance with research regulations; and prepare materials for regular research team meetings.

Qualifications

Required:

3-5 years experience. 1-2 years of prior experience in clinical research or an equivalent combination of education and experience.
Bachelor's Degree or higher educational attainment in biostatistics, biomedical informatics, public health, or related field that ensures a fundamental understanding of research design considerations. Master's Degree preferred.
Basic knowledge of regulatory requirements and how to appropriately fulfill them, including Institutional Review Board submissions.
Ability to perform descriptive and basic inferential statistics, including regression analyses, and sample size calculations.
Proficiency with basic computer programming skills, including basic Microsoft Office applications, e.g. Access, Word, Excel, PowerPoint.
Experience using a statistical programming language, such as SAS, STATA, R, or other programming language.
Working knowledge of relational database design, query, and reporting.
Excellent interpersonal and communication (written and verbal) skills
Ability to work both independently and with a team as well as the ability to manage up.
Strong organizational and documentation skills.
Preferred

Ability to import/export data into or from various formats into standard statistical software.
Experience in verifying, documenting, and cleaning large data files.
Experience with large administrative or claims datasets (e.g Medicare, SEER, NCDB, etc)
Familiarity with data standards and coding conventions.
Experience managing multiple projects effectively and meeting deadlines.
Experience with data visualization techniques in Tableau, Power BI, Excel, or with a programming language (e.g., R or Python).
Experience with mySQL or SQL

Working Conditions
Office, Library, Computer Room

Physical Effort
Typically sitting at desk or table

Contingent upon funding

Job Location - City, State
Philadelphia, Pennsylvania

Department / School
Perelman School of Medicine

Pay Range
$59,703.00 - $168,837.00

Affirmative Action Statement
Penn adheres to a policy that prohibits discrimination on the basis of race, color, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, religion, creed, national or ethnic origin, citizenship status, age, disability, veteran status, or any other legally protected class.

Special Requirements
Background check required after a conditional job offer is made. Consideration of the background check will be tailored to the requirements of the job.",4.3,"University of Pennsylvania
4.3","Philadelphia, PA",-1,10000+ Employees,1740,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
277,Data Analyst,$59k-$100k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Department of Pathology and Laboratory Medicine is seeking to hire a Data Analyst to join their Technology Center for Genomics & Bioinformatics. The Data Analyst will serve as the primary bioinformatician for the Center and be responsible for next generation sequencing (Ion Torrent and HiSeq2000) and microarray data management. Duties include:

•NGS data analysis (RNAseq, WES, WGS, Chipseq, Methseq, single cell RNAseq)
•NGS data management (data delivery, data transfer, data storage)
•Customer support
•Other laboratory pre-analytical and post-analytical activities

Note:
Due to the pandemic, this position is 100% remote until further notice

Job Title: Data Analyst

UC Job Title: SRA III

Job Number: req9136

Work Hours: Monday - Friday, 8am - 5pm

Job Type: career

Duration: Indefinite

Work Location:Los Angeles

Salary Range: 58,454.43 - 94,002.50

Job Duties:

The Department of Pathology and Laboratory Medicine is seeking to hire a Data Analyst to join their Technology Center for Genomics & Bioinformatics. The Data Analyst will serve as the primary bioinformatician for the Center and be responsible for next generation sequencing (Ion Torrent and HiSeq2000) and microarray data management. Duties include:

•NGS data analysis (RNAseq, WES, WGS, Chipseq, Methseq, single cell RNAseq)
•NGS data management (data delivery, data transfer, data storage)
•Customer support
•Other laboratory pre-analytical and post-analytical activities

Note:
Due to the pandemic, this position is 100% remote until further notice

Job Qualifications:

•At least one year experience working with NGS data analysis
•Demonstrated understanding of the statistical principles behind current best practices in bioinformatics
•Broad experience with data generated by high-throughput molecular assays including microarrays and next-generation sequencing, preferred
•Experience in molecular biology combined with a very strong record of high-throughput data analysis, supported by publication in this area, preferred
•Experience in bioinformatics, biostatistics, computational biology or similar molecular biology, genetics, or biotechnology, preferred
•Strong experience in the use of a high-level programming language such as R, MATLAB, Python or Perl for complex data analysis
•Strong communication, data presentation and visualization skills. In particular, a demonstrated ability to effectively interact with scientific and thought leaders who specialize in areas other than bioinformatics, biostatistics, etc.
•Ability to work both independently, collaboratively, and interdependently to handle numerous concurrent, fast-paced projects

Bargaining Unit: RX

Layoff Referral Deadline:

Posted Date: 9/28/2020

Posting Category: Research",4.0,"UC Davis Medical Center
4.0","Los Angeles, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,-1,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
278,Data Analyst,-1,"A Data Analyst performs, but is not limited to the following duties:
Extract data from agency data base for management and program report
Provide organization and management of case files.
Review data (completeness of information, proper execution).
Extract data from data base.
Obtain additional information from another investigative agencies/data base.
Establish/maintain physical file.
Prepare notices/advertisements.
Receive, suspense petitions, claims, and process requests.
Reconcile inconsistencies.
Prepare declarations.
Gather information and organize investigative package.
Verify case files and case tracking systems.
Maintain internal status information on the disposition of all forfeited assets.
Assure information is accurate and perform analytical computations necessary to process data.
Conduct and reconcile inventories.
Distribute and receive documents.
Assist lead analyst or official in obtaining/collecting all documents/information to complete case file.
Perform word processing relevant to case documentation.
Perform data entry relevant to case.
A Data Analyst must meet the following qualifications:
Ability to establish case/project files.
Ability to enter and retrieve data from data bases.
Ability to prepare and format management reports.
Ability to manipulate, transfer, compute and print information.
Ability to create and manipulate spreadsheets.
Ability to prepare and correct reports and correspondence using word processing software.
Performs certain liaison functions with clients with respect to budget execution.
Reviews reprogramming requests of clients.
Provides program specific analysis to support budget formulation, budget execution, and financial reporting processes.
Requires experience with Government accounting system.
Proficiency in using spreadsheet and word processing software.
Ability to consistently deliver the highest quality of work under extreme pressure.
Required:

· Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Information Technology or related field.

· 84 months experience developing and administering data quality programs.

· 84 months experience working with business and technical users to define data quality rules, data cleansing and data remediation and developing corresponding solutions.

· 60 months experience identifying and proposing resolution of data quality issues.

· 84 months experience in complex SQL development.

· 84 months experience in internal and external stakeholder communications and outreach, including the development of presentations and other materials",-1,Ambire Consulting,"Albany, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
279,Data Analyst,-1,"Position Number: 348952

Location: Saint Louis, MO 63146

Position Type: Temporary

Required Skill Set:
Data Analysis, JavaScript, Python, SAS, Spotfire

Position Description:
*C2C is not available**
*Only U.S. Citizens and those authorized to work in the U.S. can be considered as W2 candidates.**
Location: St. Louis, MO 63146
Duration: 6 months

Data Analyst
Knowledge in working with one or more of the following tools: SAS, Spotfire, J-Review, R, JavaScript, Python, or Perl.
A thorough understanding of data standards.
Filter, tag, join, parse, and normalize data sets for use in analytical models.
Create reports and dashboards from a versatility of data.
Work with data manager or steward to resolve data quality issues and with data scientists to understand their workflows and requirements.
Manage model degradation.
Ensure models remain predictive.
Good data wrangling, some statistics & linear algebra skills.
Create operative business insights for business stakeholders, and use the outputs of the Data Scientists in operative business.
Decomposition of complex problems, expert knowledge in data, tools, and methods, storytelling and communication, business acumen.
1-3 Years of Experience
Other locations considered:
Arlington, WI
Evansville, IN
Huxley, IA
Williamsburg, IA
Lubbock, TX
Monmouth, IL
Ankeny, IA",4.5,"Rose International
4.5","Saint Louis, MO",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1993,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
280,Business Data Analyst,$54k-$99k (Glassdoor Est.),"Western Digital

The next big thing in data is you!

ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
Take a lead to define, facilitate, implement, & maintain Information-Systems to meet Sales business needs.
Work with Sales Operations, Business Units, Business Operations, Finance, Product Technical teams, Project, and IT teams, to ensure efficient collection, standardization, and analysis of data required to support sales teams.
Use appropriate research tools such as to analyze business requirements and problems. Analyze and help facilitate design of process improvement solutions.
Lead data quality & data validation effort; generate data governance exception management reports, and see issues through to resolution
Participate in testing and implementation activities to ensure attainment of desired business outcomes (in accordance with established requirements).
Complete assignments that require individual user discretion and independent judgment in resolving problems.
Assess process designs for gaps, non-value-added steps, and other impediments to efficient operation.
Support change management activities including development and delivery of training and communications to support transitions.
Maintain progress and provide visibility into project activities to complete deliverables on time.
Review requirements, user stories, designs, and specifications with SMEs
Serve as liaison to downstream users of sales data
Collaborate with stakeholders to ensure reporting solutions are user friendly, scalable, repeatable, effective & efficient, and that meet expectations of stakeholders
Define, implement and standardize reports and dashboards leveraging visualization tools
SKILLS:
Knowledge of business functional operations, sales channels, data systems, and their respective interdependencies
Experience in the areas of business process review, business process improvement, data management & data governance.
Strong research and data analysis skills.
Strong verbal/written communication skills
Basic knowledge of Project-Management methodology and practices
Ability to quickly analyze, troubleshoot, and correct perceived problems.
Excellent follow through, ability to develop and implement action plans, and issue resolution.
High level of initiative, energy, drive and enthusiasm.
An ability to manage multiple parallel tasks and priorities.
Experience with process improvement methodologies, such as DMAIC.
Must be a self-starter and can complete tasks with minimal direction/oversight
Produce clear and accurate outputs.
Proactively solicits feedback and acts on it.
Proactively initiates connections with key stakeholders and team members.
Identifies and demonstrates an understanding of the expectations of customers (internal and external).
Communicates ideas clearly and persuasively, adapting style to the situation and audience.
Proactive and inquisitive learner... seeks out and capitalizes on opportunities for change that enhance the business, rather than reacting to circumstances
REQUIRED:
BS Degree or equivalent work experience
5+ years in Sales Data Analysis or Business-Systems Analysis and/or related experience
Experience in writing SQL scripts.
Experience in data modeling.
Experience in Tableau or any other visualization tool. Bonus if have an understanding of Tableau administration.
Preference for candidates having background in Sales Force
Oracle Analytics & Reporting Visualization solutions
ABOUT
WESTERN DIGITAL®
The future. It’s on you. You & Western Digital.

We’ve been storing the world’s data for more than 50 years. Once, storage
was the most important thing we could do for data. Now, we’re helping the world
capture, preserve, access and transform data in a way only we can.

The most game-changing companies,
consumers, professionals, and government organizations come to us for the
technologies and solutions needed to bring meaning and value to their
ever-increasing diversity of data.

But we can’t do it alone. Today’s
exceptional data challenges require your unique skills. You can be the next big
thing in data.

Western Digital® data-centric
solutions are comprised of the Western Digital, G-Technology™, SanDisk® and WD®
brands.

Western Digital is an equal opportunity employer.

Western Digital does not discriminate on the basis of race,
color, ancestry, religion (including religious dress and grooming standards),
sex (including pregnancy, childbirth or related medical conditions,
breastfeeding or related medical conditions), gender (including a person’s
gender identity, gender expression, and gender-related appearance and behavior,
whether or not stereotypically associated with the person’s assigned sex at
birth), age, national origin, sexual orientation, medical condition, marital
status (including domestic partnership status), physical disability, mental
disability, medical condition, genetic information, protected medical and
family care leave, Civil Air Patrol status, military and veteran status, or
other legally protected characteristics. We also prohibit harassment of any
individual on any of the characteristics listed above. Our non-discrimination
policy applies to all aspects of employment. We comply with the laws and
regulations set forth in the ""Equal
Employment Opportunity is the Law"" poster.

Western Digital participates in the E-Verify program in the US.
For more information click here. Este empleador participa in E-Verify.

#LI-JS1

Mid-level, Senior",3.6,"Western Digital
3.6","San Jose, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1970,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
281,Data Analyst,$38k-$70k (Glassdoor Est.),"Responsibilities: *
· Provides plan with data, reporting and analyses that enable data driven decision making.

· Provides summary analyses in written and oral presentation settings.

· Builds database from scratch. And prepares complex presentations.

· Develops system test cases and documents results, researches system issues and documents findings.
Requirements: *
· Bachelor’s degree in Science, Technology, Engineering or Mathematics

· Ability to translate business requirements into non-technical, lay terms

· Understanding of addressing and metadata standards

· High-level written and verbal communication skills

Job Types: Full-time, Contract

Salary: $80,000.00 - $90,000.00 per year

Experience:
SQL Developer: 1 year (Preferred)
Data Analytics: 1 year (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.7,"CCS Global Tech
4.7","San Diego, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1997,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
282,Data Analyst,$47k-$85k (Glassdoor Est.),"Connor Group is a specialized advisory firm of Big 4 alumni and industry executives. We provide high-value services to assist companies with Financial Accounting and Operations, IPO Services, and M&A Services. Connor Group is a team of big brains helping financial executives with their most complex and significant matters. Our clients are the world’s top growth companies. We support them as they change the world! Here at Connor Group we value competence, discipline, courage and likeability. We also believe that work/life balance is an essential factor in professional and personal success. Connor Group is a fantastic place to work, filled with highly competent and likable people! Are you someone who… - has over 3.5 GPA in computer science Bachelors or Masters? - has 0 to 2 years of software development experience? - has good hands on experience using at least one programming language like Java / Java script / C# / Phython / Ruby? - has a good understanding of SaaS-based products and web technologies like SOAP, REST, XML, WSDL, XSD, UDDI and JSON? - has good analytical and problem solving skills? - is a team player with strong communication skills and a can-do attitude? - is a creative problem solver? If so, we want you on our team! Connor Group currently has offices in Silicon Valley, San Francisco, Reno, Salt Lake, and New York. But the majority of Connor Group professionals work from remote client premises. Our unique and exciting environment requires someone who will apply creative thinking to support ever-changing needs. Job Responsibilities: • Hands on design, development, deployment and maintenance of integration processes between 3rd party applications across cloud and/or on premise using 'Dell Boomi AtomSphere' platform or using Workato. • Managing, Monitoring, Sustaining, Troubleshooting and supporting existing integration implementations for our clients. • supporting developers and architects in managing and creating design, development, and maintenance documentation related to each client. • Adapt and implement the methodologies and processes.",4.6,"Connor Group
4.6","San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1992,Company - Private,Real Estate,Real Estate,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
283,Data Analyst,$22k-$31k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description:

Job Summary:

Collects, disseminates and reconciles data related to membership, outcomes, and youth trends to support overall business decisions, service to members, gain efficiencies, achieve outcomes and ensure safe Club environments.

Responsibilities:
Develops and conducts daily, weekly, monthly, quarterly, annual and ad-hoc reporting around agency attendance and outcome metrics. Distributes reports to appropriate audiences.
Responsible for completing on-going data requests from internal and external stakeholders.
Conducts analysis of internal data to ensure that data is relevant and readily accessible to necessary stakeholders.
Creates templates and management tools for reporting fiscal and grant related oversight.
Develops data collection and tracking tools for membership, outcomes, and quality oversight.
Identifies discrepancies in data and informs appropriate departments.
Conducts annual research and trend analysis of database systems and software packages to ensure best practices and product knowledge is current.
Communicates directly with database vendors to ensure organizational needs are met. (i.e., troubleshooting and building out systems to accommodate the needs)
Coordinates data collection and reporting using member records, surveys, assessments, interviews, and other data sources. Including, but not limited to, the databases that support BGCA, United Way and outcomes initiatives.
Ensures integrity of member related data through file audits, trend analysis and other methods.
Provides timely reporting to enhance agency annual goals around ADA, FOA, membership and outcomes achievement.
Delivers support, technical assistance, and training to Club staff around database usage, data entry and data integrity.
Provides support to internal colleagues in understanding data trends and effects on organizational benchmarks.
Assists with development and maintenance of overall data standards (i.e., fidelity of activity names and requests; process and systems for data/activity requests).
Collaborates interdepartmentally to coordinate data processes and ensure compliance with public and private grant requirements.
Assists in annual reporting - compiling data and spreadsheets and scheduling meetings with club managers.
Provides support to departmental projects and initiatives as assigned by Director of Strategy, Measurement and Analysis.
Assists with preparation of departmental reports as assigned.
Must participate in required trainings by the Club, County, State, and/or funder as required.
Physical Demands:

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to sit and use hands to touch, handle, or feel. The employee is occasionally required to stand and reach with hands and arms. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 10 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, distance vision, and ability to adjust focus.

Work Environment:

The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. The noise level in the work environment is usually moderate.
Required Experience:

Skills:

Strong written and verbal communication skills.

Good organization and prioritization skills and ability to manage several projects simultaneously.

Must have a valid WI driver’s license, good driving record, and meets state required automobile insurance minimums

Education:

Bachelor’s degree in Communications, Business, Social Work, or other related field.

Experience:Experience with Microsoft Office and any Membership Information System.

Experience utilizing Excel to analyze data and create reports.

Keyword: Data Analyst
From: Boys & Girls Club of Greater Milwaukee
Apply now",3.9,"Boys & Girls Club of Greater Milwaukee
3.9","Milwaukee, WI",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1860,Nonprofit Organization,Social Assistance,Non-Profit,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
284,Data Analyst - Listings,$41k-$80k (Glassdoor Est.),"Compass is building the first modern end-to-end real estate platform by integrating agents, buyers and sellers through technology. Before Compass, no one has achieved the blend of the Natural Intelligence that hundreds of thousands of enterprising real estate agents bring to this market, with the Artificial Intelligence that cloud, mobile and AI technologies enable.

As one of the fastest growing technology companies of our generation, in an industry larger than any other, we have an opportunity and obligation to build a world-class engineering team and the operating platform that will transform the real estate industry. In 2019 we tripled the size of our Product & Engineering team, and are searching for creative and inspiring colleagues at all levels of the organization to join us as we continue to expand in 2020.

The Data Product team's mission is to envision, build, and deploy the next generation end-to-end platform for real estate data ingestion, processing, storage, serving, and analysis at massive scale to provide leverage for Compass. Every team and agent at Compass relies on our platform to make data-informed decisions as they grow their business on top of this strong foundation.

About This Role

In this role, you will help Compass become the leading source of real estate information by expanding our geographic coverage, introducing new data types and sources, and ensuring the highest data quality standards are met. You will work cross-functionally with company leadership, product managers, engineers, support teams, and other analysts to grow and maintain the Compass data platform.

Responsibilities
Support our expansion team in efficiently onboarding new listing data sources with a high bar for quality
Create, test, monitor, and improve key data quality metrics tied to the customer experience
Serve as a subject matter expert and escalation point on data quality issues reported by front-line customer and product support teams
Directly interface with third party data sources during onboarding and change or incident management activities
Create and maintain operational and analytical scripts, or other tools to swiftly resolve data quality issues or drive actionable decision-making
Leverage data to build conviction and consensus around prioritizing features that improve the customer experience and scale the business
Confirm feature release readiness by performing ad hoc analyses and tests in support of new product development
Advocate for process improvements to drive our data platform forward with a metrics-driven, continuous improvement approach
What We Look For
2+ years experience in software product, project management, or engineering roles, building and launching successful data-driven products at scale
Experience manipulating large datasets using various tools or techniques, including Python/Google Apps scripting, SQL, pivot tables, lookups
Looking for people with expertise in data forensics, and who are detail-oriented, outstanding communicators, and are quick to learn new technologies/concepts
Preference given to candidates with 2+ years experience designing, implementing, and maintaining databases and/or data conversion/ETL pipelines
B.A., B.S., or similar degree in a technical discipline (Engineering, Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics) is strongly preferred
Knowledge of, or prior experience with, real estate data integrations is a plus
At Compass, our mission is to help everyone find their place in the world. This means we continually celebrate the diverse community different individuals cultivate. As an equal opportunity employer, we stay true to our mission by ensuring that our place can be anyone's place.",3.9,"Compass
3.9","New York, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
285,Staff Business Data Analyst,$61k-$110k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview


We are looking for world class analytics talent to help transform our TurboTax Live product offerings. Join the team developing innovative solutions that connect users and tax experts in new ways as we look to transform the way taxes get done.

This role will be primarily responsible for shaping the way we measure, monitor and improve quality experiences by leveraging analytics.You will partner closely with product managers, engineering teams, data scientists, and customer success managers to evaluate the quality of tax returns and drive process and systemic improvements for our TurboTax Live Experts.

Data is central to Intuits decision-making process, and analysts are a critical component to evangelize data-driven decision making as we look to scale TurboTax Live for the future.
What you'll bring


5 + years of relevant work experience in a business outcome focused analytical role
5+ years of experience in generating and presenting insights from marketing/product/customer care data. Experience in content analysis, advanced analytics, measurement and optimization
Advanced experience in database query languages (SQL), to retrieve and analyze data from database tables (e.g. AWS Redshift, AWS Athena, Vertica)
Fluency in data analysis, data manipulation, data mining including defining KPIs, statistical and predictive modeling concepts, descriptive statistics, experimental design and multivariate A/B testing
Good understanding of data structures and pipelines.
Experience with data instrumentation, interpretation and visualization tools (e.g. Tableau, Qliksense, Quicksights, Amplitude etc)
Outstanding communication skills with the ability to interact with business leaders to make business recommendations
Experience in programming languages and stats packages (e.g. Python, R) and familiarity with creating re-usable data sets with high-quality data is a plus
Detail-oriented with superior organizational skills
Experience working in a scaled agile framework/ scrum environment
· Genuine passion and customer empathy to find solutions to make taxes less stressful
How you will lead
Provide guidance and thought partnership to Business leaders and stakeholders on how best to harness available data in support of critical business needs and goals.
Manage the full cycle of iterative big data exploration, including hypothesis formulation, algorithm development, data cleansing, testing, insight generation/visualization, and action planning
Use considerable expertise and independent judgment in collaborating with peers, data engineers, database managers, and business analysts in designing and implementing the research strategy needed to methodically and iteratively structure, extract, cleanse, sample, test, validate, and communicate data backed insights from complex sources and significant volumes of data for complex and unique business problems
Apply proven methods and skills in working with divergent data types, data scales, and big data (petabytes), to explore and extrapolate data-backed insights using advanced predictive modeling and testing on data acquired and cleansed from a range of sources (relational and non-relational NoSQL databases)
Partner with cross-functional teams including Customer Success, Expert Network, Product, Engineering, and Analytics to design and build analytics and reporting tools that are instrumental to self serving insights and gathering learnings.
Maintain a culture of high-quality output and growth mindset. Effectively communicate at all levels, ensure that work gets done well and on time, respond effectively to unexpected pivots in plan and prioritize for best outcomes
· Ability to tell stories with data, educate effectively, and instill confidence, motivating stakeholders to act on recommendations.",4.3,"Intuit - Data
4.3","Tucson, AZ",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1983,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
286,Data Analyst,$34k-$62k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Type Permanent Staff (EHRA NF)
Department Social Medicine-424901
Working Title Data Analyst
Appointment Type EHRA Non-Faculty
Position Posting Category Information Technology
Salary Range $51,500-$70,000
Full Time/Part Time? Full-Time Permanent
Hours per Week 40
Vacancy ID NF0004593
Position ID 20037318
Posting Open Date 10/19/2020
Application Deadline 11/02/2020
Open Until Filled No
Proposed Start Date 11/30/2020
Position Summary

The COVID-19 virus (SARS-CoV-2) is especially devastating for those who are housed or work in criminal justice settings due to restricted access to sanitizing supplies and personal protective equipment, close congregant living conditions, and exposure to correctional staff who unknowingly transmit the infection from the community. These populations are also more likely to experience severe and life-threatening symptoms of COVID-19, due to higher rates of underlying medical conditions.

This position is funded by an NIH funded RADx-UP grant, which aims to increased access to COVID-19 testing among historically marginalized and underserved populations.

The hired candidate will join an interdisciplinary research team, led by Dr. Lauren Brinkley-Rubinstein, that will investigate, develop, and implement long-term COVID-19 testing strategies among incarcerated populations and correctional staff in diverse criminal justice settings across the country.

The hired candidate will have experience in computer science and web scraping (experience with Python, R, etc.) who is also able to manage data sets and provide analyses, as needed. Their job activities would be to help make the COVID Prison Project (which is getting support from the RADx) more sustainable through improved web scraping functionality, helping build out the CPP website as needed, providing support around the data management of the RADx, and assist with analyses and data visualizations for external partners to digest the data more easily.

This position provides informatics expertise to facilitate design, development, and provisioning of research datasets tailored to individual study needs. The position will perform hands-on data mining using graphical user interface (GUI) tools (i2b2/SHRINE, PopMedNet, CLARK, SAS, SAP Business Objects, et cetera) and SQL to extract aggregate and patient-level datasets to meet study requirements, provision datasets to requesters, provide consultation and help sessions to requesters, and assist with regulatory matters as they relate to PHI data.

This position will interface with workgroup teams, project management staff, governance committees, and others on a regular basis. This position will also be responsible for attending webinars and conference calls, as well as offering consultations, recommendations, and basic training to internal and external faculty and other stakeholders.

Educational Requirements

Master’s or Bachelor’s degree and 0-2 years’ experience
or will accept a combination of related education and experience in substitution.
Degree or coursework in Clinical or Biomedical Informatics strongly preferred.

Qualifications and Experience
Preference for the selected candidate to have a master’s degree in computer, business, math/science related curriculum. A certificate and/or degree in clinical informatics is highly preferred. Minimum of 1 year of experience working with database systems and data mining.
Proven understanding of security and regulatory requirements surrounding protected health information (PHI).
Understanding of clinical research study design and methodologies.
Basic knowledge of SQL is preferred, as well as experience with GUI data mining tools such as i2b2 and/or SAP Business Objects.
Ability to maintain a high degree of accuracy and professionalism with strong attention to detail.
Excellent written and oral interpersonal communication skills.
Proven ability to work in a team environment.
Equal Opportunity Employer

The University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, color, disability, gender, gender expression, gender identity, genetic information, national origin, race, religion, sex, sexual orientation, or status as a protected veteran.

Special Instructions
Quick Link http://unc.peopleadmin.com/postings/184618
Department Contact Name and Title Sarah Morgan - Research Project Manager
Department Contact Telephone or Email numberbe@email.unc.edu
Office of Human Resources",4.3,"University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill
4.3","Chapel Hill, NC",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
287,Data Analyst,$36k-$66k (Glassdoor Est.),"This isÂPriyaÂfromÂComTech Global Inc.ÂI was reviewing your resume online and would like to talk to you regarding an exciting opportunity we have with one of ComTech GlobalÂ's premier clients.ÂYour experience looks like a good fit for the position and I wanted to know if you would be interested in exploring this opportunity.
Data Analyst
Blue Bell, PA or Orlando, FL
Contract
Locals highly preferred
The Senior Data Analyst drives Pharma client analytics solution supporting many of the world's largest pharmaceutical companies to improve patient lives, support drug safety programs, and help manage new Clinical studies. This is 100% remote now, once COVID restrictions are lifted it will be 2 days/wk onsite and 3 days/remote â Local candidates only! They can have candidates sit in either BLUE BELL, PA or ORLANDO, FL â so you can submit candidates local to either of these 2 locations, please!
We are looking for a strong Data Analyst with good SQL Skills, some BI/Data Warehouse experience and reporting skills (ideally w/ Tableau)

Please have candidates complete the following skill grid below with their YEARS of experience so I can include this with my submittal
Required Skills
Candidates years of experience with the required skills
BS in a technical field (BI, Analytics, Data Science, IS, Computer Science

Advanced SQL skills
Dashboard design experience; Tableau
Project Management skills
Master's Degree (BI, Analytics, Data Science) â nice to have
Healthcare experience â nice to have
From the Manager:
-Looking for a True Data Analyst with some BI/Data Warehousing/SQL/Reporting skills
-Not looking for someone w/ a Data Science background
Required Qualifications
-BS in a technical field (BI, Analytics, Data Science, IS, Computer Science).
-Advanced SQL skills.
-Advanced dashboard design skills, including 2+ years of experience with Tableau.
-Excellent communication and presentation ability.
-Excellent project management skills.
-Highly self-motivated.
Preferred Qualifications
-MS in a Data-related field (BI, Analytics, Data Science).
-Expert-level SQL skills
-Expert-level Tableau skills.
-Healthcare (ideally Pharma) experience â nice to have
Responsibilities
-Build and continually improve Tableau dashboard offerings for business partners.
-Serve as Subject Matter Expert (SME) for business data, systems and processes under teams area of support.
-Write and edit SQL code to ensure data is pulled optimally.",4.0,"Comtech Global Inc
4.0","Orlando, FL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,"Health, Beauty, & Fitness",Consumer Services,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
288,Data Analyst,-1,"Remote to start and once the environment changes, the candidate will be located in Denver

Minimum Qualifications:
2+ years of professional experience in an analytical role
Excellent data analysis skills and a strong sense of curiosity
Experience with SEO and/or web analytics (i.e., Adobe Analytics or Google Analytics)
Experience with data visualization tools (i.e., PowerBI, Data Studio, Tableau, Looker, etc.)
Experience connecting to and extracting data through an API
Proficiency with Python, R, or other similar programming languages
Ability to work with multiple cross-functional teams and drive results
Preferred Qualifications:
Collaborative in your approach to problem-solving
Bachelor’s degree in mathematics, statistics, marketing, or computer science is a plus
Self-starter, highly organized, and strong critical thinking skills
Experience with A/B testing
Comfortable presenting data and crafting compelling stories to influence decisions
Eager to take on new challenges and see tasks through to completion
Responsibilities:
Lead the data analytics vision for the Global SEO Strategy team
Produce insights and visualizations rapidly to assist the team in reporting the impact of SEO optimization performance
Execute deep-dive analyses that provide clear, actionable insights and opportunities
Extract and ingest data using the APIs of various search tools
Extract and clean data, creating visualizations as needed to assist in storytelling the results of SEO analysis
Create reports and dashboards to guide decision-making and track performance for the team
Make data and reporting updates as needed to ensure accuracy, conducting QA of data and working as needed to resolve data quality issues
Partner with internal teams to extract and ingest data into Autodesk data platforms
Work with engineering teams and other data analysts to lead the direction of SEO data automation projects, establishing appropriate metrics and KPIs for the organic channel
Contract length: 6 months

Job Types: Full-time, Contract

Salary: $35.00 - $40.00 per hour

Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
web analytics: 2 years (Required)
Python: 1 year (Required)
PowerBI: 1 year (Required)",-1,Applicantz,"Denver, CO",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
289,Data Analyst,$29k-$53k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description

To support our ongoing development, we are looking for a highly motivated and experienced Business Data Analyst to join our IT team. The selected candidate will work closely with our IT Leadership to understand and implement the business intelligence needs of the company. Successful candidates will have a proven track record of extracting, interpreting, analyzing and presenting data with a high focus on accuracy and data integrity. They must possess a strong background in SQL server and Grafana BI. The ideal candidate will have a keen eye for detail and possess excellent problem-solving and organizing skills and will be able to quickly adapt to evolving priorities. Because you will work closely with cross-functional teams to strategize and develop solutions, excellent communication and collaboration skills are also a must. This position is based at our location in Henderson, NV but can also be remote.

Responsibilities

Manages the design, development, implementation and maintenance of reports, dashboards and analysis tools
Provides regular reporting within specified deadlines
Providing detailed and accurate reporting (weekly, monthly, quarterly and annually) to leadership, managers and all other related stakeholders
Rigorously documents processes and procedures used for all reporting and analyses
Tracking activity in our project management suite, ensuring timelines and priorities are executed.
Communicating effectively with excellent interpersonal, verbal and written communication skills.
Displaying a positive, open-minded attitude and can-do outlook in all circumstances while being highly receptive to feedback
Working independently and as part of a team in a fast-paced environment while handling multiple projects and deadlines, and performing other duties and responsibilities as assigned with exceptional follow-through

Qualifications

3+ years experience in data, analytics and reporting
3+ years experience with MS SQL and MS SQL based information systems
2+ years experience with Grafana BI
Superior attention to detail and customer service skills
Ability to thrive in a fast-paced work environment and adapt quickly to changing priorities with a can-do attitude
Strong organizational skills, great follow-through and perfectionist standards
Excellent written and verbal communication skills and strong interpersonal skills
Team player who has ability to thrive in a collaborative work environment
Strong proficiency with Microsoft Office: Word, Excel and Outlook",3.4,"First Legal
3.4","Henderson, NV",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Legal,Accounting & Legal,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
290,Data Analyst,$33k-$57k (Glassdoor Est.),"COMPANY INFORMATION:

LEGACY Supply Chain recently acquired Direct Shot Distributing who is a leading provider of third-party logistics and order fulfillment services for a broad spectrum of channels and industries. With a network of modern, strategically located warehouse and distribution facilities across North America, and a sophisticated suite of complementary service capabilities, Direct Shot Distributing delivers a seamless commerce experience.

SUMMARY STATEMENT:

Key individual who is responsible to work with management in creating and overseeing all areas of key performance indicator analysis and reporting for Direct Shot Distributing.

Individual will work closely with Business Units and Direct Shot Distributing Departments to ensure the highest level of quality, excellent customer service and timely resolution of issues.

Responsible for reporting Business Units contractual metrics performance on a daily, weekly, and monthly or ad hoc basis. Works with the Coordinators and Distribution Center teams to report performance results, analysis and corrective actions, while looking at ways to improve service.

JOB RESPONSIBILITIES AND DUTIES, including but not limited to the following:

Define key performance reporting metrics and implement processes to ensure timely reporting of such results.
Coordinates all operations for accounts as it relates to reporting
Work closely with Distribution Centers and IT to ensure reporting systems and tools are fully operational 24x7x365.
Responsible for creating ad hoc online queries, inquiries, and daily reports using industry best practices and tools available including within OPM, WMS and business reporting tools.
Monitor vendor performance information for various customers if applicable.
Resolve Claims for KPI Reporting issues.
Responsible for performance management reporting process to drive optimal staff efficiency and effectiveness in reaching the department goals.
Work with Billing Department to ensure Business Units monthly billing is correct.
Creating Daily/Weekly/Monthly Reporting – of KPI’s with a focus on creating automated process to create such reports.
Work with Content Companies and Distribution Center as it relates to daily, weekly, monthly forecasting.
Ad hoc queries and reporting using industry best practices.
Providing support in Controls and Balancing – work with Distribution Coordinators and Account Management -
Daily balancing of transaction movement between processing systems, by researching all areas found to be out of balance and notifying responsible parties of balance issues.
Weekly inventory balancing between shipping and warehousing systems, by researching all areas found to be out of balance, deciding when compare adjustments should be applied and why and updating the compare report for audits.
Daily/Weekly/Monthly review and control over:
Advanced shipping notices
Open In-bound orders
Open In-transit orders
Vendor Incident reports
Inventory Accuracy reports
Dock to Stock Reports
Inventory Adjustment Reports
Article Suspense
Review of N/R and Prepack adjustments
Pull together the monthly data used in the creation of the Parato Charts
Other duties as may be assigned by Manager of Business Operations.

QUALIFICATIONS:

College degree
2 years experience in warehousing and logistics
Previous supply chain or retail analysis experience preferred
Strong analytical skills required
Must be proficient in MS Excel
Knowledge working with SQL
Individual must be highly skilled in the use of all MS Office programs, Internet and eMail
Ideal candidate will demonstrate a willingness to learn and expand their skill set as well as a desire to constantly find ways to improve our day-to-day business processes
Independent thinker – must have ability to analyze data, interpret business impact and make decisions
Excellent phone usage and etiquette; clearly understood speech
Excellent grammar and usage of the English language
Accurate data entry and 10-key
Proven demonstration of effective delegation and follow-up
Proven positive people skills
Must maintain a professional demeanor
Ability to stand, sit, and walk",3.3,"Legacy Supply Chain
3.3","Franklin, IN",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1983,Company - Private,Transportation Management,Transportation & Logistics,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
291,Data Analyst,$38k-$66k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Summary:

VieMed is seeking a dynamic, critical thinking Data Analyst to assist the organization in creating and modifying business intelligence tools. These tools will provide world class services to our Executives, Sales, Finance and other internal teams as well as identifying opportunities through data for VieMed’s continual growth. By performing these duties, VieMed will be able to better communicate with its providers, payors, patients and therapists and provide an overall higher level of service.

Position Responsibilities:

Assists in the design, coding, and testing of technical analytical solutions.
Applies knowledge of standard system development lifecycle process and utilizes our methodology effectively on all projects.
Applies knowledge of industry trends and developments to improve service to our clients.
Clearly articulates roles, project goals, and timelines as they relate to project and development plans, as needed.
Adheres to coding standards defined by technical management.
Accurately prepares written business correspondence that is coherent, grammatically correct, effective and professional.
Accurately employs our development tools.
Establishes responsible deadlines and personal work plans.
Listens to others and accepts input from team members.
Responsible for plan performance reporting and trend analyses.
Conducts research and produces actionable insights on healthcare economics issues and trends.
Establishes effective working relationship with other members of the Technology team.
Contributes to team effort by accomplishing related results regularly. Adheres to Scrum Agile practices and consistently delivers results on time.
Works with our Finance and Sales teams to create customized and ad-hoc reports by compiling and translating data from all available financial monitoring sources into meaningful actionable reports.
Analyzes data from external sources in various formats from spreadsheets to relational databases and creates meaningful visualizations that solve business problems.
Prepares data and reports for use in presentations for providers, customers and VieMed’s Executive Team.
Evaluates, researches, and creates reports for departmental operations flows to help increase efficiency and reduce wasted steps and roadblocks.
Designs, creates and deploys data visualization dashboards within departments that display KPIs and team performance.
Creates data loads and feeds into organizational data warehouse.
Assists team with maintaining data warehouse.

Requirements:

Bachelor's degree in statistics, mathematics, information systems, computer science, finance, information management, economics or similar quantitative area or the equivalent of four (4) years of work experience in field.
Two (2) years experience in applying quantitative analytics tools, methods and processes.
Preferred previous experience/working knowledge of health insurance industry, processes and data requirements.
Self-starter with the ability to think critically to solve business problems.
Strong analytic, problem solving, and troubleshooting skills.
Ability to communicate technical concepts to a non-technical audience.
Experience with SQL and data extraction tools.
Experience with data visualization, charts, dashboards and reporting tools.
Exceptional attention to detail.
Experience with Tableau, Microstrategy, Power BI, Sisense and/or other visualization programs.
Ability to support key business initiatives through positive relationships, effective communication and cross-team collaboration.
Strong business orientation and passion for customer service and results.

We are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration without regard to their race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, status as a protected veteran, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.9,"VieMed
4.9","Lafayette, LA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
292,Data Analyst - MS Excel & Access,$75k-$135k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job ID: 169210

This position will analyze historical data and projections of future activity to understand levels of inventory across all districts. Create schedules that dictate assessment and trim/removal timeframes for all programs in each district. Work with the Scheduling & Resource Balancing Manager to get an in-depth understanding of the prioritization of each program based on fire risk and other factors. Continuously monitor progress and update current year schedule based on new data received from Fulcrum, Survey123 and other systems. Identify gaps between master schedule forecasts and actual program progress and ensure program stays on track to meet annual goals.

Requirements:

This position will support long term planning within the Planning & Compliance organization. They will also provide regulatory and strategic support across all of company programs. *Strong experience working with MS Excel, Access.*

Job Type: Contract

Schedule:
Monday to Friday",3.3,"Cenergy International Services
3.3","Pomona, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
293,Data Analyst,$29k-$51k (Glassdoor Est.),"Develops and maintains institutional databases, which facilitate internal and external reporting.

Essential Functions

Coordinates with internal/external entities to collect, manage, and analyze data; verifies information for completeness and accuracy.

Compiles data for report generation that satisfies internal/external funding reporting requirements.

Provides timely data analysis and generates reports for dissemination at presentations, trainings, and board meetings.

Designs, implements, and manages relational databases to meet obligatory set of data required by funding agencies; records and arranges information in specified order or groupings.

Analyzes user requirements, procedures, and problems to automate processing or to improve existing computer system.

Reviews computer system capabilities, workflow, and scheduling limitations to determine if requested program or program change is possible within existing system.

Studies existing information processing systems to evaluate effectiveness and develops new systems to improve production or workflow as required.

Upgrades system and corrects errors to maintain system after implementation; trains users in use of equipment.

Knowledge of all Microsoft Office software and able to learn and use institutional software systems.

Complies with all State and University policies.

Other duties may be assigned.

No supervisory responsibilities.

Required Qualifications

To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Bachelor’s Degree.

Two years of experience, related to the statement of duties and responsibilities; or equivalent combination of education and experience.

Training in developing and analyzing institutional databases, which facilitate internal and external reporting.

Working Conditions

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to sit; use hands to feel; and reach with hands and arms. The employee is occasionally required to stand; walk; and talk or hear. The employee must regularly be able to lift and move up to 50 lbs.

The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
The noise level for this work environment is usually moderate.

EO/AA Statement

The University of Texas at El Paso is an Equal Opportunity / Affirmative Action Employer. The University does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, national origin, sex, religion, age, disability, genetic information, veteran status, or sexual orientation and gender in employment or the provision of services in accordance with state and federal law. Discrimination on the basis of sex includes an employee’s or prospective employee’s right to be free from sexual harassment under Title IX of the Higher Education Amendments of 1972.",4.3,"University of Texas at El Paso
4.3","El Paso, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1914,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
294,Data Analyst,$53k-$96k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who We Are and What We Are All About:
Join global leaders in engineered materials to power, protect and connect our world with Rogers Corporation. At Rogers Corporation, we’re changing how the world uses technology. We develop innovative specialty materials and components that enable technology in a wide array of high-growth markets. Our customers demand high performance and reliability, so we are always looking for people who enjoy a challenge, make things happen and get results. Integrity is at the heart of how we work. We excel at building enduring relationships that foster trust between our colleagues and our business partners. We work creatively and cross-functionally, making a rewarding environment. To grow with a global, results-oriented company, explore our latest job listings.

Summary/Objective:
Rogers Corporation is currently seeking a talented individual to join the Enterprise Information Management team at its site in Chandler, AZ. This position reports to the Manager of Enterprise Data. The hired individual will be responsible for data mapping, data conversion responsibilities and data definitions for Enterprise Information Management team. Leading annual efforts to execute the data lifecycle management reviews and completion with business process owners. Primary responsibility for maintaining business rules and generating profiling for data quality tools assessments. This individual will work across all data domains to calculate data quality KPIs, communicate to data owners and data stewards, monitoring corrective actions required, follow up on non-compliant data quality KPIs. Troubleshoot general problems and make recommendations on appropriate corrective actions. This individual will work with all layers of the organization and great communications skills are a must.

Essential Functions:

Data conversions, data mapping, data definitions and data lifecycle management will be completed with the assistance from business process owners, data stewards and center of excellence teams globally.
Maintaining working knowledge of business processes and data policies to understand the critical business rules, application of the rules within the Data Quality tools and how that impacts the data profiling and KPIs.
Interpret the business data defined by the business process owners and develop business rules for each of Rogers’s businesses within the data quality software.
Work with Data Stewards to improve accuracy of master data and maintain it through monthly monitoring of data quality KPIs for each data domain.
Generates ad hoc reports and regular datasets or report information for end-users using system tools and database or data warehouse queries and scripts. Maintain professional training and knowledge of our key software applications that store master data records.
Perform adhoc cleanup projects as assigned.
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Required Education and Experience:
Graduate degree in Data Management, Business or Information Systems or related field
7+ years’ experience working in a professional setting
5+ years’ experience data quality or data management field
Working knowledge of SAP Information Steward or equivalent data quality tools
Experience in multiple tier-one platforms such as SAP, Microsoft Dynamics, PeopleSoft, SalesForce.com
Experience utilizing multiple software platforms daily
Ability to select and consistently apply standard policies and procedures
Working knowledge of data quality and data lineage is preferred
Required Skills and Abilities:
Ability to engage and communicate at manager level and above to provide clear, concise explanations of data governance concepts, programs and initiatives
Ability to communicate with lower levels of the organization, helping them understand how their work aligns with the larger efforts of Enterprise Information Management.
Must be a self-starter, able to work independently with a proactive working style
Excellent verbal and written communication skills.
Expertise skills utilizing Excel
Ability to work quickly and accurately under pressure and time constraints
Demonstrated critical thinking and analytical skills are required; ability to apply systems knowledge to troubleshoot and analyze new issues is critical
Ability to visualize data to depict the information to aid in decision making
Preferred Education and Experience:
10+ years’ experience working in a professional setting
7+ years’ experience data quality or data management field
Preferred Skills and Abilities:
Adaptive and attune to changing prioritizing within global manufacturing organization
Ability to work in a fast paced, multi-tasking, high transaction team environment.
Why work for Rogers

With an outstanding work environment, vast developmental opportunities, and a top-notch benefit package, we empower employees with a culture of excellence. Come join a winning team! Rogers Corporation provides equal employment opportunities to minorities, females, veterans, and disabled individuals, as well as other protected groups.

How You Can Apply for this Position

Visit us at: www.rogerscorp.com/careers to apply!

About Rogers Corporation:
Rogers Corporation (NYSE:ROG) is a global leader in engineered materials to power, protect and connect our world. With more than 180 years of materials science and engineering experience, Rogers delivers high performance solutions that enable Advanced Connectivity and Advanced Mobility, as well as other technologies where reliability is critical. Rogers delivers Power Electronics Solutions for energy-efficient motor drives, vehicle electrification and alternative energy; Elastomeric Materials Solutions for sealing, vibration management, and impact protection in mobile devices, transportation interiors, industrial equipment and performance apparel; and Advanced Connectivity Solutions for wireless infrastructure, automotive safety and radar systems. Headquartered in Arizona (USA), Rogers operates manufacturing facilities in the United States, China, Germany, Belgium, Hungary, and South Korea, with joint ventures and sales offices worldwide. For more information, visit www.rogerscorp.com.",2.8,"Rogers Corporation
2.8","Chandler, AZ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1832,Company - Public,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
295,Data Analyst,-1,"Integrate data from multiple data sets, analyze and interpret complex data sets and make findings relevant and actionable for both internal and external stakeholders",4.0,"COLLABORAIT, INC
4.0","Falls Church, VA",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
296,"Enterprise Data, Financial Data Analyst - Content Design Specialist Contractor",$58k-$98k (Glassdoor Est.),"We're Bloomberg Enterprise Data - fast paced, innovative and expanding. We have worked hard and smart to become the $1bn business we are today. We partner closely with our clients, taking time to understand their unique businesses and individual data and technology needs. Our endless selection of datasets, covering all asset types, with multiple delivery technologies and flexible scheduling mean our clients are able to get exactly the data they need, when they need it, in the format they prefer. Without us, they simply can't operate.

What's the role?
In this role you will be working with the Bloomberg Enterprise Data Product Management Team specifically on Reference, Regulatory, Alternative and Pricing Data. We are constantly improving our products, to make them more feature rich and application ready, whilst reducing the total cost of ownership. Product Managers have a high level of business, communication, and technology skills, so that they can create working prototypes, specify Engineering tasks, and work effectively with Sales and Clients.

You will design, specify, and create prototypes of large and varied data models and data sets, both financial and non-financial, using a wide range of tools, methods and platforms.
We expect you to evaluate areas of interest, understand what is possible and commercially viable, recognize which models and concepts should be applied, and how the data resources should be acquired. An open, creative approach is critical to your success.

Whilst designing data for diverse addressable markets, you will explore and work with a wide range of data, and apply existing methods or develop new methods. You will also engage in data analysis in a practical way, convince business leaders that your results are worth investing in and educate other analysts and business team members.

Most critically, you will deliver the output of your data design to business users (both non-technical and technical) and will be a key person in shaping the product offering and the customer experience.

We'll trust you to

Operate in an influential business role within a fast growing area.
Design and specify commercially attractive products.
Grow your business and technology skills.
Understand addressable markets.
Evaluate what is possible and viable.
Take responsibility for the Data Architecture of multiple data sets.
Work with Engineering, Product Managers, Sales, and Clients.
You'll need to have:
Experience with financial data
Familiar with specifying and using large structured data and data sets to solve complex business demands
Experience in working with Global Teams, across Sales, Technology, Operations and customers
The ability to address multiple priorities in an extremely fast-paced environment.
Legal authorization to work full-time in the United States and will not require visa sponsorship now or in the future
If this sounds like you:Apply if you think we're a good match! We'll get in touch to let you know what the next steps are, but in the meantime feel free to have a look at this:https://www.bloomberg.com/professional/solution/data-and-content We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, colour, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.",3.9,"Bloomberg
3.9","New York, NY",-1,10000+ Employees,1981,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
297,Data Analyst,$33k-$61k (Glassdoor Est.),"This key supporting role on the Digital Business Development team will build reports and monitor the performance of revenue and expense streams to monitor ROI and product margins. This position will work directly within the Digital Business Development team in conjunction with other Digital teams and departments to drive short and long-term revenue and profitability. Using Domo, DataStudio, Bigquery, Snowflake, Excel or SQL, this person will work to surface results, insights and help communicate them to various business stakeholders. In addition, this person will interpret data, and analyze results using statistical techniques and provide and improve ongoing reports. The ideal candidate has extensive experience manipulating and analyzing large data sets and possesses excellent interpersonal, communication, and problem solving skills.

ESSENTIAL DUTIES & RESPONSIBILITIES:

Own reporting on a daily weekly and monthly basis
Build forecasting models for month, quarter and year across different websites
Work closely with the Finance, Advertising and Audience Teams to align on business goals and clearly communicate changes and outcomes.
Create dashboards by pulling data from different sources and present them to management team
Answer ad-hoc analytic questions
Ensure data collection is optimized to provide crystal-clear visibility into the past, present, and future behaviors of our users
Pursue data quality, troubleshoot data validation, and see issues to resolution

QUALIFICATIONS, SKILLS & ABILITIES:

4+ years of analytical work experience, preference in Publishing or Advertising
Excel super user
Technically proficient in SQL and/or LookML, R or Python is a plus
High attention to detail
Strong organizational skills with an obsession to detail and quality
Exceptional work ethic and proven ability to overcome obstacles to deliver results
Excellent communication and presentation skills
Bachelor's degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, Engineering, Economics, Information Systems, or Marketing (with an analytic focus) from a top educational institution or other quantitative fields with relevant business experience also considered.

Lee offers a competitive salary and benefits package as well as a challenging and rewarding work environment.

Lee Enterprises is a leading provider of local news, information and advertising, serving 77 markets in 26 states. Lee’s newspapers have daily circulation of 1.2 million and our websites reach more than 43 million digital unique visitors. Check us out at www.lee.net.

Lee Enterprises is an Equal Opportunity Employer",2.6,"Lee Enterprises
2.6","Davenport, IA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1890,Company - Public,Publishing,Media,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
298,Data Analyst,$34k-$62k (Glassdoor Est.),"Location: Binghamton, NY Category: Professional Posted On: Wed Sep 16 2020 Job Description:

Budget Title: Senior Staff Assistant (SL-3)

Salary: Commensurate with experience

The Data Analyst, as part of the Office of Undergraduate Admissions, will be responsible for developing reports, providing analysis, and maintaining databases in support of admissions and enrollment.

Responsibilities include:
Collect, analyze, and interpret data from a variety of sources and prepare reports related to student recruitment, admissions, and enrollment management
Complete competitor and market share analyses and research national higher ...",4.5,"Binghamton University
4.5","Binghamton, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1946,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
299,Data Analyst,$46k-$87k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Bureau of Public Health Statistics has an immediate need for an experienced, knowledgeable epidemiologist or data analyst to take the lead in data submissions and analysis for two major projects.

The first is the Health Professionals Registry, for which data submission, and the design and construction of an integrated database will begin in December and January.

Second, the candidate will pursue a detailed medical marijuana data analysis using Behavioral Risk Factor Surveillance Survey (BRFSS) 2019 data.

Working knowledge of SAS and complex data systems is critical.",4.4,"novalink Solutions llc
4.4","Phoenix, AZ",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2003,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
